The tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend crowd had bought our country a one-way ticket to economic oblivion. The American people were just hanging on. That reminds me a little of that fellow that fell off a cliff and on the way down, grabbed a branch, a limb that was sticking out from the cliff. And he hung there, and he looked down at the rocks, hundreds of feet below, and he was yelling for help.

Well, by 1980 the American people had lost faith with the liberals who claimed we could spend our way to better times, and if we raised taxes only the other guy would pay. Well, we Republicans believe in a fundamentally different approach.

Republican House Members you've sent to Washington. They've been real heroes in our battle to invigorate America's economy and rebuild her defenses. And a special thanks for Congressman Bill Broomfield. His leadership in the House Foreign Affairs Committee has been a great service to our country. And there's another leader that Michigan has loaned to our crusade for whom I'm most grateful, but he had to stay back in Washington -- Guy Vander Jagt. As chairman of the National Republican Congressional Committee, he's been a major player in the Nation's Capital. We depend on him, and thank you for sending him to us.

The individuals I just mentioned, along with Republican activists around this country, share a vision of a strong, prosperous America -- a land where people are free to go as far as their talents and hard work will take them. I think it's especially appropriate that I am here, in this city where our dream began in 1980, to support a team which so exemplifies this American dream. I'm talking about Bill Lucas and Colleen Engler, the next Governor and Lieutenant Governor of the State of Michigan.

Kay Orr. Women in America are taking on the tough jobs and, at long last, getting the credit they deserve. You know, if I can refer back to that business I used to be in -- it's not like the days of Ginger Rogers. Her male counterpart got the lion's share of the publicity, but Ginger Rogers did everything that Fred Astaire did -- and did it with high heels on, and doing it backwards.

In the last few years something wonderful has been happening in America. We're showing as never before that we're truly the land of opportunity. The number of women in elected offices has risen dramatically, now over 18,000 nationwide. In just 6 years the number of elected black officials has risen from under 5,000 to almost 6,500.

And not only in politics and government but in every field of endeavor, economic recovery is ushering in a new era of progress and expanding potentials for all Americans. It's incumbent on all of us who so strongly believe in the opportunity society to be personally involved in campaigns like this one here in Michigan. So, it's a special privilege for me to be here in support of an individual whose life is testimony to the ideals that we hold so dear. I hope that between now and election day, you'll do everything in your power to make certain that Bill Lucas is the next Governor of this State. [Applause] I was going to ask if I could count on you, but you've already answered.

Bill was born in Harlem and is an example to every young person in this country, of every race, of what an individual can accomplish if he lives right, works hard, and sets his sights high. Bill was a social worker and a teacher in New York, an investigator for the Civil Rights Commission, and an agent for the FBI. He has dedicated his life to this country, seeing to it that America is the land that God intended her to be. This is a man who has put his life on the line to make our streets safe and secure. Three times during his law enforcement career, when he was a policeman in New York, a gun was aimed at him, the trigger pulled, and then the gun misfired. So, when I say thank God we've got a man like Bill Lucas around, I really mean it.

Now, some people think that Bill Lucas is unique because he is profamily, because he is conservative, and because he balanced Wayne County's budget without raising taxes. Now, I don't think that's unique; I think that's the way government ought to be run. And about those taxes, Bill says the people of this State deserve a tax cut. His opponent has done everything in his power to get his hands in your pockets. It's a classic contest between the old liberal ideas of tax and spend versus the vibrant, new philosophy that has pushed America into an era of growth and economic expansion. Of course, I know there are those who claim that all the progress we've had nationally is a spillover from developments here in Michigan. [Laughter] Well, I can only say that it's pretty clear Michigan would be doing a lot better if it had a Governor who believes in high growth and low taxes, a Governor like Bill Lucas. Let the others talk about a comeback State; Bill Lucas will make this a go-ahead State.

Bill and I have much in common. We share the values of hard work, family, God, and love of country. And he was a Democrat and switched, and so was I. You know, it's a cliche, but you've heard it before, but it's true. You know, the Democratic Party didn't -- we didn't really leave it, it left us a long time ago. I'm sure there must be some Democrats in an audience like this or some who have been and switched. The truth of the matter is, there are millions of patriotic Democrats across this country who are totally out of step with the leadership of their party, which is still going down that old-fashioned road of taking your money and giving you orders. I -- having been Governor of California and knowing that Bill wants to be Governor -- I can tell you, he'll make a heck of a chief executive for this State. So, tell your neighbors and friends: Come November 4th, it's Colleen Engler for Lieutenant Governor and ``Cool Hand'' Luke for Governor.

Seriously, though, it's a pleasure to have this chance to speak with you and to be in a State that has meant so much to the Republican Party and the success that we've enjoyed in these last 6 years. Let me just say that your GOP delegation to Congress is terrific. I owe a great debt to each and every one of them. And that's especially true for Bill Broomfield, the dean of the GOP's Michigan delegation. And one other individual I rely on, would be remiss if I didn't single him out -- Guy Vander Jagt. And I thank you for lending him to the country. These are true champions of our cause.

The measure of their success can be found in the change that's now taking place in the Republican Party. It wasn't that long ago when party ranks were dwindling and registrations were down. And after being over there in that rally just a short time ago, and seeing the young people that were there -- I remember right after I became a Republican, I commented to Nancy once after coming back from an affair that the only young people we saw there looked like they couldn't join anything else. [Laughter] Well, that's not so anymore.

America drifted into the second half of the 1970's, liberal power reached its zenith. Our opponents gained full control of both Houses of Congress, and they'd held it for almost 30 years. The Presidency, all of the executive departments and agencies and, at the same time, they held all of those and dominated much of the State and local government throughout the Nation. The liberal agenda only had one flaw: It didn't work. High taxes, central planning, and heavyhanded Federal controls were about as good for America as Mrs. O'Leary's cow was for Chicago. [Laughter] As our country sank into decline and uncertainty, a revitalized Republican Party -- dedicated to building a free, prosperous, and secure America -- emerged to meet the challenge.

Together, a new beginning. And it was a new beginning, for our country and for the Republican Party. In Michigan this new day began when the GOP took control of the State senate. Isn't it great that the chairman of today's event, John Engler, is the senate majority leader? Today we're the party of new ideas and open doors; we're the party of opportunity and freedom, of strength and ideals.

And I've been meeting them all over the country -- in schools, in universities and college campuses, in shops and factories, and above all, on our military bases. This generation is the best darn group of young people we've seen in a long, long time. And I understand that we have with us a courageous young heroine, Meenu Sundareson, who risked her life to rescue an infant on board the plane in the recent hijacking in Pakistan. And, Meenu, I just want to thank you personally, and to say how proud we all are of you. There she is. God bless you.

Well, as Bill Lucas and I can both tell you, even once you've got your eyes open, making that change in registration is the most difficult hurdle to jump. And yet so many are jumping over and joining us. They know that today ours is the party of all the people, while the leadership of the other side remains paralyzed by a dependency on special interests and tied to the failed ideas of the past.

There is no better symbol of the realignment taking place in our country than your ticket here in Michigan. Colleen Engler has both youth and experience on her side. She knows that women are not just welcome in the Republican Party; they're welcome in the leadership of the Republican Party. The days of looking for the best man are over. What we Republicans are looking for now is the best candidate, period.

And let me stress the difference between our parties is clear on this front as well. We don't choose someone based on his or her race or sex in an attempt to curry favor from this or that particular group. We're looking for leaders who share our ideals and have the talent necessary to get the job done. And again, we Republicans are looking for the best candidate, period. And the best candidate for Governor of Michigan is Bill Lucas, period.

Bill's a man who has gained the respect of anyone who's ever known him. Born and raised -- as I've already told you in that televised account -- he was raised in Harlem, and after his parents died, his aunt cared for him as her own child. And this honest compassion and example of family responsibility, no doubt, made a lasting impression. Early on, Bill learned what commitment and the desire to achieve are all about.

I want to thank you for having me with you here today. And I hope you'll do all you can to see to it that Bill and Colleen and the other Republican candidates are elected and reelected. And there's no way to say how rewarding all of this has been for me to come here and to see you. You know, sometimes in Washington, you kind of lose track of what the real Americans are doing across the Potomac and outside the District. But it's wonderful to be here with you, and, please, send these two people to the statehouse. We need them.

Well, we set to work to change all that. We went to the American people and told them: The economy's gone sour. Taxes are too high. We're overregulated. And there's one simple reason for it: The Federal Government is too big, and it spends too much of your money. And we told the American people that there was one way to end the years of tax and tax and spend and spend, and that was to elect fewer liberals and a whole lot more Republicans. Well, the people heard us, they heard us, and we started moving. One example: tax brackets -- they were too high and the liberals in Washington wanted them to go higher. We not only stood fast against the liberals' demand, we actually cut taxes, enacting an across-the-board personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. Then we indexed taxes to the rate of inflation, thereby ending the hidden tax of bracket creep. You'll remember with that runaway inflation, and you'd get a cost-of-living pay raise -- didn't make you any better off, just tried to keep pace with the rising cost of living. But because the tax was based on the number of dollars you got, not their worth, you were worse off, not better off -- because the income tax went up.

Well, even then, the old habits of tax and tax and spend and spend died hard. The critics didn't like our program of low taxes and limited government and sneeringly called it Reaganomics. And they found a battle cry for their campaign in '84, shouting at the American people: ``We're going to raise your taxes!'' The American people didn't bother to shout back.

Here in Nebraska, and around the country, they just went into the polling booths and pulled the Republican lever. And, ladies and gentlemen, I think we Republicans had a right to the support we got. Our policies brought down inflation, taxes, and interest rates.

But it's true that in the midst of this expansion, some sectors of our economy are having their troubles -- sectors like farming. And when we're talking about problems down on the farm, I believe we're talking about more than statistics like crop yields and land prices, we're talking about a way of life sustained and nurtured by the soil -- the oldest way of life that Americans know. And with this in mind, our administration has provided more support for America's farmers than did the administrations of the last five Presidents combined -- spending an amount, this year alone, totaling some $26 billion. Our economic program has resulted in lower farm production costs, and we're working hard to expand the overseas market for American farm products. And a native Nebraskan -- our special trade representative, Ambassador Clayton Yeutter, is playing a central role in this effort.

Yes, times are still hard for many Nebraska farmers, but they've begun to get better. World markets are expanding. In just the next 3 years, the number of people on Earth will grow more than enough to populate another America. I was beginning to think there was an echo in here -- [referring to hecklers in the audience].

I didn't come here today to talk about Washington. But I do have a good reason for bringing up these issues of low taxes and economic growth. You see, Kay Orr believes in the same things you and I do -- that the way to move Nebraska ahead isn't by inflating the Government budget at the expense of the family budget, but by keeping taxes equitable and low and fostering sound and lasting economic growth. That sounds good to me. How about to you? [Applause] Of course, the liberal Democratic leaders opposing Kay are promising the people of this great State that, honest, this time they aren't going to increase spending and taxes. Well, permit me to offer some advice from a fellow who deals with the liberals every day in Washington: When it comes to tax and tax and spend and spend, some of them mean well, but the liberals are just like Oscar Wilde -- they can resist everything but temptation. Or to make play on something the late Will Rogers once said: These liberals never met a tax they didn't hike.

Then there's the crucial matter of experience. As State treasurer, Kay gained the skills she'll need to lead Nebraska on to a new era of prosperity and growth. She'll be able to provide a school system that strives for excellence at every level. And as I said, she'll promote new jobs and economic growth while keeping taxes low. And she'll work to provide Nebraska farmers with expanded and more reliable markets. And although Kay and Bill are running for Governor and Lieutenant Governor, their campaign has importance that extends beyond Nebraska itself to all parts of the Nation. For by electing them the people of this State will be sending a message to the rest of the Nation, and especially to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. The message: Stop the taxing; stop the spending; and make government live within its means. That's a message the liberals need to hear.

And let me just say something else in here while I'm talking this. Well, you've noticed that I've called -- the liberal leadership. I know that across this country there are millions of good, patriotic Democrats who are way out of step with the liberal leadership of their party. They remind me of something that happened to me when I was the drum major of the YMCA Boys Band in Dixon. We were leading the Decoration Day parade. And the man on the white horse, the parade marshal who was leading all of us, galloped back down the parade line at one point to see if everything was all right. And I'm up there with my baton, and pretty soon the music begins to sound faint. And I turned around and looked. He had arrived back up in front just in time to turn the band to the right, and there I was walking down the street all by myself. [Laughter] And that's the way with the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party -- their party turned to the right years ago, and they're still going left.

But there's another reason why the candidacy of Kay and Bill is so important. It stands for the virtually unlimited opportunity that our nation has come to offer to men and women alike. We still have a long way to go, but today American women are finding opportunities that their forebears never dreamed of.

Today over two-thirds of the women between ages 25 and 44 are employed. Half our college students are women and growing numbers of women are doctors, lawyers, police, and military officers. Today women fill almost three-quarters of all new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. And the number of women-owned businesses is growing nearly three times faster than the number of businesses owned by men. As long as I've got this microphone, I'll out-sound them -- [referring to hecklers in the audience].

Or consider that earlier today I was in Detroit campaigning for Bill Lucas, a gubernatorial candidate who's a former FBI agent and one of the most impressive men I've ever met. Bill Lucas is a Republican, and Bill Lucas is black.

This brings me back to the gains women today are making and, in particular, to women in politics. The truth is, it's the GOP, not the Democrats, that has the most women in the House of Representatives -- outstanding Members of Congress like Nebraska's own Virginia Smith.

There are two women in the United States Senate, Nancy Kassebaum of Kansas and Paula Hawkins of Florida, and both are Republicans. You know, now that I think of it, it was a certain Republican President who nominated Sandra Day O'Connor to be the first woman in history on the United States Supreme Court. And today our party has not one or two, but five women running for governorships -- including the next Governor of the great State of Nebraska, Kay Orr.

Kay, there's an experience of mine regarding women in politics that I think you and everyone here might enjoy hearing. You know, before she became Prime Minister of England, Margaret Thatcher had become, for the first time, the head of the Conservative Party in England. And it's usually expected that the head of that party, if that party wins in the next election, will become Prime Minister.

Kay Orr is one woman in government no one's going to forget. Kay, ladies and gentlemen, permit me to close today by telling you something of what I've seen during this campaign of 1986. As I mentioned a moment ago, earlier today we were in Detroit. Last week we were in Alabama and Louisiana, and before that in your neighboring State of Colorado. And everywhere I've gone, I've seen something that touched me, and something that gives heart to all of us who can still remember the self-doubt, the weakness at home and abroad, that marked so much of the sixties and seventies. I see it here today in Omaha. Call it confidence and self-assurance, what you will. It's a renewed understanding that, for all our faults, ours is a country of goodness and greatness; that despite our mistakes in the world, we've stood for human freedom with greater consistency and courage than any other nation in history; that if only we have faith, if only we look not to government but to ourselves we can build upon this economic expansion to create a new and lasting era of prosperity. And come to think of it, what I've seen has a name. It's love of country.

This new confidence and energy, this new self-assurance -- this is what Kay Orr stands for and wants to build upon here in Nebraska. So, I ask you to cast a vote for your State and for yourselves. But more than that, I ask you to cast a vote for the future of Nebraska, a vote for your children and your children's children. And I am so pleased to see so many young people here because they're what's at stake in this election. My friends, let's elect Kay Orr -- A Governor for all Nebraskans -- and Bill Nichol, a Lieutenant Governor. Send that ticket to the capitol of this great State.

Now it's time to go back to Washington. Congress is still in session, and somebody has to keep an eye on them. [Laughter] Kay and Bill, ladies and gentlemen, I'll always remember this day, and I'll always remember the good people of Omaha. You know, it's wonderful to get outside the District of Columbia, where the real people still are. I was only 6 feet and three-quarters of an inch when I walked in here, but I think I'm going to leave here about 6 feet 4. God bless you. Thank you all.

Executive Order 12532, I prohibited: (1) the making or approval of bank loans to the South African Government, with certain narrow exceptions; (2) the export of computers and related goods and technology to certain government agencies and any apartheid-enforcing entity of the South African Government; (3) nuclear exports to South Africa and related transactions, with certain narrow exceptions; (4) the import into the United States of arms, ammunition, or military vehicles produced in South Africa; and (5) the extension of export marketing support to U.S. firms employing at least twenty-five persons in South Africa that do not adhere to certain fair labor standards.

In addition, I called for (6) consultations with other parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade with a view toward adopting a prohibition on the import of Krugerrands; (7) the completion of a report on the feasibility of minting U.S. gold coins; (8) an increase in the amount provided for scholarships in South Africa to victims of apartheid and an increase in the amount allocated for South Africa in the Human Rights Fund; and (9) the establishment of an Advisory Committee to provide recommendations on measures to encourage peaceful change in South Africa.

I shall continue to exercise the powers at my disposal to apply the measures contained in Executive Orders 12532 and 12535 as long as these measures are appropriate and will report periodically to the Congress on significant developments pursuant to Section 204(c) of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act.

Railroad Retirement Board's chief actuary informs me he anticipates cash-flow problems in the rail industry pension fund, and states that ``an upward adjustment in financing can no longer be regarded as premature.'' Refinancing legislation enacted in 1974, 1981, and 1983 has been required to prevent the rail pension fund from going broke three times in the last decade, and significant, constant declines in rail employment levels continue to deteriorate rail pension assets. With yet another financial crisis threatening the pension fund's ability to pay railroad retirees' benefits, the Administration agrees with the Board's chief actuary, Board Chairman Gielow, and Board Member Chamberlain that measures are needed now to forestall financing problems. I therefore concur with Mr.

I am asking each Executive department and agency, including regional and field offices, to cooperate with existing adult literacy programs by encouraging Federal employees to volunteer to serve in these programs. Volunteer services may range from tutoring to support activities such as providing clerical assistance or transportation. Participation by individual employees in this program is entirely voluntary, but I urge you to use appropriate volunteer recognition programs in your agencies to recognize outstanding literacy volunteers.

Program to honor the outstanding volunteer achievement by individual citizens and organizations. The President will present these awards at a White House ceremony next spring. Award categories include the arts and humanities, education, the environment, health, human services, international volunteering, jobs, material resources, public safety, youth, and the workplace.

In a unique, cooperative effort between the private sector and government, VOLUNTEER: The National Center, a private, nonprofit volunteer support organization, and ACTION, the Federal volunteer agency, are cosponsoring the program for the sixth year. Funding for the program is provided by private sector corporations and foundation sponsors.

VOLUNTEER, a national organization supporting greater citizen involvement in community problem-solving, provides technical assistance to volunteer-involving organizations, public agencies, unions, and corporations. It works closely with a network of over 250 associated Volunteer Action Centers and more than 1,500 other local, State, and national organizations. ACTION serves to stimulate voluntarism and to demonstrate the effectiveness of volunteers in addressing social problems. Its major programs include the Foster Grandparent, Retired Senior Volunteer and Senior Companion programs for the elderly, Volunteers in Service to America (VISTA), and a variety of programs for youth. ACTION also promotes private sector initiatives by providing short-term grants to innovative volunteer projects in such areas as literacy and drug abuse.

President today announced his intention to nominate Fred E. Hummel to be a member of the Board of Directors of the National Institute of Building Sciences for a term expiring September 7, 1989. This is a reappointment.

Representatives of NATO and the Warsaw Pact resume the mutual and balanced force reduction (MBFR) talks today in Vienna. It has long been NATO's goal to reach a verifiable agreement that would reduce and limit conventional forces in the crucial region of central Europe. This round of talks offers an opportunity to make progress toward that end.

For its part, NATO has made every effort to lay the groundwork for success. On December 5, 1985, in order to achieve a breakthrough in these negotiations, the West tabled a proposal that accepted the framework the Warsaw Pact had proposed for a time-limited, first-phase agreement calling for initial reductions by U.S. and Soviet ground forces, followed by a no-increase commitment on all forces of the two alliances in the area. Underscoring further its desire to achieve tangible progress in Vienna, the West at the same time changed its long-held position that there should be agreement on the numbers of forces of both sides in central Europe before initial reductions were taken -- a major compromise step in the East's direction.

Eastern response to this significant move has not contributed to progress in the talks. Despite public claims by Warsaw Pact leaders that they were willing to incorporate reasonable verification measures in an agreement, the Warsaw Pact, in the draft MBFR agreement it tabled on February 20, 1986, again proposed inadequate and unacceptable measures for ensuring compliance.

Moreover, the East actually took a step backward from its 1983 verification position and would now exempt the half-million Soviet troops on annual rotation into and out of central Europe from any requirement to pass through monitoring points.

Despite this lack of movement by the East in the previous two negotiating sessions, the United States and its allies remain hopeful that success can be achieved at the Vienna negotiating table. We look to the Soviet Union to seriously respond to the important compromise proposal tabled by the West last December.

Western position in MBFR would enhance peace and stability in central Europe. All NATO nations hope that the East is capable of mustering the political will necessary to do its part to advance the Vienna negotiations. It is time for the Warsaw Pact to demonstrate that it is indeed committed to meaningful and verifiable reductions in conventional forces.

It's a pleasure to be here today to help you of the National Fraternal Congress of America to celebrate your 100th anniversary. Come to think of it, it's a pleasure to celebrate the anniversary of anything that's older than I am.

Now, it's my intention today to talk to you about voluntarism -- no easy task when you consider that the audience is full of experts. It's a little bit like preaching to the choir. [Laughter] The situation does remind me of a story. I find that, increasingly, things remind me of stories. And this was one about the fellow that was the only survivor of the Johnstown flood. And he had been quite a speaker out along the mashed-potato circuit, always telling of his adventures in surviving that great flood. And then he died and went to heaven.

So, it's with a certain humility that I'd like to speak to you for a few minutes this afternoon. And by the way, I'm sorry to say that it will be just some minutes; Congress is still in session, and I've got to get back to the office to keep an eye on them. [Laughter] But it's with humility and respect that I speak to you -- all the more so when I consider all that this Congress -- this Congress, here -- and its member organizations have accomplished during these past ten decades. Indeed, when the National Fraternal Congress was founded a century ago, it had just 16 member organizations, and today that figure has risen to the neighborhood of 100. You count millions of Americans among your members. You spend an annual amount of, well, I was going to say $225 million, but you've topped me already -- to support voluntarism and other Fraternal projects. And each year, as you've been told, your members devote -- it's now 36 million hours of volunteer work.

Well now, since, as I said a moment ago, you're experts in this field, all of you will have noticed that these are good times for fraternal and volunteer organizations, that the ethic of voluntarism seems to have gained new strength in recent years. Indeed, last year charitable giving in America amounted to some $79.8 billion, an amount larger than the national budgets of over two-thirds of the nations in the world. Perhaps still more striking, charitable contributions are rising dramatically -- between 1980 and 1985, charitable contributions increased by 82 percent. This success has not gone unnoticed. In fact, other nations around the world have realized the great value of charitable giving and voluntarism in their society. As a result, an international conference on private sector initiatives will be taking place in Paris, France, this month -- this autumn with the goal of -- or, I should say, this autumn, not this month -- with the goal of promoting such progress around the world.

This increase in volunteer work and charitable donations tells us something about the mood of the country, the temper of the national mind. Just 6 years ago our economy had stagnated, and the mood of the country had in many respects gone sour. Today all that's changed. Our economy is continuing to grow in one of the longest continuous economic expansions in our history. Our defenses are being rebuilt. And the strategic defense initiative, SDI, has challenged the assumptions that have dominated strategic planning since the end of the Second World War.

In foreign policy, the United States has reasserted itself around the world on behalf of human freedom, aiding those fighting for liberty in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, and, yes, Nicaragua. And may I say that I intend to press Congress unremittingly until it finally approves the assistance to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters that we requested so long ago. In fact, I don't, and I don't think you, intend to rest until Nicaragua at last experiences true freedom and democracy.

Economic growth, broad success in foreign policy, a newly patriotic and self-confident nation -- why should this be? Well, of course, it has a great deal to do with the specifics of our programs. Our 1981 tax cut, which I've mentioned, was significant in restoring our nation to economic health, just as the historic tax reform we're about to see enacted, as I've indicated before, will lead us to greater prosperity. And in foreign policy, the rebuilding of our defenses was, and remains absolutely, necessary in order to defend our Republic and demonstrate to friends and adversaries alike the seriousness of our arms. Yet beyond all the programs, there's something more basic and even more important. I'm referring to the vision, the national sense of purpose, that our administration has worked so hard to enhance. At its most fundamental level, of course, the American vision is the vision of all Western civilization -- the belief in a just and living God, in individual responsibility, and in the importance of the family. And by reasserting, for example, the ancient belief in the goodness of creation -- a belief found, among other places, in Genesis -- we've been able to reawaken a sense of the goodness of our own land and our people. And by restating the belief that history has meaing, that it's a story unfolding according to the will of its creator -- we've been able to reestablish a sense of our nation's own place, and that story is a land of opportunity and a defender of freedom.

This brings me to the final matter I'd like to discuss with you today. Nothing in our nation's history is more offensive to our fundamental values and national sense of purpose than drug abuse. And in the face of all that our country has accomplished in recent years, nothing could represent a worse disappointment and heartache. And I know what you've been doing in that regard, also.

Disheartening as the figures are, I must outline the problem of drug abuse for you fully and candidly. Despite our best efforts, illegal cocaine, including crack, is streaming into the United States, in spite of the fact that we have intercepted 10 times as much of that drug as was previously done. Four to five million Americans regularly use it. Half a million Americans are hooked on heroin. One in twelve persons smokes marijuana regularly. And regular drug use is highest among the age group 18 to 25, the young people just entering the work force.

During that same address, I outlined a series of initiatives we're taking to deal with the problem head on. These initiatives include working more closely with foreign countries to combat drug trafficking, seeking to ensure that our nation's schools and workplaces become drug free, and strengthening law enforcement activities that put pushers and dealers behind bars. As part of these efforts, I'll be convening on October 6th and 7th a meeting of our Ambassadors from those countries which face major drug production, consumption, and transportation problems. And Nancy and I will meet with them to discuss how we can mobilize an international commitment to win the war against illegal drug use. As I've said before: No drug network will remain alive.

But the point I want to stress before you today is that while government can accomplish certain important, but limited, objectives, the fight against drug abuse can only be won through a great national effort involving all Americans -- and especially organizations like yours, as you've been doing since 1971. I know that the organizations represented here, as I say, are already actively involved increasing public awareness to the problem and establishing programs for students and parents in your communities. I commend you for that, and I'm grateful to know that we can continue to count on your support in the months to come.

So, please, continue helping all Americans say no to drugs. And just as here in Washington we've established national goals, you can establish local goals of your own -- drug-free communities and drug-free homes. As I said at the outset, you're the experts when it comes to Americans helping each other. And I know that when you put your minds to it, you'll be able to come up with ways to help that nobody in government ever would think of. I know at the same time that you help to create a national intolerance for drug abuse.

Nancy has brought back to me so many stories from her visits out to treatment centers, schools, and so forth. Could you believe -- they're unbelievable, some of them -- could you believe a boy in the fourth grade, 8 years old -- and this boy is not only a user; already he's a pusher. And he carries a beeper. If he's in class and the beeper goes off, he excuses himself from class because that means there's a customer outside waiting for him. What have we let happen in this country of ours over these recent years?

God bless all of you, and I thank you for all that you've already done -- all the hope that you've shed throughout our nation for these past hundred years. Now, if I didn't know so much about what you've been doing, I would have been here asking you to join our crusade. But now, I hope you won't mind if our crusade joins you -- and this crusade against drug abuse -- we can all be together. And I really mean it when I say, ``join you,'' because when we made that speech, my own view was that, yes, government can do some things; yes, we step up our efforts and continue to try to intercept the drugs and so forth and to catch the pushers. But the real way it is going to be done is when -- as has happened so many times in this country -- when 240 million Americans out here make up their minds that we are going to do away with drugs, and right from the community level and the neighborhood on up, the people mobilize to put a stop to this.

To paraphrase Nancy -- and by the way, I'm kind of glad I came on my own today. [Laughter] I found out on that recent broadcast, she has the darndest way of stealing the show. [Laughter] But to paraphrase Nancy, to say no to drugs is to say yes to life. And, once again, you've been responsible for creating life and making life better for so many that I feel a little humble in your presence, very proud indeed to have taken up your time to be here.

I am greatly concerned with the adverse precedential impact that my approval of H.R. 2316 would have upon litigation against the Federal government. There must be some limit to the time during which the Government must remain prepared to defend itself against specific claims. That limit is set forth in the Federal Tort Claims Act, 28 U.S.C. at 2401(b).

I am also greatly concerned that this private relief bill would allow a claimant to circumvent the orderly administrative process for asserting claims against the United States as prescribed by the Federal Tort Claims Act, 28 U.S.C. 2675. Other individuals who have also failed, for whatever reason, to file their claims within the required time, have been likewise precluded from the relief Ms. Mendes-Silva seeks in this bill.

To preserve the confidentiality of the current system of financial reporting, financial reports filed pursuant to the authority of Executive Order No. 11222, 5 C.F.R. Part 735, and individual agency regulations in which confidentiality for such reports has been assured shall continue to be held in confidence.

The President welcomes today's vote by the House. The country is now only one vote away in the Senate from enacting the President's number one domestic priority -- a tax system that will promote economic growth, simplify tax returns for the vast majority of Americans, return the code to a promise of fairness and equity, and most important of all, reduce rates for most Americans.

The President. Members of the Court and ladies and gentlemen, welcome to the White House, and thank you for coming to witness this historic occasion. This ceremony is the culmination of our constitutional process which involves each of the three branches of government.

I've had the honor of nominating Justice Rehnquist to be the next Chief Justice of the United States and Judge Scalia to be the Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court. The Senate has confirmed my nominations, and I now ask that Chief Justice Warren Burger administer the constitutional oath of office to Justice Rehnquist and Judge Scalia.

Rehnquist, before I ask you to take the oath, I would like to make this observation with your lead, Mr. President, that we will have today the 16th Chief Justice of the United States in almost 200 years, and Judge Scalia will be the 103d Justice of the Court. For me it is not only an honor but a personal privilege to take part in the ceremony involving Justice Rehnquist, who has been a colleague and a friend, a warm friend for 15 years, and Judge Scalia, with whom I have worked on extrajudicial activities relating to the administration of justice. And now, without more, I ask Justice Rehnquist, are you prepared to take the oath?

Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God.

Rehnquist. I, William H. Rehnquist, do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies, foreign and domestic; that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same; that I take this obligation freely without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God.

Justice Rehnquist. Thank you. Mr. President, I know that I speak for all of my colleagues, and for all of my family, when I thank you for inviting us to these proceedings at the White House, signifying the transition in the Supreme Court.

At the conclusion of the second part of these proceedings in our Court this afternoon, I will become the 16th Chief Justice of the United States. Forty-five years ago, when Harlan Stone succeeded Charles Evans Hughes in that position, he wrote to his predecessor that he now realized he must bear some burdens which John Marshall did not know. So, I'm sure, it will be with me. Mr. President, I am grateful beyond measure to you for affording me the opportunity to serve the Court and to serve my country as Chief Justice of the United States. And I pray that God will grant me the patience, the wisdom, and the fortitude to worthily follow in the footsteps of my illustrious predecessors in discharging the responsibilities of this high office.

Antonin Scalia, do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies foreign and domestic, that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same, that I take this obligation freely without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion, and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God.

Scalia. I, Antonin Scalia, do solemnly swear that I will support and defend the Constitution of the United States against all enemies foreign and domestic, that I will bear true faith and allegiance to the same, that I take this obligation freely without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion, and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties of the office on which I am about to enter, so help me God.

Scalia. Thank you. This is an occasion for thank you's. It's very easy to know where to begin; it's very hard to know where to end. I'd begin, of course, with President Reagan, who has chosen to think me worthy of this appointment for which I'm very grateful and will do my best to live up to his confidence. I have to thank my wife, Maureen, who's an extraordinary woman and without whom I wouldn't be here or if I were here, it wouldn't have been as much fun along the way. [Laughter] And I have to thank a lot of other people, going way back to teachers in Public School 13 in Queens, Xavier High School in Manhattan, up to my colleagues on the Court on which I presently serve who are here today.

In the course of my last tour of duty on the Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, I have come to know in one way or another all of the current Justices on the Supreme Court, I have an enormous respect for that institution, and I have an enormous personal regard for each of them. I look forward to working with them in our common enterprise for many years to come. Thank you all very much.

In marking this moment of transition, let me first say, on behalf of all Americans, how grateful we are to Chief Justice Burger. For 17 years on the Supreme Court, and for 13 years before that on the DC Circuit, the Chief Justice's service to the Nation has been a monument of integrity and of dedication to principle -- and especially to the judiciary itself. But, Mr.

Chief Justice, we know your service isn't ending today. How appropriate it is that you will be guiding the bicentennial celebration of that Constitution that you have served with such distinction over the years. And what a lasting contribution this will be. Because of your work, Americans in all walks of life will come to have an even more profound knowledge of the rule of law and the sacred document upon which it rests. Your service as Chief Justice has been outstanding, and it's a mark of your generosity that you've agreed to offer yourself for additional service to your country and the law.

Our new Chief Justice is one of America's most brilliant jurists. From his days in law school, where he graduated first in his class, he has been recognized for his extraordinary legal insight. On the Court, he has distinguished himself through the brilliance of his reason and the clarity and the craftsmanship of his opinions. I nominated William Rehnquist because I believe he will be a Chief Justice of historic stature. Associate Justice Antonin Scalia is also a brilliant judge. He had a distinguished career as a lawyer and as a professor of law before joining the Court of Appeals nearly 4 years ago. There he became known for his integrity and independence and for the force of his intellect. Chief Justice Rehnquist and Justice Scalia, congratulations to both of you.

With these two outstanding men taking their new positions, this is, as I said, a time of renewal in the great constitutional system that our forefathers gave us -- a good time to reflect on the inspired wisdom we call our Constitution, a time to remember that the Founding Fathers gave careful thought to the role of the Supreme Court. In a small room in Philadelphia in the summer of 1787, they debated whether the Justices should have life terms or not, whether they should be part of one or the other branches or not, and whether they should have the right to declare acts of the other branches of government unconstitutional or not.

They settled on a judiciary that would be independent and strong, but one whose power would also, they believed, be confined within the boundaries of a written Constitution and laws. In the convention and during the debates on ratification, some said that there was a danger of the courts making laws rather than interpreting them. The framers of our Constitution believed, however, that the judiciary they envisioned would be ``the least dangerous'' branch of the Government, because, as Alexander Hamilton wrote in the Federalist Papers, it had ``neither force nor will, but merely judgment.'' The judicial branch interprets the laws, while the power to make and execute those laws is balanced in the two elected branches. And this was one thing that Americans of all persuasions supported.

Justice Rehnquist and Justice Scalia have demonstrated in their opinions that they stand with Holmes and Frankfurter on this question. I nominated them with this principle very much in mind. And Chief Justice Burger, in his opinions, was also a champion of restraint. All three men understand that the Founding Fathers designed a system of checks and balances, and of limited government, because they knew that the great preserver of our freedoms would never be the courts or either of the other branches alone. It would always be the totality of our constitutional system, with no one part getting the upper hand. And that's why the judiciary must be independent. And that is why it must exercise restraint.

The warning, more than a century ago, attributed to Daniel Webster, remains as timeless as the document he revered. ``Miracles do not cluster,'' he said, ``Hold on to the Constitution of the United States of America and to the Republic for which it stands -- what has happened once in 6,000 years may never happen again. Hold on to your Constitution, for if the American Constitution shall fall there will be anarchy throughout the world.'' Holding on to the Constitution -- this has been the service of Chief Justice Burger, and a grateful Nation honors him today. So, too, I can think of no two better public servants to continue that work than Chief Justice Rehnquist and Justice Scalia. You both have our nation's heartfelt wishes for success and happiness.

Thank you all for joining in this important ceremony. I know that, in a few moments, our new Chief Justice and Associate Justice look forward to greeting each of you in the cross hall. Thank you again.

I fully support the objectives of the Native American Programs Act of 1974 to help American Indians, Alaskan Natives, and Native Hawaiians achieve economic and social self-sufficiency. My decision not to approve H.R. 3247 is based on my belief that this bill would seriously undermine the administrative flexibility needed to ensure responsiveness to individual tribes and Native American organizations -- flexibility that is essential to the effectiveness of the Native American programs.

Executive branch must be allowed to carry out its responsibilities to administer the laws effectively. H.R. 3247 would cause undue interference with ongoing program management. This legislation, if signed into law, would make effective administration of this important program extremely difficult by creating delays in implementing program policy that can only hurt rather than help the Native Americans it is intended to serve.

H.R. 3247 were to become law, it would require diverting scarce resources away from program-related activities to meet wasteful and unnecessary administrative requirements and would involve the Congress inappropriately in ongoing administrative activities that should be left to the Executive branch.

These provisions of H.R. 3247 would unnecessarily increase administrative requirements and thereby shift resources away from technical assistance and other activities more directly related to helping applicants and grantees. Equally troublesome, they would inevitably involve both the Congress and members of the public in second-guessing the ANA on details related to administration of Native American programs. This would have adverse results for the programs and would potentially set a dangerous precedent for unnecessary restrictions disrupting the operations of other Federal human services programs.

Quite simply, the Executive branch cannot effectively carry out its responsibilities to implement the laws if agencies are required, as a routine procedure, to justify each grant decision to the Congress, or if every general statement of agency policy or procedure must be made through formal notice and comment rulemaking.

The provisions of H.R. 3247 also raise concerns about confidentiality, in requiring the Commissioner of the ANA to discuss publicly the weaknesses and problems of applications submitted by individual tribal organizations. This could well have a chilling effect on the competitive grant process. New and less experienced organizations could be more hesitant to apply, and established Native American organizations might be disturbed about public distribution of information about their applications.

I reiterate my support for the continuation of the Native American programs. I therefore urge the Congress to provide funding for these programs in the fiscal year 1987 continuing resolution and urge that the 100th Congress promptly consider new legislation to authorize appropriations for these programs. The Administration, through the Department of Health and Human Services, looks forward to working with the Congress to develop legislation that will meet the Congress' legitimate concerns for accountability of the Executive branch, while also meeting our concerns that the law not be burdened with requirements incompatible with our responsibility to achieve the statutory purposes of these programs.

Each year, thousands of lives could be saved and injuries prevented if motorists would use their safety belts. The annual cost to society of these needless deaths and injuries is currently in excess of $32 billion. Taxpayers bear a large share of this cost. The estimated annual cost to Federal, State, and local governments as a result of auto accidents is $11 billion. I have determined that an on-the-job safety belt use policy for Federal employees will reduce human pain and suffering, set an example for the private sector, and reduce the burden on the taxpayers caused by motor vehicle accidents.

Federal employee occupying the front seat of a motor vehicle on official business, whose seat is equipped with a safety belt, shall have the safety belt properly fastened at all times when the vehicle is in motion.

All agencies of the Executive branch are directed to promulgate rules and take all appropriate measures within their existing employee occupational safety and health programs to carry out the purposes of this Order. This includes, but is not limited to, conducting an education program for employees about the requirements of this Order. The term ``agency'' as used in this Order means an Executive Department, as defined in 5 U.S.C. 101, or any employing unit or authority of the Federal government, other than those of the Legislative and Judicial branches. The Secretary of Labor shall cooperate and consult with the heads of agencies in the Legislative and Judicial branches of the Government to encourage and help them adopt safety belt use programs. The Secretary of Labor shall also submit an annual report to the President that includes the status of on-the-job belt use by Federal employees.

But if I may be serious, I do have another story for you today, and it goes like this. In the spring of 1942, shortly after Pearl Harbor, the Japanese were planning a decisive naval engagement that would crush American power in the Pacific and open Hawaii and our west coast to attack. To accomplish this, the Japanese assembled the most powerful armada in history. Against their cruisers, battleships, and carriers, the United States could assemble really only three aircraft carriers -- one of which was still badly damaged from the Battle of the Coral Sea. And aware that the Japanese were preparing for this decisive battle, the Commander of the Pacific Fleet, Chester Nimitz, knew the odds against him and understood that his only chance of victory lay in the skill and daring of his outnumbered sailors and fliers -- and in his superior intelligence services.

Although aware of Japanese preparations, the Americans did not have the answer to the all-important question of where the Japanese would attack. A young naval officer who had, with a small group of cryptographers, been monitoring Japanese transmissions, successfully deciphered their code. From his intercepts, Commander Joseph Rochefort knew the target of the planned attack was a place the Japanese were calling ``AF.'' And in his own mind, he felt certain he knew what AF was -- an island not far from Hawaii; it was called Midway.

Admiral Nimitz had no such doubts. He authorized a message sent from Midway, a message they knew that the Japanese could decipher and would be sure to transmit to their own intelligence services. The message reporting water problems at Midway went out, and Commander Joseph Rochefort and his dedicated cryptographers listened as the Japanese intelligence services reported to Tokyo naval headquarters that AF reported a water shortage. Commander Rochefort had his confirmation: Midway was the target.

The rest, as the saying goes, is history. And what history it was and is. Because of that critical intelligence, Nimitz placed his outnumbered carriers on the Japanese flank and, with several devastating strikes, not only dealt a blow that guaranteed naval superiority to the United States but made Midway one of the most dramatic and decisive naval battles in all of history. And while few Americans know the story of Commander Rochefort and his colleagues, all of us are in their debt.

You of the National Security Agency are like them, part of a proud tradition, a tradition which is, in fact, older than the Nation, a tradition that has its beginnings with George Washington and the American Revolution. And you, too, make history quietly -- silently, aware that your greatest moments, your greatest victories, if ever known at all, will be divulged only to generations many years from now. This does not deter you. You have chosen this work because you know that in a world where the dangers to our nation's freedom and security are grave and great, you provide a vital line of defense. You understand that since World War II, accurate, up-to-the-minute intelligence has saved lives, averted war, and kept alive the cause of freedom.

You also understand that the loss of our own sensitive information can undermine the very foundations of our free society. And you work to meet those twin challenges by providing the crucial intelligence and safeguarding the security of our own communications and electronic networks.

Today your work continues not only to prevent conflict but to fight terrorism, protect our security from hostile intelligence threats, guard the men and women of our Armed Forces around the world, and generally protect the values that we, our friends, and our allies hold dear. Without the product of your painstaking and dedicated efforts, we would, in a dangerous world, be blind and deaf.

Without your long hours of selfless duty, often in far and forgotten corners of the world, we could neither protect America nor advance the cause of freedom. Without your success in guarding our vital communications, information and technology, our adversaries would rob us of the secrets we need to be strong and secure.

The simple truth is: Without you, I could not do my job; nor could Secretary Shultz conduct diplomacy; nor could Secretary Weinberger, nor Admiral Crowe, muster the forces that defend us. And so, while you serve in silence; while your success must go without recognition, often even by your own families; while you cannot share with them or your fellow Americans the pride you feel in protecting and guarding their future; let me today, in this place, speak for all of them: We are grateful for what you do, for the sacrifices you make, for your selfless commitment to our country, and for the limitations on your personal freedom which you accept so your countrymen can live their lives in freedom and peace. We understand your burden, and we salute you. You carry on the struggle for freedom, and you, too, are heroes. America's proud of you, and we thank you.

Of course, you cannot perform your work without proper support from the Department of Defense, the Director of Central Intelligence, the White House, and the Congress. And today we're celebrating an example of that support -- a new building complex, the most modern of its kind in the world. I want to congratulate you all, Cap Weinberger, Bill Casey, Bill Odom, and the members of the intelligence committees of the Congress who cooperated so effectively to make this building possible. When we took office 5\1/2\ years ago, we promised to make America strong again. And today we see a monument to that reassertion of American strength and security.

And yet we're also aware today of a growing threat to that security. Especially in the espionage trials of the last several years, you've glimpsed the terrible damage that espionage does. And as events of recent days have highlighted, the intelligence threat to our country remains very real. Our adversaries are employing all the means we associate with spies, including electronic espionage against sensitive communications and data bases. Our most sensitive defense secrets and most advanced technology have been stolen, given to our adversaries out of misguided motives or attempts at financial gain. Such losses eliminate the technological advantage on which our defense rests. Similar efforts to infiltrate long-term agents into sensitive government departments and agencies are underway.

Those around the world who would seek to steal our secrets and technology, to subvert our values and institutions, and to violate the privacy of our communications must realize this fact: The American people will no longer tolerate this conduct. Already we have taken steps to demonstrate that we will not allow our adversaries to abuse the great freedoms of this country to our detriment. The recent flurry of espionage indictments and convictions expresses our unwillingness to tolerate betrayal of the special trust given to those who guard the Nation's secrets. So, too, recent efforts by NSA have helped the private sector make it profitable to provide secure telecommunications and information systems to both government and industry. But on the issue of espionage, let me say again, we will root out our spies, we will punish them severely. And on this point, let me assure you, we have broad bipartisan support in the Congress and the overwhelming backing of the American people.

So, to you also falls the task of being especially vigilant against threats from hostile espionage services, as well as other unauthorized disclosures of the information that you hold in safekeeping. Professional honor -- these are code words. You protect the secrets and hold them in trust for your fellow citizens, and there can be no excuse for breaking that trust. Let us remember that those who would take it on themselves to declassify vital information endanger all of our lives, our freedom, and our way of life.

President today announced his intention to nominate E. Pendleton James to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Communications Satellite Corporation until the date of the annual meeting of the Corporation in 1989. This is a reappointment.

But while we vigorously support the purpose of this legislation, declaring economic warfare against the people of South Africa would be destructive not only of their efforts to peacefully end apartheid, but also of the opportunity to replace it with a free society.

The sweeping and punitive sanctions adopted by the Congress are targeted directly at the labor intensive industries upon which the victimized peoples of South Africa depend for their very survival. Black workers -- the first victims of apartheid -- would become the first victims of American sanctions.

Banning the import of sugar, for example, would threaten the livelihood of 23,000 black farmers. Banning the import of natural resources is a sanction targeted directly at the mining industries of South Africa, upon which more than half a million black laborers depend for their livelihood.

By prohibiting the importation of food and agricultural products, the measure would invite retaliation by South Africa, which since June has purchased over 160,000 tons of wheat from the United States. Denying basic foodstuffs to South Africa -- much of which go to feed the black population -- will only lead to privation, unrest, and violence. It will not advance the goals of peaceful change.

Are we truly helping the black people of South Africa -- the lifelong victims of apartheid -- when we throw them out of work and leave them and their families jobless and hungry in those segregated townships? Or are we simply assuming a moral posture at the expense of the people in whose name we presume to act?

Punitive economic sanctions would contribute directly and measurably to the misery of people who already have suffered enough. Using America's power to deepen the economic crisis in this tortured country is not the way to reconciliation and peace. Black South Africans recognize that they would pay with their lives for the deprivation, chaos, and violence that would follow an economic collapse.

The imposition of punitive sanctions would also deliver a devastating blow to the neighboring states in southern Africa that depend on Pretoria for transportation, energy, markets, and food. An estimated million-and-a-half foreign workers, legal and illegal, now live in South Africa. The number of people, women and children especially, outside South Africa who are dependent upon the remittances of these workers for their survival has been estimated to be over five million. Do we truly wish to be directly responsible for increased suffering, and perhaps starvation, in southern Africa? Do we truly wish our action to be the rationale Pretoria invokes for expelling these workers? Do we truly wish to trigger a cycle of economic sanctions and counter-sanctions that end up crippling the economy of South Africa and devastating the economies of the frontline states? What sense does it make to send aid to those impoverished countries with one hand while squeezing their economies with the other?

Another feature of the bill would require the Administration to publicly identify within six months any and all nations that have chosen not to join us in observing the U.N. arms embargo against South Africa, ``with a view to terminating United States military assistance to those countries.'' But the United States will not revert to a single-minded policy of isolationism, with its vast and unforeseen effects on our international security relationships, that would be dictated by the unilateral decisions of our allies. No single issue, no matter how important, can be allowed to override in this way all other considerations in our foreign policy. Our military relationships must continue to be based upon a comprehensive assessment of our national defense needs and the security of the West.

Not only does this legislation contain sweeping punitive sanctions that would injure most the very people we seek to help, the legislation discards our economic leverage, constricts our diplomatic freedom, and ties the hands of the President of the United States in dealing with a gathering crisis in a critical subcontinent where the Soviet Bloc -- with its mounting investment of men and arms -- clearly sees historic opportunity. Therefore, I am also vetoing the bill because it contains provisions that infringe on the President's constitutional prerogative to articulate the foreign policy of the United States.

Title II of the bill, for example, mandates affirmative measures to eliminate apartheid and provide assistance to its victims, including support for black participation in business enterprises as owners, managers, and professionals.

It authorizes the President to take steps for the purpose of assisting firms to fight apartheid and extend equal opportunity to blacks in investment, management, and employment. The bill also contains a number of other useful and realistic provisions, such as those calling upon the African National Congress (ANC) to reexamine its Communist ties and mandating a report on the activities of the Communist Party in South Africa and the extent to which it has infiltrated South African political organizations. Still other portions of the bill call upon the ANC to condemn the practice of ``necklacing'' and terrorism and to state affirmatively that it will support a free and democratic post-apartheid South Africa. These provisions, as well as many others in the bill, reflect the agreement of the Congress and the Administration on important aspects of an overall anti-apartheid policy.

Administration has been -- and remains -- prepared to work with the Congress to devise measures that manifest the American people's united opposition to apartheid -- without injuring its victims. We remain ready to work with the Congress in framing measures that -- like the 1962 U.S. embargo of military sales and the carefully targeted sanctions of my own Executive order of 1985 -- keep the United States at arms distance from the South African regime, while keeping America's beneficent influence at work bringing about constructive change within that troubled society and nation.

It remains my hope that the United States can work with its European allies to fashion a flexible and coordinated policy -- consistent with their recent actions -- for constructive change inside South Africa. I believe we should support their measures with similar executive actions of our own, and I will work with the Congress toward that goal. It remains my hope that, once again, Republicans and Democrats can come together on the common ground that, after all, we both share: An unyielding opposition both to the unacceptable doctrine of apartheid as well as the unacceptable alternative of Marxist tyranny -- backed by the firm determination that the future of South Africa and southern Africa will belong to the free. To achieve that, we must stay and build, not cut and run.

Africa -- the violence, the repression, the terror -- speaks well of us as a people. But the historic crisis in South Africa is not one from which the leading nation of the West can turn its back and walk away. For the outcome of that crisis has too great a bearing upon the future of Africa, the future of NATO, the future of the West.

Throughout the postwar era, we Americans have succeeded when we left our partisan differences at the water's edge -- and persevered; as we did in the rebuilding of Europe and Japan, as we are doing today in El Salvador. We have failed when we permitted our exasperation and anger and impatience at present conditions to persuade us to forfeit the future to the enemies of freedom.

Let us not forget our purpose. It is not to damage or destroy any economy, but to help the black majority of South Africa and southern Africa enjoy a greater share of the material blessings and bounties their labor has helped to produce -- as they secure as well their legitimate political rights. That is why sweeping punitive sanctions are the wrong course to follow, and increased American and Western investment -- by firms that are breaking down apartheid by providing equal opportunity for the victims of official discrimination -- is the right course to pursue.

It's getting on close to the end of the month, and I bet many of you'll be spending part of this Saturday or the next hunkered down at your desk, calculator in hand, balancing your checkbook, and making sure your family's finances are in order. There are probably a hundred things you'd rather be doing on a fall weekend, but you know that it's important to your family's security and happiness.

September 30th is the final deadline for Congress to pass our nation's budget, the appropriations that will allow the Government to continue to function. Once again, the budget deadline finds Congress unable to produce a responsible budget. They let it come right down to the wire. I say once again because this is nothing new. It's been many years since Congress has passed its appropriations on time. Instead, they throw together what they call a continuing resolution, at the last moment -- a kind of Christmas tree hung with pet projects and wasteful spending programs that never could have made it into a real budget.

But that isn't the worst of it. The House of Representatives is trying to use this bill to force through policies that they know could not pass otherwise -- policies that do not belong in an appropriations bill and are simply unacceptable. Provisions passed in the Democratically controlled House would pull the rug out from under our negotiators at the arms control talks with the Soviets in Geneva, endangering the real progress we are making toward meaningful arms reductions. Others would hurt programs vital to our defense needs. And while all sorts of wasteful boondoggles are included, they want to cut essential pay raises for our military personnel. And I'm sorry, but that's just plain wrong.

After delaying so long, some in Congress say I should just sign this spending-spree bill because otherwise the Government will be forced to shut down. Well, I hope they know where the keys to the building are, because if they don't act responsibly, I won't have any choice but to shut it down. If they want to put a real budget together by candlelight, it's okay by me. Now it's up to the Senate to remove the most objectionable parts of the House bill so we can keep operating. My friends, this is no way to run a government. The breakdown of the congressional budget process is one of the primary reasons why spending is out of control and deficits are so large.

Democrats believe that you, the taxpayers, caused the deficit because you pay too little in taxes. Well, that's hogwash. We don't have deficits because you're undertaxed; we have deficits because Congress overspends. It's time Congress cut the Federal budget and left your family budgets alone. For all their talk about the deficit, the liberal Democrats in Congress have not been able to control their big spending ways. Last February I proposed eliminating 44 wasteful programs, but Congress cut only 2. Now, instead of reducing spending, some in Congress want to break faith with the American people and turn tax reform into a tax hike. Well, that really touches my temperature control.

It seems to me that if we can't convince the liberals in Congress to cut spending, maybe we should cut the number of liberals in the Congress. This yearly budget fiasco illustrates clearly that the process simply doesn't work, but there is a solution. If Congress can't control spending, they should give me what 43 State Governors have: the line-item veto. Then, each spending item could be judged on its own merits, and Congress couldn't sneak through spending programs they know would never survive the light of day. And isn't it time we had a balanced budget amendment? Earlier this year that amendment lost by only one vote. The American people want a balanced budget amendment. In this election year, isn't it time that we make sure our elected representatives do, too? Let's vote for a Congress that will pass the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment and, once and for all, get Federal spending under control. I can tell you one thing, it would really make my day.

Today's historic vote on tax reform marks the last legislative hurdle for the American people, who finally have a tax code they can be proud of -- one that is fairer, simpler for most people; one that encourages growth and that is profamily.

Today's action culminates years of hard work and determination by many in the Congress, the executive branch, and most importantly, by numerous dedicated individuals throughout the Nation who believed we Americans deserved better. I look forward to signing the bill when it arrives on my desk.

I understand and share the very strong feelings and sense of frustration in the Congress and in our Nation about apartheid, an unconscionable system that we all reject. The ongoing tragedy in South Africa tests our resolve as well as our patience. None of us wants to aggravate that tragedy.

In the last several months, the South African Government, instead of moving further down the once promising path of reform and dialogue, has turned to internal repression. We all know that South Africa's real problem traces to the perpetuation of apartheid. And we know that the solution to this problem can only be found in lifting the present State of Emergency, repealing all racially discriminatory laws, releasing political prisoners, and unbanning political parties -- necessary steps opening the way for negotiations aimed at creating a new, democratic order for all South Africans. The South African Government holds the key to the opening of such negotiations. Emerging from discussion among South Africans, we want to see a democratic system in which the rights of majorities, minorities, and individuals are protected by a bill of rights and firm constitutional guarantees. We will be actively pursuing diplomatic opportunities and approaches in an effort to start a movement toward negotiations in South Africa.

I outlined in my message to the House of Representatives on Friday my reasons for vetoing the Comprehensive Anti-Apartheid Act of 1986, principally my opposition to punitive sanctions that harm the victims of apartheid and my desire to work in concert with our Allies. I also indicated in that message that I am prepared to sign an expanded Executive order that strongly signals our rejection of apartheid and our desire to actively promote rapid positive change in South Africa. I am prepared to expand the range of restrictions and other measures that will characterize our relations with South Africa. There would be strong sanctions in my new order, sanctions that I earnestly wish were unnecessary.

These sanctions, directed at the enforcers not the victims of apartheid, encompass measures recently adopted by many of our Allies, as well as many elements of the original Senate Committee version of the bill. They are incontestably necessary in today's circumstances. My intention is to make it plain to South Africa's leaders that we cannot conduct business-as-usual with a government that mistakes the silence of racial repression for the consent of the governed.

My new Executive order will, therefore, reaffirm and incorporate the measures I imposed last year (i.e., bans on loans to the South African Government and its agencies, all exports of computers to apartheid-enforcing entities and the military and police, all nuclear exports except those related to health, safety, and IAEA programs, imports of South African weapons, the import of Krugerrands, and a requirement for all U.S. firms to apply fair labor standards based on the Sullivan principles).

Sanctions, in and of themselves, do not add up to a policy for South Africa and the southern Africa region. Positive steps as well as negative signals are necessary. This unusually complex and interrelated part of the world is one that cries out for better understanding and sympathy on our part. We must consider what we can do to contribute to development of healthy economies and democratic institutions throughout the region and to help those who are the victims of apartheid.

Following the Congress' lead and building on existing programs, I plan to expand our assistance to those suffering the cost of apartheid and to help blacks as they prepare to play their full role in a free South Africa. We spent $20 million in FY 86 and have requested $25 million in FY 87. We will do more, much of it along the lines incorporated in the South Africa bill.

I am also committed to present to the next Congress a comprehensive multi-year program designed to promote economic reform and development in the black-ruled states of southern Africa. We intend to seek the close collaboration of Japan and our European allies in this constructive effort. Our goal is to create a sound basis for a post-apartheid region -- a southern Africa where democracy and respect for fundamental human rights can flourish.

I believe the United States can assist responsibly in resolving southern Africa's tragic dilemma. Many observers in and outside South Africa regard present trends with despair, seeing in them a bloody inevitability as positions harden over the central question of political power. This is a grim scenario that allows no free choice and offers a racial civil war as the only solution. It need not be so if wisdom and imagination prevail.

Africans continue to search for solutions. Their true friends should help in this search. As I have said before, our humanitarian concerns and our other national interests converge in South Africa as in few other countries. With the actions I propose today, I believe it is clear that my Administration's intentions and those of the Congress are identical. May we unite so that U.S. foreign policy can be effective in bringing people of good will and imagination in South Africa together to rebuild a better, just, and democratic tomorrow.

Now, let me just say it's wonderful to be here in Missouri. And it's great to be back on the campaign trail. It almost feels like 1980 all over again. You know, as I said to my staff when we were taking off in Air Force One, it's great to be out of Washington and back where the real people are. You make a fellow feel mighty welcome.

And now all of that brings me to today's star and one of America's all-star candidates for 1986. A man of proven ability, one of the ablest leaders in government today -- I'm talking about the next United States Senator from the great State of Missouri, Kit Bond. Believe me, we need Kit in Washington to help work the same kind of magic in Congress that he did here in your State capital. We need Kit Bond in the United States Senate to stand up to the liberal big-spenders and their tax hike schemes and keep America on the track of growth, prosperity, and freedom.

It's no secret that there are still some folks in Washington who want to put America full speed in reverse -- back to the days when big government, taxes, and inflation were destroying our economy and military weakness made America a punching bag for nickel-and-dime dictators around the world. America used to wear, a few years ago, a ``Kick Me'' sign around its neck. Well, we threw that sign away, and now it reads, ``Don't Tread on Me.'' It's important to remember those days 5\1/2\ years ago, because the tax-and-tax, spend-and-spend crew is still lurking in the shadows, just waiting for a second chance. The liberal leadership of the Democratic Party hasn't changed. They're just itching to raise your taxes and rev up that inflationary money machine.

You know, when I hear some of the things that Kit's opponent is saying, I sometimes think the liberal Democratic leadership will never change its big spending, high-tax ways. But then, as I've always said, you don't have to make them see the light -- just make them feel the heat. So, let's make them feel the heat on election day. You know, this 1986 election will be a crucial moment of decision for our country: Will liberal policies return us to the days of malaise? You remember 5\1/2\ years ago, when Washington told us that we were suffering from a malaise? We were responsible for the economy, what had happened. Or will America continue down the road of progress?

The answer to that question depends almost entirely on one thing: electing Senators who are progrowth, prodefense, and pro-America. It means sending someone to Washington who'll work together with me to keep America moving forward, someone like Kit Bond. Kit has a proven record as Governor battling at the State level to bring America back. And I've said it a few times before, but I think it's worth repeating: America is back! And with Kit's help in the United States Senate, we're going to keep her standing tall and proud and free.

America is once again united in hope and strong in purpose. We've squashed inflation. We're keeping the doors of the opportunity society wide open by cutting tax rates still further and spurring on the economic expansion that has already created about 11\1/2\ million new jobs. Today employment is at a record high. And, as Kit told you, no place higher than right here in Missouri. But let me give you a figure. If you can just visualize all the Americans in the United States, male and female, from age 16 all the way up and out past retirement age -- all living Americans in that group. 61.3 percent of them today are employed, and that's the highest percentage in our nation's history.

Some sectors, such as agriculture, are still hurting. That's why this administration is providing more help to our nation's farmers than the last five administrations all put together. But money alone is not the answer. Farmers don't want more government programs, they want more profits. And that's why we need Kit Bond in the Senate, to keep those interest rates coming down and keep foreign markets open to our agricultural exports. We don't need a liberal in there creating more problems; we need a problemsolver like Kit Bond creating jobs and prosperity.

And we need Kit in the Senate so we can keep rebuilding our defenses, speaking out loudly and clearly for human liberty, and working around the world for freedom and democracy. You know, of all the things that go with this job of mine, I'm most proud of our young men and women in the military uniform than of anything else. They're all volunteers, and they have the highest level of education in the history of the military. A few years ago only 54 percent of our military had a high school diploma. Well, last year it had reached 91 percent. They're one fine bunch, and let me say this: If we must ever ask our military personnel to put their lives on the line for us, we're not going to give them anything less than the top-quality, best equipment they need to get the job done and come home safely.

Now, we've come a long way since those days of malaise, but the next couple of years will decide whether all our progress since 1980 will be set in concrete or only written in the sand. Kit's election could very well decide whether we keep control of the Senate or lose it to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. And that's the difference between 2 more years of progress or 2 years of paralysis. We could not have accomplished what we have if we did not have that slim majority in the United States Senate. The other party has controlled both Houses of the Congress for almost 50 years. And now, for 5\1/2\ years, we have controlled the one. I didn't seek reelection to be a 6-year President. There are too many exciting challenges before us, too much business that still must be completed. I cannot -- I will not have my hands tied by a Congress that is totally hostile to all we're trying to do. You know, I guess my name will never be on the ballot again. But you can vote for me in a way, if you'd like. If you want to vote for me, vote for Kit Bond so that we can have a Republican Senate that I can work with instead of against me -- and they'll be around after I'm gone.

And you know, it's time the people of Missouri got the straight facts about Kit's opponent. Missouri doesn't need a Senator like Kit's opponent whose voting record in the State legislature has been rated 100 percent by the ultraliberal ADA, a tax-and-spend Democrat whose votes helped push this State's budget out of balance and who now wants to go to Washington to continue her free-spending ways. This State doesn't need a Senator like Kit's opponent who wants to raise your taxes and slash defense. You don't need a Senator who opposes the balanced budget amendment, the line-item veto, and Gramm-Rudman deficit reduction. And then, when she's asked how she's going to reduce the deficit, she says, well, you can trust her to get the job done. Someone should tell her this isn't the Trust Me State, this is the Show Me State.

Kit Bond, who as Governor created thousands of jobs, held the line against taxes, and transformed a liberal-induced deficit into a budget surplus. Missouri needs a Senator who will fight against a tax increase, a man who knows how to give America more growth, not more government. Missouri needs Kit Bond, and America needs Kit Bond. But let me give a for instance. Let me give you just one example of the difference that Kit could make in the Senate. The great majority of Missourians, we know from the polls, favor the balanced budget amendment -- a constitutional amendment that will say to the government in Washington, you have to balance the budget. Forty-three States, I think, have that already. Well, earlier this year that amendment lost by one vote in the Senate. One Missouri Senator, Jack Danforth, voted for it; the other Missouri Senator voted against it. If you agree with Jack, why send someone to Washington who will cancel his vote? Elect Kit Bond so that America can have a balanced budget amendment.

Now, maybe you've noticed that I've been careful to refer to the liberal leadership of the Democratic Party. That's because I believe that the liberals who've taken control of that once great party don't represent the vast majority of hard-working, patriotic Democrats that can be found throughout America. Imagine -- you know, I'm sure that in a crowd like this there have to be some. And I'm sure, also, that there have to be some who were Democrats and, like me, have seen fit to change. Imagine if that great Missourian Harry Truman were here today, what he'd think. This was the man who battled back Communist aggression in Korea and whose timely aid saved Greece, and possibly much of Europe from Communist enslavement. What would he say about a party who sees the Soviets building another fortress, Cuba, on the American mainland and won't even lift a finger to stop it? You can bet that whatever he had to say would have been unprintable. But you'd have understood what he was saying.

Governor, the Representatives, and Senators that you elect will determine the future -- your future, America's future. So, before I go, let me just conduct an informal poll. Speak up loudly so that all Missouri can hear you. Do you want to go back to the days of big spending, high taxes, and runaway inflation?

I'm glad we finally got a chance to get together. I'd like to send a special greeting to someone who couldn't be here with us. She's been active in South Dakota politics for longer than I've been around -- well, maybe not quite that long. But we miss Donna Oddlund and wish her a speedy recovery from her surgery.

Being here brings back memories. I remember coming here in 1980 to ask for your support, and you came through beyond our highest expectations. You not only helped elect our ticket but to make certain the job got done right, you sent Jim Abdnor to Washington. It's a pleasure for me to come here once more, this time in support of one of the most hard-working and decent men I have ever met in public office -- Jim Abdnor. And I hope you'll do all you can to see that he is reelected to the United States Senate.

But together, with the total commitment of a team of responsible public officials like Jim Abdnor, we've turned around a desperate situation and put our country back on track. Today our country has enjoyed 45 months of economic growth. I visit you today sorely aware that even in the midst of our country's growth and expansion, some parts of our economy continue to struggle. And that's why today I'm naming Alan Tracy, who comes from a Wisconsin farm family, to a new position: my Special Assistant for Agriculture, working with me in the White House to make sure the views and interests of family farmers are always a part of our decisionmaking.

Here in the Grain Belt, we know too many farmers were encouraged by the Federal Government and by high inflation to expand and make investments that now have put them right behind the eight ball. Land, unfortunately, was one of the sanctuaries in the time of inflation, and property prices rose way beyond the norm. Well, we had to do something about inflation. But -- of course that reduced those inflated prices and left many farmers, who had obtained credit on the basis of the inflated value, the security that the land offered -- that security had been vastly reduced. And it has been a very definite economic problem for them. The Federal Government, although it was run by a different bunch in those days, helped get these folks in trouble. And we're not going to pull the rug out from under them while they're struggling to get back on their feet.

I've discovered that there are a great many things that we've been doing that people aren't aware of, and particularly people in agriculture. Our administration is providing more direct support for America's farmers than that provided by the last five administrations in Washington all put together. It is about $26 billion this year alone. Here in South Dakota, we've spent over $2\1/4\ billion in these last 5 years. But the answer, in the long run, is not more subsidies or more controls. Coming from rural America, I understand: Farmers don't want another government program; they don't want to live on subsidies; what they want to do is make an honest, legitimate profit.

And we are, with Jim Abdnor's support and guidance, taking steps that offer hope for American agriculture. The first step is opening up world markets to our products. Sometimes it's difficult to get tough with our friends in other countries, but that's what we've had to do. And they're beginning to get our message. It's either free trade and open markets for both sides, or it's no deal. We're taking steps to pressure our allies to pull back from subsidizing their own agriculture, so that when the American farmer competes, it's on an equal footing. These things are being done at a time when the value of the dollar is being brought into line with other currencies, permitting Americans to meet the competition on a level playing field. Finally, American farmers no longer have to fear being singled out to bear the brunt of a foreign policy maneuver. We've made a commitment: As long as any American is permitted to do business with the Soviets, there will be no grain embargo.

Our economic recovery program has started to pay off for America's farmers by cutting their production costs. Interest rates, energy prices, and inflation -- murderously high when we took office -- are down, way down. The last thing farmers or anyone else needs now is the return of control in the United States Senate to the big taxers and big spenders who will open the cage and turn the inflation monster loose on America once again. And that's why the November election is so important for you and for the country. What you have in South Dakota is a classic choice between a responsible leader working for the long-run interest of his country and constituents versus a compulsive spender, the kind of razzle-dazzle liberal who put our country in the soup in the first place.

I grew up in a small town in the Midwest, and I know why Jim Abdnor loves rural America. He sees it as a way of life. He identifies with the people who work in the granaries, the shops and garages, and in the fields. He has worked and sweated for a good portion of his life, especially the last 6 years, for the people of America's heartland. There's a sign on my desk in the Oval Office that reads: ``There is no limit to what a man can do or where he can go if he doesn't mind who gets the credit.'' Well, that reminds me so much of Jim. He never cared who got the credit, only that the job got done. And I can't believe in November the people of this State are going to trade in a workhorse for a showhorse. And today is a perfect example.

I was going to make my remarks with Jim Abdnor sitting here on the platform. He could have been here in the spotlight, but instead he answered the call of duty. He's back in Washington protecting the taxpayers from last-minute raids and looking out for the interests of South Dakota. I have to believe the people of this State want another 6 years of that kind of devotion.

In just one term, Jim has written and been the original sponsor of seven bills that became law, and has passed more than 50 amendments. He's stood up and said no to the interest groups who have full-time professionals in Washington trying to get their hands in your pockets. Jim, in fact, has won the Watchdogs of the Treasury Award eight times straight. The Chamber of Commerce gives him high marks, and the National Federation of Independent Business has named him a ``Guardian of Small Business'' -- every year he has been named this that he has been in the Senate.

I understand that Jim's opponent tries hard to portray a different image here in South Dakota than he does in Washington. It is sufficient for me to say that Teddy Kennedy has supported our administration more often than Jim Abdnor's opponent. And a few weeks ago, I was out in California, and I couldn't help but notice that some of the chic group from the industry I used to be in, there in Hollywood, had gathered at one posh Malibu home to raise huge sums of money for ``left-leaning Senate candidates.'' Well, Jim's opponent may be the choice of that flash-and-glitter crowd, but come November, he's not going to be the choice of the people of South Dakota. Jim is as different from one of those lighter-than-air liberals as anyone can be. He's been a farmer all his life. He's one of only two farmers on the Senate Subcommittee of Agriculture Appropriations, and his friends and neighbors back home are never far from his mind.

I'm pleased to tell you that I've advised Jim, who's been very concerned about this subject, that the United States Department of Agriculture will make advanced deficiency payments to farmers under the Target Price Program this fall, if Congress will work with us to make room for them in next year's budget. Now, earlier this year, Jim got an amendment to a bill passed that allows farmers unable to plant due to flooding and excessive rain to keep their advance deficiency payments rather than have to return money already invested in seed and fertilizer. He is the author of a bill now on the verge of passing that will revolutionize national water policy and development. Instead of pork barreling, buying votes, or playing to the crowd during an election year, Jim's bill is a true example of responsible reform. With user fees and cost-sharing provisions, he is seeing to it that Federal water development continues, even in an era of budget cuts. Well, I could go on, but you get the picture. Jim Abdnor works hard, he deserves your votes.

My friends, this election will not only determine if our country continues to move forward, but also whether it will remain safe and secure. When Jim's opponent and his liberal colleagues dominated American Government, our military strength was permitted to decline. Communism was on the offensive, and even our friends began to wonder whether or not they could rely on America. Today, with Jim Abdnor's support, we have rebuilt America's defensive strength.

We've ferreted billions of dollars of waste and fraud out of the system we inherited. And that's why you've seen so many news stories on the subject. I delight in being able to tell my fellow citizens, face to face, that when you've seen those stories about $400 hammers and so forth: That is what has been going on, and the reason you've read about it is because we've discovered it and done something about it.

We have restored America's pride in those who wear the uniform of the United States military. God love them, they deserve it. And I hope you agree with me that we cannot ask those brave men and women who defend this country to put their lives on the line unless we're willing to give them the top-quality weapons and equipment they need to get the job done and come home safely.

You know, we landed out here at the National Guard Airport, and I have to say just one thing that's different. I saw those rows of planes. Well, they weren't there before, just a few years ago. And what planes we did have, on any given day 50 percent of them couldn't get off the ground for lack of spare parts or crew. Well, today the Western alliance is strong, and the forces of freedom are on the offensive. And another thing I'm proud of: In these last 5\1/2\ years, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to communism. In fact, one small country, Grenada, has been brought back into the family of free nations.

But liberals, totally out of touch with mainstream America, would cut our military strength and put the United States back -- pull it back from our international responsibilities. They're waiting in the wings, ready to act if they recapture the United States Senate. I say a weaker America is not a safer America. And I say when we negotiate with our adversaries, we should do it from a position of strength.

This coming November, the people of South Dakota have the opportunity to do a great service to their country. Along with voting for Jim, you can also help by casting your ballot for Dale Bell, who will do a great job. He'll do a great job representing you in the House of Representatives. And, my, will he find targets there.

I know this is purely a State matter, but as a former Governor, I can't help but tell you that I think George Mickelson is going to make South Dakota a great Governor. And he has a tough act to follow. I know how proud all of you are of Bill Janklow. He's been a leader in the truest sense of the word. Bill, Jim, and these other fine South Dakotans demonstrate why the country is turning to the Republican Party for leadership. We share the vision of a free, opportunity-filled America; and our standard bearers are solid men and women, people you can trust.

All of us who are grown up -- and I've been that for a long time -- the most important thing you can do for their future is reelect Jim Abdnor. He has been a champion for South Dakota and in the cause of a strong, proud, and free America. And by reelecting Jim Abdnor, we can prove to these young people that nice guys don't have to finish last. I hope you help me make sure the nicest guy in the Senate finishes first.

Arena. He was introduced by Gov. William Janklow. In his remarks, he referred to the release of Nicholas Daniloff of U.S. News & World Report. Mr. Daniloff had been arrested on charges of espionage in the Soviet Union on August 30. Earlier, the President attended a reception for major donors to Senator Abdnor's reelection campaign in the arena. Following his remarks at the rally, the President returned to Washington, DC.

Secretariat, to plead nolo contendre to all three counts of the indictment filed against him. The court has remanded Mr. Zakharov into the custody of the Soviet Ambassador to the United States for the purpose of effecting his immediate departure from this country. It is expected that Mr.

During the discussions held over the past 10 days, Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze has informed me that Yuriy Orlov, one of the founders of the Helsinki Monitoring Group and a giant of the Soviet human rights movement, will be allowed to leave the Soviet Union. Mr. Orlov and his wife will depart by October 7 and are expected to come to this country. The precise timing and means of their departure will be determined through diplomatic channels.

Orlov, a physicist by profession and member of the Armenian Academy of Sciences, was chairman of Moscow's Helsinki Monitoring Group until his arrest in October 1977 for alleged anti-Soviet activity. The Helsinki monitors, a courageous group of human rights activists, openly attempted to hold the Soviet authorities accountable to their commitments under the Helsinki accords of 1975. They maintained direct contact with Western diplomats and journalists in an effort to keep them informed of Soviet human rights abuses. Such well-known figures as Andrei Sakharov, Yelena Bonner, and Anatoly Shcharanskiy participated in the Moscow Helsinki Monitoring Group. And similar groups modeled on the Moscow example sprang up in other major Soviet cities.

Orlov was a founding member and driving force behind the Helsinki monitors. As chairman of the Moscow group, he singled himself out for particular attention from the KGB and was caught up in the first wave of arrests of group members. In 1978 he was sentenced to 7 years in a strict-regime labor camp and 5 years of internal exile. Since 1984 he has been forced to live in a remote Siberian village in extremely harsh physical conditions. At age 62 Orlov is in extremely poor health as a result of prolonged periods of solitary confinement, up to 6 months at a time, in labor camps and severe beatings suffered both in camp and in exile. Orlov's wife, Irina Vitova, shared his commitment to the Helsinki process. She has maintained regular contact with Western Embassies and journalists over the years since her husband's arrest and has steadfastly worked to ameliorate the harsh conditions of his confinement.

President. Yes. Yes, that's what I was here to tell you about. [Laughter] I am pleased to announce that General Secretary Gorbachev and I will meet October 11th and 12th in Reykjavik, Iceland. The meeting was proposed by General Secretary Gorbachev, and I've accepted. And it will take place in the context of preparations for the General Secretary's visit to the United States, which was agreed to at Geneva in November of '85. And I might say the United States and the Soviet Union appreciate the willingness of the Government of Iceland to make this meeting in Reykjavik possible. So, I know you will all be on your best manners.

Mr. President, why did you change your mind on this? All year you had seemed to oppose the idea of a meeting in a neutral country and demanded that it was the General Secretary's turn to come to the U.S. And is there any agenda for this meeting? Are you going to have any kind of agreements on INF or risk reduction centers?

President. No, this in no way discounts the fact and what we've said about a summit -- this is not a summit. This was a suggestion by his -- that he and I, one on one, meet earlier and make that in neutral country because we have agreed that -- yes, to the summits, that this one would be here and the next one would be in their country.

President. I hoped for that the last time we met, and I'll continue to hope for that. And our arms negotiators have continued to meet -- both sides have made proposals, and there have been differences between them. And so far those differences have not been reconciled.

Well, Mr. President, on that subject, we believe the Soviets seized Daniloff because of our arrest of Zakharov, and they wanted Zakharov out. They're now going to get Zakharov out. What do you say to those who say that you've lost on that trade, and they got what they wanted?

President. No, not at all. There was no connection between these two releases, and I don't know just what you have said so far about this, but there were other arrangements with regard to Zakharov that resulted in his being freed.

President. May I point out to you that there have been several instances over the recent years in which we have arrested a spy and convicted a spy here in this country. And in each instance we ended up -- rather than giving them board and room here -- we ended up exchanging them for dissidents and people who wanted exit from the Soviet Union.

Mr. President, you said that Daniloff was a hostage. What message do you have for other American hostages today -- for instance, those in Lebanon who have not been beneficiaries of these negotiations?

President. I'm glad that this is the last question, and I have looked forward to answering this one. I understand I'm scheduled soon for a press conference, and I'm going to save all the ammunition for that. So, I'll see you again.

President. But, to answer this question, I understand the sorrow, the grief of the families of the hostages who are held in Beirut and -- we assume they're held in Beirut because that's the kind of hostage situation this is. There has never been a direct contact with us from the holders of those hostages, the kidnapers, but there hasn't been a day since they were taken that we have not been engaged in efforts to get them out.

And I can just add this: that sometimes we've thought that we were on the verge of doing that and then there's been a sharp disappointment. And so, as I say, I can understand the families -- if this looks at one. But look at the difference: Here we are dealing with a government with which we have diplomatic relations. In the other, we're dealing with faceless terrorists who have only, through others, issued a demand that cannot be met, and we, as I say -- there is not a day that goes by that we're not bending every effort to get those people home.

Mr. Secretary, how do you answer those who say that what this Daniloff arrangement really means is that the Soviets now have license anytime they want to get out a captured KGB spy, all they've got to do is grab an American inside the Soviet Union?

Shultz. I think that we have to look at our overall objectives here and then judge what has happened, including the answer to that question, in the light of our objectives. Let me set them out for you.

Second, we want to get Daniloff out. Third, we want to address your question, in part, by making it clear that we have run out of any patience with the idea of any country using its people in the U.N. Mission as a platform for espionage against the United States. And at the same time, we want to handle these matters as best we can so that the ongoing, potentially positive results from our negotiations and discussions with the Soviet Union can continue and have a chance of bearing fruit.

Those were our objectives. Now Daniloff is out. The Soviets have assured us that their numbers in the U.N. Mission presently are less than those that we set out for October 1st. In their terms, they decided to do that for reasons of efficiency in running their Mission. But at any rate, from our standpoint, the numbers are there.

Second, they have told us, and our own information confirms, that the majority of those on the list we gave them have left; and they have described to us their conception of a normal rotation process, but those people have left. They asked us in the course of our discussions for a grace period, and that was extended by 2 weeks. And we expect to have further information by the time that expires.

So, we have been achieving our objectives in that sense, and we have managed in the discussions that were held here, and in the response, in the prospective meeting in Iceland shows we have managed to keep the possibility of positive results in this relationship going. And so overall, I think it's been a pretty good week for us, and I hope they may feel the same way.

Well, then, let me back up. It sounds to me as you've now done what 2 weeks ago you refused to do about the U.N. Mission. You wanted to see documents, you wouldn't take their word for it that they've left. On top of that, in a blanket allegation, the administration said, ``These 25 are spies.'' It strikes me now, and please correct me if I'm wrong, that in the negotiations the U.S. has given a little ground, it has agreed to take their word for it. Number one, on who's left and who hasn't left, and number two, to withdraw the notion that all 25 are spies.

Shultz. The numbers that we sought we have attained. And we have had an explicit discussion with them about that. Obviously, we keep track of the numbers, but a reason, for example, why it's difficult for us to know precisely what their level is, is that if somebody in their Mission who has a multiple entry visa returns to Moscow, we don't know whether he's coming back or not until he comes back. So, that's why we have to have a discussion about this matter, and we have had it. And so, we have their estimate and description of that staffing level. Furthermore, we've had an explicit discussion about the 25. Obviously, they see it differently than we do, but from our standpoint, the important thing is that most of them have left. And I believe we will deal successfully with the balance of this problem.

So overall, I think that what we are seeking -- namely, to make it clear to everyone, not only the Soviet Union -- that the use of the U.N. Mission as an espionage platform is out. And I think that's one of the things that has come out of this. It is a very strong sentiment and a very important point.

Shultz. Well, this is a preparatory meeting, proposed as such and accepted as such. And in a way it's very much a part of the process that has been going on with increasing intensity over the last 2 or 3 months, where we've had all sorts of special groups meeting on all the different subjects that we have under review. So, this is a meeting that will give a special push, obviously, and I think it's a very good idea, a good thing. Now, our agenda will be our regular agenda. Obviously, we're going to talk about arms control issues, and they're important. And we have made progress in a number of areas. You mentioned INF, that's one of them. We're going to talk about various bilateral problems. We're going to talk about regional issues. You can be sure that we're going to keep the subject of human rights on the agenda.

So, all of these subjects will in various ways be discussed. I think that if we can move things to the point where on some significant things -- well, they're all significant, but especially significant things -- we can see the gap closed and the prospect of an agreement. That is all to the good. But, of course, we have to look at the content and both be satisfied with the content. But there has been enough motion and enough sense of the importance of this that perhaps this meeting can do what's necessary to energize our own -- both negotiators and provide for a productive summit meeting in the United States, hopefully still in 1986.

Shultz. I don't want to specify the numbers. We know the numbers. In discussing this issue, some questions have been raised about some members of the group -- and we're willing to hear what they have to say about that. But at any rate, we expect to see 25 people that we think have an association with intelligence activities leave.

Mr. Secretary, you've said this is a preparatory summit. But after all, it is a summit. And this administration's policy has been that summits must be carefully prepared and must have a very good chance of tangible results. If I understood the President correctly, he's not certain what's going to come out of this summit. Why did your policy change, and don't you take a risk that, in fact, nothing will come out?

Shultz. Well, in the announcement that the President read, I believe it calls it a meeting, but you're the labeler. That's the way it is described by them to us and us to them, that it is a preparatory meeting. Obviously, it's at the level of heads of state. Now, in a real sense, it is being carefully prepared.

We have been working hard on all of the different areas of subject matter for a long time and, as I said, with great intensity this summer. We had our Geneva arms control team in Moscow for a couple of days and theirs here for a couple of days. We've had a number of meetings on regional issues, we had an overall meeting that Under Secretary [of State for Political Affairs Micheal H.] Armacost chaired, we've had a major discussion of bilateral issues, and we've also discussed the human rights area.

So, there's been a lot of preparatory work, and the question now is: Through a meeting of the two heads, will we be able to energize this process still further and make the summit meeting in 1986 -- which, as I said, we still hope it will be in 1986 -- make it genuinely productive?

Mr. Secretary, could you please assess for us the impact that the Daniloff case has had on U.S.-Soviet relations? Some people have suggested that, in fact, instead of hurting chances for a summit, it has propelled chances for a summit -- as we see with this meeting next week. That, in fact, it forced both sides to stop the diplomatic posturing and get serious about relations.

Shultz. I think the President put it right. Something like the Daniloff case doesn't contribute to a summit; it tends to create a bad atmosphere and tends to make people in the United States concerned about what will happen to them if they go to the Soviet Union and so on. So, I don't think that contributes anything. On the other hand, it was an impediment, and as we have said, it was hard to imagine a fruitful summit while Daniloff was being held. So, his release clears that atmosphere, and I think will enable us to move forward productively.

Shultz. Well, we have a continuing dialog with the Soviet Union about a large number of dissidents, about divided families, about emigration generally. So, there is an ongoing urging of them to take action in those areas.

Thank you, sir. Mr. Secretary, how important do you think having this meeting is to the Soviets? In your talks with Mr. Shevardnadze did you get the feeling that Mr. Daniloff would've been released if these plans for a meeting in Iceland had not been agreed to by the United States?

Shultz. The Daniloff case, and the various other aspects of it, no doubt, troubled them; but they certainly troubled us, and we were not about to go. And I don't think one could have had a fruitful summit without these matters being settled. Now, insofar as their assessment of the need for this preparatory meeting is concerned, the fact that they suggested it in the first place shows that they felt it could be a productive contribution to this dialog. So, I assume that's their belief, and as we considered it, and the President considered it, we agreed. And so, the meeting will be held.

Shultz. Well, I don't want to get into the prediction business beyond saying that there has been a great change in the negotiating positions on INF, comparing now with, let's say, a year and a half or so ago. So, there's been a lot of motion, and in the discussions that we've had there are suggestions of other possible areas where agreement might be found. So, I think there are reasonable prospects. But on all of these things, you never have an agreement until you have an agreement. So, it's a little hard to assess just how far along we are.

Shultz. There are all sorts of problems here, and I think that the strong and resolute action by the President probably sends a pretty good message of how we feel about it and what we'll do about it. And so, I think you have to look at all these things as a package. But obviously, the Soviet Union can pick up people in their country, and have over a long period of time. And just look at the history of Mr. Orlov, as an example.

Mr. Secretary, I gather from what you've said that the Soviets still have not committed themselves to attending a summit in the U.S. Is it your feeling that they're going to Iceland with the idea of waiting and seeing how that will turn out before they decide about a summit here?

Shultz. No. I think it's very clear that they recognize, as we do, that the genuine summits will be -- the next one in the U.S. and the following one in the Soviet Union. That's in everybody's plan, and that's what's referred to in the statement that the President read today. So, there's no suggestion that this meeting in Iceland is a substitute for a summit. It's quite the contrary.

Mr. Secretary, could you tell us what grounds did they cite for the need for this meeting in Iceland? And what was our reason for accepting this notion after we had rejected the notion of the two leaders meeting on neutral territory before?

Shultz. We are engaged in a very important and very serious effort to try to get control of the escalating numbers of nuclear weapons and, in whatever way we can, to get a better handle on the tensions around the world that erupt out of regional problems of various kinds, human rights problems, even some of our bilateral issues. We've worked at it very hard, and I observe that the Soviets have, too. We believe, and I think they do, that a real, well-prepared, extensive summit meeting in the United States on the one hand, in the Soviet Union on the other, can be a good thing. We want to make it as good a thing as possible. That's why this tremendous effort that's been going on is being made.

Now, the General Secretary suggested to the President that it would help in this preparatory effort if the two of them met -- perhaps a little less formally than a summit meeting tends to be -- and see if they can't push the ball along a little bit in, perhaps, some of the areas that show the most promise. And as we thought about it, it seemed like a sensible idea. So, why not?

Shultz. No, you were probing about the nature of our discussion. And we had some discussion about a few people that Mr. Shevardnadze had found very useful to him, and we talked about that a little bit. But anyway, our list stands; and basically, people are leaving. Obviously, the Soviets say that's because of their normal rotation. Anyway, from our standpoint, if they leave, that's what counts. And those that may still be here when we get to Reykjavik, we'll talk about that. But we expect to see that fulfilled.

Shultz. The nature of this exchange on the question of the Iceland meeting wasn't of that character at all. I think you're sort of misreading the whole thing. The President received a letter, and it had in it commentary about a wide variety of matters, and it wound up in effect saying, expressing the importance the General Secretary attached to this whole process and made the suggestion that if there were a meeting of this kind in the near future, that might be helpful. And we thought about it, and the President decided that perhaps it could be. And we should be willing to do those things of this sort, that may help this process along. And really, it's just as simple as that.

Mr. Secretary, why did the President not tell the Soviets in reply to that suggestion, okay, if you agree to a date certain, on a summit here in the United States? Why did he not use that opportunity to pin them down to a summit date?

Shultz. Because I don't think that sort of cat-and-mouse game on these sorts of things is a productive way to go about it. We did explore carefully their conception of this meeting -- that is a preparatory meeting -- and their desire, as well as ours, to have a summit in 1986 in the United States, if it's possible. And so, that's what we're shooting for.

Mr. Secretary, is it still your understanding of the Soviet position that a formal summit, if it's in the United States at the end of this year, be an occasion to sign formal arms agreements? And if that is still the Soviet precondition, what are the prospects of being able to do that at a year-end summit here?

Shultz. I don't think we're talking about preconditions. What we're talking about is what's desirable, and there are lots of different ways to satisfy both of our desires to have significant results from these meetings. Why not? If they're available -- it's almost as though you're saying that it would be a great thing if we had this meeting and nothing came of it. I don't agree with that. I think the object is to have these meetings and have something come of it and both sides agree to that. So, we're trying to find our way to things that will be good from our standpoint that can be part of a summit meeting. And obviously we know that they're not going to agree to something unless they think it's good from their standpoint. So, that's the nature of the deal.

Shultz. Well, I think what we saw here was Daniloff released yesterday. And what I announced today was that Zakharov is being released from the United States, and Mr. Orlov and his wife are being released from the Soviet Union. I have also, in response to your question, discussed the U.N. matter; and I think this is a very significant part of the picture, as we see it.

Shultz. And those who haven't left -- in response to a request for a grace period, we will see how that stands when we meet in Reykjavik. So, we have stayed right with our position, and we're getting the results we're seeking.

I don't think it's surprising that, if you ask them what's happened, they would say, well, we intended to bring those individuals that happened to have been named home anyway. And that's what's happening. So, that's what they say. From our standpoint, what matters is to have those people out. That's the operative fact.

Ten days ago, Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev proposed to me that we hold a preliminary meeting to make concrete preparations for his coming visit to the United States. And now that Nicholas Daniloff has been released as we insisted, an important obstacle has been removed, and I have accepted Mr. Gorbachev's proposal. We have agreed to meet in Iceland on October 11th and 12th, and it will be to prepare the ground for a productive summit, covering all the issues on our agenda: arms reductions, human rights, regional conflicts, and bilateral relations.

And now, for all the American people, I'm pleased to welcome you once more to the 41st annual meeting -- an honor to address you once again. Let me note at the outset that both the IMF and the World Bank are in the year of changes at the helm. At the IMF, Managing Director de Larosiere has announced his intention to resign after 8 years of service -- 8 of the most challenging years in the Fund's history, I might add. And he has met those challenges with strong leadership, a skillful negotiating style, and complete dedication to the mission of the institution he leads and serves. He has enhanced the prospects of the world economy for all of us, and we salute him for his service.

If this is a time of changes for the Fund and for the Bank, these are even more dramatic times for the world economy. These last 5 years, we have seen men and women begin to challenge old dogmas and rediscover timeless truths. We've seen that nations that have embraced the enduring principles of economic growth have become more prosperous and secure. And those that have not, have weakened, faltered, and fallen behind. We've heard many names given to these rediscovered economic insights -- names describing policies of taxation, regulation, government spending, monetary management, and trade. But all those names and the many theories with which they are associated come down in the end to one name, one theory, one word. The word is ``freedom,'' in this case economic freedom.

It rests on that word -- a word that means trust in the people more than in governments, trust in what the people can achieve when they are able to reach and climb as far as their natural talents and native abilities will take them.

And each time I've spoken about this vision I've said that, as with political freedom, economic freedom is not just a question of absolutes, not just a case of an open economy or a totalitarian one, but also of degree. Even in free market economies, high taxes make people less free to work, save, and invest.

And so, in 1981 America took a new course. We cut all forms of intervention in the economy, we cut the scope of regulation, we brought down tax rates, and we lowered the rate of increase in government spending. And by early 1983 we began to see the results as America entered what is now one of our longest lived expansions in the postwar era, an expansion that has been accompanied by falling inflation and falling interest rates. Today a greater percentage of our people are at work than at any time in our history. And in the last 4 days we have just taken another great step on the road to sustained growth with the passage of historic tax reform legislation. We will never forget that our growth has been, and remains, important not only to Americans but to people everywhere. Our growth has fueled the growth of the entire world economy.

I suggested that if the world economy were to grow as all of us hoped it would, we needed to turn away from small-minded calculators in big state bureaus and look, instead, to large-minded entrepreneurs in small private enterprises -- whether industrial, commercial, or agricultural -- for these people know secrets more profound than those revealed in all the charts and analyses produced by all the agencies and bureaus put together. Again, a statistic from our own situation comes to mind. According to the MIT program on neighborhood and regional change, between 1981 and 1985 businesses that were less than 5 years old, and businesses that had fewer than 20 employees, created more jobs than America as a whole. And if we had had no entrepreneurs, we in America would have lost more than 3 million jobs in that time, instead of the large gains that we, in fact, enjoyed.

All of us here today can take great satisfaction knowing that this message of economic freedom is at last being heard and acted upon in Europe and Africa, in Asia, and in Latin America. Only a few years ago in Western Europe, for example, capital markets were, to a large extent, closed to entrepreneurs. In part, because steep taxation sapped Europe's risktakers of any reason to take a chance on a new company or a new idea.

And with labor regulations that made it more difficult to lose a job than to get divorced, entrepreneurial activity was at a low ebb. Now, however, this is changing. As inflation and interest rates have fallen and new policies have been adopted to encourage growth and entrepreneurship, Europe has begun to put behind it a decade in which not one net new job was created and once more is seeing new growth, new jobs, new companies, new opportunities, and new hope.

And this progress has not been confined to the industrial world alone. Less developed countries have also caught the spirit of freedom and enterprise. In India we have seen -- within just a few harvests -- a country that imported agricultural products turn into a food exporter -- this, after incentives were introduced and controls removed. In China, too, we have heard the same story of incentive and bounty. And in famine-stricken Africa, we've seen some countries free their markets and give their farmers incentives to produce. And those countries did not suffer the devastation of their neighbors. Some, in fact, exported food to those who were starving around them. As I mentioned in my address to the United Nations of a week ago, we welcome the resolution of the Special Session on Africa that calls for more free market incentives. We in the United States are looking at ways the assistance we provide to African countries can best support development of free markets, especially in agriculture. And America hopes that other donors will do the same.

All in all, we've made great progress toward a stronger world economy since I last addressed you, and yet problems remain. I would like to turn now to some of those problems and see what we can do to solve them. And let me look at them from three vantage points: that of the United States and the industrial world; that of the developing nations; and finally, that of international organizations such as the IMF and the World Bank.

President of the United States, I'm particularly aware of the tasks that we in America have before us. Highest among these is curbing the growth of our government's spending. No nation can survive if government becomes like the man who in winter began to burn the wallboards of his house to keep warm until he had no house left and froze.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation is evidence of this, but we can and must do more. I pledge to you that I will do all in my power to stop this fiscal death march. And I believe the American people will support me in this effort.

We have other items of unfinished business in America. Bringing interest rates down even further while keeping inflation under control is one. Reducing our trade imbalances while resisting protectionist pressures at home and abroad is another. We know the role our recovery has played in the world. We know how much rides, not only for ourselves but for much of mankind, in the completion of the work that we began 5\1/2\ years ago. But while America's expansion is beneficial, other industrial nations must also contribute their fair share to world recovery and adopt more growth-oriented policies. Now, of course, some dislocations may come in the process, but we must recognize that if we're all to prosper together, then we must all work together toward that end. Every nation must contribute to world economic growth. And we must do more than repeat this high sounding sentiment; we must take practical steps.

We've come a long way since I last spoke to you. The Plaza agreement, concluded last September among five industrial nations, was a beginning toward correcting the excessive volatility in our exchange rates. Since then we have also coordinated the reduction of interest rates. And at the economic summit in Tokyo earlier this year, we agreed to new mechanisms for closer economic cooperation. All of this helps foster world growth, not only for the major nations of the world but for everyone. The industrial countries have much more to do. So, too, do the developing countries. Let me take up now the second great vantage point in the question of world economic growth, that of the developing nations.

These include lowering taxes, privatizing public enterprises, liberalizing trade and investment policies, and moving in general to more market-oriented economies. All this is important, not just for the developing countries but for all nations and people who will invest in their businesses, buy their products, sell them goods, and work with them to live in peace and brotherhood on our planet.

As Secretary [of the Treasury James A.] Baker stressed in presenting the Program for Sustained Growth in Seoul last year, growth-oriented reforms are particularly important in the debtor countries. History has shown that when nations have rising populations and do not give their people the freedom that fulfills their aspirations, those nations try to buy peace in their restless and unproductive populations by borrowing themselves into bankruptcy. Either that or they turn to oppression.

So, let us remember that growth is the key to repaying debt while fulfilling the dreams of the people. Several debtor nations have taken long steps up the path to renewed economic strength. Countries like Colombia and Argentina have brought inflation down, opened their markets. Other countries like Senegal and Ivory Coast have made progress in liberalizing their economies. And Mexico and the Philippines both recently agreed to comprehensive, growth-oriented economic programs supported by the IMF and the World Bank. It is important that these programs, as well as the comprehensive programs of other debtor nations, be fully supported by commercial banks.

The United States wants to see that role continue. We welcome the increased emphasis in the IMF on growth-oriented reform packages even while continuing the focus on financial stability. For the same reason, we welcome the recent establishment of the structural adjustment facility, and we urge the IMF to put even more emphasis on market-oriented structural reforms. The World Bank also has a critical role to play in promoting growth in less developed nations, whether troubled debtor nations or not. And we welcome an increase in the practice of lending contingent on countries turning to more market-oriented policies. We also support the early completion of negotiations for refunding of the International Development Association, and we support the implementation of the convention that establishes the Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency.

The future of world economic growth depends on choices made all over the world -- in industrial countries, in developing countries, in the IMF, and the World Bank. The question is: Will we turn toward uplands of freedom and growth or toward the swamp of state control and stagnation? This is the question every nation and every institution must ask itself. The world growth depends on our answers, and on something else closely related to those choices. This is the last area of problems I wish to discuss with you. This is the one area that can most easily jeopardize all we've achieved and hope to achieve. It might be said that since the end of the Second World War, we -- all the nations represented here -- have lived under an economic constitution. In the two decades before the adoption of that constitution, our people suffered the horrifying consequences of a collapse in international trade and monetary flows. And since its adoption, we've had 40 years of a prosperity more widely shared and more generous than the world has ever known. I call the postwar arrangement a constitution, but it has been in fact not one constitution, but three. I'm speaking of the collection of postwar international economic agreements that created the IMF, the World Bank, and, yes, the GATT.

Today each of those agreements and institutions has come to a turning point. Each is grappling with new challenges such as debt restructuring, financial instability, trade in new products and new industries, and the rise of worldwide protectionist pressures. Collectively, these turning points represent a culmination of the policies that the nations of the free world established right after the war. Those nations -- our nations -- saw that the best way to ensure a just and lasting peace, was to build an open, growing, and prosperous world economy. The same era that produced the noble proposal of the United Nations, has also produced the IMF, the World Bank, and GATT. And these institutions gave us a growing and prosperous world economy, but many of the arrangements originally incorporated into them presumed America's singular strength.

And for more than a decade now, Europe and Japan combined have had a role equivalent to that of the United States in world trade and an increasingly important role in finance. Many other countries, those with open markets and low taxes, are growing rapidly and may soon become fully industrialized and can expect to play more prominent parts as well.

These have been healthy developments and ones that reflect the success of our postwar vision. But they have led to strains in the postwar agreements, and these strains have given rise to a new round of significant questions about how the world economy should develop from here. Questions such as: How can we coordinate our policies to restore stability to exchange rates? How can we resist protectionist pressures as our nations become more nearly equal competitors and world trade grows? How can we manage our financial responsibilities without sacrificing growth? And how should we expand our international constitutions so that the hopes and opportunities of the last generation can also be the hopes and opportunities of the next?

The recent GATT ministerial was a good first step toward answering some of these questions. The ministers decided on comprehensive negotiations that would include trade and agriculture, services, investment, and intellectual property.

But we needed more steps. First of all, we need to resolve that a further opening of the world economy is a goal worth working for. I know I believe it is. I lived through the Great Depression back in the thirties. I saw what so-called protectionism brought the world. Nothing was protected; everything was destroyed. And today the stakes are even higher. In my country, for example, up to 10 million jobs are tied to international trade, as is 20 percent of our gross national product, compared to 12 percent in 1929. The choice is simple: We can go forward or backward. I believe that we must move to a more open world economy.

And this is why I have vetoed protectionist legislation. It's why I have supported strong and growing roles for the IMF and the World Bank. It's why Secretary Baker presented his plan to strengthen our multilateral strategy for dealing with the debt crisis. And it's why we've pressed for a new GATT round. It is why, also, we have moved and will continue to move aggressively against unfair trading practices in other nations. No trading system among equals can survive if some feel they're being discriminated against, and if there are enormous imbalances in trade flows. The only ways to resolve the external imbalances are through increased growth abroad, a greater competitiveness for the U.S. dollar, or both -- coupled with the opening of markets.

My friends, I believe that the challenge before us is to develop a truly global economy, one that celebrates the diversity of our nations while it opens us to uninhibited trade and investment among our peoples. We've traveled a vast distance toward such a world in the last 40 years. We've come so far. And now, it's time for stock-taking, for planning with open minds the next leg of the journey, and for beginning it. Let us look with open minds at ways of promoting stable exchange rates and assuring sound money. Let us approach with open minds the next round of trade talks and push them as far as we can to our goal of eliminating all trade barriers.

We are, my friends, on a great journey of exploration. And as on all such journeys, from time to time we tire. But if we're strong and if we continue onward, I believe we will find that a more bountiful land lies before us. Let us all join together on this great journey. Let us reaffirm our commitment to the institutions that have brought us this far. And let us reaffirm our commitment to strengthening them for the adventure that lies ahead.

Iceland is a vital United States ally that provides defense facilities of strategic importance to the defense of the United States and NATO. Recently, a troublesome issue has arisen concerning the transportation of cargoes to the base in Iceland, an issue that could impair the critical United States-Iceland defense relationship. Although for approximately 14 years such cargoes had been transported exclusively by Icelandic shipping companies, under U.S. cargo preference laws they have more recently been carried primarily by a United States carrier, which entered the trade in 1984. The Government of Iceland has taken the position that because Iceland's economy and security depend upon its shipping lines, and because of our mutual defense interests, Icelandic lines should have the opportunity to compete for participation in this trade. Iceland's serious concern about this defense issue has been expressed at the highest levels. This Treaty will resolve this matter and will further the cooperation of the United States and Iceland in essential areas of defense.

Treaty provides an exception to inconsistent cargo preference law with regard to transportation of cargoes shipped between the United States and Iceland for purposes of the 1951 United States-Iceland Defense Agreement. Under the Treaty, transportation of such cargoes shall be provided by vessels of the United States and vessels operated by Icelandic shipping companies on the basis of competition pursuant to the Treaty. Any such competition is to result in contract awards that ensure that both United States flag carriers and Icelandic shipping companies are able to maintain a viable presence in the trade. The related Memorandum of Understanding provides for implementing arrangements necessary to ensure achievement of these objectives.

In view of the important national security interests furthered by this Treaty, I recommend that the Senate consider this Treaty as soon as possible, and give its advice and consent to ratification of the Treaty, with related Memorandum of Understanding, during this session.

American people must redouble their efforts to prevent fires and their terrible toll in human lives and the destruction of property. There are encouraging signs: Today smoke detectors have been installed in 75 percent of American homes. Our target is 100 percent. National public awareness campaigns have prompted many families to plan and practice means of quick escape if fire strikes in the home. Fire safety concepts, such as ``Stop, Drop, and Roll'' to smother a clothing fire, are gaining currency. Many homes have installed sprinkler systems to extinguish fires quickly, and more Americans are making it a practice to keep fire extinguishers handy in the home, especially in the kitchen, where many fires start. There is an increased awareness and avoidance of such dangerous practices as smoking in bed, leaving matches where young children can get at them, and overloading electrical circuits.

Management Agency and its United States Fire Administration are working with all levels of government, the private sector, service organizations, and volunteer groups to launch a national campaign to assure that every home in the United States has a properly installed and maintained smoke detector. The Operation Life Safety program, a consortium of the private sector, the International Association of Fire Chiefs, and the United States Fire Administration, also is making valuable contributions by encouraging the installation of residential sprinkler systems. Over 150 communities have established such programs at last count.

We are very proud of, and grateful to, our Nation's fire fighters: the more than one million men and women, both volunteer and career, who daily risk their own lives to save the lives and property of others. Last year 122 fire fighters gave their lives in the line of duty. They are true heroes to whom we owe a lasting debt of gratitude. I am pleased to know they will be honored at the National Fallen Fire Fighters Memorial Service at the National Emergency Training Center in Emmitsburg, Maryland, on October 12.

I commend the many national, State, and local organizations whose dedicated commitment to fire safety has done so much to reduce our Nation's fire losses in the last decade, and I am grateful for the contributions of the National Fire Protection Association, the originator of Fire Prevention Week, and I congratulate this organization as it celebrates its 90th anniversary this year.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

President today met in the Cabinet Room with Members of the House and Senate to discuss legislation to restore economic viability to the Nation's energy-producing regions. The President expressed his concern for the current state of the domestic oil and gas industry, which he called a matter of vital concern for every American. He believes that the Nation's security is dependent upon a strong and competitive domestic oil and gas industry, and he said that America must never again be dependent on unreliable foreign sources of oil. The President reviewed his administration's efforts to help the industry without bringing big government back into Americans lives.

I agree with the remarks of the Members in the House and the Senate who, speaking in favor of passage of this legislation, expressed reluctance to have the Federal Government inject itself into the collective bargaining process. Those Members of Congress noted that throughout the 60-year history of the Railway Labor Act, the Congress has intervened in negotiations between labor and management only in extraordinary cases where a continued, unresolved dispute threatened to deprive the Nation of essential transportation services.

Recently, however, the smooth functioning of the Railway Labor Act has been severely upset by Federal court decisions permitting secondary picketing of carriers not directly involved in a particular dispute. The effect of these decisions is to create the potential for a national strike in every dispute between labor and management that is governed by the Railway Labor Act. Secondary picketing is restricted in virtually all other industries under the National Labor Relations Act. The administration is submitting to the Congress legislation that will restore to the Railway Labor Act the same reasonable limitations on secondary activity that apply to workers in other industries under the National Labor Relations Act.

The legislation we will propose is designed to ensure that Federal intervention in the collective bargaining process, as in the measure I have signed today, is once again limited to extraordinary disputes of national significance as has been the case throughout the history of the Railway Labor Act. Until enactment of such legislation, the only alternative to Federal intervention in any number of regional disputes will be to accept in each case the threat of a shutdown of the Nation's rail system. I therefore urge the Congress to give the same speedy and considered attention to that legislation that it so responsibly devoted to the passage of S.J. Res. 415.

Yesterday marked the first major sale of our Federal loan portfolio. The Farmers Home Administration brought over $1 billion in community development loans to market. The investor reception has been so positive that the underwriters were able to increase the price of the loans and guarantee a very good return to the Treasury. The bonds that will be issued later this month will carry a Triple-A rating and have an effective yield of less than 1 percent over comparable U.S.

But this sale means more than the simple return to the Government. First, it proves that many Federal financial assets can be successfully sold without Federal guarantees providing for more efficient servicing of these loans in the long run. Second, and more importantly, the difference between the final price and the face value of the loans will clearly indicate the implied Federal subsidy in these credit programs.

It is often too easy, when faced with the choice of raising taxes to directly fund a government program, to establish subsidized credit which competes with the private sector and masks true costs to the taxpayers. These three loan sales will tell us exactly how much subsidy is being provided while at the same time assist with reducing our budget deficit.

Executive departments and agencies shall identify proposed regulatory and statutory provisions that may have significant potential negative impact on the family well-being and provide adequate rationale on why such proposal should be submitted. The head of the department or agency, shall certify in writing that, to the extent permitted by law, such measure has been assessed in light of the criteria in Section 1 of this Order and how such measures will enhance family well-being. Such certification shall be transmitted to the Office of Management and Budget. Departments and agencies shall give careful consideration to family-related concerns and their impact in notices of proposed rulemaking and messages transmitting legislative proposals to the Congress.

The Office of Management and Budget shall, to the extent permitted by law, take action to ensure that the policies of the Executive departments and agencies are applied in light of the criteria set forth in Section 1 of this Order.

The Office of Policy Development shall assess existing and proposed policies and regulations that impact family well-being in light of the criteria established by Section 1 of this Order, provide evaluations on those measures that have significant potential impact on the family to the Office of Management and Budget, and advise the President on policy and regulatory actions that may be taken to strengthen the institutions of marriage and family in America.

Office of Policy Development shall submit preliminary reports including specific recommendations to the Domestic Policy Council and shall submit a final report to the President no later than 180 days from the date of this Order. Each year thereafter, a report, including recommendations shall be submitted, through the Domestic Policy Council to the President.

This Order is intended to improve the internal management of the Executive branch and is not intended to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by a party against the United States, its agencies, its officers, or any person.

To the extent provided by law and subject to the availability of appropriations, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall provide the Commission with such administrative services, funds, facilities, staff, and other support services as may be necessary for the performance of its functions.

Economic Bill of Rights to end unfair government competition and return government programs and assets to the American people. Privatization follows in the great tradition of free enterprise and private ownership of property that has long been a part of American history, from the initial sale of government lands under the Northwest Ordinance to the homestead program that brought the pioneers to the American West over 100 years ago.

There are many activities that are not the proper function of the Federal Government and that should simply be left to the private sector. The American people know that in many cases the Government is less efficient than private enterprise in providing certain services. Government agencies do not have the same incentives and interests that allow the private market to provide goods and services more efficiently and effectively.

Privatization programs have the potential for bringing enormous benefits to all members of society. Workers can be given part ownership in the newly created private company and often receive a pay raise. The public receives better services.

Managers are free to respond to the proper incentives to build a successful business, and competition in the free market allows others to share in the prosperity. As recent experience in Great Britain shows, privatization also increases the public participation in the market system: By selling government-owned enterprises, the number of families owning stock increased dramatically.

In the United States, privatization has been pursued more aggressively at the State and local level than at the Federal level. One of the many success stories comes from right here in southern California. The University of Southern California's Medical Center, which is operated by Los Angeles County, contracted out its food service and found that it could save over $6 million in 4 years. Most of the county workers affected by the change went to work for the private contractor, and 90 percent of them received a pay hike when the service went private.

Commission will be chaired by Professor David Linowes of the University of Illinois. The other members will bring a wide range of expertise to the Commission. The bipartisan Commission will study all activities of the Federal Government and report back to me on which government programs, enterprises, and activities are more appropriately part of the private sector. In addition, the Commission is expected to review scholarly work on privatization and examine the accomplishments of other countries and State and local governments. Based on its findings, the Commission will propose how we can return appropriate Federal activities to the private sector through the sale of government operations and assets, the use of private enterprise to provide services for government agencies, or the use of vouchers to provide services to the public through the private sector. It will recommend legislative and administrative action that can be taken to accomplish the privatization initiatives. In the meantime, my administration will continue to vigorously pursue our current privatization initiatives.

It is my hope that my Commission on Privatization can take politics out of the privatization effort and propose a national policy, one that draws upon the lessons of our past successes -- such as the homestead program in the West -- that transformed the American economy into the biggest and best this world has ever seen, and a policy that calls upon the ingenuity of our free enterprise system to benefit all Americans.

D. Antonovich, of California, is on the board of supervisors for Los Angeles County, the largest local government in the country. One of the board's top three priorities has been privatization, and since 1980 they have authorized 645 private contracts for a savings of $100 million.

Independent Steelworkers Union at Weirton Steel Corp., the largest employee-owned company in America. He recently served as a member of the Presidential Task Force for Project Economic Justice, which promoted privatization and employee ownership as an alternative to state socialism in Central America.

In both her current position and her former position as vice president of government affairs for Air Florida, she acted as the primary liaison between government and the private sector for each company.

Governor of New Mexico, took office in January of this year. Since that time he has established a privatization cabinet council to study privatization in State government. As former Assistant Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Interior, he led the efforts on privatization in coal leasing.

L. Priest, of Connecticut, is professor of law, director of the program in civil liability, and director of the Center for Studies in Law, Economics, and Public Policy at Yale Law School. He has written a number of articles on economic policies.

I hope all of you are enjoying this Labor Day weekend, a time for family outings, backyard barbecues, and a time of appreciation for the working people of America. It was back in 1882 when Peter McGuire, the son of Irish immigrants and founder of the Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners, first came up with the idea of setting a day aside to honor the laboring people of our country. On September 5th of that year, 1882, the first Labor Day celebration took place in New York City. By 1894 it had spread throughout the country and was proclaimed a Federal holiday by an act of Congress.

American working men and women have much of which to be proud. Our democracy is based on their good sense and commitment to liberty. It was the hard work and skill of working people that turned a vast American wilderness into the world's most powerful economy. Our working people are still the most productive on the planet. I've always believed that, given the tools and equipment they need and on a level playing field, American workers can outcompete and beat the pants off anybody, anywhere.

Now, there are those who don't have this same confidence. They fear foreign competition, as is reflected in protectionist trade proposals that float around Washington these days. Well, restricting trade in the long run is bad for everybody, especially for the working people of America. Protecting one domestic industry risks retaliation against another. For example, American agriculture would be dealt a devastating blow if our trading partners shut their markets to our farm products in retaliation to American protectionism.

Trade and commerce are the lifeblood of job creation. The flow of goods and services between countries and peoples is a stimulus to growth and prosperity. This isn't a time for us to be afraid, to be erecting barriers, or to be trying to shut out the world. Instead, we should be working to open markets, to increase our productivity, and to meet the competition head-on. And don't let anyone tell you we can't do it. Last year manufacturing productivity in the United States jumped by 3.5 percent, the biggest increase of any major industrialized nation.

We've been witnessing fundamental changes throughout the width and breadth of our economy. Management and labor have gotten serious. Companies have been restructured, overhead has been cut, costs brought down, quality improved. Impressive investments have been made in technology and computerization. American industry is stepping out in the world again, and this time it's leaner, meaner, and ready for action.

As usual, Congress is now talking about passing heavyhanded legislation to deal with our trade problem. If there's one thing that should be clear to even the casual observer, it is that quick-fixes and easy answers like protectionism are not the way to a better life. That was made abundantly evident when, during the last decade, higher taxes and bigger government gave us double-digit inflation and economic stagnation. When we got to Washington 6\1/2\ years ago, we put in place economic policies that foster lasting progress, policies that encourage people to work and invest, policies that leave more resources in the hands of the producers, consumers, and entrepreneurs rather than in the bureaucratic coffers of the Federal Government.

What has this meant for the working people of America? We're entering the 58th month of economic growth. Inflation has remained low and more than 13\1/2\ million jobs have been created, about 240,000 a month since the expansion began. Unemployment continues to drop; a higher percentage of our working-age population is employed than ever before. And last year workers' pay increases stayed well ahead of consumer price increases since hourly compensation rose an average of 3.9 percent, consumer price increases only 1.1 percent. Furthermore, poverty is declining in America, and the median family income after adjustments for inflation jumped by 4.2 percent last year, the fourth straight year in a row it's increased. In short, the working people of America are better off, and what better day to say it than on Labor Day.

You may notice that the holiday we celebrate today falls directly between the Fourth of July and Thanksgiving, days that underscore our devotion to freedom and our thanks to God. That is an appropriate spot to reserve for the recognition of the working men and women of America.

Landon. It's a great day in my life, and it's a great day in the life of all of us to have had the privilege that we have today of meeting the President of the United States and Mrs. Reagan. I give you now the President.

You don't know what a joy it is for a fellow like me to go to a birthday party for someone who can, in all honesty, call me ``kid.'' [Laughter] Today we celebrate -- I know it will actually be in just a few days -- but we're celebrating Alf Landon's first century, half the life of our nation since the framing of the Constitution. As you know, it seems right to me that Alf Landon was born in the centennial year of the Constitution and is now part of its bicentennial year.

And after all, you ask what the America that our Constitution created is, what it means, and you'll get back many answers. For example, America means a dream and the freedom to chase that dream. America means government of, by, and for the people, in a land where the sacred soul of humanity is not only respected but revered. America means justice under law.

It means peace and decency. It means a bright Kansas Sun rising over fields that hard-working, broad-shouldered farmers have planted with prayers and plowed with hope. But the funny thing is that no matter what you say when you talk about America you'll also be saying something about Alf Landon. In a hundred years, Alf Landon has chased many dreams and caught most of them. Along the way, he's found time to stand for the American values of liberty, democracy, and opportunity. And no one is more the living soul of Kansas, which to me means quiet strength and the simple decency of all America, than Alf Landon.

When it was out of fashion, you warned of the dangers of too much government and too much government spending. Recently, I was reminded that on your 90th birthday you said that credit cards are the worst things that have happened to our country; they encourage people to spend money they don't have. Well, don't spend money you don't have. I just wish I could get you to come back to Washington and help me drum that message into the Congress. But I guess the next best thing to having you in Washington is having a chip off the old block. I know you're proud, just as I'm grateful, that Nancy is in the Senate. She's doing a great job.

The President. I know the time has come to leave, but I just couldn't help but tell you a little experience. I have met the Governor on a previous birthday sometime ago, and I expressed the wish that I could meet him again on his hundredth birthday. He looked me up and down; he said, ``You seem to be in pretty good shape.

Their labor, resourcefulness, and devotion to family and country have forged the freest, most prosperous nation the world has ever known. Their trades and occupations are countless, but with all their diversity they are one in commitment to the ideals of democracy and to the dream of a better life for themselves and for their children. In the pursuit of that American dream, every generation has proven anew the dignity of work and of working people.

Day provides all of us with an opportunity to reflect on the meaning of work not simply as an economic necessity but as an expression of deeper human qualities. We can be truly grateful that God has blessed our nation with an abundance which has permitted us to produce a vast quantity of goods for people around the world. But we must always remember that of all of our resources none is more valuable or important than the American worker. We rejoice in the fact that more of our citizens are working than ever before and that we continue to be a land of hope, energy, and opportunity.

On this occasion, let us also remember the freedoms and the sacrifices that have made our abundance possible. We are heirs to a precious legacy, one that has taken centuries to build, and we must forever recognize that its preservation and increase are our glad task and solemn responsibility.

Syndrome is a deadly disease that can strike a child or teenager during recovery from a relatively innocuous viral illness -- from the flu, for example, or from chicken pox. Suddenly, instead of continuing to gain strength and health, the child becomes lethargic or disoriented, unusually excitable, hyperactive, irritable, or even combative. A frequent symptom is uncontrollable vomiting, and violent headaches and delirium may occur.

Any child can develop Reye's Syndrome, but research strongly indicates that children given aspirin as treatment for the flu or chicken pox may be particularly vulnerable. To protect their children, parents must learn to ``think Reye's'': do not use aspirin to treat children with chicken pox or influenza-like illness; do recognize the early symptoms of Reye's Syndrome; and do seek medical attention for a child immediately at the first sign of those symptoms.

They have stressed the need to avoid the use of aspirin to treat flu-like illness and chicken pox. The result has been a marked decline in the annual incidence of the disorder. According to a report published last year, the average annual incidence of Reye's Syndrome from 1981 to 1984 was lower than that of the previous five years, with the decrease identified among children younger than 10 years of age. The incidence in 1985 was much lower than during any previous year since surveillance of Reye's Syndrome was initiated in the 1970's.

Americans welcome such encouraging news. We look for further advances to come from the scientific studies of Reye's Syndrome being supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, National Institute of Child Health and Human Development, and Centers for Disease Control.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

From this moment on, we must approach each new task with the same sense of urgency that we first brought to Washington back in 1981. The challenge is no less, and the goals are still attainable. If I could interject something here: Political life has always reminded me a little of my former career. And the whole philosophy was when you come to town open big. And now, well, it's time for an even bigger finish and a good curtain call.

On the domestic side, we face one more important task -- or no more important task, I should say, then securing the confirmation to the Supreme Court of Judge Robert Bork. [Applause] Well, we all know that since his nomination Judge Bork has come under attack for being some kind of a right-wing ideologue. We also know those charges are wrong. Judge Bork believes in judicial restraint, and this means reading laws in the way intended by elected officials and pass them and not reshaping them according to judicial whim. Now, where the law deals with moral issues, Judge Bork has said -- and I quote -- ``The moral content of the law must be given by the morality of the framer, or the legislator, never the morality of the judge.'' So, consider that irony. Some legislators are organizing opposition to a judge who believes in deferring to them and in faithfully abiding by the intent of the laws they pass. The country wants and deserves a Supreme Court that doesn't make the laws but interprets the laws.

Bork is superbly qualified -- one of the outstanding legal minds in the country and a judge's judge. He's also a people's judge: a judge who believes profoundly in the Constitution that protects the people's rights and in government by the people themselves. I'm convinced that in the end he will be confirmed, but there's no denying that it's going to be a tough fight. I'll need the help of every person in this room, especially those of you who deal regularly with the Congress. I have a feeling -- well, I was going to ask a question here, but when I mentioned his name, I don't need to ask the question.

I was going to ask it, you know, to limber us all up -- that when it comes to restoring judicial restraint as the guiding principle of American courts, when it comes to winning the confirmation of Judge Bork to the Supreme Court he so richly deserves, I was going to say, can I count on you? You've already answered that question.

But next, the budget process. Excuse me; it's probably more accurate to say the so-called budget process -- delay after delay, missed deadline after missed deadline, a process that's not reliable or credible. And consider what it turns out. There's the Federal program that will spend millions to build luxury hotels, restaurants, and condominiums -- that's right, condominiums. As I remarked when I spoke about this in Indiana recently, I barely had time to figure out what yuppies were before Congress started to subsidize them.

It's time to bring an end to the yearly budget fiasco, time to enact the measures that we have put forward as part of our Economic Bill of Rights. And let me say in some areas we're not waiting for Congress to act. A new initiative I announced as part of my Economic Bill of Rights is privatization. Last week I appointed a private -- or a bipartisan commission, I should say, to report back to me on ways that we can permanently reduce the size of the Federal Government by returning appropriate activities to the private sector.

But central to the entire effort to bring discipline to the Federal budget will be passage of the line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment. On the balanced budget amendment, a special note: 32 States have already adopted resolutions calling for a constitutional convention for the purpose of drafting a balanced budget amendment -- 32 -- that's out of the 34 that are needed before a convention would actually take place. And I can tell you that every time I have mentioned balanced budget out across the country, in addresses to as many as 30,000 people in one outdoor meeting, they break into applause at that term.

And it seems that here in Washington, I think -- well, I would prefer to see the Congress show the discipline to pass a balanced budget amendment on its own. But if Congress refuses to do so, then I think we'll agree it will be our intention to take the case directly to the State legislatures. You know, I'd sort of enjoy speaking back in Sacramento again. [Laughter] On August 12th I challenged the Congress to give us an up-or-down vote on our balanced budget amendment and to negotiate on every spending item, and that offer still stands.

In foreign affairs, we're engaged in intensive negotiations with the Soviet Union on arms control, as you well know, negotiations that hold out the hope of actually cutting both sides' nuclear arsenals. And then in Nicaragua there is the urgent and crucial matter of establishing democracy. In recent weeks the issue in Central America seems at times to have become confused: Who is proposing what? How many likely votes are there on Capitol Hill for this or that? But the real issue has never changed. The real issue is peace and democracy in Central America and the national security of the United States.

President Arias of Costa Rica has said, there will never be peace in Central America until Nicaragua achieves ``true democracy.'' If the other side wants peace, there's no reason for delay; let them democratize now. Democracy requires an immediate cease-fire with the freedom fighters; a general amnesty and the negotiated release of the thousands of political prisoners now held in Sandinista jails; a firm date for free, contested, and internationally supervised national elections; and the immediate recognition of fundamental human rights -- rights including freedom of speech, freedom of the press, freedom of worship. The time has come to focus on the goal to bring peace and democracy throughout Central America and especially in Nicaragua.

We share their desire for peace, prosperity, and democracy; and we will support them in that quest just as we've supported them in the past. We will not accept a mere semblance of democracy. We got to this point through efforts of the over 15,000 freedom fighters struggling, and some of them dying, for freedom for their country. It is their country, their future, and if the recent peace agreement does not work, let's resolve that they will be able to count on our continuing assistance until Nicaragua is a genuine democracy.

I want you to know how grateful I am and how deeply grateful for all that each of you has done -- for all that testifying on the Hill, for all the travel, all the speeches, and all the interviews, for all the support and for all your dedication. I know these past few months haven't been easy -- believe me, I know. And maybe the worst of it has been that at times it seemed as though events were simply happening to us. As one wit has defined history: ``It's just one darned thing after another.'' [Laughter] But history doesn't just happen; it's made. And even in the most difficult moments of these past months, we went right on making history, right on striving to turn our vision of America into reality.

And what do we see: a story of intense concern for the cause of human freedom in our own hemisphere; a story of spreading democracy from the Pacific rim to Latin America and beyond; a story of more Americans employed, in better jobs, than ever before; a story of more for the people and less for government. But we can't stop now. There is much yet to be done to build in those safeguards that bring low inflation, low interest rates, and increased productivity. We're at the crossroads today, and the country's waiting to see which way we'll turn. Sixteen months more for our own generation, but above all, for our children and grandchildren, let us go on making history together.

And may I conclude with a little Irish blessing -- although, some suggest it's a curse: May those who love us, love us. And those who don't love us, may God turn their hearts. And if He doesn't turn their hearts, may He turn their ankles so we'll know them by their limping.

Mental illnesses afflict the rich and the poor, the young and the old. They respect neither race nor gender, robbing millions of Americans of full, productive, and happy lives. Millions more -- relatives, friends, and co-workers -- share the pain.

This pain is all the more regrettable because much of it is needless. Stigma, rooted in fear and ignorance, keeps many mentally ill citizens from getting the help they need. Adults in the prime of life are incapacitated by symptoms that could be prevented or ameliorated with appropriate treatments. Children, our most important resource for the future, are unable to reach their full potential because early symptoms are ignored and manifestations like alcohol and drug abuse often go unrecognized. Elderly citizens, the fastest growing segment of our population, are prematurely relegated to long-term care facilities due to improper diagnosis and lack of treatment.

Economic losses alone can be measured in the billions of dollars, but the cost in human suffering is incalculable. Untreated mentally ill adults cannot work, ignored mentally ill children cannot learn, and misdiagnosed older citizens cannot contribute. Worst of all, young and old, bereft of hope, sometimes take their lives. Appropriate treatments can relieve suffering and save lives. They can also restore productivity and increase independence -- helping Americans to continue contributing to, rather than become dependent on, society.

Americans can avoid the temptation to stigmatize those with mental illnesses by learning more about their causes and treatments. They must recognize that mental disorders are not due to personal weakness, but are heavily influenced by environmental stresses, genetic vulnerabilities, and biochemical and brain dysfunctions. Americans should know about, and use to its potential, the scientific progress that has brought an array of new treatments. Symptoms that once disabled can be alleviated. Dysfunctional behavior and thinking patterns that once crippled can be corrected. Psychological disorders that once undermined personal happiness can be ameliorated through counseling and therapy.

Americans can take hope in a future enlightened by today's research. New technologies permit study of the living brain, shedding light on the neurochemical processes that underlie emotion, behavior, and thought. Genetic studies delve into the very substance of life, opening new insights into the causes and possible prevention of some of our most devastating mental illnesses. With knowledge, there is hope. With hope, there is progress.

Diabetes affects the health of perhaps 11 million Americans. It can strike suddenly or it can do subtle long-term damage to major organs. Fully half the people with diabetes do not know they have the disease.

During the last decade, our knowledge of diabetes has increased in the research laboratory. We now have a better understanding of this disease and its burdensome complications, but there is still much to learn. In addition, we still face the major challenge of transforming research advances into practical benefits for diabetes patients.

To increase public awareness of diabetes and to emphasize the need for continued research and educational efforts aimed at controlling and curing this disease, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 44, has designated the month of November 1987 as ``National Diabetes Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of November 1987 as National Diabetes Month. I call upon all government agencies and the people of the United States to observe this month with appropriate programs and activities.

For generations, comprehension of world and national geography has been considered essential to the education of Americans. Yet today, in an interdependent world where knowledge of other lands and cultures is increasingly important, studies show that Americans need more geographical knowledge. Citizens, especially young people, should be fully acquainted with our country and our neighbors around the globe and aware of geography's expanding study of the oceans and the universe; the increasing wealth of knowledge provided by research in the disciplines that support geography; and geography's physiographic, historical, social, economic, and political aspects.

Prime Minister, with great warmth and respect, as the representative of a country with whom Americans share many fundamental values: We're both deeply committed to the system of democracy; we are both committed to the protection of the fundamental rights of the individual; and we're both committed to pursuing a world that is prosperous and at peace.

Our shared values reflect historical bonds and the fact that Swedes and Americans have mingled for centuries. Next year will mark the 350th anniversary of the founding by your countrymen, Mr. Prime Minister, of a small colony named New Sweden near what is now Wilmington, Delaware. Those brave settlers helped turn a wilderness into a great nation. Even more, they brought with them the hardy virtues and pioneer spirit that became so much a part of our national character.

Swedish pioneers of Wilmington, Delaware, were followed by over a million Swedes who came here between the 1840's and 1930's. And today some 5 million Americans proudly claim Swedish origins. History suggests our countries have always been close politically and also in spirit. When this was still a very new nation, in 1783, a treaty of commerce and friendship was signed with Sweden. It was among the very first treaties of the United States of America. Over the years since, our governments have always remained on amicable and cooperative terms, and our peoples have developed and maintained commercial and personal relationships that have strengthened both our nations.

All this reflects a commonality of spirit and a shared sense of decency of which we can take great pride. Americans will never forget that, by a special act of Congress, our country has officially adopted a remarkable Swede, a hero of moral and humane people the world over. I refer to Raoul Wallenberg, the Swedish diplomat, who in the Second World War saved hundreds of thousands from the Nazi terror. That Wallenberg is now a citizen of both our countries is a bond between us and should be an inspiration to our peoples. Let us join in insisting that, if there is a new openness in the Soviet Union, the Soviet leadership give the world an accounting of this moral giant, Raoul Wallenberg.

Many thousands of our countrymen visit back and forth each year, conducting business, pursuing the arts, studying -- and often competing successfully in sports, as Mr. Borg can testify. The late Secretary of Commerce Malcolm Baldrige visited Sweden in May, where he announced that the United States is eliminating the export license requirements for high-technology goods bound for Sweden. This summer, Swedish Trade Minister Gradin came to Washington for a positive round of discussions on global and military trade issues -- or, pardon me -- on bilateral trade issues. And in June, my wife Nancy, visited Stockholm, where for 3 days she exchanged views with those who plan and run Sweden's enlightened programs to combat drugs.

Your visit now, Mr. Prime Minister, renews our political, bilateral discussions at the highest level. Dialog between our governments has improved and deepened in recent years, and we're determined to ensure that it continues to improve. I look forward to discussing with you, Mr. Prime Minister, the major issues of the day and examining how, as modern industrialized democracies, we can meet the challenges we will face in the future. Sweden and the United States face similar challenges, though we've chosen different paths to meet them. Yet, as friends, we value each other's views and our talks today will be of great value.

I'm particularly looking forward to our exchange of views on issues concerning world peace and nuclear arms reductions. The people of the United States maintain defense spending at levels necessary to preserve peace and to safeguard freedom in the world. We have, in recent years, taken a decisive lead in seeking balanced and verifiable arms agreements with the Soviet Union, agreements that will reduce both the level of nuclear weapons and the threat of their use. Our strength and our determined search for peace go hand-in-hand. Much progress has been made as of late, and we remain optimistic.

As a neutral nation, Sweden is not an ally of the United States, but it is a partner in our pursuit of a free and peaceful world. We recognize and appreciate that Sweden provides amply for its own strong defense and works vigorously for the cause of peace. We respect that, Mr. Prime Minister, even though on some issues we may differ in views. The great Swedish leader and a renowned international statesman, Dag Hammarskjold once said: ``Only he who keeps his eyes fixed on the far horizon will find his right road.'' Well, today, the people of the United States and Sweden have their eyes fixed on the far horizon. We're on the right path for a better tomorrow.

Minister Carlsson. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen, let me, first of all, express my thanks for the warm and friendly welcome you have given us in your magnificent Capital and here at the White House. I'm convinced that the talks we will have here with you, Mr. President, with members of your Cabinet, with Senators and Congressmen as well as with other of your fellow Americans elsewhere in the country, will strengthen the solid friendship and cooperation already existing between Sweden and the United States. And I'm proud to say, Mr. President, that I come here as a representative of a nation which is one of America's oldest friends.

Sweden was, in 1783, one of the very first countries to enter into a formal relationship with the newly independent United States. And as far back as in the 17th century, the colony of New Sweden was established in what is now the State of Delaware and parts of Pennsylvania and New Jersey. Next year, a celebration of the 350th anniversary of this first Swedish settlement in America will take place throughout the United States.

Swedes who then settled in the Delaware Valley were the forerunners of more than a million immigrants from Sweden who later came to this country of promise, who helped build the land, and who set out to create a future here for themselves and for their children. But the relationship between our two countries is not only a historical one. It's firmly anchored in the present. We share the same democratic values, believing in a just society with freedom for the individual. Our two nations are among the most privileged with a high standard of living. This is partly because of our level of technological development. It gives us a potential not only to strengthen our own economies but also to contribute to international development and greater economic justice also between nations.

As one should expect in a relationship between friends, it's seldom plagued by political problems. We play, of course, different roles on the international scene. From time to time, as is natural for two democratic governments, we certainly assess international events differently. On other matters, we are in agreement. We both favor free and fair trade between nations. And coming, as I do, from a nation which is more dependent upon exports and imports than most others, I can assure you that we support all efforts to strengthen the open multilateral trading system.

Our ability to influence world events on our own is limited. What one cannot do alone, one may be able to do in cooperation with others. We believe that we have a right to participate actively in world affairs. The rationale for this is simple: Any international conflict which leads to global war will affect all the people on Earth, no matter how far they are from the conflict. As you have stated yourself, Mr. President, together with Mr. Gorbachev, a nuclear war cannot be won. Such a war has only losers, and we will all be among them.

And let me therefore, Mr. President, bring your special message from the Government and the people of Sweden on the verge of important meetings between representatives of your administration and the Soviet Union. We will support every measure with you, Mr. President, and Secretary General Gorbachev will take in the process of reducing nuclear arms. The agreement on intermediate nuclear weapons now being negotiated has our full backing. Your signatures on such a document would be regarded as an historic achievement all over the world. East and West, North and South, it will be hailed as a first step toward the ultimate goal of a world without nuclear weapons.

President, I came here with my wife to this country for the first time in 1960 to study here, like so many other Swedes have done. We have all cherished the warmth, the friendship, and the openness which we have encountered here. These many contacts have indeed strengthened the close ties between our two countries. So I am sure with this week's visit, on behalf of the government and the people of Sweden, I wish to express our best wishes for the happiness and well-being of you, Mr. President, of Mrs. Reagan, and of the American people.

Commission was created by the Congress to plan, encourage, coordinate, and conduct the Nation's observance of the 500th anniversary of the voyage of Christopher Columbus to the New World in 1492. P.L. 98 - 375 instructed the Commission to report to the Congress its recommendations for a comprehensive national program of commemorating the Quincentenary.

As you will see from this report, the Commission has executed its charge in a spirit that takes full account of the heroic and visionary character of Christopher Columbus and of the mingling of peoples, sharing of civilizations, and development of new nations that took place in the New World as a consequence of his achievement. The report establishes five themes that collectively embrace the broad significance of the observance; it proposes three national initiatives to create enduring programs of commemoration; it identifies worthy projects to be carried out by the Nation's cultural, educational, and civic organizations; and it outlines a program of celebratory activities that will make participation in Quincentenary events possible for citizens and communities throughout the Nation.

The report provides the means of funding this comprehensive national program through proceeds from the sale of commemorative coins and through donated funds and services from private citizens and organizations.

Bork the ABA's highest possible rating of fitness for Supreme Court nominees: well qualified. The ABA describes this rating as ``reserved for those who meet the highest standards of professional competence, judicial temperament and integrity. The person in this category must be among the best available for appointment to the Supreme Court.'' The ABA conferred its highest rating on Judge Bork only after a careful and extensive investigation.

The Act incorporated and broadened the sanctions adopted pursuant to the declaration of emergency under IEEPA. Thus, all implementation of sanctions with respect to South Africa since October 2, 1986, has been based upon the Act, rather than upon the predecessor Executive order measures. Consequently, no expenditures incurred after October 1, 1986, were directly attributable to the exercise of powers and authorities conferred by the IEEPA emergency declaration with respect to South Africa.

The President. Prime Minister Carlsson and Mrs. Carlsson, ladies and gentleman, welcome to the White House. Nancy told me much about the warmth and good will that was so evident in Sweden during her June visit.

I welcome you, Mr. Prime Minister, as long-overdue friends. Sweden, while quite some distance in miles, has never seemed very far away to me. As a boy in northern Illinois I had neighbors with names like Hansson and Lund. This morning in the course of our discussions, I realized anew what I have long known: that Sweden and America share the same basic values and the same hopes for a more peaceful and prosperous world. We often pursue our similar goals through different means, but our democratic traditions have bred in us both an appreciation for diversity and an understanding that there is often more than one way to achieve a goal.

Today we welcome our guests with special warmth because this is not merely the visit of a Prime Minister on an official trip but also somewhat of a sentimental journey. In 1960, Mr. Prime Minister, early in your married life, you went to Northwestern University in Illinois, where you attended graduate school and Mrs. Carlsson worked in the university library. A hard-working young couple building a future together. I'm happy to note that the still-young Carlssons next month will celebrate their 30th wedding anniversary. [Applause] You've heard this, and let me add the warm congratulations of both Nancy and myself. I understand you'll be visiting Northwestern again this Saturday, and I wish you a most pleasurable return to this special place.

Today we've had the opportunity to reaffirm the bonds of affection between our peoples and to talk of the issues we, as the leaders of two free nations, face in the world. Prime Minister and Mrs. Carlsson, I raise my glass to you and to the Swedish people in friendship, and I ask all of you to join me in this toast and in a hearty skal.

Reagan, ladies and gentleman, this beautiful dinner in the White House is the culmination of a day of intense and interesting talks with our American friends. The splendor of this evening and the opulent beauty of the Washington summer highlight the character of the Swedish-American friendship.

In several respects, no comparison between our two countries is possible. We're obviously a different size. We're certainly a different influence. We have different histories, and we sometimes voice different views. But in many other respects our two nations are very similar. What has been called the American way of life has a great attraction for many Swedes, not least for the young.

But some of the influence has also been in the other direction. During the last century, more than a million Swedes came to this country, and most of them came to stay and start a new life here, bringing with them a part of Sweden to this land. You will still remember many of them. One is Carl Sandburg, the son of a Swedish immigrant who became one of America's greatest poets.

There is still great interest among Swedes in traveling to the United States. This interest is encouraged, for instance, by an extensive student exchange program and is, above all, supported by the generosity of American colleges and universities in admitting students from overseas. I'm one of the Swedes who once studied in this country. The year which my wife, Inga, and I spent at Northwestern University in Illinois was one of our most memorable. We very much look forward to returning there this weekend to revive old memories.

Two days ago I had the privilege of personally visiting the U.S.S. Constitution, a very fine ship in the port of Boston. We were there again reminded of the forthcoming bicentennial of the American Constitution to be celebrated in Philadelphia next week. We are proud that Sweden is one of five countries singled out to be honored there for having had diplomatic relations with the United States for more than 200 years. Next year we will see another celebration of the 350th anniversary of the first Swedish settlement in America. We deeply appreciate it that you, Mr. President, on this account, have proclaimed 1988 as the Year of New Sweden.

This is natural for the United States as a major partner in several military alliances. But it's also the natural course for Sweden as a neutral country, since we, too, are affected by international developments. In particular, we know that we all run the risk of annihilation in a nuclear exchange.

Let me, therefore, Mr. President, in conclusion, again assure you that Sweden will support every effort by you and your Soviet counterpart to begin a process of reducing nuclear arms. I understand that you are near an historic breakthrough in the endeavor to start dismantling nuclear weapons. There are millions of people around the world who share your sentiments, Mr. President, about the immorality of a nuclear war. The fact that an agreement is near which may make such a war so much less likely is a signal of hope to all mankind.

Chief Justice Burger, ladies and gentlemen, I want to start out by congratulating you contest winners. You have all accomplished something very fine, and you have a right to be very proud. I'm sure your families are proud of you.

History's no easy subject. Even in my day it wasn't, and we had so much less of it to learn then. [Laughter] But one of the most valuable benefits of a study of the past is that it gives you a perspective on the present. I think it's probably true that every generation, every age, is prone to think itself beset by unusual and particularly threatening difficulties and to look back on the past as a golden age when issues were not so complex and politics not so divisive and when problems didn't seem so intractable. Sometimes we're tempted to think of the birth of our country as one such golden age: a time characterized primarily by harmony and cooperation and reason.

Well, in fact, the Constitution and our government were born in crisis. As I'm sure you all discovered in your research, the years leading up to our Constitutional Convention were some of the most difficult our nation ever endured. The economy was near collapse. Trade disputes between the individual States threatened to send it over the brink. A steadily increasing number of farm foreclosures led to an uprising of poor farmers in Massachusetts led by a former Revolutionary War captain, Daniel Shays -- Shays' Rebellion. Meanwhile, pirates from the Barbary Coast plundered our shipping, seemingly at will, and our young nation was surrounded on almost every side by none too friendly neighbors.

To many, by that time, it was clear that the Articles of Confederation could not hold our nation together, and as Henry Knox said: ``The poor, poor Federal Government is sick unto death.'' Well, even so, there was in 1787 no general agreement in our land as to how a stronger Federal Government should be constituted or, indeed, whether one should be constituted at all.

It wasn't the absence of problems but the presence of vision that won the day in 1787. And it wasn't the absence of division but the presence of something higher -- those self-evident truths for which so many had recently had to fight and die -- that allowed men to transcend their differences, to come together to produce a document that would change the world.

It was then, in 1787, that the revolution truly began; for it was with the writing of the Constitution, setting down as it were the architecture of democratic government, that the fine words and brave rhetoric of 1776 took on substance, that the hopes and dreams of the revolutionists would become a living, enduring reality. All men are created equal and endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights -- until that moment, that was just a high-blown sentiment, the dreams of a few philosophers and their hotheaded followers.

But could one really construct a government, run a country, with such idealistic notions? But once those ideals took root in living, functioning institutions, once those notions became a nation, well, then, as I said, the revolution could really begin not just in America but around the world. A revolution to free man from tyranny of every sort and secure his freedom the only way possible in this world: through the checks and balances and institutions of democratic government.

We know only too well that the ideals of our founders still wait to be fulfilled throughout much of the world. We read the headlines. We see the great problems, the divisions, and some lost hope. But in 1987, as in 1787, success will not depend on the severity of our problems but on the strength of our vision, the courage of our beliefs.

One of the great pleasures of my present job is that it so often brings me in events such as these in contact with the young people of America. And I can't tell you how often I've had the same certain knowledge that Ben Franklin had, because I look out on this your generation and see that it's one of the finest groups of young people this nation has ever seen. And I know that with young people like these the cause of America and human freedom is rising and will continue to rise until it floods the whole world with its light. And in closing, I want to thank the Commission on the Bicentennial of the United States and those whose generosity made this event possible.

And the moment you've all been waiting for: It's time to announce the national winner. Apparently, there were two essays that were so good the judges couldn't decide between them. So, they very judiciously decided to award two prizes. And they go to Liza Johnson and Mahbub Majumdar.

I just want to leave you with one little word that I've used sometimes with young people before when I've faced them about this Constitution. And now that all of you, through your efforts, are so familiar with it -- maybe you've already figured this out, but if you haven't, just let me tell you.

I've read a number of constitutions of other countries, including that of the Soviet Union, and was astonished to find guarantee of freedom of expression and assembly and so forth in all of those. And you find yourself thinking, well, then, what makes ours so different? Why does ours work the way it does? And the answer is so simple that it almost escapes you. And yet it is so great that it explains the whole difference: three words -- ``We the People.'' All those other constitutions in the world are documents in which the government tells the people what they can do. And our Constitution is one in which we the people tell the Government what it can do, and it can do nothing other than what is prescribed in that document. So, if we can get the rest of the world to switch around someday, it will be heaven on Earth.

American priests and seminarians who were studying in Rome. And when I happened to mention my hope that one day you would return to the United States and that perhaps this time your visit would extend to the South and the West, when I mentioned this, those seminarians broke into applause. Today, Your Holiness, you begin just such a return visit, and today all America applauds.

In a document of the Second Vatican Council that you helped to draft, it is written: ``In language intelligible to every generation, the church should be able to answer the ever recurring questions which men ask about the meaning of this present life and of the life to come.'' ``In language intelligible to every generation'' -- certainly no one can speak with greater force to our own generation than you yourself. In Poland you experienced nazism and communism. As Pope, you suffered a terrorist attack that nearly claimed your life. Still you proclaim that the central message of our own time, that the central message of all time, is not hatred but love.

During your papacy, you have taken this message to some 68 countries. You have celebrated Mass in the ancient capitals of Europe. You have spoken words of truth and comfort on the African savannah. You have visited new churches on the islands of the Pacific. You've addressed vast gatherings throughout South America and the Far East. Now you have come back to the United States, the nation of citizens from all nations. If I might just interject something, your Holiness, I know that in your travels you've made it a point to speak to people in their own language. Well, here in Miami I have a suspicion that you will find many in your audience eager to hear you speak the beautiful language of Spain.

From the first, then, our nation embraced the belief that the individual is sacred and that as God himself respects human liberty, so, too, must the state. In freedom we Americans have in these 200 years built a great country, a country of goodness and abundance. Indeed, Your Holiness, it is precisely because we believe in freedom, because we respect the liberty of the individual in the economic as well as the political sphere, that we have achieved such prosperity.

We are justly proud of the Marshall plan, whose 40th anniversary was celebrated in Europe earlier this year. In Europe and elsewhere, we continue to place our might on the side of human dignity. In Latin America and Asia, we're supporting the expansion of human freedom, in particular, the powerful movement toward democracy. And yet we Americans admit freely to our shortcomings. As you exhort us, we will listen. With all our hearts, we yearn to make this good land better still.

Americans -- more than 50 million Catholics -- will greet you. They do great works, America's Catholics, in the name of their church. Here in the United States, American Catholics put their faith into action in countless ways: maintaining parochial schools that give underprivileged children in our inner cities the chance to receive a good education, supporting the AIDS hospices established by Mother Teresa's Missionaries of Charity, and perhaps simply helping to put on a fundraising dinner for the local parish. Abroad, American Catholics likewise seek to translate their faith into deeds, whether supporting missionaries in distant lands or helping America's Knights of Columbus restore the facade of St. Peter's in Rome.

Americans of every kind and degree or belief will wish Your Holiness well, responding to your moral leadership. Today's Florida sunshine is no warmer than the affection that you will meet. I began a moment ago by quoting from one document of the Second Vatican Council. Permit me to close by quoting from a second: ``By the hidden and kindly mystery of God's will a supernatural solidarity reigns among men. A consequence of this is that one person's holiness helps others.'' Today Americans feel this solidarity. And we thank you for the courage and sanctity, the kindness and wisdom, with which you have done so much to help our troubled world.

For the second time this year, I have met in private audience with His Holiness Pope John Paul II. We discussed the practical aspects of ideals we share: peace, justice, and the expansion of freedom. We agreed that, as the Pope first remarked when I visited him at the Vatican City in 1982, peace is not only the absence of war, it also involves reciprocal trust between nations.

Holiness and I had the opportunity to share our views on the progress that has been made toward the establishment of a genuine peace in Central America. I assured His Holiness that the United States is committed to the extension of democracy throughout Latin America.

Pope and I also discussed the prospects for improved relations between the United States and the Soviet Union. And I told him that the United States is unshakeably committed to the establishment of an enduring world of peace and to the extension or expansion of human freedom around the globe. Indeed, without freedom, there can be no peace.

On arms control, we discussed the nearness of an agreement that would eliminate all American and Soviet INF missiles for the first time in history, achieving not just a limitation but an actual reduction in nuclear weapons. Of course, all of this depends upon Soviet willingness to get down to the hard work of completing an agreement. We stand ready as well for another historic agreement -- one that would reduce strategic arms on both sides by half.

With regard to the economic needs of the world's poor nations, I thank the Pope for speaking so eloquently about what he terms the moral causes of prosperity, among them hard work, honesty, thrift, initiative, and daring. Generous aid from the wealthier nations to the poorer is certainly of great importance, but in the long term it's even more important to share the conditions -- the moral causes of prosperity, including respect for the economic rights of the individual that represents such a powerful force for economic growth and human betterment.

And once again, Your Holiness, welcome back to the United States. I must leave you now, but I know that Nancy is looking forward to greeting you in Los Angeles. In the meantime, and throughout your visit, millions of our fellow Americans will welcome you with affection, listening joyfully to your message of human dignity and peace.

Each year at this time, the Jewish community prepares for the High Holy Days -- Rosh Hashanah and Yom Kippur. This period of deep reflection is marked by prayer, repentance, and the giving of charity.

Days of Awe begin and end with the blowing of the shofar, the ram's horn, whose blasts fill the heart and the mind with their many meanings. The shofar was sounded as Moses ascended Mt. Sinai to receive from the Lord the tablets containing the Ten Commandments, the moral foundation stones of Western Civilization. It was heard again as the Children of Israel entered the Promised Land. And the sound of the shofar and the shout of the people brought down the walls of Jericho.

We are pleased to extend our best wishes to all Jewish people in the United States, in Israel, and around the globe as you celebrate the beginning of the year 5748. L'Shanah Tova, may you be inscribed in the Book of Life for a happy and healthy year.

Today we acknowledge the many contributions made by Hispanics over the 200 years of our Republic and the role Hispanics continue to play. As we celebrate the bicentennial of our Constitution, we must reflect on the fact that this great nation of ours is made up of immigrants, immigrants who have brought their culture, their traditions, and their values. They were attracted to this nation by a common element: by the love of liberty and justice. And I can proudly say that nowhere have I seen these values more cherished and protected as they are by the Hispanic community.

Hispanics have also brought with them their talents and aspirations, as is witnessed in the people joining us today. We have a group of individuals who I understand will be honored at another function as outstanding Hispanic media professionals. Having earned my living in the media, as I did, and understanding its importance in the shaping of our society, I'd like to add my congratulations to those being honored. Since some of them are present in the audience, I'd like to ask them to please stand so they can receive a strong round of applause. Marta Casals Istomin -- [applause] -- she is the artistic director of the Kennedy Center; Jose McMurray -- [applause] -- senior producer at National Public Radio; Eduardo Zavala -- [applause] -- founder of ZGS - TV Productions, and Arturo Villar -- [applause] -- publisher of Vista magazine.

Now, we also have in the audience the DC Council of Hispanic Employment Program Managers. Where are you? Oh, they're holding up hands. Well, there, two stood up. [Applause] All right. Thank you all. Because I would like to thank them for this wonderful poster designed by Jesse Almazan commemorating this week.

And I would also like to thank all of you for joining us today and for your valuable work in fostering the presence and role of Hispanics in the Federal Government. Your commitment is impressive. I applaud this important role you play in increasing the number of Hispanics in the Government.

And this brings me to this administration's commitment to increasing the number of Hispanics in government. I have appointed individuals of high caliber to serve in key Federal Government positions, such as Katherine Ortega, United States Treasurer, and Jose Manuel Casanova, Director of the Inter-American Development Bank. And now I'd like to take this time to announce my intention to nominate Grace Hughes as Director of Community Relations Services at the Department of Justice. And I'm sure you're familiar with all the other appointees throughout the executive branch. They've served with dignity and courage and exemplify the hard work and commitment found in Hispanic Americans.

The great achievements of all these individuals, in the media and in the Federal Government, serve as an inspiration to all young Americans. This special week provides the rest of us a chance to express our deep appreciation for contributions that are made across the spectrum of American life by our fellow citizens who come from Hispanic backgrounds. It allows us to reflect on the fundamental meaning of democracy, which must be synonymous with opportunity for all people.

I know that the ceremony is over, and you want to get back in the shade, and I don't blame you. But I can't resist telling you that standing here in front of you I often wish that I could speak in that lovely language. I wished it very much at a time when, as Governor of California, I was representing the President of the United States at a meeting in Mexico. And I spoke and then sat down to very scattered applause. I was embarrassed. And when the next speaker began getting applause at almost every sentence, I had to hide my embarrassment and started to applaud louder and longer than anyone else -- until our Ambassador leaned over and said, ``I wouldn't do that if I were you.

National Hispanic Heritage Week, all Americans can recognize, honor, and celebrate the rich and diverse contributions Hispanic Americans have made to our land ever since the exploration and settlement of the Western Hemisphere.

People of Hispanic culture have been present in the Americas from early times and have exerted much influence on the development of the United States. Hispanic explorers helped open the New World, discover its resources, and found its new nations, including parts of our own. Explorers such as Coronado in the 16th century traveled throughout the present-day United States, and Spaniards settled in St.

Florida, long before Jamestown was founded. The founding of missions and presidios in California was simultaneous with the American Revolution; and when the new United States had won, thanks in part to Spanish help, Te Deum masses of thanksgiving were celebrated in those missions, just as throughout all Spanish colonies. In the 19th century, the vision of liberty inspired countless brave Latin Americans to fight for independence for their countries. Today, Hispanics carry on the dream of freedom throughout the hemisphere, and democracy is enjoying a broad resurgence.

Spanish names bestowed on so many of our cities, towns, States, rivers, mountains, and lakes -- Los Angeles, Sacramento, Guadalupe, Colorado, Sierra Nevada, for instance -- remind us daily that the values of Hispanic Americans, such as devotion to church, family, work, and community, helped settle our frontiers and build our future. Hispanic Americans have served and sacrificed time and again in the Armed Forces to keep our Nation free. Hispanic cultural heritage is a constant source of enrichment for our country, and Hispanic Americans are a source of close ties to the nations of Central and South America.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 11th day of Sept., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

As we reflect on our Constitution this week, we must seek to further its purpose here at home and all across the world. The cause of freedom is America's cause. And one of the most exciting movements in this direction during the past 10 years has been in Latin America, where over 90 percent of the people are now living under democratic rule. It was my privilege earlier this week to speak with the Holy Father, Pope John Paul II, on our mutual concern about peace and freedom in Latin America.

And yet, for all the progress in this region, one country, Nicaragua, and its 3 million inhabitants have seen that dream of freedom trampled. Many Americans have learned over the last few months what has really been happening in Nicaragua: how a democratic revolution was betrayed; how a tiny elite has been creating a totalitarian, Marxist-Leninist dictatorship to satisfy their own personal lust for power and to give the Soviet Union a beachhead on the mainland of this continent -- only 2,000 miles from the Texas border, a clear national security threat.

Yet despite all the repression and Soviet intervention, the people of Nicaragua still cling to their dream of freedom. In the best tradition of our Founding Fathers, they formed a democratic resistance against tyranny, one of the largest peasant armies in the world, with more than 17,000 freedom fighters called contras. And as the contras have grown stronger, the Communist regime has grown shakier.

So, under increasing pressure, the Communist leader Daniel Ortega recently signed, at a summit of Central American leaders, a peace plan that pledged his government to democratic reform, respect for human rights, and free elections.

We welcome the Guatemala plan, but it falls short of the safeguards for democracy and our national security contained in the bipartisan plan I worked out with the congressional leadership. That is why, as Secretary Shultz said earlier this week, there should be no uncertainty about our unswerving commitment to the contras. It is their effort that has made the peace initiative possible. At the appropriate moment, I intend to put forth a $270 million request for contra aid over 8 months -- 18 months, I should say.

Secretary Shultz also spelled out, the Sandinista regime has a long way to go in living up to its pledge of democratic reform. Only 8 days after signing the peace agreement, Sandinista police used attack dogs, night sticks, electric cattle prods, and government-organized mobs to break up a peaceful demonstration by the Nicaraguan Democratic Coordinadora.

So, too, the 6 independent Nicaraguan political parties have called efforts by the Communists to manipulate the National Reconciliation Commission set up under the plan ``a Sandinista maneuver to fool the international public.'' They accused the Sandinistas of ``violating the spirit of the Guatemala agreements.'' And this week we learned that Daniel Ortega will be in Moscow on November 7th, the date the Central American peace plan is to go into effect, celebrating with his Soviet allies the anniversary of the Bolshevik revolution.

What the world wants from the Sandinistas are real democratic reforms, real signs of freedom, such as reopening the newspaper La Prensa, but not censoring its copy or denying it newsprint. La Prensa and other publications must be free to report, so must the independent radio stations and TV. Freedom of religion must be respected. The Sandinistas have said they will allow three exiled priests to return, but what of the thousands of other exiles? Return is not enough; they must be free to minister, live, and organize politically without intimidation. Genuine free political competition must be permitted. The secret police, with their neighborhood block committees, must be abolished and all foreign advisers sent home. The Sandinistas should know that America and the world are watching.

Mervyn LeRoy was one of the pillars of the entertainment industry, responsible for some of the finest motion pictures ever. He was one of the greatest directors and producers of all time, knowing exactly how a scene should be and knowing just what to say to get his actors to make it right. He was dedicated to his profession and brought unmatched enthusiasm and energy to everything he did. He achieved excellence and earned the respect and affection of everyone he worked with.

I have directed the U.S. INF negotiator in the nuclear and space talks at Geneva to present to the Soviet Union at today's meeting of the INF negotiating group our proposal for implementing a double global zero treaty, eliminating all U.S. and Soviet ground-based INF missiles. Our negotiator will also present an inspection protocol which details the procedures which we consider necessary to effectively verify compliance with the treaty.

The draft we are presenting is a logical progression from a draft text designed to reduce INF missiles to a specified level to a draft treaty which would eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet missiles.

I have always made clear my firm belief that not having a treaty is better than having one which cannot be effectively verified. Accordingly, we are proposing the most stringent verification regime of any arms control agreement in history. The most effective verification possible is vital to ensure that an INF agreement makes a lasting contribution to peace and stability. We will not settle for anything less.

We have come a long way in our efforts to remove the threat posed by Soviet INF missiles. NATO resolve to deploy U.S. INF missiles to counter this unprovoked Soviet threat, while at the same time seeking negotiations with the Soviets, laid the foundation for the historic agreement which is now within reach.

Difficult issues remain to be resolved, including verification. We have presented a comprehensive and effective verification regime. The Soviets have said they agree in principle with a number of our verification requirements but have yet to provide some key details. Further, some of the details they have provided have not met the test of ensuring verification and confidence in compliance.

It is up to the Soviet Union now to demonstrate whether it shares our determination to conclude a treaty eliminating all U.S. and Soviet INF missiles. And I also call upon the Soviet Union to get down to serious business with us, as well, in completing an agreement on a 50-percent reduction in U.S. and Soviet strategic arms.

It is with the deepest regret that I accept your resignation as Secretary of Transportation. For six and a half years you have dedicated yourself to the goals of this Administration and the long-range needs of the American people.

Countless lives have been saved and crippling injuries prevented on our highways, railroads, and in the air because of your leadership. Drunk driving is declining and seat belt use is increasing, drugs and alcohol have been declared off limits to transportation, and vigilance over our air system has never been greater. We have increased competition in industries that for years were stifled by government regulation during a time when travel has never been safer.

No one knows better than I the challenge of making government respond to the conservative mandate of 1980. You have been invaluable in that struggle. As our economic recovery program has sparked growth in transportation, you have taken a number of major initiatives to assure that we fully meet the demands of unprecedented expansion.

You made Conrail the flagship of privatization in the United States. You transferred National and Dulles Airports to a Regional Authority, something other transportation planners had tried and failed to achieve on at least eight occasions since 1949. And in case anyone doubted the potential of American entrepreneurial know-how, under your leadership an entirely new space-based industry has been created to launch commercial satellites, thus competing with the French, the Chinese and the Russians. All this -- and much, much more -- is on the record.

Cabinet table and in the inner councils of government. But I understand your decision to leave and believe the reasons behind it will strike a chord with everyone who values the very human emotions that underlie public life at its finest.

As you can imagine, I have not reached this decision lightly. Only a compelling reason -- the need to elect a successor who can build on your Administration's remarkable record of achievement -- has persuaded me to leave office at this time. For over twenty years, public service has been my greatest satisfaction.

I learned long ago that public life is full of private choices. I have chosen to devote all my time and energies to my husband's campaign for the Presidency, not only because Bob needs me but because I believe the American people need Bob.

It has been a rare privilege, Mr. President, to serve these past six and a half years, first as a Member of your Senior White House Staff and more recently as part of the Cabinet family. I have never forgotten your instructions early in 1981 to disregard what would be politically popular when making policy, and to concentrate instead on what conscience and intellect deem right for the American people.

Inspired by that principle, we have worked to redefine the relationship between Washington and the people: getting the Federal Government out of the business of running railroads and airports, paving avenues into space for commercial entrepreneurs and eliminating economic regulation while strengthening safety oversight. Most Americans today are freer than ever before to travel where and how they will at less cost, while during the last three years we have compiled the best safety record in history.

I am extremely grateful for the opportunities you have given me. I leave with great admiration for you and Mrs. Reagan, and with great respect for the leadership you continue to give our country. Your Administration will be remembered as a turning point in American life. Thank you for allowing me to play a part.

Today it's a pleasure to assign the stewardship of this institution to one of this nation's most respected intellectuals. Dr. James Billington, I am certain, will continue the magnificent job done here at the Library of Congress by his predecessor, Dr. Daniel Boorstin. And let me add that I think this nation owes a debt of gratitude to Dr. Boorstin for his hard work and dedication. Dr. Boorstin did much to ensure that the people as well as government officials receive full benefit of this national treasure. Dr. Billington will build on this tradition.

Jim has had a lifelong love of books. He stands here today because of an appreciation for scholarship instilled in him by a father who never went to college, but who filled his home with books bought secondhand to save the family's limited funds. Much to his father's credit, Jim Billington received a scholarship to attend Princeton University, from which he holds a B.A. degree. He went on to receive his doctorate of philosophy as a Rhodes scholar at Oxford University. By the way, he speaks eight languages. Throughout a distinguished career, Dr. Billington has combined his love of scholarship with a dedication to public service, because he believes that scholarship and freedom go hand in hand.

Billington will now bear the responsibility of overseeing the world's largest library, which includes a collection of 84 million items, 535 miles of shelves, and a staff of more than 5,000. During a time of necessary budget restraint, this will not be an easy task. The challenge, as Dr. Boorstin will testify, is not just administering this institution but ensuring that its vast resources are put to maximum use for the benefit of government, academia, business, and the people themselves. The Library of Congress was founded with a $5,000 appropriation in 1800. It has grown with the country, and it is an important part of the decisionmaking process here in the Nation's Capital.

Billington, I know you'll keep this institution the vital center of scholarship and ideas that it was intended to be. We entrust you with this great national resource, Dr. Billington, and are proud to have you as America's librarian. Thank you, and God bless you.

INF negotiator, placed on the negotiating table in Geneva our new draft treaty calling for the elimination of all U.S. and Soviet ground-based INF missiles. This new step by the U.S. reflects the fact that the Soviet Union recently agreed to my original proposal to ban this entire class of U.S. and Soviet missiles.

Glitman also presented to the Soviet Union today a protocol to our draft treaty that calls for the most stringent verification regime of any arms control agreement in history. This reflects my long-standing insistence that the most effective verification possible is needed in order to ensure that an INF agreement marks a lasting contribution to our efforts to build a safer peace, and I will not settle for anything less.

In short, our new proposal calls for eliminating all U.S. and Soviet INF missiles and launchers within 3 years; a ban on modernizing, producing, or flight testing any INF missile system; a comprehensive verification regime tailored to a double global zero outcome. And with these new actions taken up by the U.S., it's now up to the Soviet Union to demonstrate whether or not it truly wants to conclude a treaty eliminating this class of U.S. and Soviet missiles.

Well, now to the business at hand. I always try to keep my remarks short, and will today. Although, when I run over, I like to remember something President Eisenhower once said. ``One good thing about being President,'' he said is, ``nobody can tell you when to sit down.'' [Laughter] But it's a pleasure being here at this meeting of the National Alliance of Business. Since its founding 20 short years ago, the alliance has been an American leader in addressing a tragedy that concerns all of us: structural unemployment.

Never has your leadership been more effective than in the last 6 years. With Bill Kolberg as your president and now with John Clendenin as your chairman, you're spearheading our country's first public-private partnership to prepare for the future Americans who thought they had no future: the Job Training Partnership. It's easy to forget today that when we came into office Federal job programs had become a national scandal. For 40 years government-sponsored training had achieved little more than to give leaf-raking a bad name.

Well, if anything, matters got worse after that. The CETA program of the seventies didn't settle on mere incompetence; it added corruption. In many cities, CETA positions were parceled out as political patronage. And CETA spent millions on such worthy projects as building an artificial rock for rock climbers to practice on.

The worst-hit victims of these federally financed fiascos were the trainees themselves. Most genuinely needed the simple but basic skills of showing up punctually, performing a task that others valued, doing it well, and getting it done on time. Instead, they got laxly supervised make-work. The message came through loud and clear that honest effort will not be honestly rewarded.

Well, thanks to you, all this has changed. When we came into office, we took one look at this mess and said it had to stop. We said that it wasn't enough to get better managers and stricter accountants; we wanted a revolution in approach.

Well, we said it was time to bring the grace of humility to this prideful city. So, we turned to you. With your help and guidance, the Job Training Partnership is business-run and locally run, not Washington-run. And unlike all the many programs before it, and despite so many voices saying when we started that business would not rise to the challenge of helping the unemployed, you met the challenge. The hard-to-employ are getting trained. They're getting placed. They're keeping good jobs with good pay in good companies. They have reclaimed the American dream.

And they're not alone. Not everyone needs special job training, but everyone is part of a growing economy. In November America will set a record: the longest peacetime economic expansion in our business cycle history -- 59 straight months of growth. Never before has this happened. After a decade-long roller coaster ride down in the seventies, the American family once more has seen its income rising strongly and steadily since our recovery began. And the net worth of American households -- assets minus liabilities -- has been growing right in line with income. This is not a question of the rich getting richer and the poor poorer. No, in fact, if you include pension and Social Security rights, the gap between rich and poor has steadily narrowed, and we expect this to continue.

Too often in the past, blacks lagged behind others as others advanced, but in the last 5 years, black employment has shot forward twice as fast as white employment. Since 1982 the real income of black families has increased almost 40 percent faster than white family income, and the share of black families in the highest income brackets is up by over 70 percent. This August the percentage of blacks employed was the highest on record, as was the percentage of all Americans employed. Economics columnist Warren Brookes looked at this record and concluded that ``on every front -- jobs, income, even household wealth -- this, 1981 through 1986, has been the best 5 economic years in black history.'' Yes, we still have some distance to go, but our economic policies are the headwaters from which economic justice for black Americans will, like a great river, flow.

Yes, all of America has come a long way from the ``malaise'' days of the late seventies. And while getting here wasn't easy, it was simple. We simply got government -- with all its failures and reasons ``why it can't be done'' -- out of the way and let the American people take a crack at putting things right. Now, I know that many still look at our cuts in taxes and regulations and scoff. Sometimes they dismiss the strong economy as a sign of my luck and then keep right on with their old talk of new programs and more spending. Well, maybe they ought to take a moment to look at the facts. I know that may come as a surprising suggestion to many of our critics. I'm not saying they're hostile to the facts, just apathetic about them.

Recently the U.S. Chamber of Commerce examined the facts in the major industrial economies of the world. Their conclusion: More government, beyond a point, really does mean less growth. As the chamber's chief economist, Richard Rahn, concluded: ``For many countries economic growth rates significantly decline and unemployment rates begin to increase when total government spending exceeds the range of 15 to 30 percent of gross national product.'' Well, today the United States is around 35 percent, and that's why I'm determined that the way to close the budget deficit is not by raising the American people's taxes but by cutting the Federal Government's spending.

Investment as a share of overall economic activity has risen since our recovery began and is now one-sixth of gross national product, even while in Europe and Japan the investment rates have been falling. And this investment is ushering in a new American industrial age. But some would end this new age of opportunity before it ever begins. In the next few weeks in Washington, you will see the challenge before us. On one side, you'll find those who support what used to be called Reaganomics. Of course, our critics stopped calling policies Reaganomics when our policies started to work. On the other side, you'll find, if I may coin a phrase, pit bull economics. It may look harmless, but let it loose and it'll tear America's future apart with higher taxes, new and costly programs, and protectionist trade policies. It's dangerous.

Our opponents talk about the trade deficit and saving American jobs, particularly in manufacturing, even though the foremost authority on job creation and loss has reported that ``in statistically significant terms we haven't eliminated a single manufacturing job'' in more than two decades. Some manufacturing industries are down, but others are up. And in fact, throughout the economy, in all sectors, we have created a record 13\1/2\ million jobs in the last 5 years.

But the issue here is not over jobs or family income. We know how to create more jobs and better incomes -- the way we've been doing it. We must have compassion for those workers who have been displaced as their industries have become more efficient. We must help them develop new skills and find new lines of work. We have proposals to do this before Congress, and you've been leading the way in this area, too. But that's not the issue here in Washington. No, the issue is control. Should Washington have more control, or should the American people?

Well, that's how many critics may think, but in choosing between big government and the American people, I'm old-fashioned. I stand with the men who wrote the glorious Constitution whose 200th birthday we celebrate this week. I put my trust in the people. In the months ahead and in the battles to reduce Federal spending, prevent destructive protectionism, keep taxes down, we'll decide whether the American economy will retain the vitality that gives our future so much promise. I hope I'll have your support in these battles.

Let me mention one area in particular that I know you care about and where the central issue is, once again, Washington's control: welfare reform. Twenty-three years ago, Washington launched a War on Poverty. Poverty won. [Laughter] But from that failure, we learned many lessons about poverty and getting out of it. We learned that work should be more rewarding than welfare, because work is the only genuine path to self-respect and independence. We learned that welfare should sustain and not disrupt families, because intact, self-reliant families are the best antipoverty insurance ever devised. And we learned that the Federal Government doesn't really know how to apply these and other lessons to the day-to-day problems of the welfare family that's trying to lift itself up.

Successful reforms have been, virtually without exception, those that were homegrown in State capitals, cities, and neighborhoods. And that's why we propose to allow expanded experimentation at the State and local levels. Experiments that work will be tested more broadly. This is just plain common sense, and yet there are those who believe that the Federal Government should once again parachute a single set of reforms on the Nation. The history of just one more reform from Washington is bleak.

For example, a few years ago there was an idea here to replace welfare with what amounted to a guaranteed minimum income. We were told that this would cure the problems in the system. And among other things, it was argued that families would no longer have to break up to receive assistance, so they would stay together. And then somebody said, maybe we should test this in one or two cities before we do it in the Nation as a whole. So, they did. And they found that people worked less and families broke up faster under that plan than they had before.

As in so many other areas, in welfare reform it's time to get the Federal Government to learn some humility and admit what it doesn't know and put its trust in the American people. At the very least, we should insist that the Government will not do more harm than good when it acts. It's time for us to look carefully at the full range of government activities and ask which ones make it harder for the poor to escape poverty; which cut off rungs in the ladder of American opportunity; which make it more difficult to realize the American dream. America is at the dawn of the new age of hope. And let us resolve that all Americans will know the promise of the new age and the new century.

Well, now, before I close, let me add that Washington is, I hope, about to have a great debate. I have nominated one of America's most distinguished legal scholars and jurists, Robert Bork, to the Supreme Court. Well, tomorrow the Senate opens hearings on his confirmation. Judge Bork believes laws should govern our country and if you want them changed you should convince elected legislatures to change them, not unelected judges. This doctrine of judicial restraint shouldn't be controversial in our democracy, but it is. And I hope it'll be fully debated in the weeks ahead.

I say ``I hope'' because too often character assassination has replaced debate in principle here in Washington. Destroy someone's reputation, and you don't have to talk about what he stands for. Well, I hope that Judge Bork's critics will be candid about why they oppose him and not fabricate excuses for attacking him personally. That way we can have a full and open debate on an important constitutional principle. And when the votes are counted, America will win. Thank you, and God bless you.

Today the United States and the Soviet Union will sign the agreement to establish Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers. This agreement is another practical step in our efforts to reduce the risks of conflict that could otherwise result from accident, miscalculation, or misunderstanding. Today's agreement goes beyond existing structures to establish the first new, direct channel for communications between Washington and Moscow since the creation of the hotline in 1963.

Risk Reduction Centers will play an important role in further lessening the chances of conflict between the United States and the Soviet Union. They provide a means to transmit notifications required under existing confidence-building measures and could play a key role in exchanging the information necessary for effective verification of future arms control agreements.

For the United States, this agreement results from close cooperation among the executive, Congress, and private groups and individuals to produce a pragmatic agreement that advances our common goals of peace and security. I would like to make special mention of the excellent counsel and leadership that we have received over several years on nuclear risk reduction from Senators John Warner and Sam Nunn. I would also like to express my appreciation to the United States delegation on Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers -- and especially its cochairman, former Assistant Secretary of Defense Richard Perle and my Special Assistant Robert Linhard -- and to the Soviet delegation, headed by Ambassador Aleksei Obukhov, for their skill and dedication in successfully concluding the negotiations. This agreement complements our ongoing and promising efforts in Geneva to achieve -- for the first time -- deep, equitable, and effectively verifiable reductions in Soviet and American nuclear arsenals.

Foreign Minister, I am pleased to have you sign this agreement today and look forward to the day when General Secretary Gorbachev and I can sign even more historic agreements in our common search for peace.

Shevardnadze. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, comrades: In Soviet-American relations in recent times, events like this one are not too frequent; however, 1987 turns out to be relatively fruitful. In April, last April, during the visit of Secretary of State Shultz to Moscow, we signed an agreement on peaceful cooperation in space. Today, we are signing an agreement on Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers.

President, reached in Geneva. Nuclear war should never be fought, you both said. Let us hope that the agreement that we are signing today will help to move further toward that historic goal. This is a sign which may be a prelude to more important agreements, in particular, agreements on the reduction of nuclear arsenals, as the General Secretary of the CPSU Central Committee and the President of the United States agreed in Reykjavik. The most important thing is to do the utmost for this to happen to the gratification of our peoples and of the entire world community.

The sooner it happens, the better. Then, having done good work for our time, we will be able to hope that time, too, will work for us. Today, we have acted to try to ease somewhat the pressing burden of fears, uncertainties, and anxieties of which people have become tired. I would like to use this opportunity to cordially thank all those who, for 2 years, worked with perseverance and dedication to prepare this agreement. I would like to pay tribute to the diplomats and experts, and to the members of the U.S. Senate, particularly to Senators Nunn and Warner, who worked with a great deal of energy and persistence to promote this idea. I would like to hope that this small gulp of hope is a prelude to the quenching of the global thirst for peace and security.

The success of USA Today and industry-wide improvements should be no surprise to those of us who believe in free enterprise. Competition keeps the quality up and the price down. And as we're well aware, USA Today is not just competing with one newspaper; it's up against papers in every major city in the country.

Seriously, starting a new business of any kind takes a special breed of people. You can all be proud of what you've accomplished. Your success is truly a turning point in the news business. You're leading a whole industry into the 21st century.

Diplomatic practices in the old days aside, it goes without saying that today trained diplomats remain of tremendous importance. Yet in this information age -- this age of the mass media and the microchip, of telecommunications satellites above the planet and fiber optic cables underground -- in this new age, traditional diplomacy alone is not enough. The United States must speak not just to foreign governments but to their people, engaging in public diplomacy with all the skill and resources that we can muster. Castlereagh spoke to Metternich, but leaders today must speak to the people of the world.

All these accomplishments have been made possible by individual men and women, those unsung but utterly dedicated Foreign and Civil Service professionals who run our nation's public diplomacy. I understand that hundreds of our public diplomats will read these remarks or listen to them on tape, so let us take a moment now to express the Nation's gratitude. To you, our public diplomats, whether stationed here in Washington or in posts from Rome to Shanghai: In a difficult world, you tell America's story, and America gives you her thanks.

America's story -- as I've said, during these 6\1/2\ years we have dramatically improved our ability to tell America's story around the globe, but I would submit that we've done still more. I would submit that we've given the story itself new content, and on this, the very day before we celebrate the bicentennial of our Constitution, I would like you to join me in considering the renewed power, the renewed sense of hope, that America's story holds for all the world.

You're well aware of the world struggle -- the struggle of ideas, economic vitality, and military strength. As you look ahead to the next decade, the decade of the eighties, you are less than optimistic about the United States. Yet now that the decade of the eighties is here, now that the decade of the nineties, indeed, is nearly upon us, the American situation has changed dramatically, and with it the nature of our public diplomacy.

In a moment I'll return to our vantage point as a Soviet dissident or a citizen in the Third World, but permit me to speak first about what has happened here at home. Tax cuts, the rebuilding of our defenses, a cutback in government regulations, a determined, continuous effort to hold down the expansion of government spending -- these are the policies that have been instrumental in all that we have accomplished, the proximate causes, if you will, of our renewed economic vitality and renewed strength in the foreign policy arena.

I speak deliberately when I refer to these policies as instrumental, for they've merely served as the instruments of ideas, ideas like limited government and individual initiative, ideas like the view that America has a mission to stand up in the world for human freedom. Our administration has spoken out for these ideas again and again. The American people have responded. And government policy and the very scope and shape of government itself has been changed.

This connection began [between] speaking out and the formation of policy may seem obvious, but it has enormous significance for a conference concerning itself with public diplomacy. For what it means is this: Not by force, not by coercion, but by speaking out, we have changed the course of history. Disraeli said: ``With words we govern men.'' Of course, it's less our intention in the United States to govern than to serve.

But in all the long American story, words have indeed proven fundamental. The basic act of the American Revolution was not the call to arms but the Declaration of Independence, an act that in effect called the Nation into being and the act that has sustained our Republic for two centuries now. Providing the rule of law for our fathers -- as it does for us, as it will for our children and grandchildren -- was the writing of the Constitution -- several thousand words, mere words, on four sheets of parchment, but what power.

But second, we've gone beyond a mere statement of the facts, beyond reminding the world of the actual historical record, vital though that is. We've dared in our public diplomacy to articulate a vision, dared not just to defend the status quo but to speak of a new age of liberty. Consider this year alone. In April we asked that a date be set for the rapid and complete withdrawal of Soviet forces from Afghanistan. In Berlin this June, we called for tearing down the Wall. This July we urged the Soviets to rescind the Brezhnev doctrine and establish genuine self-determination in Eastern Europe. As I said last month in Los Angeles, containment is not enough. Our goal has been to break the deadlock of the past, to seek a forward strategy -- a forward strategy for world freedom.

There's a third element in our public diplomacy, one that bears directly upon issues that are being raised at this conference. Permit me to call this, if you will, the moral element. You see, even as the 1970's were marked by talk about national malaise, they were marked, as well, by talk about some sort of moral equivalency between the United States and the Soviet Union. One version of this view saw both nations simply as military and economic units struggling to determine which would become the greater power. Another version admitted that the Soviet Union had its moral shortcomings but pointed out that so did the United States, after all.

Well, yes, our country has its shortcomings, but there's no moral equivalency between democracy and totalitarianism. There's no moral equivalency between turning the proud nations of Eastern Europe into satellites and joining the nations of Western Europe in the defense of their freedom. And, my friends, there's no moral equivalency between propaganda and the truth.

I said, this touches upon issues being raised at this conference. We all know of the tremendous progress we're seeing in communications, a virtual riot of new technology. But we know, as well, that the Soviets are serious about using these new technologies for their own purposes. Already, to name just one example, Soviet television can be received in Western Europe, North and Central America, Southeast Asia, North Africa, and the Middle East. The Soviet message, even if it is propaganda, now reaches around the globe.

But there is, as I suggested, that moral point, that crucial distinction between what is true and what is not. Describing his experience in a prisoner-of-war camp during the Second World War, Laurens van der Post writes that, in reading official propaganda sheets, he and his fellow prisoners evolved a technique for telling the true from the false. This was possible, van der Post writes, because ``every thought, every articulation of meaning, from painting to music, carries within it evidence of its correspondence to the truth by the impact it makes on our senses and imaginations.''The truth -- the truth will make itself known. Permit me to close now by telling you two stories that show this to be true, and in doing so, return to our vantage points in the Third World and the Soviet Union.

First, the Third World -- imagine now the situation of a man of integrity and dignity in Cuba. His name is Ricardo Bofill. As an academic, he became a professor of Marxist philosophy. During the 1960's he was a leading member of the Communist Party.

Yet today he knows that Castro has betrayed every ideal the revolution seemed to espouse, and at the cost of constant threats and harassment, Ricardo Bofill serves as president of the Cuban Committee for Human Rights.

Like all Cubans, Ricardo Bofill is bombarded day in and day out by the Castro regime's propaganda. Even so, he and thousands of others recognize without hesitation the one news source that tells the truth. Bofill recently wrote: ``It seems to me that there will arrive a moment concerning the situation of Cuba when it will be necessary to speak of the time before and after the broadcast of Radio Marti.

The ability to answer the monolog that Fidel Castro has sustained for nearly 26 years has finally evolved.'' Well, to all those involved with Radio Marti, you will never receive higher praise than the words of that brave man.

I have a letter that testifies to that at home. It came to me by way of USIA -- that was smuggled out of the gulag. The letter is only about 2 or 3 inches long -- in width, I should say, of paper. It is only about three quarters of an inch in length. And yet there is a message on there of thanking us for maintaining freedom and keeping it alive in the world. And it is signed by 11 women prisoners, all on that tiny piece of paper. I don't know how they wrote it, but I know you cannot see the words without a magnifying glass.

There are some of the things that come up. I, as some people here at the head table know, have become a collector of stories that the citizens of the Soviet Union tell among themselves, revealing they have a great sense of humor, but also a cynicism about their system. And just yesterday I added a new one to the collection.

Well, they gave us hope, the people said, in the gulag there. Surely, this, is your mission as public diplomats, and surely, this is our mission as a nation: to stand for freedom and to give hope. On the day in Berlin that I faced the Wall and speaking to a very large audience on the west side, in West Berlin, advocated the tearing down of the Wall, I could see rows of East German military police fully 100 to 200 yards from the Wall, with their backs to the Wall and me speaking. They were there to keep any East Berliners from approaching the Wall, where they might be able to hear through the loudspeakers what I was saying.

Two hundred years ago the very notion of free self-government was a new idea. But James Madison, a man whom many call the Father of the Constitution, urged his fellow citizens not to oppose the idea simply because it was new. He argued that it was the glory of the American people that they were not blindly bound to the past but were willing to rely on ``their own good sense'' and experience in charting the future. It's interesting that Madison and others had to defend the Constitution because it was new. Times have changed. For over 200 years we've lived with freedom under law, and perhaps, we've become complacent about it. We should never forget how rare and precious freedom is.

Active and informed citizens are vital to the effective functioning of our constitutional system. All of us have an obligation to study the Constitution and participate actively in the system of self-government that it establishes.

This is an obligation we owe, not only to ourselves but to our children and their children. And there is no better time than right now, during the next 4 years of the bicentennial, to rededicate ourselves to the Constitution and values it contains.

And now, Stephanie, Damien, Brian, Tyese, would you join me and everybody here and everybody watching and listening throughout the land as we recite the words that we all know by heart: the Pledge of Allegiance.

As we stand here today before Independence Hall, we can easily imagine that day, September 17, 1787, when the delegates rose from their chairs and arranged themselves according to the geography of their States, beginning with New Hampshire and moving south to Georgia. They had labored for 4 months through the terrible heat of the Philadelphia summer, but they knew as they moved forward to sign their names to that new document that in many ways their work had just begun. This new Constitution, this new plan of government, faced a skeptical, even hostile reception in much of the country.

To look back on that time, at the difficulties faced and surmounted, can only give us perspective on the present. Each generation, every age, I imagine, is prone to think itself beset by unusual and particularly threatening difficulties, to look back on the past as a golden age when issues were not so complex and politics not so divisive, when problems did not seem so intractable.

Sometimes we're tempted to think of the birth of our country as one such golden age, a time characterized primarily by harmony and cooperation. In fact, the Constitution and our government were born in crisis. The years leading up to our Constitutional Convention were some of the most difficult our nation ever endured. This young nation, threatened on every side by hostile powers, was on the verge of economic collapse. In some States inflation raged out of control; debt was crushing. In Massachusetts, ruinously high taxes provided -- or provoked an uprising of poor farmers led by a former Revolutionary War captain, Daniel Shays.

No, it wasn't the absence of problems that won the day in 1787. It wasn't the absence of division and difficulty; it was the presence of something higher -- the vision of democratic government founded upon those self-evident truths that still resounded in Independence Hall. It was that ideal, proclaimed so proudly in this hall a decade earlier, that enabled them to rise above politics and self-interest, to transcend their differences and together create this document, this Constitution that would profoundly and forever alter not just these United States but the world. In a very real sense, it was then, in 1787, that the Revolution truly began. For it was with the writing of our Constitution, setting down the architecture of democratic government, that the noble sentiments and brave rhetoric of 1776 took on substance, that the hopes and dreams of the revolutionists could become a living, enduring reality.

All men are created equal and endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights -- until that moment some might have said that was just a high-blown sentiment, the dreams of a few philosophers and their hot-headed followers. But could one really construct a government, run a country, with such idealistic notions? But once those ideals took root in living, functioning institutions, once those notions became a nation -- well, then, as I said, the revolution could really begin, not just in America but around the world, a revolution to free man from tyranny of every sort and secure his freedom the only way possible in this world, through the checks and balances and institutions of limited, democratic government.

Checks and balances, limited government -- the genius of our constitutional system is its recognition that no one branch of government alone could be relied on to preserve our freedoms. The great safeguard of our liberty is the totality of the constitutional system, with no one part getting the upper hand. And that's why the judiciary must be independent. And that's why it also must exercise restraint.

If our Constitution has endured, through times perilous as well as prosperous, it has not been simply as a plan of government, no matter how ingenious or inspired that might be. This document that we honor today has always been something more to us, filled with a deeper feeling than one of simple admiration -- a feeling, one might say, more of reverence. One scholar described our Constitution as a kind of covenant. It is a covenant we've made not only with ourselves but with all of mankind. As John Quincy Adams promised, ``Whenever the standard of freedom and independence has been or shall be unfurled, there will be America's heart, her benedictions and her prayers.'' It's a human covenant; yes, and beyond that, a covenant with the Supreme Being to whom our Founding Fathers did constantly appeal for assistance.

It is an oath of allegiance to that in man that is truly universal, that core of being that exists before and beyond distinctions of class, race, or national origin. It is a dedication of faith to the humanity we all share, that part of each man and woman that most closely touches on the divine. And it was perhaps from that divine source that the men who came together in this hall 200 years ago drew the inspiration and strength to face the crisis of their great hopes and overcome their many divisions. After all, both Madison and Washington were to refer to the outcome of the Constitutional Convention as a miracle; and miracles, of course, have only one origin.

During the summer of 1787, as the delegates clashed and debated, Washington left the heat of Philadelphia with his trout fishing companion, Gouverneur Morris of Pennsylvania, made a pilgrimage to Valley Forge. Ten years before, his Continental Army had been camped there through the winter. Food was low, medical supplies non-existent, his soldiers had to go ``half in rags in the killing cold, their torn feet leaving bloodstains as they walked shoeless on the icy ground.'' Gouverneur Morris reported that the general was silent throughout the trip. He did not confide his emotions as he surveyed the scene of past hardship.

One can imagine that his conversation was with someone else -- that it took more the form of prayer for this new nation, that such sacrifices be not in vain, that the hope and promise that survived such a terrible winter of suffering not be allowed to wither now that it was summer. One imagines that he also did what we do today in this gathering and celebration, what will always be America's foremost duty -- to constantly renew that covenant with humanity, with a world yearning to breathe free; to complete the work begun 200 years ago, that grand, noble work that is America's particular calling -- the triumph of human freedom, the triumph of human freedom under God.

And may I simply say also, a man wrote me a letter, and I would call to your attention what he did to mine. You could go from here to live in another country, France, but you wouldn't become a Frenchman. You could go to Japan and live there, but you wouldn't become a Japanese. But people from every corner of the world can come to this country and become an American.

I think a moment ago I was given a cue, and I can think of no more fitting tribute to the Constitution's bicentennial than ringing the Centennial Bell, and with it, will be rung bells all over the Nation. Maybe that's all they were going to ring it.

Thank you very much, and thank all of you, and Senators Heinz, Specter, and Congressman Coughlin, John Cardinal Krol, Earl Baker, and all of you. I came to Pennsylvania to be a part of the celebration of the 200th anniversary of the Constitution of the United States. I can't think of a Member of the United States Senate who has fought harder to put the ideals of our Constitution into practice than the man we honor today, Senator John Heinz.

There's a story, you knew I'd have one of these -- [laughter] -- about a fellow who always wanted to work with animals. And he applied to the zoo, and they had an ad out -- they needed someone there. And then he found out to his dismay that the job they had immediately open was dressing in a gorilla outfit, taking the place of the gorilla who just died, until a new one could be delivered. And then they promised that he'd have a regular job at the zoo, once that took place.

Well, he put on the suit, and he got in the cage. And he got a little bored sitting around, so, particularly when the children were there, he began doing tricks and showing off for them. And finally he got so interested in that, he got carried away one day -- he was swinging on a rope, and he swung so far that he landed in the lion's cage that was next door. And the lion came roaring at him.

John was first elected to the Senate in 1976, and since 1981 he's been a part of a team that has held the special interests at bay, brought taxing and spending under control, and put America's house, economic house, back in order. I think we Republicans can be proud of what we've accomplished; and we couldn't have done it without energetic and responsible Senators like John Heinz and Arlen Specter. Believe me, having worked with these two, I can fully appreciate that saying about having a friend in Pennsylvania.

Together we took on one of the toughest jobs in the world: cleaning up after the other party had been in total control of the United States Government. They'd held a majority in both Houses of Congress almost continuously since the 1930's. And in the last 4 years of the 1970's, they had also captured control of the White House and every Federal department and agency.

Our country ended up with double-digit inflation, economic stagnation, sky-high interest rates, and unprecedented national pessimism. These maladies, which brought such suffering to our people, as much as liberal Democrats would like us to believe otherwise, were not the result of a natural disaster, a plague, or even the celestial influence of Halley's comet. The mess we found ourselves in was a result of bad policies, of haywire liberalism.

And let us reaffirm today that, whoever is the Republican Presidential nominee in 1988, our candidate will be a darn sight better than any one of the pack that is vying for the other party's nomination. If you listen to what they're saying, they want to take us back to the failed policies of the past.

Well, with responsible policies, we revived our nation's economic vitality and, just as John has told you, put the country back on its feet. And as he also told you, our people have enjoyed 57 months of growth. We are, if we can make it all the way to Thanksgiving, on our way to achieving the longest period of peacetime growth in the country's history. Employment is at an all-time high. And since the recovery began, our economy has created 13.6 million new jobs, and poverty, which started increasing in 1979, has begun to decline. Prime interest rates which were beating the life out of our economy at 21 percent when we got in Washington, are now under 9 percent. Inflation, which was public enemy number one in 1980, has been put in a cage and kept under control.

Together we pulled America back from the edge of an economic catastrophe. Having done that, we moved forward to tackle some of the severe problems that were crying out for responsible action. High on the list was reform of our Social Security system. I'd like to take this opportunity to thank Senator Heinz for the terrific job that he did as a leading player on the National Commission on Social Security Reform. He helped rescue that system from bankruptcy.

Even though the one-time Speaker of the House [Thomas P. O'Neill, Jr.] denied it was true when we said it, we would have been bankrupt in that particular program by July of 1983. He denied that, but after the '82 election was over, then he came to see me about seeing what we could do to rescue Social Security. Well, partly as a result of his exemplary effort on this commission, he was named by the national seniors magazine, 50 Plus, as one of the most effective legislators on behalf of the elderly. And, as one of those, thank you. [Laughter] John was also instrumental in eliminating the mandatory retirement age of 70, and you can bet I'm happy about that. [Laughter] He also was a driving force behind reforms that protect our citizens' private pension coverage.

I might add here that a side benefit of a strong, growing economy is an expanding stock market. By creating the conditions in which our stock market has flourished, we've been part of a process that has dramatically strengthened the pension funds of the American worker. And the same is true for the endowments of many of our institutions of higher learning, which have also been major beneficiaries of the expanding stock market. There's no way the Federal Government could have contributed so much to America's retirees or to higher education through government grants and spending programs. This just goes to show you the program that will do more good for more people is a strong, growing economy -- and that's a platform all Republicans can stand upon.

In the last 6\1/2\ years, we've proven to the American people that it is the Republican Party that best represents their interests. Instead of trying to curry favor from the special interests that have flocked to the Nation's Capital, Republicans like John Heinz are out meeting and talking with the citizenry, the taxpayers, the working men and women to whom America owes its greatness. I understand that John has had more than 350 town hall meetings across the width and breadth of this State since being elected to the Senate.

Our greatest challenge is to make certain that the people hear our message, so they can look at the facts and decide for themselves which direction America should go. In these next 15 months, public support and party unity will be essential. And there's much left to do: confirming Bob Bork on the Supreme Court, accomplishing real, credible budget reform, seeing to our national security, and supporting those who struggle for freedom.

As we can see by the high-pitched opposition to Judge Bork, our job is not going to be easy. But let me remind you, since coming to Washington 6\1/2\ years ago, our critics have been proven wrong time and time again. In the case of Judge Bork, the American people, I'm certain, are finding him to be intelligent, prudent, a firm believer in the Constitution and a strong defender of individual rights. I predict he will be confirmed by the Senate and, over his career on the Supreme Court he will make great contributions to the American way of life.

And let me suggest that Americans have every reason to be confident about the future. We have been at the helm during a pivotal moment in our history. First, we had to take care of the problems we inherited. Then we put America on the path that is carrying her into the 21st century, and we're well on our way. Less than a decade ago, one could hear gloomy predictions about how bad things were going to be. Our young people were being told to lower their expectations. Do you remember that? It was even being said that America's best days were behind her.

Well, we've proven the pessimists wrong. We've unleashed an entrepreneurial surge that is changing the face of American enterprise. High technology and computers are being put to work throughout our economy, increasing the efficiency of business, large and small. Productivity has been on the increase and government, business, and labor are working together as never before. We aren't telling young people to lower their expectations; we're challenging them to set their sights high. That's why they're flocking to our banner as never before.

They aren't looking for the easy way out or interested in promises of what government will do for them; they're interested in opportunity and in being free to build the kind of lives they want to build to accomplish things for themselves.

Yes, there's every reason to be proud of what we've achieved and to be optimistic about the future. And if we can get our message to the people -- and I know we will -- I have three predictions: The next President of the United States will be a Republican, Senator Heinz will be reelected, and the GOP will recapture control of the United States Senate.

I would just like to interject here, we couldn't have accomplished, even with all your help -- and it was your help that did it -- what was accomplished in these last several years had we not, for 6 of those years, had that majority, slight as it was, in the Senate. How many of us are conscious of the fact that in my administration we've had one House for 6 years? Now, for 2 years, they'll have both Houses, and for 8 years, they've had the House of Representatives. But from 1931 through 1980, the Democrats controlled both Houses of the Congress for 46 of those 50 years. And Republican Presidents, up until my term, only one had a Republican Congress for a mere 2 years out of his 8 in office.

The Democrats' Presidents only had a Republican Congress for 2 out of those 50 years. The rest of the time they had the whole show. So, that meant that for half a century, they've been in charge of redistricting, reapportionment. We're going to have to fight awfully hard to break the gerrymandering that's been going on for half a century.

But just remember those three predictions here, and determine that you're going to make them come true. I want to thank each and every one of you for what you're doing to make them come true. And I'm going to thank you in advance for sending this man back to the United States Senate, where he is so desperately needed.

American people are becoming more and more aware of the great potential of citizens with disabilities. We are also realizing that providing equal employment opportunities to handicapped individuals is both the right thing to do and a matter of economic common sense and necessity.

Competitive reality is causing business, industry, and organized labor to urge complete integration of the disabled into the job market. Federal, State, and local governments have also provided significant opportunities for these men and women. They are filling critical gaps in the work force and contributing to productivity, because the demands placed on America's labor resources have changed; because medical and technological developments are opening doors; and, most of all, because these Americans continue to prove that they can perform effectively on the job.

School yearbooks not only chronicle educational achievement and school tradition but are a part of them. For nearly two centuries American students have produced yearbooks to commemorate the accomplishments of the school year and to compose a lasting record, written and pictorial, of campus, classmates, teachers, and school staff.

In later years, alumni treasure their yearbooks for the memories they hold of times gone by and friends of long ago. The students who compile yearbooks likewise treasure all that the experience can teach them about teamwork and about writing, the graphic arts, and business skills. The practical cooperation and specialization that students learn in yearbook production stand them in good stead when they enter college or pursue other opportunities.

Finnish settlers first arrived in this country in 1638, when Nordics, many of them natives of Finland or Swedes who spoke Finnish, established the colony of New Sweden in present-day Delaware. They introduced European civilization to the Delaware River Valley and began the transformation of a vast wilderness. Theirs were the pioneer spirit and virtues that are the foundation of our national character. The 350th anniversary of their landing is a most fitting time to celebrate the legacy of America's Finnish pioneers and their descendants and to recall that the friendship of the United States and Finland has deep historical roots.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister reviewed the full spectrum of questions regarding nuclear, conventional and chemical weapons arms control. In particular, the two ministers, together with their advisers, conducted intensive negotiations on the question of intermediate-range and shorter-range missiles. This resulted in agreement in principle to conclude a treaty. The Geneva delegations of both sides have been instructed to work intensively to resolve remaining technical issues and promptly to complete a draft treaty text. The Secretary and the Foreign Minister agreed that a similarly intensive effort should be made to achieve a treaty on 50% reductions in strategic offensive arms within the framework of the Geneva Nuclear and Space Talks.

Having discussed questions related to nuclear testing, the two sides agreed to begin, before December 1, 1987, full-scale stage-by-stage negotiations which will be conducted in a single forum. They approved a separate statement on this subject.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister also discussed regional issues. The two sides discussed a broad range of issues concerning bilateral relations. A work program was agreed, to be implemented in 1987 - 1988, designed to intensify joint efforts in various areas of U.S.-Soviet cooperation. A constructive discussion of human rights issues and humanitarian questions took place.

Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze agreed that an additional meeting is needed to review the results of the work in all of these areas, including the efforts of the delegations in the Geneva Nuclear and Space Talks. They agreed that this meeting would take place in Moscow in the second half of October.

In order to sign a treaty on intermediate-range and shorter-range missiles and to cover the full range of issues in the relationship between the two countries, a summit between President Reagan and General Secretary Gorbachev will take place. The summit will be held in the fall of 1987, with exact dates to be determined during the talks between the Secretary of State and the Foreign Minister in Moscow in October.

Minister Shevardnadze. As you know, the talks covered arms reduction, regional conflicts, human rights, and bilateral issues. Although we have serious differences in many areas, the tone of the talks was frank, constructive, and notable progress was made.

Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze have issued a joint statement, which I believe you all have now. And I'm pleased to note that agreement in principles was reached to conclude an INF treaty. They'll meet again in Moscow next month to continue their efforts and to work out the details of a summit between me and General Secretary Gorbachev later this fall.

The President. These are questions that I think he can speak specifically to because of the long hours of meetings. And I must say for all of the people who have been on our team here as well as their team -- they really have gone beyond the call of duty with the hours that they have put in.

Ledogar has spent most of his Foreign Service career dealing with Europe and political-military affairs. His first assignment following his 1960 entry into the Service was as consular and economic officer in Montreal. Subsequent foreign postings were in Milan and Vietnam and to our Mission to NATO at Brussels, where he was political-military officer from 1973 to 1976, and deputy chief of mission from 1981 to the present. His early assignments in the Department of State included tours in the Operations Center, the Office of the Secretary, and as public affairs officer. He later served as special assistant to the Under Secretary for Security Assistance programs and as Director of the Office of European Security and Political Military Affairs. His training assignments have been as visiting fellow at Stanford University and to the senior seminar of the Department of State. Since 1981 he has been deputy chief of mission at the U.S. Mission to NATO in Brussels. In February of this year, he was appointed to serve as U.S. Representative to the preliminary talks on the new conventional arms negotiations mandated by NATO as well as the plenary negotiations which would follow. Mr. Ledogar also represents the United States at the Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions Negotiations.

It is with the deepest regret that I accept your resignation as Chairman and a Member of my Council of Economic Advisers, effective upon a date to be determined in late November. As one of the original members of my team, you have served this Administration selflessly for what will be almost seven years.

Your accomplishments at the Treasury Department were extremely significant. You smoothly led debt management through a difficult period, developing innovative financing techniques, including the first foreign-targeted Treasury bond and the redesigned, market-oriented savings bond, reducing government expenditures by millions of dollars. In 1981, you helped to develop the strategy to handle the savings and loan crisis. In 1982, you devised the initial strategy, still largely in place today, to deal with the international debt crisis, encouraging market-oriented economic policy reforms in debtor countries. In both of these cases, through your adroit management skills, you ensured that there would be no massive government bail-out and saved the taxpayers billions of dollars.

Time and again, you proved yourself a formidable negotiator, and the American people were fortunate to have you defending their interests. You represented our country with great ability at five economic Summits and in negotiations to establish new lending facilities for the International Monetary Fund and the Inter-American Development Bank. Perhaps your most significant negotiation resulted in the path-breaking yen-dollar agreement with Japan, in which the Japanese agreed to deregulate their domestic and international capital markets.

You were in the forefront in redefining international monetary relations. Your innovative suggestion in 1982 at the Versailles Summit resulted in the first efforts of the major industrial nations to coordinate their economic policies to achieve both strong growth and low inflation. That process of international policy coordination, which was subsequently expanded by Secretary Baker, now plays an established role in promoting sound, long-term economic policies around the world, which should result in more stable exchange rates.

Some of your accomplishments are less tangible, but no less significant. I remember the skepticism we faced in 1981, both here and abroad, when this Administration began advancing the basic tenets of a market-oriented economy, including deregulation, tax reduction, and restrictions on the size and role of government. You persuasively explained our philosophy through countless meetings and speeches, as well as quiet diplomacy, and I have watched with pleasure as so many countries gradually have begun to change their own domestic economic policies in positive ways. At home, you have helped to keep us on the path toward economic growth and price stability consistently advocating adherence to sound economic policies. I will particularly miss your presence in Washington as a forceful champion of my economic philosophy. You have played a major part in helping to achieve what promises to be the longest peace-time expansion in history, with almost 58 months of unbroken prosperity and 14 million new jobs to date.

Beryl, as a result of your consistent good judgment and sound advice, you have strengthened the Council of Economic Advisers as a respected and influential institution in setting national economic policy. You have had an important influence in shaping our positions on tax reform, trade, agriculture, and many other issues. You will be sorely missed by the Cabinet, by the White House staff, and by me.

It has been my highest privilege and honor to serve in your administration since January 1981, first as Under Secretary of the Treasury for Monetary Affairs and, most recently, as Chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers.

I accepted the original invitation to serve in your administration because of my high regard for you and for the philosophy and positions which you have for many years so ably articulated. It has been a treasured experience to participate in the countless important initiatives which your administration has undertaken in the area of economic policy which have restored the strength of our great nation. I will always be grateful for this opportunity which you have given me.

Government, and those soon to be enacted in Norway, to strengthen export controls. Diversions of strategic technology by Toshiba Machinery and the Norwegian firm Kongsberg Vappenfabrik have undermined our common security and demonstrated the inadequacy of existing national laws and procedures. Japanese legislative and administrative actions increase criminal penalties and statutes of limitations, mandate new and stricter licensing procedures, provide for tight export control procedures by companies, and for close governmental monitoring of these. The Norwegian Government will this month introduce a new comprehensive export control law in the Parliament, or Storting, that will strengthen Norway's national laws and procedures along these same lines.

Paris-based Coordinating Committee (COCOM), which is composed of 16 allies, including the United States, serves the common security of its member nations by preventing militarily useful technologies from reaching the Soviet Union. COCOM reflects the principle that the security of the West and of Japan is based on the qualitative technology edge that we are able to maintain in our weapons systems. COCOM exists to protect that critical advantage. The serious diversion of nine-axis milling machines and numerical controllers for use in the Soviet program to quiet submarines serves as an unfortunate, yet graphic, example of the damage which can be done to our collective security.

Congress has offered a number of bills and amendments that would punish Toshiba and Kongsberg through mandatory sanctions and compensation. But the technology diversion problem is broader than the specific violations of the firms that are currently the targets of legislation. The real problem lies in the shortcomings of national export control systems, and responsibility rests with allied governments to make and enforce the necessary changes. Therefore, the administration opposes these bills and amendments.

It is now essential that all COCOM partners strengthen their national export controls to prevent further diversions. High technology products in the 1980's are produced worldwide, and the Soviet Union targets its acquisition programs wherever the technology can be found. The administration has begun an aggressive and unprecedented effort to urge that all COCOM partners take steps to prevent further diversions and strengthen national export control systems.

First, the Senate opened the confirmation hearings on Judge Robert Bork, my nominee to the Supreme Court. Before these hearings began, there had been a lot of talk to the effect that Judge Bork was some kind of political ideologue. In truth, Judge Bork's philosophy of judging is neither conservative nor liberal. He simply believes that a judge should keep his own views from interfering with an interpretation of the laws and the Constitution according to the intentions of those who enacted them, consistent with established precedent. One place this judicial philosophy will help is in the fight against crime.

The second of the week's big events was the visit of Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze. In 3 full days of talks important progress was made. The United States and the Soviet Union have now agreed in principle to completing a truly historic treaty that will eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range missiles. I expect to sign this treaty later this fall at a summit. We agreed to begin formal negotiations on verifying existing nuclear testing treaties and to forge ahead toward another historic objective -- cutting our strategic nuclear arsenals in half.

I'm proud that these were American proposals, which the Soviets have come around to accept. But I made it clear to the Soviet Foreign Minister that I will not sacrifice our SDI program. Indeed, yesterday we announced that we're moving forward on SDI to demonstrate and validate six promising technologies. Nor will we let up on our insistence on better Soviet performance on human rights and regional conflicts like Afghanistan. Our agenda is both peace and freedom, and when I meet Mr. Gorbachev again later this year this is the agenda I will pursue.

This week the House leadership worked out a bipartisan plan to continue providing humanitarian aid to the democratic resistance in Nicaragua. But I'm afraid I have to tell you that, when it comes to the Federal budget process itself, the news is not good. In less than 2 weeks, the Federal Government begins a new fiscal year. But has Congress even sent me so much as one of the 13 appropriations bills? The answer is no, even though the passage of these bills on time was required by law.

Instead, this week the Congress began to put together a continuing resolution. In plain terms, this means that since Congress can't get its act together on controlling spending, Congress simply keeps overspending at last year's pace for a few more weeks. After that, Congress will have to face the spending problem all over again -- perhaps only passing yet another continuing resolution. Now, when Congress passes one of these continuing resolutions, it puts appropriated Federal funding into a huge lump. And when one of these massive continuing resolutions comes to my desk, it's a take-it-or-leave-it proposition. Sign the bill and, with it, accept the inability to get wasteful spending under some level of control or, reject it, and watch the United States Government run out of money and grind to a halt. I've felt for some time that no President should be placed in that position.

Our administration has proposed reforms that would fix the budget process: the line-item veto and a balanced budget amendment. But if we're going to run the Federal Government by continuing resolutions, then the very least Congress can do is this: Break them into separate parts, with each part dealing with a specific area of Federal funding. Doing so would provide me with at least some opportunity to exercise my rightful judgment as President -- an opportunity I intend to insist on.

Robert Bork has shown in his calm, direct, and candid answers that he is eminently qualified to sit on the Supreme Court. If the Senate uses the standards it should -- integrity, qualifications, and temperament -- it will certainly move quickly, once the Judiciary Committee hearings are completed, to confirm Judge Bork.

Reagan met with Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar in his private office for approximately 5 minutes. Accompanying the President on this courtesy call were Ambassador Walters, Secretary Shultz, Chief of Staff Baker, and National Security Adviser Carlucci. The Secretary-General welcomed the President to the United Nations. The President responded that his visit is meant to demonstrate the importance that the United States attaches to the United Nations. He told the Secretary-General that he admired his recent efforts to bring an end to the Iran-Iraq war and thanked him for making a personal trip to those two countries.

General Assembly Peter Florin of the German Democratic Republic. The President congratulated President Florin on his recent election to this post and asked for impartiality as he assumes important responsibilities.

Iranian landing craft was discovered laying mines in international waters 50 miles northeast of Bahrain. We have previously communicated with the Iranian Government the way in which we would respond to such provocative acts which present an immediate risk to United States ships and to all ships.

Fire often affects the very young and the very old, and more than 80 percent of fires take place in the home. Such facts are exactly why our Nation observes a special week every autumn to remind ourselves that fire prevention and safety messages are vitally important to each of us and to our families.

This year the National Fire Protection Association, the originator of Fire Prevention Week, is encouraging families to be safe and to design and practice a home fire escape plan. Private sector initiatives in partnership with the public sector are complementing this effort. All who can should join with government officials at every level, fire service personnel, citizens' groups, and private citizens to develop and carry out public awareness and education programs about fires. Campaigns being formulated will reach high-risk populations, including inner city and rural residents, children, and the elderly.

Fire Fighters Memorial Service at the National Fire Academy in Emmitsburg, Maryland, the tribute of a proud and grateful Nation will be paid to the 114 American fire fighters who died in the line of duty in 1986. Let us honor these heroes in prayerful remembrance.

During this period, we consulted directly with the parties to the dispute. Special Cyprus Coordinator M. James Wilkinson traveled to Cyprus in late July and met President Spyros Kyprianou and other officials of the Cypriot government. Mr. Wilkinson also talked with the leader of the Turkish Cypriot community, Rauf Denktash, and his principal advisers. Mr. Wilkinson's visit to Cyprus directly followed a visit to Turkey and Greece by Under Secretary of State Michael H. Armacost, a visit in which Mr.

We continue to give the United Nations Secretary General our full support in his efforts to help the parties resume the negotiating process. He is working toward an overall agreement that would address all the issues of concern as an integrated whole. To that end, the Secretary General met with Foreign Minister Iacovou on June 17 in Vienna. The upcoming session of the United Nations General Assembly in New York also should provide further opportunities for the Secretary General to consult with those directly concerned in the dispute.

Regarding the United Nations Force in Cyprus (UNFICYP), the Secretary General is continuing his efforts to address the question of funding for the Force and to find replacements for the troops that Sweden plans to withdraw from the contingent it contributes to UNFICYP. The Secretary General continued to pay special attention to the issues he identified in his last report to the Security Council as having contributed to heightened tensions on the island, including the situation in Varosha and military buildups.

On the latter topic, we are pleased to note reports that there has been a decrease in the number of Turkish tanks on the island. This follows a period during which the Turkish government had informed us that a temporary increase in both tanks and troops had occurred as a result of the modernization of equipment and the rotation of troops. Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash also reiterated this point in an early August public statement noting that Turkish troop and tank level fluctuations were temporary. We continue to make clear to all parties to the Cyprus question our concerns about quantitative and qualitative increases in arms anywhere on Cyprus.

I have selected as his replacement Bill K. Perrin, an individual who combines ability with wide experience in government and business at the local, national, and international levels. Mr. Perrin's nomination has been submitted to the Senate for its consideration.

I am deeply indebted to you for your outstanding efforts in the many roles you've played in my two terms of office and the campaign which preceded them. From your advance work in 1980 to your appointment in 1982 as a Special Consultant, and then as Special Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Advance, your assignment as Director of Operations for my second Inaugural and, finally, as Deputy Assistant and then Assistant to the President, you have carried out your important and sensitive responsibilities with unfailing professionalism, personal insight, and skill.

The demands that have been placed on your position have grown rapidly with the accelerating changes that have occurred not only in American domestic life but in our status as the leading nation of the Free World. Distance and time have been compressed, both in geographical terms and in the pace of political events that call for evaluation and response. In 1918, Woodrow and Edith Wilson spent 12 days on the steamer George Washington traveling from New York to Brest for the Paris Peace Conference. Today, my entire trips to Europe, Japan and the Far East, for Economic Summits or official state visits, have consumed less time than my early predecessors required merely to reach their destinations.

Despite the changes that technology has wrought, the arduous variety of your tasks -- what Merriman Smith in A President's Odyssey called ``problems of protocol, logistics and personal safety; detailed minute-to-minute schedules'' -- has remained fundamentally the same. As his phrases make clear, much more than travel is involved -- your duties encompassed the safety of the President and those who accompany him, the public's interest in contact with the person they have chosen to lead them, the public's understanding of the national policies which so profoundly affect their lives, and the furtherance of U.S. goals and interests in its relations with its allies and the world community.

You have always recognized the scope of your responsibilities within this framework, and I have relied on you extensively, your advice and your experience, as we developed plans to communicate my agenda and to explain my policies both here at home and abroad. As a leading member of my White House Planning Group, you have helped guide the design and articulation of my Administration's themes and programs. Far from being an adjunct to policy, this planning lies at the heart of the success we have enjoyed in turning ideas into proposals and proposals into legislation. Few people who deal so closely with the public have fewer opportunities for getting public credit than you have had, but I can assure you that your colleagues in the Administration, and I, personally, recognize how much credit for our success belongs to you.

I'd had the opportunity, I might have counseled you against the offer of further service you included in closing, because I now feel free to call upon you from time to time to extend the yeoman's labors you've already given this Presidency. From the bottom of my heart, I want to thank you and Ali, and your entire family, for the long hours of separation you've endured and the many sacrifices you've made for me and for this Nation.

After considerable thought and with mixed emotions, I have concluded I cannot delay any further my return to the private sector. The experiences of the past five years have been the most rewarding and fulfilling of my life. Because of these experiences and my deep respect and affection for you and Mrs. Reagan, the decision to submit my resignation effective September 25, 1987 has been extremely difficult. It has been an honor and privilege to serve as an Assistant to the President since January, 1986 and, prior to that, as Deputy Assistant to the President, Special Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Advance.

I have often contemplated returning to Merrill Lynch since my two-year leave of absence expired, over three years ago. However, I always concluded there were compelling challenges here at the White House and I might in some way be able to help. Now, however, family and personal considerations require me to end my full-time commitment but not my continuing loyalty, devotion and dedication to the principles you have so vigorously and successfully represented. My decision has been made easier because of the excellent team now in place in the White House.

As a result, I have had the privilege to travel with you throughout this great nation and to have witnessed firsthand the dramatic resurgence of the American spirit. To have seen and felt firsthand this renewed pride in America -- pride that is as a direct result of your leadership and example -- has been an unforgettable reward. I have witnessed history unfold as you moved America forward, by restoring confidence in our institutions, our economy and ourselves. To chronicle even the highlights of these events would be impossible -- there are so many -- but my most indelible memory is the mutual love and respect between you and the American people. I have deeply admired your willingness to go to the people for what you believe in. For example, no one gave tax reform a chance -- you did, you went to the people, and now we have a fairer tax system.

Another responsibility you entrusted to me was helping plan and direct your international travel and foreign public diplomacy. In five short years, the march of democracy worldwide and the growth of economic freedom are a direct result of your leadership and example. No one has represented America better than you, and I have never been prouder to be an American than to be with you at the DMZ, the Great Wall, Pointe du Hoc, Omaha Beach, Bergen-Belsen, Geneva, the Berlin Wall . .

Domestically and internationally, your Presidency has made a dramatic difference. My family, but especially my new daughter, Jessica, will benefit from your efforts as America goes forward into the New Century.

Thank you for the confidence you have placed in me and the opportunity to serve you and this great country during the past five years. Hopefully, I can continue to help you, and I hope you will call upon me for other assignments.

The President. I was elected, and reelected, on a platform that pledged to decentralize Federal programs, reduce the size and spending of the Federal Government, strengthen the national defense, restore economic prosperity through private enterprise, and foster individual initiative. As you know, I believe that individual initiative is the key to a vibrant, strong, and healthy nation. People who decide for themselves what risks to take and how hard to push for what level of personal fulfillment are the people who contribute the most to society. I strongly believe the best way to encourage economic growth is through private enterprise.

United States has many very good programs to provide help to those who really need it and to do those things that are more effectively done by governments than by individuals. I believe there should be as direct a connection as possible between the government and the people. As you know, I have taken my message many times directly to the American people. I believe strongly in as much local community control as possible of those necessary programs -- the closer the administration of the programs is to the people who receive the help, the more effective those programs will be.

The distrust between the United States and the Soviet Union was apparently greater during your first term as President than during the second. A long time has passed since you used phrases such as ``evil empire'' about the Soviets. Why is the distrust on your part less today?

The President. I think that we are still a long way from the point where either the United States or the Soviet Union will be prepared to rely on simple trust in dealing with each other. We have fundamentally different political and social values. You cannot compare the totalitarian nature of the Soviet system, which lacks basic democratic and personal freedoms, with the open societies of the United States or Sweden, which are based on the rule of law and the rights of the individual. Clearly, we and the Soviets must manage our differences in a common effort to avoid the danger of conflict in this nuclear age. But that does not mean we should abandon our efforts to promote democratic values wherever possible -- quite the opposite.

The prospect of nuclear disarmament gives the European public an enhanced sense of psychological security. But our real security, in terms of coping with the legacy of historical hostilities -- imbalance of conventional armed forces, territorial claims, ethnic loyalties, trading restrictions, etc. -- is hardly affected by a mutual and balanced scaling-down of nuclear capabilities. What advice do you have to Europeans to turn the psychological security of denuclearization into a real security of removed sources of conflicts?

East-West tension is the fundamental difference between societies that are based on freedom and those that are not. Weapons, even nuclear weapons, are a result of this difference, not the cause of it. I have often spoken of our ultimate goal of ridding the world of nuclear weapons. But we must not delude ourselves; to achieve this goal will be a long and slow process. For the foreseeable future, all of us will continue to depend on nuclear deterrence to preserve both peace and freedom.

Thus, even if we are able to reach a verifiable INF agreement to eliminate a whole category of nuclear weapons, it is very misleading to talk about denuclearization. The United States will maintain its nuclear commitment to NATO. Meanwhile, we must deal with the problems created by the Warsaw Pact's advantage in conventional weapons. We must also look for ways to open up human contacts to break down ignorance and distrust. We must continue to encourage the East to permit the basic freedoms and individual liberties that we take for granted in our own societies.

The President. I would very much like for the General Secretary to see this country. At Geneva I invited Mr. Gorbachev to visit the United States. But naturally we believe that meetings on the highest level must be well prepared and justified in terms of substance. I am pleased to note that an agreement in principle was reached to conclude an INF treaty during Soviet Foreign Minister Shevardnadze's visit to Washington last week. Secretary Shultz will meet Mr. Shevardnadze again in Moscow next month to continue the efforts and to work out the details of a summit later this fall.

The President. The United States has been involved in the regional negotiating process in Central America for several years. We have important security interests in Central America that will be well served by a resolution of the conflict in Central America that brings genuine democracy, peace, and stability to the region. The test of any agreement lies in its implementation, and we will watch closely to see whether the provisions of the agreement are carried out in letter and spirit.

Nicaraguan acceptance of full democracy -- including political pluralism; freedom of the press, religion, and assembly -- is an essential element of the peace plan adopted by the five Central American Presidents. I believe that all democratic states need to do everything they can to encourage this development. In particular, they need to press the Sandinistas to fulfill the commitments they have made under the Guatemala agreement to open the Nicaraguan system. We want to see the Central American nations tackle their serious economic and social problems free from outside interference, and this means the withdrawal of the large number of Soviet and Cuban advisers in Nicaragua.

Without democracy in Nicaragua, it will be difficult to bring peace and security to Central America. Internal democracy is the only effective means of assuring that the Sandinistas abide by their commitments. As it now stands, the agreement contains sufficient ambiguities that the Sandinistas might use it to eliminate the resistance without bringing democracy to Nicaragua. The pressure of the resistance is what moved the peace effort forward to begin with. Withdrawal of this pressure would remove all incentives for the Sandinistas to negotiate in good faith and could leave the Sandinistas virtually free to violate whatever they agree to. The United States is committed to helping the peace process move forward, and we will be watching very carefully to see that it is implemented fully and comprehensively.

The President. Your question implies that there is somehow a difference between the cause or causes small countries should stand for -- or that simply because they are small countries -- in the ones they are compelled to stand for -- and those that large countries support.

Fundamentally all countries, large or small, should have common cause in the world today to live in peace and to prosper. Domestically, people have a right to a system based on a government of choice. Internationally, we have a right to an environment which allows people to live free from the constant fear that their national sovereignty will be encroached upon through the aggressive actions of others. The small countries certainly do have a common interest in the preservation of peace, and believe me, the big countries share the same interest.

Insofar as one considers the idea of common cause from the perspective of those broad principles, I think all countries share a common cause, and of course they should give voice to it. The United States, too, though not a small country, speaks out often and with great intensity on many causes. The term ``small countries'' is a very general one encompassing many different individual situations, so I'm not sure that even in moving the discussions from very broad principles to more immediate, pragmatic concerns, one can really talk about a common concern of small countries per se.

The President. I do not think that a northern European nuclear-free zone would increase security in Scandinavia. The best way to maintain security in Scandinavia, and in all of Europe, is for NATO to remain strong in order to be able to deter any threat of conflict initiated by the Warsaw Pact. NATO is a defensive alliance of free and sovereign nations; all of its members contribute according to their abilities. International agreements that would appear to create two categories of NATO members would weaken the alliance and thereby increase instability and undercut deterrence.

Congress is higher when your rating in the polls is higher. The very same or an equally good White House argument seems to carry less weight when your rating goes down. Do you have any comments on the conditions of a President's effectiveness set by the opinion polls?

The President. The United States system of government is very responsive to the opinions of the American people. I think this is the bedrock foundation of its strength as a system. Public opinion polls, while often not on the top of a politician's list of favorite things, do reflect the mood and feelings of the American people -- granted sometimes more, and sometimes less, accurately.

Again, one of the key features and greatest strengths of our system -- and one particularly worth noting now at the 200th anniversary of our Constitution, the document which provides for the system itself -- is the checks and balances between the different branches of the Government. While I may not always like a particular point of opposition, I don't think it's too surprising that some segments of Congress respond very quickly to the opinion polls and perhaps feel they can push harder at some times than others. I don't think, however, that a President's decisions regarding central issues of peace, security, and the economic health of this nation are really determined by the shifts, up and down, in the opinion polls. That's something every modern President just has to live with, and you go on and put through the programs you know are the right ones.

We can all be extremely proud of and grateful for those who staff our Nation's emergency medical services (EMS). They make a tremendous difference in our land as they save lives and care for the injured and the critically ill.

Dedicated physicians, nurses, paramedics, park rangers, fire fighters, law enforcement officers, and countless devoted volunteers form a system that works daily for the safety and well-being of all Americans. Many perform their tasks under severe conditions, and many risk their lives to rescue accident victims; all of them make EMS a national success.

Most of us can tell from personal experience of quick, efficient EMS teams who have saved the lives of people we know and love. Despite these many successes, however, more than 750,000 Americans continue to lose their lives from emergencies each year. That is why EMS teams across our country strive constantly to improve their remarkable lifesaving record. They work to upgrade their training and skills, to find new methods and better equipment, and to establish nationwide standards for EMS training and the delivery of care.

We can all recognize, appreciate, encourage, and support our local emergency medical services teams. We can also improve the current EMS system by developing awareness of accident prevention, by following good health practices, and by learning CPR (cardiopulmonary resuscitation). These personal efforts can help make life safer for all of us.

For decades America has paused on the 11th of November, the anniversary of the armistice that concluded World War I, to remember and to honor our veterans of military service. We do so in proud and grateful recognition of the hardships and sacrifices demanded from and faithfully accepted by the millions of men and women who have defended our land in war and in peace.

Our observance of Veterans Day this year, the Bicentennial of the Constitution, reminds us in a special way of the service men and women who have made liberty's cause their own. Our fundamental charter lives on because through the years countless brave Americans have gladly willed to ``provide for the common defence.'' No one is more responsible for securing ``the Blessings of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity'' than our veterans. That is why, this November 11 and always, we let veterans know that their service is not forgotten, that their sacrifices are appreciated, and that America salutes its defenders.

November 11, 1987, as Veterans Day. I urge all Americans to recognize the valor and sacrifice of our veterans through appropriate public ceremonies and private prayers. I also call upon Federal, State, and local government officials to display the flag of the United States and to encourage and take part in patriotic activities throughout our country. I invite the business community, churches, schools, unions, civic and fraternal organizations, and the media to support this national observance with suitable commemorative expressions and programs.

We are honored to have Rosemary Willson with us this evening. Rosemary, as long as there's an American flag to wave and warm evenings with friends, Meredith's music will live on in our hearts. We elected officials are always trying to figure out the mood of the country. We look at polls, we see what the newspapers are saying, call in experts. But I suspect that if we just listen to a Meredith Willson composition, we would know the spirit and soul of our nation. I've been looking forward to this event, because, as you know, I enjoy the outdoors, good food, and good conversation.

I know that some of my best friends from time to time think I'd been led both down and off the garden path by, if not a grasshopper, perhaps the occasional gypsy moth or even a boll weevil. [Laughter] Well, it's true that in American politics, some of us may prefer different paths from time to time, but we're all heading toward the same goal. And we're more likely to get there if we remember that at its core, the American political process is premised on friendly political competition between fellow citizens.

After all, only in America can a President of one party get together with congressional members of both political parties for a friendly feast right in the middle of a heated political struggle. We should be grateful for this tradition; we should work hard to maintain it. And in that spirit, Nancy and I are delighted to have been able to join you this evening for these moments of leisure, friendship, and good will. So, thank you all, and God bless you.

Vienna today representatives of the North Atlantic alliance and the Warsaw Pact opened the 43d session of the Mutual and Balanced Force Reduction Talks (MBFR). The United States remains committed to achieving a sound, verifiable agreement in MBFR to reduce and limit conventional forces. The main threat to security and stability in Europe is the substantial Warsaw Pact conventional superiority based on massive forward-deployed Soviet forces. In MBFR, the U.S. and its NATO partners seek to redress the conventional imbalance in central Europe through negotiated force reductions to equal levels.

U.S. and the other Western MBFR participants believe that their proposal of December 5, 1985, provides for an effectively verifiable accord that meets this objective. The Western proposal accepts a time-limited, first-phase framework as suggested by the Eastern side.

It calls for initial U.S. and Soviet troop reductions, followed by a 3-year, no-increase commitment on manpower in the central European zone, during which time both sides would verify remaining force levels.

President has instructed the U.S. delegation to the negotiations to press for an Eastern response to this initiative. Thus far, the Eastern side has failed to give a meaningful response to the West's proposal.

The President. When our administration came to Washington, we were determined to make of our nation what I have many times referred to as an opportunity society, a land in which Americans, all Americans, would be able to develop their talents to the fullest. Today we honor a group of institutions that have long stood for just that -- opportunity. I'm speaking, of course, about America's historically black colleges and universities.

Listen to this record of achievement: Black colleges and universities have educated 50 percent of our black business executives, 75 percent of our black military officers, 80 percent of our black judges, and 85 percent of America's black physicians. For decades, then, these institutions have been giving black Americans hope -- hope for a better life, hope that they would be able to play a full and active part in the life of the Nation. With the unique role of these educational institutions in mind, our administration has made certain that, in an era of budget cuts, black colleges and universities actually received increased funding by 1986, up some 19 percent since we took office.

Then, too, we've worked to see to it that students would have economic opportunties after graduation to complement the educational opportunties they benefited from while still in college. Indeed, in large measure because we've cut taxes and worked to limit the economic role of government, today our nation is enjoying one of the longest periods of peacetime economic expansion in history -- 57 months and still counting.

Just yesterday there was still more good news, right there on the front page of the New York Times. The Times reported that -- and I'll be quoting again -- ``Black high school students across the country are making steady gains in the scores they achieve on standardized college admission tests.'' Well, there is something profound here in this connection between educational achievement and economic growth. You see, I'm convinced that the one has a great deal to do with the other, that education represents an investment in the future and that the investment becomes more inviting when the future itself looks brighter. In the words of author George Gilder: ``Economic opportunities summon initiatives.

You know, I can't help thinking that the goals Americans set for themselves in the days of my own youth seem so modest: indoor plumbing, electricity, a family car, a telephone. I remember living in a home without indoor plumbing.

Today jet airplanes carry passengers -- even those of modest means -- from coast to coast and overseas, while our engineers are busy developing crafts that one day will take off from a runway and carry us into space. And discoveries in the field of superconductivity are coming so rapidly that research results are often out of date before they're in print.

Yes, these are exciting days -- exciting days above all for young Americans and those who educate them. For black Americans, there is additional excitement -- the excitment that goes with breaking the bonds of prejudice, that goes with the defeat of discrimination.

Perhaps, then, it's in the years ahead that our black colleges and universities will contribute the most to our nation, surpassing even the enormous contributions they've made in the past, making ever greater strides toward the achievement of a genuine opportunity society.

Today it's our privilege to have with us 30 students who represent this future, 30 students who have been chosen as the finest undergraduate students in mathematics, engineering, and science at historically black colleges and universities. They were nominated by the presidents of their colleges and selected by a distinguished panel of leaders in higher education. Later today they will receive awards sponsored by the Carnegie Corporation of New York in recognition of their dedication and academic achievement.

To you 30 students: You represent the shining hope of America's future. In the technological age of the 21st century, your intellect, creativity, and skilled minds will keep our nation at the forefront of scientific research and technological development. The time and effort you're investing in your education will pay rich dividends to you and to the Nation. You're America's best and brightest hope for the future. Would you 30 please stand and accept our congratulations?

Lafontant graduated from the U.S. Navy's broadened opportunity for officer selection and training program and is currently attending Hampton University in Hampton, Virginia, majoring in chemical engineering. After graduation, Mr. Lafontant plans to pursue a graduate degree, followed by a career as an officer in the Navy's nuclear power program.

Second Class Owens -- and I have to look both ways -- they've not been pointed out as to which is which -- is a national scholarship midshipman majoring in chemistry at Savannah State College in Savannah, Georgia. Mr. Owens previously graduated from one of the Navy's programs in nuclear power and has received the Reserve Officers Association Award, given to the junior or sophomore student with the highest naval science grade-point average.

Setting aside a week in recognition of our country's historically Black colleges and universities is most appropriate because they are truly valuable national resources. During more than a century and a quarter they have educated hundreds of thousands of Americans who have gone on to contribute substantially to our Nation in every walk of life. Their alumni have included some of our most outstanding leaders and scholars.

That cherished document is the guarantor of liberty, union, and self-government for all Americans. Thanks to it we remain a strong people united in the richness of our diversity. We can all be proud of the role of historically Black colleges and universities in strengthening our country. Keeping these fine institutions a vital force in American education is a worthy national goal.

To acknowledge the accomplishments of historically Black colleges and universities and the appropriateness of focusing national attention on their contributions, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 22, has designated the week of September 21 through September 27, 1987, as ``National Historically Black Colleges Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this commemoration.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 24th day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Subsequently, at first light in the Persian Gulf on September 22, U.S. forces boarded the disabled craft, which proved to have been manned by regular elements of the Iranian navy. Three crewmen were found dead on the vessel and nine mines were found on deck. Twenty-six survivors were recovered from the water and from lifeboats and taken to U.S. naval ships for examination and medical treatment. Arrangements are being made to turn the survivors over to an appropriate humanitarian organization. Two members of the crew of the IRAN AJR are believed missing. Search and rescue operations for them have been undertaken, as well as operations to find and clear a number of mines that, according to discussion with surviving crewmen of the IRAN AJR, were laid prior to action against the vessel by U.S. forces.

The actions taken by U.S. forces were conducted in the exercise of our right of self-defense under Article 51 of the United Nations Charter. Mining of the high seas, without notice and in an area of restricted navigation, is unlawful and a serious threat to world public order and the safety of international maritime commerce. These Iranian actions were taken despite warnings given to the Government of Iran, subsequent to the recent mine damage done to the U.S.-flag vessel BRIDGETON, that the U.S.

U.S. forces in the area have returned to their prior state of alert readiness. They will remain prepared to take any further defensive action necessary to protect U.S. vessels and U.S. lives from unlawful attack.

These limited defensive actions have been taken by our Armed Forces in accordance with international law, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief. While being mindful of the historical differences between the Legislative and Executive Branches of government, and the positions taken by all of my predecessors in office, with respect to the interpretation and constitutionality of certain of the provisions of the War Powers Resolution, I nonetheless am providing this report in a spirit of mutual cooperation toward a common goal.

Presidents over four decades have recognized that the United States has vital interests in ensuring free world access to the energy resources of the Persian Gulf and in preventing hostile domination of the Gulf region. Today those interests are threatened by the Iran-Iraq war and Iran's continued belligerent behavior in the region.

Iraq has made clear its willingness, without preconditions, to negotiate an equitable settlement of the war and to implement U.N. Security Council Resolution 598. To date, Iran has refused to implement it. Meanwhile, by aggressive military action and terrorism, Iran has continued its efforts to intimidate the nonbelligerent nations of the Gulf, to close Gulf waters to neutral shipping, and to export a destabilizing blend of religion and politics in and even beyond the region. Iranian policies create a threat that could seriously interrupt freedom of navigation and the free flow of oil in the Gulf.

Our overriding aim is peace and stability in the region. We have no interest in provoking Iran or anyone else, although we will defend ourselves as necessary. Indeed, the United States hopes that more normal relations with Iran will evolve as Iranian belligerence and tensions in the area diminish. We have made these points known repeatedly to Iran through diplomatic channels as well as by public statements.

The continuation of the Iran-Iraq war is the major cause of increasing tensions in the Gulf, to which our forces and those of other nations have responded. We look to the United Nations Security Council for a negotiated settlement to this war in its entirety through the rapid implementation of U.N. Security Council Resolution 598 in all its parts. We hope that the Soviet Union will cooperate as the Council moves to create conditions for such implementation by adopting a second resolution rather than delaying and seeking opportunities to expand their own influence at the expense of peace in the region.

The success of our policy will depend to a great extent on the consistency and care with which we carry it out. Our resolve to date has begun to pay off: through increased European naval contributions to protect freedom of navigation in the Gulf, through quiet but essential and effective GCC support for our naval efforts and those of other nations, through diplomatic progress in the U.N.

I think you know the U.S. Olympic team seems to have permanently captured the American imagination. Surely, the storybook victories of 1960 and 1980, when young American athletes, given little chance for the gold medal, won against far more experienced opponents.

Americans see in this team a national symbol, a symbol of what might be called the corny, homegrown conviction that victory can come to those who live by the amateur spirit, who play fair and by the rules, that nice guys in a tough world can finish first.

Gross was a dedicated and hard-working public servant. Referred to as ``the conscience of the House,'' he met his responsibilities with care, wisdom, and old-fashioned common sense. He did his homework and earned the respect of his colleagues on both sides of the aisle. As a Representative, he sought to do what was best for his constituents and always thought long and hard about spending taxpayers' money.

Before coming to Washington, he was a journalist in Iowa, where we worked together at radio station WHO in Des Moines. I have many fond memories of H.R. Gross, and Nancy joins me in extending our deep sympathy to Hazel and their family.

President today announced his intention to nominate Mark D. Siljander to be an Alternate Representative of the United States of America to the 42d Session of the General Assembly of the United Nations.

Thank you all very much, and believe me, welcome to Washington. [Laughter] It's wonderful to see you all here. Makes me feel as if the reinforcements have just arrived. I have to tell you that back there, and hearing those songs before I came out, put a lump in my throat. And I was trying to control that when I came in, and you just enlarged it. [Laughter] I want to congratulate you on your fourth national convention. In just a few short years you've become the largest politically active women's organization in the Nation.

One of the things we're going to keep their attention focused on is -- well, you might say it's making sure that justice is done, that Justice Bork is confirmed by the Senate as our next Supreme Court Justice.

Now, before the hearings, these same interest groups also argued that Judge Bork was outside the mainstream. But recently, in an article on the op-ed page of the Washington Post, President Carter's White House Counsel, Lloyd Cutler, threw that canard out the window. I have a hunch that maybe the Post was thinking they would get a different view than they got when they accepted his op-ed piece. [Laughter] Mr. Cutler wrote of Judge Bork, and I'll quote again: ``His views were and are widely shared by justices and academics who are in the moderate center.'' Well, it's clear now that the charges that Robert Bork is too ideological are themselves ideologically inspired and that the criticism of him as outside the mainstream can only be held by those who are themselves so far outside the mainstream that they've long ago lost sight of the moderate center.

And there's one subject I wish the hearings had dealt with more thoroughly, and that's crime. Nearly one-third of the Supreme Court's docket is devoted to criminal cases. As a judge on one of our nation's most important appellate courts, Judge Bork has handed down tough but fair decisions that have not only protected the rights of the accused but the rights of the victims, as well. And they've been too long ignored. And I know you'll agree: our Constitution requires no less.

And if people want a measure of how the American public feels on the nomination of Robert Bork to the Supreme Court, they should ask this organization about the 72,000 petitions, pro-Bork petitions, that have flooded in over the last 3 weeks -- with more coming in all the time. Now, I don't usually make predictions. I've always been a little superstitious about that, but in this case I feel confident that reason will prevail over politics.

And now, even though I'm going to change subjects here, I'm still preaching to the choir. [Laughter] The next item on our agenda -- and nothing we've done in the last 6\1/2\ years has been more important -- is the survival of freedom in Central America. Believe me, I know how much your organization has done in that cause: setting up schools, medical clinics, and farms to help refugees fleeing Communist oppression; $4 million worth of clothes in one shipment alone. And over the last few years, you've been vital in getting the message out to the American people. But this is the crucial moment, now is the time we must redouble our efforts to make sure that the hope for freedom in Nicaragua is not betrayed once again.

In the latest issue of Public Opinion magazine, they printed the results of an extensive polling of American attitudes towards Central America. And the numbers make it very clear the message is getting across. The American public recognizes the great danger posed by an aggressive Communist government in Nicaragua and, by a large majority, favors continued aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters battling to liberate their nation from Communist tyranny. Of those who had an opinion, a huge majority described Central America as ``very important to the defense interests of the United States.'' And they agreed that the situation in Nicaragua is a threat to the security of the United States. Huge majorities believe there is a danger of Nicaragua becoming another Cuba, an aggressive Soviet outpost exporting revolution to its neighboring countries. And that is the real problem: Communist Nicaragua is, in fact, a Soviet beachhead in the Americas.

Asked the question: Should the United States aid the rebels to prevent Communist influence from spreading to other countries in Central America? -- 58 percent said yes, and only 29 percent were opposed. Well, I can tell you, aid to the freedom fighters must and will continue. The American people want it, justice demands it, and it's the only way to make the Marxist-Leninists in Managua sincerely talk peace.

In the months ahead, as the Central American peace progress -- or process undergoes its inevitable complications, it'll be even more vital to keep the central issue before the American people: democracy in Nicaragua. We can accept nothing less.

There's only one fair path to peace: free and fair elections open to all. Now the Sandinistas have promised to end all censorship. Well, that's a good beginning, and we must hold them to it. But it's only a beginning. The next steps are obvious: Open up the jails and let the thousands of political prisoners free; let the exiles come home; allow freedom of worship, free labor unions, a free economy; dissolve the so-called neighborhood watch committees; and give the people of Nicaragua back their basic human rights; and last, but not least, send the Soviets and the Cubans home. Anyone who demands anything less of the Sandinistas, anyone who does not insist on true democracy in Nicaragua, is not serving the cause of peace. We'll not be satisfied with mere show, with ``Potemkin'' reforms. Until these conditions are met, democratization will be no more than a fraud. And until they're met, we'll press for true democracy by supporting those who are fighting for it.

These words ring just as urgently true today, perhaps even more so. And it's individuals and groups like yours who have responded to that sense of urgency, who've taken up Washington's call, who will keep America good and therefore prospering. Working from the grassroots through all the branches of government, it is people like you who are keeping that sacred fire of liberty alive.

And then I'm just going to leave you with one little thing about some of those other parts of the world. I have become a collector of stories that are told among the people of the Soviet Union, that reveal that they have a sense of humor, but also some cynicism about their present system. And I've collected quite a number of them, and they're just wonderful. And one that I think is kind of interesting is the question that was asked in school over there about how do you tell a Communist? He said, ``Well, it's someone who reads Marx and Lenin.'' And how do you tell an anti-Communist? ``It's someone who understands Marx and Lenin.'' [Laughter] Thank you very much.

In this bicentennial year of our Constitution all Americans can be proud to have a man of Judge Sessions' character and integrity leading the FBI in the fight against crime, all the while bearing witness to the Nation's unswerving commitment to due process of law. Judge Sessions embodies the ideal that the enforcement of our laws must be very tough, but very fair. Under the direction of Judge Sessions, the FBI will carry on its crucial responsibility to safeguard our persons, our property, and our constitutional rights.

Senate is considering legislation that would force a retreat from the Persian Gulf by the United States. This ill-conceived legislation could have disastrous effects for the U.S. commitment to the Persian Gulf and to our strategic interests in keeping those waters safe for navigation. Ultimately, it could provide a means for Iran to achieve what cannot be achieved by any other means, namely, our complete withdrawal from the Persian Gulf and the Gulf of Oman.

Allied cooperation in protecting the Gulf has been very helpful. Now is the time to show steadfastness in our commitment, not vacillation and timidity. I will veto this legislation should it reach my desk. I want to make it clear that, despite the damage this legislation could do just by its consideration, we will not abandon our strategic interests or our friends in the Persian Gulf.

There's good news. The Federal deficit for this year is expected to drop by some 30 percent compared to last year. That could be a whopping $65 billion reduction, and it happened without a tax increase. There's also some disappointing news.

The bill would continue the authority of the United States Government to borrow funds which we must do to avoid the default on our obligations. This legislation also includes a so-called fix of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction law, but it really is an attempt to force me eventually either to sign a tax bill or to accept massive cuts in national defense, or both. I would have no problem with signing an extension of the debt limit. But the choice is for the United States to default on its debts for the first time in our 200-year history, or to accept a bill that has been cluttered up. This is yet another example of Congress trying to force my hand, and it's one more reason why the President needs the line-item veto to separate the good from the bad.

Congress consistently brings the Government to the edge of default before facing its responsibility. This brinkmanship threatens the holders of government bonds and those who rely on Social Security and veterans benefits.

Interest rates would skyrocket, instability would occur in financial markets, and the Federal deficit would soar. The United States has a special responsibility to itself and the world to meet its obligations. It means we have a well-earned reputation for reliability and credibility -- two things that set us apart from much of the world.

Some in Congress will claim that if I reject this bill with its Gramm-Rudman-Hollings fix, then I'm against deficit reduction. But, of course, nothing is farther from the truth. Since 1980 when you first elected me to this office, I have led efforts to control Congress' appetite to spend in deficit.

Over a 5-year period, while revenues went up 28 percent, congressional spending went up 46 percent. From 1982 to 1987, for every dollar Congress cut from our national defense, they added $2 for domestic spending. Now, that's not fiscal restraint. Two years ago, Congress took a first step to curb spending with Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, and I agreed. Its purpose was to get on a track to lower deficits and eventually a balanced budget. Well, the ink was not even dry before Congress walked away from its own plan. Instead of facing the tough choices to reduce Federal spending, Congress attempted to shift the burden to our national security and to you, the American taxpayers, in the form of new taxes.

For those who say further responsible spending reductions are not possible, they are wrong. For those who say the only choice is undermining our national security at a time when the United States is close to an agreement with the Soviet Union on reducing nuclear weapons, they are wrong.

In the weeks ahead, Congress will have the opportunity to meet this commitment. So today, let's get some things clear. I will not hesitate to use my veto to hold down excess spending, and I will spell out the impact that defense cuts will have on our long-term security interests. You don't need more taxes to balance the budget. Congress needs the discipline to stop spending more, and that can be done with the passage of a constitutional amendment to balance the budget.

Congress needs to reform its budget process, at least by breaking up those massive, catch-all spending bills into individual parts. That way, each part can stand on its own. And to meet the new deficit target in Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, if Congress insists on lowering defense spending, then I will certainly insist on lowering domestic spending as well.

This decision is not easy. I have no choice but to sign this bill to guarantee the United States Government's credit. But I also will not permit Congress to dismantle our national defense, to jeopardize arms reduction, or to increase your taxes. I am determined that will not happen.

Vladimir Feltsman, that you manifest no bitterness, that you speak instead of the good you found in the midst of your suffering, this proves that you're not only a great musician, this proves that you are a hero of the human spirit. And, Vladimir, with all our hearts, we welcome you and Anna and Daniel to the United States and to freedom. And God bless you.

The President. In view of the friendly relations between the United States and Sweden, it is only natural that there should be meetings at the highest level from time to time. The meeting is symbolic of the basic friendship that underlies the relations between our two countries, and it is also of practical value. It is useful to examine our bilateral relationship and to share views on a range of global issues where both the United States and Sweden take an active interest. We need to continue to work even more closely together in a common effort to promote our shared democratic goals and objectives throughout the world.

Sweden has criticized the United States sharply over disarmament issues, Vietnam, Central America, and South Africa. Could you explain what effect, if any, this kind of criticism has on American decisions?

Responsible, constructive criticism is accepted as such. The United States has global responsibilities and often sees issues from a different perspective than does a neutral country like Sweden. The point is that we should be able to express our differences clearly but also see if there are ways that we could work together to bring about a solution of the issue. For instance, I understand that Sweden does not agree with American support of the democratic resistance in Nicaragua, but we both share the goal of bringing about a true and full democratic system.

The President. No country likes to hear itself criticized, but I cannot think of any country that has not been criticized. Americans do not expect that Sweden will in the future agree with every American policy or action. But I think that when two friendly countries disagree it is only natural that they first discuss their differences privately. They are then, of course, free to express themselves publicly if they choose.

The President. I believe that the Soviet Union has not abandoned its stated objective of promoting its Communist ideology throughout the world. I also think that the Soviets have built up a massive military force that far exceeds their requirements for simple defense. Continuing Soviet aggression in Afghanistan cannot be forgotten. Sweden itself is the best judge of whether or not there is a Soviet military threat towards it. I am aware that Sweden has long had a policy of armed neutrality and that you have built up a strong military force.

Gorbachev is an impressive Soviet leader with whom I have personally always gotten along well. As for the reform policies pursued by him and his government, I can only hope that they succeed in bringing greater openness, respect for human rights, and eventually, genuine democracy to Soviet society.

This would benefit not only Soviet citizens but also U.S.-Soviet relations and the cause of peace. I have mentioned in some of my recent speeches steps which the Soviet Government could take to show that the new thinking in the Kremlin is supported by action as well as words. These steps include dismantling the Berlin Wall, renouncing the Brezhnev doctrine, or -- most urgently -- ordering a prompt and unconditional withdrawal of Soviet troops from Afghanistan. All of these steps are, unfortunately, long overdue and would be a credit to any Soviet leader who takes them.

If Gorbachev is successful in his efforts to make the Soviet Union more efficient and if you achieve a disarmament agreement, might this not make the Soviet Union much stronger politically and economically? Is it really in the United States interest to contribute to that?

States interest to do whatever it can to deter war and promote a more peaceful and democratic world. Properly negotiated and fully verifiable arms reduction agreements can be an important means of strengthening security, but of course, it is equally important to ensure that our defensive forces remain fully capable of deterring any danger of conflict.

The President. We have agreed in principle now on concluding a treaty eliminating an entire class of U.S. and Soviet intermediate-range nuclear missiles, and I hope that we will be able to accomplish this soon. Of course, verification remains an essential issue on which important details still have to be worked out. We also agreed to seek progress on a START treaty that would cut in half the number of strategic arms held by the United States and the Soviet Union. Unfortunately, the Soviets have not been willing to permit those negotiations to progress as far as I would like and are continuing to link progress to their efforts to cripple the United States SDI program, even though the Soviets themselves continue to conduct extensive strategic defense programs of their own.

I appreciate this opportunity to speak with you today, and I thank you for that greeting. And I still remember when we first met together, not that long after my arrival in Washington. And then we talked about a revolution in economic thinking, a revolution whose ideas have proven themselves in the years since. And while progress has been made, formidable challenges remain. It's fitting then, on this occasion, that we make an assessment and discuss our vision of the world's economic potential, as mankind, quite literally, moves toward a new millennium.

Making an assessment and setting goals are, of course, nothing more than good management. And if there's anything that the working people, whose taxes contribute to the support of our institutions, have a right to insist upon, it is just that: good management. The world looks to us for leadership, to set a standard of honesty and responsibility and rational decisionmaking.

I'd like to take this opportunity to thank each of you for the exemplary work that you've been doing and to express my deep appreciation to Barber Conable and Michel Camdessus for their outstanding service.

But when I first addressed these institutions 6 years ago, the United States was suffering from economic decisions that can only be described as bad management. Inflation, stagnation, and 21-percent interest rates were the order of the day. Good management must be built on sound principle. And before our economic revolution, the decisionmakers increasingly put their faith in solutions that, no matter how well-intended, did not work. Instead of encouraging enterprise and production, the emphasis was on bureaucratic planning and redistribution. Instead of demanding measurable results and strict accounting from public spending, the Federal spigot was turned on. Resources were drained from productive, job-creating enterprise in the private sector and siphoned to questionable, ineffective, and often counterproductive government programs. Decentralized decisionmaking in the private sector and in local and State government was supplanted by Federal planning, as new power and resources were centralized in the Federal bureaucracy.

But as we found out to our detriment, good management should never be mistaken with the expansion of government control and power over an economy. Good management, if it means anything, must bring a country closer to reaching its full potential and must improve the well-being of its people. Now, that's obviously not what was happening in the United States in the late 1970's.

Policies then in place led to declining productivity, a drop in the gross national product, lower real take-home pay, and a dramatic rise in poverty. In 1980 the American people called for fundamental change, reform that would put this country solidly back on the road to growth, expansion, and long-term stability.

Our goal was to increase economic activity from the bottom up. And again, good management doesn't mean amassing control and authority; it means finding ways of achieving one's objectives. In dealing with a national economy, it means opening opportunity for the people and giving them the incentive to work more efficiently and to invest in economy-building projects and job-creating businesses; it means making certain that excessive regulation doesn't strangle enterprise; it means leaving enough resources in the private sector to serve the needs of investment; it means competition, even from foreign companies; and more than anything else, it means expanding freedom and opportunity for individuals instead of increasing the power of the state.

Productivity is up. Real family income is up. And we've at last reversed the rise in poverty that began in 1979. Credit for these accomplishments belongs to the American people themselves, because as is often the case, the best thing government can do is get out of the way. And that's just what we've tried to do.

Our expanding economy has not only improved the well-being of our own citizens but has served as an engine for progress throughout the world. The expansion of trade and international commerce during the last 6 years has helped keep our prices low and industry and manufacturing competitive and our economy growing.

At the same time, expanding trade with the United States has helped many countries weather an economic storm. Earnings from exports to the United States, in some cases, made all the difference. The central themes of our relations, especially with developing countries, have been, and should continue to be, trade rather than aid, mutual benefit rather than charity, a hand up rather than a handout.

There is, of course, the trade deficit, something of justifiable concern both in this country and abroad. Corrections are necessary, and there are strong signs that corrections are underway. It is vital, however, that policymakers not be stampeded into self-destructive action. There has been a chorus of American politicians playing to the fears of working people, singing the song of protectionism and charging that, as a result of the trade deficit, jobs will go overseas, unemployment will rise, and the United States will be deindustrialized. It sounds good as part of a political campaign speech, but as an old Virginia lawyer once told his hometown jury, ``tain't so.'' Unemployment has declined in the United States by 40 percent since late 1982, even as our trade deficit has grown. In Japan and Germany, countries with large trade surpluses, unemployment has gone up. And a long-term analysis shows us holding our own in manufacturing jobs. Importantly, from the end of 1982 to the present, during a time of large trade deficits, manufacturing jobs in the United States grew by more than a million. Furthermore, real wages in manufacturing, which declined by 7 percent from 1977 to 1981, increased by 2\1/2\ percent from 1981 to 1986.

I pledge to you that any protectionist legislation reaching my desk is going to be returned to the Congress with ``Veto'' on the cover. Part of the answer lies here at home. As I noted at the economic summit in Venice last June, it's imperative that the United States consistently reduce its Federal deficit spending. And today I will sign a bill that reinstates our deficit reduction targets as part of an extension of the borrowing authority of the United States Government. Now, this was not an easy decision. On one hand was the responsibility to preserve our 200-year history of meeting our obligations and maintaining credibility and reliability to our own citizens and to the world. On the other hand was the political debate being waged between those who favor either raising taxes or cutting defense -- or both -- and those of us committed to further reductions in domestic spending, reductions that will bring down the deficit and keep our economy strong.

I said, it was a tough decision. It should be seen as a signal that America is not backing down from its responsibilities. But having made this decision, I call on the surplus countries to do the same: to find the political gumption to stimulate their economies without reigniting the fires of inflation. It must be recognized that the health of the world economy does not hinge solely on U.S. budget policy. As U.S. budget and trade deficits decline, other countries must pick up the slack, particularly on imports from developing countries. Our focus -- and this means all of us -- must be on achieving balanced growth and more open economies. Secretary Baker and finance ministers from other major countries have been working hard to devise ways to achieve these dual goals. This is a true test of our ability to manage the international economy.

Certainly we cannot succeed without an open and fair world trading system. As the pace of change picks up, it is essential that the guidelines for trade, the rules of the road for international commerce, be kept up to date and that reoccurring areas of friction be dealt with. And that's why our government is totally committed to the success of the Uruguay round of trade negotiations. GATT has played a major role in expanding world trade and economic growth in these last four decades. Now it must address new areas, as technology and changing circumstances vastly increase the potential and scope of economic dealings between the peoples of the world. Services, investment, and intellectual property protection, formerly of only domestic concern, are now economic activities that are part of the arena of world commerce and must be included in any overall trade agreement.

The management decisions are ours to make. This is a time of tremendous opportunity to set in place a world trading structure that will carry mankind to new levels of enterprise, opportunity, and well-being. A good place to start achieving that laudable goal is with the substantive proposals the United States has set forth concerning agriculture. For too long, our farm policies have managed us instead of us managing them. Unless decisive and common action is taken, this growing burden could well overwhelm us. In the major Western economies, farm subsidies alone have jumped from $10 to $15 billion in 1970 to $100 billion in 1986, and that is just the direct costs. Billions of dollars are being spent by governments for capital investment in agriculture that would be totally unnecessary with an open trading system. Consumers in nations that limit agricultural imports are forced to pay higher prices, using family resources that could be put to much better use.

The unnecessary costs, market distortions, and the inefficiencies of current agriculture policy are part of the political and economic landscape throughout much of the Western World. And for this very reason -- the commonality of the problem -- we believe a broad-based, cooperative, international solution is the only answer. We're asking the people of the world to consider not piecemeal reform but revolutionary change in the production and distribution of food and fiber. We propose a total phaseout over the next 10 years of farm export subsidies, quotas, nontariff barriers, and all distortions of agricultural markets. In doing so, world food costs will be cut, government budgets spared, wasteful practices eliminated, and economic growth boosted on a broad international scale. We envision by the end of the century an open and free trading system in agricultural products throughout the vast expanses of the world. People of every land, communicating, cooperating and competing with each other, buying and selling, producing and distributing, finding more efficient ways of meeting the universal challenge of keeping food on the table.

And what we accomplish in agriculture may someday be used as a blueprint for opening borders throughout the planet to the totality of trade and commerce of every nation, a global free and fair trading system uniting and uplifting all mankind. And today, as we reaffirm our goals, let us underscore that as mankind moves forward we go together. No nation will be excluded, no people left behind. The United States remains fully committed to doing its part in working with those developing nations that are struggling to improve the well-being of their people. Overcoming the obstacles to progress in these poorer nations is, perhaps, the greatest management challenge in the world today. A cooperative solution to the debt problem is the only real answer. It involves a partnership among developing countries, commercial banks, and international financial institutions.

First and foremost, let us move forward with the understanding that there are no easy answers or quick fixes. Those who counsel otherwise are either mistaken or malicious. Now is the time for rational decisionmaking and responsible action. Those who choose to follow false prophets, to live in an illusion instead of seeking a solution, will be left with the consequences of their actions.

What the United States has proposed is a positive program, a forward strategy, if you will, that will see debt retired not by extracting wealth from nations that are already too poor but by increasing the level of economic activity and servicing the debt from new wealth. Last week Secretary Baker announced added U.S. support for this program with his endorsement of expanding the resources of the World Bank. A number of proposals to strengthen the IMF's ability to promote growth-oriented reform will be advanced soon. But this alone will not be enough. Leaders in debtor nations have tough decisions to make. Our slogan must be: It can be done.

And let no one suggest that some peoples are condemned by culture or race to misery and deprivation. Victor Hugo once wrote that ``people do not lack strength; they lack will.'' And the will comes from a realization that one can accomplish what one sets out to do, that great deeds are possible. What's needed is commitment [and], as in all good management plans, a model that works. The world is not without such models. In the last 30 years there's been extraordinary growth and economic advancement in what were underdeveloped nations around the Pacific rim, some of which are poor in every significant natural resource, including adequate territory. These peoples have overcome great difficulties, improved their living standards, and become a major force in the world economy. They've done so using economic concepts similar to those that helped reinvigorate America's economy these last 5 years. Tax structures and regulatory policies designed to encourage investment and enterprise are the magic behind the miracle. And debt, coincidentally, has not been the serious roadblock to growth on the Pacific rim that it has been elsewhere.

The success I'm talking about is in stark contrast to the misery and decline so evident in nations that have followed statist development models. In many parts of Africa, collectivism has brought decline even in countries rich in natural resources. There are, however, reasons for hope that the corner has been turned in Africa. A growing commitment to economic free reform is one of the most promising developments in years. Senegal, Ghana, Cameroon, and Malawi are some of the countries where market-oriented reforms are being put in place. The World Bank and the IMF are supporting these efforts. The United States will do all we can. U.S. economic efforts in sub-Saharan Africa are aimed toward ending hunger through economic growth, policy reform, and private sector development.

My hope is that cooperative support for policy reform in Africa, including the active participation of other donor countries and institutions, can eliminate hunger in Africa by the end of the century.

Leaders in China understand this -- well, understood it, I should say, when they began easing their country toward a freer economic system. Reform in China is now widespread and dramatic. From 1979 to 1985, the value of agricultural output in China rose at more than double the rate of the previous 15 years. Rural per capita income more than doubled. The total grain harvest went from 300 million tons in 1978 to over 400 million tons in 1984. In fact, in 1985, for the first time in 25 years, China became a net grain exporter. Similar progress is being enjoyed in other parts of the economy where reforms have been instituted.

Throughout the world, people are realizing that moving forward will require cutting themselves free from statist controls and from the weight of heavily subsidized government enterprises. In many industrialized countries, and in Third World countries as well, deregulation is the order of the day. Instead of looking at private enterprise as the adversary, many governments now see it as their best hope for progress and development. Tax rates are being lowered from New Zealand to France, from India to England. Government corporations are being privatized, denationalized, and cut off from subsidies from Ghana to Argentina, from the Philippines to Mexico.

The impetus for privatization directly complements efforts to reduce the net burden -- the debt burden, I should say. Debt-equity swaps can offer a method of turning money-losing government operations into tax-paying private businesses.

The debt is reduced, and a budget obligation is eliminated. The government is, thereby, free to use its resources and focus its attention on other matters. My Presidential Task Force on Project Economic Justice, headed by Ambassador William Middendorf, recommended that this method could be used not only to bring down the debt and stimulate privatization but to expand employee ownership, as well. Bold, innovative ideas like this are consistent with the overall American debt strategy and deserve to be given serious consideration. What is not needed now is business-as-usual. The United States will continue working with all those who are putting forth an honest effort to deal with the debt dilemma.

As vexing as our problems are, let no one doubt that democracy works. The unbridled energy of free people is the most powerful, creative, and moral force on this planet. And through all the political maneuvering and public debate, through the arduous negotiations, compromises, and balloting, one cannot but feel that he or she is part of something far more grand, far more historic. There is more evidence everyday that the future is on the side of the free. In the Western Hemisphere, the 1980's has seen an historic shift to democracy. Today 90 percent of the people of the Western Hemisphere live in countries that are either democratic or in transition to democracy. All who love liberty are heartened by the return to democracy in the Philippines and by recent events in South Korea. All this is reason for confidence that mankind is truly moving into a new era of freedom and prosperity, these two mutually reinforcing goals.

Bello, intellectual giant of the last century, once wrote: ``All truths touch on one another, from those that govern in the path of planets in space to those that delineate the actions and reactions of political forces. Progress in one line attracts progress in all others. All are connected and propel one another forward.'' Today we are part of that process of free men and women that is propelling mankind forward. The World Bank, the International Monetary Fund, and each of you are playing a vital role; and it has been my honor to speak with you today.

The President. Good afternoon. Most bill signing ceremonies are happy occasions; this one is not. This is a bill that I'll sign with great reluctance, and this is a bill that does not do justice to the American people. The bill contains two main provisions.

This is an action that we just take to prevent the Government from defaulting on its obligations, and I have no objection whatsoever to doing so. In short, this extension of the debt limit is necessary and unavoidable.

But the second provision is one to which it is my duty as President to voice the strongest possible objection. For this second provision involves a so-called fix of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction law -- a fix that doesn't fix things in the right way. Putting the country on a reliable track to lower deficits and, eventually a balanced budget -- well, that's my goal.

This administration's tax cuts fostered economic growth, so that over a 5-year period, Federal revenues have actually gone up more than 25 percent. But during the same period, Federal spending went up 46 percent. From 1982 to 1987, for every dollar cut from the defense budget, Congress added two dollars -- and I repeat, two dollars -- to domestic spending. Pork-barrel spending, spending for pressure groups, spending with utter irresponsibility -- that is the main cause of the Federal deficit. And now Congress sends me this bill, a bill that I must sign to keep the Federal Government from default.

Gramm-Rudman-Hollings ``fix'' is different from the original version. This measure says that, if by a certain date Congress and the administration have failed to agree upon a budget that cuts the Federal deficit by $23 billion, then that amount -- $23 billion -- will automatically be sequestered, a fancy term for an across-the-board budget cut. The catch is this: In this version, even larger portions of the domestic budget will be exempt.

This means that the cuts in the defense budget will be deep -- very deep. Our nation's security would be undermined, and my hand in dealing with the Soviets would be weakened at a time when we're engaged with the Soviets in sensitive and significant nuclear arms reduction talks. With this bill, then, Congress is telling me that we must pay for its uncontrolled domestic spending by endangering our national security or by raising your taxes, or both. Under their arrangement, the bill would go directly to the American people, but I will not allow the American people to be blackmailed into higher taxes. There are some in Congress who think that they have me trapped -- that this time I'll have no choice but to raise taxes or gut our defenses.

For there's a third choice, the right choice. It's the choice I campaigned for in '80 and again in '84. It's the choice embodied in the Economic Bill of Rights that I proposed this past Fourth of July weekend. It is to cut the excesses from the domestic budget, to impose upon the domestic budget, once and for all, a sense of responsibility, and the national good. The whole notion of fair treatment that forms such an essential part of our national character -- the whole notion of fair treatment that demands that if defense spending is reduced, then a wider range of domestic accounts must be reduced as well.

The responsibility is on the shoulders of the majority in Congress. And I'm directing my Cabinet and my staff to do everything they can to cooperate and to reduce unnecessary spending on domestic programs. America can avoid a fiscal disaster, but Congress will not do it by putting their hand in your pocket or with a get-soft defense program. There are some in Congress who support our goals to reduce the deficit. And let's take a pledge today to stand together with a common goal, a common purpose: to reject those who continue to want to spend more, tax more, and defend less; to protect America's interests, and not the special interests.

I am today signing H.J. Res. 324, which raises the debt ceiling and amends the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985. In addition to the views expressed in my public remarks on this occasion, certain provisions of this joint resolution require technical comment as a matter of legislative history.

First, the Supreme Court's recent decision in Bowsher v. Synar, which struck down portions of the original Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law, makes clear that the Comptroller General cannot be assigned executive authority by the Congress. In light of this decision, section 206(c) of the joint resolution, which purports to reaffirm the power of the Comptroller General to sue the executive branch under the Impoundment Control Act, is unconstitutional. It is only on the understanding that section 206(c) is clearly severable from the rest of the joint resolution, under the reasoning of the Supreme Court's 1987 decision in Alaska Airlines v. Brock, that I am signing the joint resolution with this constitutional defect.

I wish to make clear my understanding that sections 252(a) (1) and (2) of the amended act -- which direct the President to issue in strict accordance with the report submitted by the Office of Management and Budget -- do not preclude me or future Presidents from exercising our authority to supervise the execution of the law by overseeing and directing the Director of OMB in the preparation and, if necessary, revision of his reports. If this provision were interpreted otherwise, so as to require the President to follow the orders of a subordinate, it would plainly constitute an unconstitutional infringement of the President's authority as head of a unitary executive branch.

Third, section 106(f) of the joint resolution purports to require the President to submit a budget that complies with certain conditions concerning reductions in spending. In light of the President's plenary power under Article II, sec. 3 of the Constitution to submit to the Congress any legislation he deems necessary and expedient, this provision must be viewed as merely precatory.

Finally, to preserve the President's right to be presented with the full text of bills, resolutions, and orders submitted for his approval, I am construing section 251(a)(6)(C)(i) of the amended act -- which contains parenthetical language that could be viewed as attempting to incorporate committee reports by reference into legislation -- consistently with my understanding that material intended to have the force of law must itself be presented to the President.

Deficiency Syndrome) into which it can develop are a severe public health problem in the United States and elsewhere. HIV destroys the immune system and attacks the central nervous system, leading to devastating physical consequences and then to death. Because the virus has a long incubation period and the progress of the disease varies sharply from individual to individual, people can unwittingly carry and spread it for years.

AIDS afflicts thousands of Americans, and an unknown number are infected with HIV without showing any symptoms. The deadly virus is most commonly spread through sexual contact with an infected person, especially through homosexual practices; through intravenous drug use with contaminated needles; and through other transmissions of infected blood. Our country's huge and vital public health task of AIDS prevention and treatment is underway. Massive public and private efforts have already led to definite advances in research and treatment. Our understanding of AIDS remains incomplete, however, and much remains to be done before any vaccine or cure is found.

Presidential Commission is studying the public health dangers of the HIV epidemic, including the medical, legal, ethical, social, and economic impact, and will issue a report next year, focusing on Federal, State, and local measures to protect the public from contracting the virus, to help find a cure for AIDS, and to care for those already afflicted.

Both medicine and morality teach the same lesson about prevention of AIDS. The Surgeon General has told all Americans that the best way to prevent AIDS is to abstain from sexual activity until adulthood and then to restrict sex to a monogamous, faithful relationship. This advice and the advice to say no to drugs can, of course, prevent the spread of most AIDS cases. Millions already follow this wise and timeless counsel, and our Nation is the poorer for the lost contributions of those who, in rejecting it, have suffered great pain, sorrow, and even death.

Education is crucial for awareness and prevention of AIDS. Parents have the primary responsibility to help children see the beauty, goodness, and fulfillment of chastity before marriage and fidelity within it; know the blessings of stable family life; and say yes to life and no to drugs. Educational efforts should be locally determined and consistent with parental values. Educators can develop and relay accurate health information about AIDS without mandating a specific curriculum on this subject. Parents and educators should teach children not to engage in premarital sex or to use drugs, and should place sexuality in the context of marriage, fidelity, commitment, and maturity.

Prevention of AIDS also demands responsibility from those who persist in high-risk behavior that is spreading AIDS. While many of these individuals apparently have not been convinced by educational efforts, some have begun to modify their behavior. AIDS is a fatal communicable disease of wide proportions, and all people of goodwill must realize that it is a public health problem whose prevention requires, at minimum, measures of detection, testing, and treatment now routinely taken against less dangerous communicable diseases. Our goal must be to protect the lives, the health, and the well-being of all our citizens.

We also need to remember that the battle against AIDS calls for calmness, compassion, and conviction -- calmness, to remember that fear is the enemy of just solutions; compassion, for all AIDS victims; and conviction, for the understanding and the willingness to combat this major public health threat effectively.

Systemic lupus erythematosus or lupus is often called ``the great impersonator'' because it can mimic so many other diseases. A disorder of the body's immune system, lupus may affect the joints, the skin, and one or more internal organs (such as the kidneys, heart, and brain) in varying combinations. As many as 500,000 Americans -- mostly women in their childbearing years -- may suffer from this autoimmune disorder.

Normally, an individual's immune system protects him or her from infection by producing antibodies that react with and eliminate foreign substances. In autoimmune diseases such as lupus, however, the immune system can harm the individual by making antibodies that react against the person's own tissues.

Scientists are not yet sure why the body's antibody-producing system behaves this way, but they are conducting extensive research seeking the cause of the disease. Their research studies include: investigations on genes that underlie the development of the disease; research on a wide variety of immune system components and chemical messengers; research on initiation of abnormal immune reactivity; and hormonal studies. Such fundamental studies will lead to the design of improved treatments that alleviate the symptoms of lupus, or even better, attack the disease itself.

Thanks to recent research progress, lupus has become more a chronic disease than the acute and often fatal disorder it was decades ago. Nevertheless, deaths do occur, and new research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and treatment are needed to eliminate lupus. A concerted Federal-private research effort is working to ultimately uncover the cause and cure for this distressing disease.

America, do hereby proclaim the month of October 1987 as Lupus Awareness Month. I urge the people of the United States and educational, philanthropic, scientific, medical, and health care organizations and professionals to observe this month with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

During this year's observance, we should resolve to redouble our efforts to ensure that all aspects of health services needed by mothers, babies, and older children are properly identified, provided, and used, when and where needed.

Appropriate perinatal, medical, nutritional, and educational services should be made available in accordance with family needs, including specialized services for those at risk for poor pregnancy outcomes such as low birth weight, delivery complications, or developmental problems.

Babies and older children with special health needs such as severe chronic illnesses, birth impairments, and related conditions often require early intervention and highly specialized care. A family-centered, comprehensive program of medical, educational, and social services in the community and in the home may also be needed.

Preventing low birth weights and infant mortality from other causes; reducing disability levels; and increasing the feasibility of home care in cases of severe chronic illness are objectives of high priority. Health professionals and staff members of State and local social service agencies can improve the effectiveness of health care delivery as they cooperate fully in these approaches.

Federal health services, research, and financing agencies continue to focus upon support of such endeavors. For instance, the recently created Bureau of Maternal and Child Health and Resource Development has as a central element of its mission the promotion of case-managed perinatal care as well as care for babies and older children who have special health care needs. Real progress can be made through the combination of State and local action and cooperation and Federal encouragement and support.

Secretary Lyng. Jim, you have it now, so that ought to reduce this fiscal year's deficit by over $3 billion. And I welcome Professor Linowes and the members of the Privatization Commission. These loan assets sales were very successful, as you can see, and they sold easily and on very favorable terms because of a great deal of hard work on the part of officials at the Departments of Education and Agriculture and by people like Joe Wright at OMB.

The loan sales proceeds of approximately $3.41 billion constitute a significant step toward reducing the Federal Government's deficit, as I've said, and even more can be done to privatize Federal loans. Presently, the Federal Government is the Nation's largest lender, with $252 billion in direct loans, $450 billion in loan guarantees, and $453 billion in government-sponsored loans. We will be taking a close look at these assets to determine which loans can be better handled by the private sector.

But while all agree that the deficit must be cut, there is a new roadblock to the promising approach of asset sales. As part of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings ``fix'' in the debt ceiling extension, Congress prohibited counting the proceeds of asset sales toward reducing the deficit. This reflects the choice of some in Congress to achieve deficit reductions through higher taxes or lower national defense. Others agree with our position to reduce the deficits through cuts in wasteful domestic spending and through privatization measures such as the one that we announce here today. Any congressional restriction on deficit reduction which would increase the tax burden on every taxpayer is wrong.

The difference in perspective here is useful. There are those who believe in less government and low taxation, and there are those who believe in big government and high taxation, and that's a choice I've always felt we could confidently leave to the American people. They've made their feelings known in the past, and I think they will do so again. So, we're going to carry on, and you, I think, are contributing nobly to this task that we have of getting the Government back into the business of government and getting it out of the hair of private business in this country.

The President. It was nothing but that we were all approving a plan requested of us by the Government of Beirut -- of Lebanon, I should say -- to help them counter terrorism. Never would I sign anything that would authorize an assassination. I never have, and I never will, and I didn't.

The President. No, I think I did know, and there are a lot of things he's being charged with right now. I was going to say credited with, but you couldn't describe them as charged with. And I don't think any of them have a basis in fact.

The President. Well, welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. I'm told that this grand old building is considered part of the White House these days, but it wasn't so many years ago that this building housed the entire Departments of War and Navy and the Department of State. They call it progress, but I'm not so sure.

Well, a lot of historic decisions have been taken in this building, but none more important than the reason that we rally today. Americans who are committed to a Supreme Court with the highest standards speak with one voice. Judge Bork is not the conservative or liberal nominee; he is America's nominee to the United States Supreme Court. And just like my other nominees to the Court, he's not going to promote my political views; he's going to apply a superb legal mind to the task of interpreting the Constitution and the laws of the United States. The support for him reveals the fact that he is superbly qualified, an individual of unsurpassed integrity, and a principled advocate of judicial restraint. We will not be satisfied with allowing special interests to determine the qualifications to serve on our country's highest court.

But more relevant than a political label are the qualifications of the nominee, and all of us better understand the significance of that point. Our history commands that the nomination of a Supreme Court Justice by a President and the act of confirmation by the United States Senate be carried out with the highest level of statesmanship. Whether President, Senator, or concerned citizen, when we enter the halls of justice and select the next steward of our Constitution, Americans traditionally leave outside their partisan leanings and the narrow special interests. Each of us owes a sacred debt to our ancestors, who established the rule of law in this Republic, and to the citizens of the future, to whom we entrust our nation's destiny. In a special way, this duty now falls upon the United States Senate as it nears a crossroad, a crossroad of conscience, as it prepares to decide on the confirmation of Robert Bork. Let us insist that the Senate not give in to noisy, strident pressures and that elected officials not be swayed by a deliberate campaign of disinformation and distortion.

Senate Judiciary Committee because of, in his words, ``the hype and disinformation on Bork.'' And today all of us join Chief Justice Warren Burger in urging the Senate to reject those who want a Justice who makes law and approve Robert Bork, who believes a Justice should interpret the law.

Other noteworthy people are coming forward. In his testimony before the Senate Judiciary Committee, Howard Krane, managing partner of one of our nation's most prestigious law firms and long-time associate of Justice Bork -- Judge Bork, I should say -- stated that Judge Bork has proven to be ``a man free from prejudice toward any group, who has exemplified the values of equality throughout his life.'' Well, Mr. Krane told this compelling story of how, as a young associate in a major law firm, Robert Bork courageously confronted the senior partners in that firm who had decided to deny employment to Mr. Krane simply because he was Jewish. Robert Bork urged those partners to consider Mr. Krane solely on the merits, and today Mr. Krane is the managing partner of that law firm.

Last week President Carter's counsel, Lloyd Cutler, testified in support of Judge Bork's nomination. Although he disagrees with Robert Bork on some political issues, Lloyd Cutler is convinced that Judge Bork's judicial philosophy represents the mainstream of contemporary thought. He believes, as I do, that Robert Bork's training, experience, character, and sheer intellectual capacity give him the potential to be a great Supreme Court Justice, like the legendary Oliver Wendell Holmes and Louis Brandeis.

This is high praise, indeed, from a Democrat. But it's in keeping with a well-respected tradition that we Americans apply to the selection of Supreme Court Justices: a President, whether Republican or Democrat, liberal or conservative, seeks out the best qualified person who generally shares the President's judicial philosophy. The Senate then decides whether the nominee meets the qualifications to serve. This way, over the years, the Supreme Court becomes composed of the best minds reflecting varied but accepted judicial philosophies. Now is not the time to change the standard, to break that tradition. And I know you join me in calling for statesmanship, not partisanship, in the confirmation of Robert Bork to the Supreme Court.

There's a growing and impressive list of other leaders of our society who support the confirmation of Judge Bork: two sitting Justices of the Supreme Court, Justices Stevens and White; four former Attorneys General; legal scholars from around the country; the American Farm Bureau; the Concerned Women of America, and last week, leaders of law enforcement organizations representing over 400,000 peace officers and prosecutors. This diverse and distinguished group, among many others, has stepped forward, because they recognize an eminent and honorable legal scholar and jurist and resent the unfair and unfounded attacks that are being made.

Beyond his scholarship and judicial qualifications, there's nothing more significant for his confirmation than the war on crime. Last week, Fred Foreman, representing the Nation's district attorneys, observed that there is a large group in this country made up of women, minorities, the weak, and the aged.

Although not well-organized, he reckoned they were in Judge Bork's corner, because they are the victims of crime. And I guess he ought to know; he and the thousands of young prosecutors around the country are the ones who have to vindicate the rights of the victims and send the criminals to jail. Now, both as Solicitor General and as judge, Robert Bork has been a principled champion in the fight against crime, and that's the kind of Justice honest citizens deserve to have on the Court.

You know, sometimes we may not always hear of some of the ridiculous decisions that are handed down and why we need judges like Judge Bork. Out in my own State, when I was Governor of California, there were two officers on the drug detail. They had, based on certain evidence, a warrant to legally go and inspect a home for drugs. And they went in, and they couldn't find the drugs. It was supposed to be heroin. The husband and wife stood there.

Bork has argued for more reasonable interpretations of criminal procedures that assure both justice and the prompt conviction of criminals rather than allowing dangerous criminals to go free on unjustified technicalities. He has not hesitated to overturn convictions where genuine constitutional rights have been violated. He has consistently rendered judgment in a clear-eyed manner with the aim of protecting the rights of the innocent. And that's what justice should be all about -- protecting our rights as Americans. And that's why 400,000 law enforcement officers have thrown their support behind Judge Bork, the battle against crime, and for the rule of law. Criminals terrorize the streets in too many of America's cities.

It's time to decide whether our children and our children's children deserve an America in which the concern is for their safety and not just the protection of the criminal. I saw a surprising statistic the other day. Nearly one-third of the Supreme Court's cases involve matters of criminal justice. The next Justice on that Court better be ready to deal with that challenge; the next Justice better be Robert Bork.

Now, we all have a lot of work to do getting out the message for Judge Bork. And I'd like to thank those of you who have already devoted so much time and energy to our cause. If he's going to overcome the storm of distortions that have swirled up against him, each of us, and Americans across the country, are going to have to double the effort on behalf of the truth. Three choices are what this battle is all about: the choice between liberal judges who make up the law or sound judges who interpret the law; the choice between liberal judges whose decisions protect criminals or firm judges whose decisions protect the victims; the choice between liberal judges selected by the liberal special interests or distinguished judges selected to serve the people.

I do not believe the United States Senate will succumb to allowing the special interests to choose Supreme Court members. The men and women raised up by the people to that great chamber will listen and will recognize that Judge Robert Bork will enrich and invigorate that court and the Constitution it guards.

I'm a black pastor. My name is George Lucas, and I'm the pastor of the Race Street Baptist Church and a veteran of two wars, the Korean war and the Vietnam war. I support you, and I've been a supporter of the President. However, we have a statement by Dr. J. Vernon McGee that says this country is either facing revival or revolution. And I think that the Judge Bork nomination is indicative of the times that we have, that we as Americans need to get back to revival, to the word of God, and to the traditional things that we have in our society.

We have an overabundance of people that support pornography, sex, liquor, drugs, the whole bit. And until we bring revival back into the Nation, we need our Congressmen, our Senators, the State government -- I ordered you a Bible, Mr.

What happens: We allow certain black leaders who are not really black leaders. Jesse Jackson's not a leader; he's not my leader. I don't cotton to the fact of black leaders going to Communist countries, putting their arms around Fidel Castro and the rest of these rascals, talking about they love America.

I came up in the ghetto of New York City. My mother was on welfare. And I live down in Petersburg. Thank God for all that He has done for me and this country. I would give my life to this country anytime, and I thank God for the privilege to even be here today. I promised the Lord Jesus Christ that if he allowed me an opportunity to speak today I would say what's on my heart. And America needs to get back to the word of God and the study of the word of God so that we can do what's right and have this country go on upwards and onward to the destiny that it's destined to do.

We need to support you, and I call on Americans, black Americans, today, of all persuasions, some that are poor. And you were right, Mr. President; they do support you. But we don't have a forum, and the only time that I had a chance to speak was today. And I want to just use it and say, God bless you, and keep on keeping on, and we're calling on Americans all over to support you.

Section 301(a) of the Act (19 U.S.C. 2411(a)) authorizes the President to take all appropriate and feasible action within his power to enforce the rights of the United States under any trade agreement, or to respond to any act, policy, or practice of a foreign country or instrumentality that is unjustifiable, unreasonable, or discriminatory and burdens or restricts U.S. commerce.

The U.S. Customs Service shall exclude from entry, or withdrawal from warehouse for consumption, into the customs territory of the United States all macaroni, noodles, vermicelli, and similar alimentary pastes composed primarily of wheat, provided for in items 182.35 and 182.36, part 15B, schedule 1 of the Tariff Schedules of the United States, the product of any member country of the European Community unless accompanied by such documentation as the United States Trade Representative determines necessary and appropriate to enforce the agreement.

The United States Trade Representative shall determine what actions are necessary to enforce the agreement and shall notify the U.S. Customs Service of the documentary requirements necessary to permit entry, or withdrawal from warehouse for consumption, into the customs territory of the United States of such pasta articles.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The agreement implemented by this determination and accompanying Proclamation is the result of those negotiations. The agreement reasonably restricts the EC subsidies on pasta exported to the United States, and therefore is an appropriate and feasible response to enforce the rights of the United States under the trade agreements of the United States or to respond to EC acts, policies, and practices that are unjustifiable, unreasonable, or discriminatory and burden or restrict U.S. commerce.

Sec. 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other Executive order, the functions of the President under the Federal Advisory Committee Act that are applicable to the committees listed in Section 1 of this Order, except that of reporting annually to the Congress, shall be performed by the head of the department or agency designated after each committee, in accordance with guidelines and procedures established by the Administrator of General Services.

Judge was named to the President's speechwriting staff in late 1986, after working as a speechwriter to the Vice President for approximately 3 years. He joined the administration in late 1982, serving at the Department of Housing and Urban Development (intergovernmental relations officer) and the Department of Commerce (special assistant to the Assistant Secretary for International Economic Policy).

Yes, today more of us have jobs than ever before. And just yesterday we learned that in August as great a proportion of us have jobs as ever before and the unemployment rate hovered just above the lowest it's been in 14 years. Since our recovery began, America has created more than 17\1/2\ million jobs -- 2\1/2\ times more jobs than France, Britain, Germany, Italy, Canada, and Japan put together. Our expansion has created jobs in nearly all sectors of the economy: more than a million in manufacturing; more than a million in construction; millions more still in services, from banking and insurance to computer programming. And you can find these new jobs in every region: from the industrial Midwest, where new industries are springing up and old industries are running at full capacity; to the South, where the economy is strong and getting stronger; to our coasts, where our success in opening international markets is helping America export more than ever before in history. And these rising exports and the declining trade imbalance will create even more jobs all around the Nation in the months ahead.

But not only do we have more jobs, we have better jobs at better pay. On average, the jobs created in our expansion pay more and require a higher level of skills than the jobs that existed when our expansion began. This is just one of the reasons why, if your family is like most families between 1977 and 1981, after taking out the sky-high inflation of those years, you saw your income fall almost 7 percent. But since 1981 -- that is, since the year we came to office -- your real income has soared more than 10 percent. To give one example of what this means, in the years we took office, the average family made only about 70 percent of what it needed to buy a new home. Today that family makes 110 percent of what it needs, and it can afford to buy the house.

Leaders all over the world have asked how we achieve this growth and prosperity. Well, my answer is simple: less government, more freedom, and moving toward a more open and equitable international economy.

Thanks to our expansion, nearly 3 million Americans have escaped poverty; but this week we got a warning. While we learned that last year family income went up and that the poverty rate dropped slightly, we also learned that some groups lagged behind in the past year. We've assisted many of our fellow citizens through the Job Training Partnership Act. Sponsored chiefly by Senator Dan Quayle, this legislation has been very effective in retraining citizens to become productive wage earners again. But there are still some Americans whom our expansion has passed by -- those caught in the welfare trap. Programs that were intended to help poor citizens have instead made them dependent on government checks, unable to break away and become productive workers in a growing economy. In the name of compassion, too many Americans on welfare have been robbed of the one priceless item with which they could build a future: hope. It's time to return hope to those on welfare, which is why our administration has worked to reform the welfare system.

For starters, we took a simple principle: that Washington doesn't know everything. And instead of dictating reforms, we told the 50 States that we'd approve any experiment intended to reduce dependency. Our only conditions? That needs would continue to be met, that there'd be no net increase in Federal costs, and that results could be measured. One State after another responded, until now nearly half of the States have implemented or proposed widespread welfare reform plans that build upon some good old common sense: that the best way to learn to work is to work.

Our administration is trying to join with Congress to take what we've learned with the States and establish work requirements into the Federal law. Now Congress appears to be close to a decision about welfare reform, and I have a message for them: I will not accept any welfare reform bill unless it is geared to making people independent of welfare. Any bill not built around work is not true welfare reform. If Congress presents me with a bill that replaces work with welfare expansion and that places the dignity of self-sufficiency through work out of the reach of Americans on welfare, I will use my veto pen. While others have talked about good jobs at good wages, we've delivered. Now it's time for Congress to join with us in making sure that the opportunities created by this prosperity reach into every American home.

Well, he was talking about the kinds of people who don't make a lot of noise, whose lives aren't flashy or gaudy, God-loving, God-fearing people who believe in certain fundamental principles, principles like self-reliance, taking care of your own and your community, looking within yourself for strength and looking to God for your bearings. Those bedrock principles are at work all around this town, this campus, even this very communications center. I'm told that Hastings College operates on a balanced budget. And the Gray Center itself has, as you've been told by the Governor, raised all its funds in the private sector, not looking toward the Government for a special leg up or for a free lunch. That kind of self-reliance is inspiring and a model for our society to follow. It's a philosophy I hope the students who come here to learn will carry with them when they leave to ply their skills elsewhere in a profession that at times does not seem to appreciate the simpler virtues.

Well, not today. A Chicago stockbroker pushes a button on her desk, and in Hong Kong a million dollars changes hands. A top-40 radio station installs a facsimile machine so that its listeners can send in their requests for their favorite songs on paper.

And take the astonishing story of two writers living 340 miles apart, Stephen King and Peter Straub, who collaborated on a novel called ``The Talisman.'' They hardly ever saw each other while they wrote. Instead, they read and edited and went over every sentence by zapping chapters from one computer to another over telephone lines. Words and sentences and paragraphs were converted into electrical impulses for their journey through the telephone. The phone lines turned the electrical impulses into light pulses. And these light pulses were turned into electromagnetic signals, which were beamed 22,000 miles into space to a satellite. The signals were then relayed back to Earth, again converted into light pulses, then changed back into electrical impulses to go through another set of phone lines, until finally those impulses arrived in the memory of the second computer. And thus, in seconds, words composed in Maine by Stephen King appeared on Peter Straub's computer screen in Connecticut.

Breathtaking, isn't it? And it took nothing more at each end than two computers, two modems, and two telephones. That same technology, modified some and with more bells and whistles, may make it possible for students at Hastings College to be taught French via satellite by a teacher at the Sorbonne in Paris or for a television program made by Hastings students to be sent to the Armed Forces Television Network for our soldiers to watch in South Korea. Maybe you'll throw in a Cornhuskers-Sooners game. [Laughter] Or, in the years to come, this technology will give you the ability to act as town criers around the world for those whose governments substitute propaganda for news.

Yes, the communications revolution will allow those who by choice live far from the madding crowd to participate fully in the blessings that living with the madding crowd has traditionally conferred, blessings such as access to organs of culture and the ability to choose among the wide variety of professional and social options once reserved for city dwellers. The center is already receiving newscasts daily from countries as varied as Israel and Malaysia, giving the good people of Hastings an unrivaled ability at any moment to sample the sounds, sights, and goings-on many thousands of miles away.

And all of this is merely a prelude to a future in which shopping and jobs and education and culture will come to our doors and into our homes, courtesy of the technology that we see here today. Access to these bounties will be possible for the people of Hastings and other towns like it across America without having to sacrifice comfort in the soil and the commitment to home and hearth and community that have made places like Hastings the very heart of that which makes our nation a light unto the nations.

The President. Thank you very much, and thank you, Commander Comer. And a special thank you, as well, to my good friend, Tom Turnage. Before I get started, let me say a word of thanks to you, commander.

In the last few years we have fought, with too little success, I'm sorry to say, to get Congress to honor a moral obligation, as well as an obligation to the peace and freedom of our children in this hemisphere, and give strong and consistent aid to the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. Earlier this year, the majority in Congress turned a deaf ear to our pleas and to those in Central America who hunger for the freedoms we in the United States take for granted.

Legionnaires, friends, it's with some nostalgia that I come to you today. We've met so many times during the years of my Presidency. We've worked so long and hard together. And now we're nearing the end, and this is my last appearance as President before you. I won't say last appearance, period. After all, once I'm out of office, I'll have some time on my hands, and maybe you'll want me back.

But today, as I look back on all the battles we've fought together, on all the victories we've won, on all we've done for this great and glorious land that we love, I can't help feeling that the battle isn't over, indeed, that the details of the debate have hardly changed in these 8 years.

We had an administration in Washington that, as one of its first acts in office, canceled or delayed a large part of the modernization of our strategic forces. The B - 1 bomber, the Minuteman III and MX missiles, the Trident submarine, the Trident I and II missiles, the entire Navy -- all to a greater or lesser degree became casualties of its knife; and so, too, did the very heart of our Armed Forces, our men and women in uniform, and their families. As pay failed to keep pace with inflation and every signal came from Washington that too many of those in authority held in contempt those who defended the Nation and the peace, reenlistment rates plummeted, and it became harder and harder to sign up good recruits.

Again and again, around the world our predecessors had shown not the slightest grasp of the fundamentals of strategy and national interest. They faced challenges as sensitive as those any postwar administration has faced -- in Africa, Afghanistan, and Central America. Again and again, they responded with remarkable passivity. And in Europe, the alliance, our most vital strategic relationship, was shaken to its very foundations by their unbelievable indecision on weapons modernizations. And it even came to be said that the Soviets longed for strong, consistent leadership in the United States, capable of making a deal and sticking to it.

I came to your convention 8 years ago, I pledged to restore America's strength, and today I stand before you to report: Mission accomplished! I pledged that our strategic deterrent would be modernized, and it has. From the B - 1 to the MX to the Trident, programs that our predecessors foolishly canceled or delayed, we got back on track. Some have said that strategic modernization has been pursued at the expense of conventional modernization. Well, nothing could be further from the truth. We stopped the decline of the Navy, and today are within striking distance of a 600-ship fleet.

Equally important, more vessels are now ready for action. In 1979, 26 of the Navy's ships were past due for an overhaul. For the last 2 years, none has been. We strengthened the Army, giving it new and better tanks; new and better helicopters; new and better air defense, including Stinger missiles; new and better equipment of all kinds, including modern antitank weapons as well as improved armor for our own tanks. And we have increased the Army's size by two active divisions and two National Guard divisions. And the Air Force today has better planes for every mission, from tactical air support to transporting troops.

But the pledge I'm proudest of keeping is the pledge I made to our young men and women in the services. Today, once again, Americans honor those who wear the uniforms of the United States of America. Yes, we pay our service men and women what they very much deserve. And where, 8 years ago, almost two-thirds of our men and women were dropping out at the end of their first tour, today almost half stay in when the first tour is up. As to how good they are, well, let me just repeat to you what base commanders from Camp Lejeune to the Korean Demilitarized Zone have told me: Today we have the best darned bunch of young men and women in uniform we've ever had, and we're proud of them.

Let me stop here to tell you something that was passed along to me recently. You may remember that the head of the Soviet Armed Forces, Marshal Akhromeyev, visited our country several months ago. And during his stay, we took Marshal Akhromeyev to visit our newest supercarrier, the U.S.S. Theodore Roosevelt. We thought it would be a valuable education for him.

And so he saw that magnificent ship go through its paces. He watched our superb aircraft perform. All in all, he spent a day on one of the technological wonders of the world, a floating airfield his navy has nothing to equal. And yet you know what he said [he] was most impressed with when he was through with that visit and his visits to our other military installations? -- our enlisted men and women. I was told that he couldn't get over the fact that we had them doing work that the Soviets would reserve exclusively for officers -- in many cases, very superior officers. And he couldn't believe that our enlisted people were so self-assured in speaking up when asked a question, so articulate in giving their replies, and so ready to add their opinions.

You know, it reminds me of what General George C. Marshall said when asked why he was so confident we would win World War II. We had a secret weapon, he said: the best blankety-blank kids in the world, and it's still true. We still have a secret weapon, as the Soviet Chief of Staff found.

By the way, when I say I'm proud of the pledge we've kept to our men and women in uniform, I mean those whose service is passed as well. America's debt to those who would fight for her defense doesn't end the day the uniform comes off. The Emergency Veterans' Job Training Act that I signed 5 years ago and the new GI bill of rights I signed last year are the least we can do to show our nation's continuing gratitude. And before I leave office, I want to be sure that we have a Cabinet-level Department of Veterans Affairs.

I addressed you 8 years ago, I pledged not only to rebuild America's power but to be ready to use it, if necessary, in defense of peace and to the ideals for which our nation has always stood. From Libya to Grenada, we have kept that pledge.

And let me read to you one other pledge I made then, and here it is: ``Once we have the defense programs to reverse the trends now in favor of the Soviet Union, we must strive for arms limitation agreements that will further that security, including significant arms reductions, so long as they are equitable and based on strict reciprocity.'' That's the end of quoting myself.

Now, actually, I didn't read that for your benefit, but for the benefit of my gang on the platforms back there. They keep saying that the INF agreement I signed with Mr. Gorbachev -- the first significant, equitable, and reciprocal reduction of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles in history -- shows how I have grown in my job. But I'm waiting for them to acknowledge the simple truth of what I've been saying for 8 years about strength being the only road to peace, and then I'll be able to say they've grown in their jobs.

So, yes, we have come a long way these last 8 years, you and I, working together for freedom and peace. And our reward is that from Afghanistan to the Persian Gulf to southern Africa we're bringing peace to long-raging conflicts, even as we frustrate Soviet aims. In 8 years we have not given up 1 square inch of land to communism. In fact, we've taken some ground back for freedom. And yet today relations between the United States and the Soviet Union are the best they've been in decades. And yet for all this progress, for all the last 8 years should have taught even the most confirmed critic of our policies, today, as I said at the start, we are still fighting the same battle we were fighting when I addressed you 8 years ago.

We still hear the voices of the liberal ideology of decline and retreat. Again the hit list for cancellations or delays includes the MX, the B - 1, a new Trident missile, and the surface Navy -- this time, two carrier battle groups they'd like to see done away with. To that they've added nearly every major new weapons system to become prominent on the scene since the last liberal administration went to its reward, including the Midgetman missile, the Stealth bomber, and our Strategic Defense Initiative. And they've added that they will start a unilateral U.S. moratorium on underground nuclear testing and a ban on flight testing of missiles.

What they fail to mention is that our conventional defense initiative is already well underway. For example, if it weren't for laser-guided munitions, part of any conventional defense initiative, we would not have been able to stage our successful strike against Qadhafi's Libya. They fail to mention that, when all is said and done, the conventional defense initiative they've outlined to date is smaller than the one we already are working on.

It's Jimmy Olsen trying to impress his date. [Laughter] The liberals like to talk about judgment and strategy, but where is the judgment and strategy in what they've endorsed? For example, they've praised me for negotiating the INF treaty, but opposed deploying the missiles that made that treaty possible. Did that show sound judgment? They want to conclude more arms reduction treaties, but would cancel or delay the weapons systems on which successful negotiations will depend. Is that a plausible negotiating strategy? They profess their devotion to NATO, but would diminish the role of the very nuclear forces that NATO needs to deter the Soviets. Does that make any sense as military strategy?

The President. Their proposed ban on flight testing missiles and underground nuclear testing amounts to nothing more or less than the planned obsolescence of our strategic deterrent, abandoning the strategy that has kept the peace for decades. And by cutting way back on SDI research, as they would do, they would abandon the only alternative to that decades-old strategy. Does that show judgment, strategy, or even plain old common sense?

The President. And by the way, some liberal critics of SDI support aggressive development of a ballistic missile defense for another country, Israel, even though they oppose all but a token effort to develop one for the United States. Defense for an ally, but not for the United States -- does that make sense?

The President. I'm speaking to an educated audience. [Laughter] Recently former Secretary of Defense James Schlesinger wrote that the liberal agenda seems, in his words, ``to suggest that the way to deter war is to be unprepared to respond.'' Yes, it comes down to this: After 8 hard years rebuilding America's strength, do we really want to return to a Disneyland defense policy, with Mickey Mouse treatment of our men and women in uniform?

The President. Goofy strategic plans and Donald Duck-like lectures telling us that whatever goes wrong is our own blankety-blank fault? Or do we want to keep advancing up the road of strength and determination and peace and freedom?

The President. Now, this is my final plea to you today, on this, our last meeting of my Presidency. Let us make sure that the Nation moves forward in strengthening the foundations of peace and freedom in the years ahead. The world is watching us. The ages are watching us.

And now before I go, I just have to say one last thing to you. I know that there are people that, with our dealings with the Soviet Union now, trying to establish a rapport there -- some have become concerned that maybe I've been taken in now and I'm taking us down a dangerous road. Well, I've told other groups before, and I want to tell you that I have used a Russian phrase -- I'm not a linguist, but I know one little Russian phrase and I've used it on Mr.

Two centuries and more ago, America was blessed with the vision of freedom and with the will and ability to achieve and sustain it for posterity. We founded a Republic in which ``We the People'' would set limits on the power of government, and not the other way around -- in which government would be forever bound to respect and to preserve life and liberty for everyone alike. The Nation thus begun was no accident, but rather the creation of men and women of character, idealism, and incredible capacity for self-sacrifice in our country's cause. All throughout our history, in peace and in war, Americans have loved and labored in defense of our Independence and our rights. For these reasons, and because freedom has enemies in every generation, Citizenship Day and Constitution Week ought to remind each of us that we must never take for granted our existence as a free land.

The men of genius who pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honor as they signed our Declaration of Independence did not take our liberty or our citizenship as Americans for granted. Neither did those who painstakingly framed our Constitution and held for the Bill of Rights during our days as a fledgling Nation. Those who have served and sacrificed in uniform through the centuries have surely taken the blessings of liberty very seriously. So have the millions of immigrants who have braved countless obstacles to reach the safety and freedom of our shores.

Remembrance of the heritage of liberty and love of country embodied in our citizenship and Constitution is our duty and delight as Americans. We are continuing to celebrate the Bicentennial of the Constitution, as well as its ratification and the adoption of the Bill of Rights, with appropriate themes and programs through 1991; each of us now should offer our allegiance anew as we pledge to live by the principles of our land and to do our part in preserving liberty for the generations yet unborn.

Constitution and in recognition of all who, by birth or by naturalization, have attained the status of citizenship, and authorized the President to issue annually a proclamation calling upon officials of the government to display the flag on all government buildings on that day. Also, by joint resolution of August 2, 1956 (36 U.S.C. 159), the Congress designated the week beginning September 17 and ending September 23 of each year as ``Constitution Week'' in recognition of the historic importance of the Constitution and the significant role it plays in our lives today.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventh day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

At some point, virtually all of us or members of our families have witnessed or benefited from the life-saving actions of the dedicated members of emergency medical service teams. These skillful Americans richly deserve the gratitude and esteem of all their countrymen, every day of the year and especially during Emergency Medical Services Week.

Those who make up emergency medical service teams -- doctors and nurses, medical technicians and paramedics, and educators and administrators, as well as many devoted volunteers and members of law enforcement, fire fighters, and park rangers -- work together for all of us. Every day, their knowledge, training, and efficiency help them save lives and care for accident victims and the critically ill. Often, they must work under difficult or even dangerous conditions; but always, they seek and strive to preserve life and health.

The efforts of emergency medical service teams extend also to research into the discovery of new methods and technology for the improvement of their work; to establishment and enhancement of strong professional standards; and to effective public education to reduce loss of life from emergencies. The experienced emergency medical service personnel in our neighborhoods and communities can teach us all a great deal about accident prevention, good health habits, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), and what to do in medical emergencies.

America's economic progress depends on full participation by all our citizens. Our Nation will continue to command economic respect worldwide into the 21st century, but we will do so only so long as we continue to maintain our technological prowess; rekindle our entrepreneurial spirit; reduce government intervention in the marketplace; and seek to ensure that Americans of all races, creeds, colors, and national origins have every chance to take full part in the domestic and international economy.

Our more than 800,000 minority business men and women truly exemplify the meaning of entrepreneurship -- the overcoming of every obstacle in the effort to find and fulfill efficiently a need for a product or service. Minority entrepreneurs are an indispensable force in our economy, enhancing life for all Americans by introducing innovations in business and by participating more extensively in the Federal procurement process with the cooperative support of government.

It is particularly important now to encourage minority business owners to pursue available export opportunities. Such trade can make minority entrepreneurs instrumental in export markets and create a wide range of new opportunities.

Minority Enterprise Development Week, and throughout the year, we can all be deeply thankful for the economic freedom that enables America's business men and women, including minorities, to seek their vision of a better future for themselves, their children, and their country.

President today announced his intention to appoint Orrin G. Hatch to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the James Madison Memorial Fellowship Foundation in an advisory capacity for a term of 4 years.

McLaughlin and officers of Executive Women in Government and honored guests, I thank you all. You know, 5 years ago it was my pleasure to have Executive Women in Government join me here to mark the 10th anniversary of your organization.

But it wasn't until 1920 and the 19th amendment to the Constitution that women secured that right: the right to vote. Yet when I was elected and reelected to this office, over half of those voting were women. And this fall, there will be some 10 million more women than men eligible to vote. If I may update an old English saying: The hand that pulls the voting lever rules the Nation.

As leaders in the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of government, the Armed Forces, and the private sector, you have assumed professional responsibilities that would have been unimaginable just a quarter of a century ago.

You make policy decisions affecting millions of people. You manage staffs of thousands. You manage billion-dollar budgets. And you represent the leading edge of a great wave of progress for American women. I hope I said billion-dollar and not million. You see, I'm used to saying billions all the time in Washington -- [laughter] -- but I'm getting back to civilian life. But you do represent the leading edge, as I say, of the great progress for American women. And because of what all of you and so many other women have done, even greater opportunities for women lie ahead.

In our administration, our mission has been to appoint the best qualified people we could find, to fill substantial jobs with substantial individuals. And the result of this merit-based approach, not surprisingly, is that more women have served in top-level policy positions in our administration than in any previous one. And they've served with distinction, earning promotions and reappointments at a very high rate. We can be proud of what you and the other women have accomplished.

In fact, of the 10 women to serve in Cabinet posts in American history, 4 of them have been in this administration. And we can be especially proud of the new ground that's been broken in so many areas. In becoming the first woman to serve as Secretary of Transportation, Elizabeth Dole also became the first woman in American history to lead a branch of our military: the U.S. Coast Guard. And Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick became the first woman to serve in a foreign policy post at the Cabinet level.

I might point out with regard to that Coast Guard setup -- also, the first time that a Coast Guard officer was ever one of the military aides to the President was in this administration. And that Coast Guard officer was a woman. And I had to admit that one day after having some ceremonies with the Navy, and some admirals, I kind of teased her a little bit. And it didn't fuss her one bit.

Now, frankly, one obstacle to making faster progress is that the Senate still has not given its advice and consent to 40 outstanding women whom I have nominated to senior executive, advisory, and judicial posts. These nominees have been pending confirmation on an average of 178 days, yet 29 of the 40 women have not even had committee hearings as yet. The liberal leadership in the Senate can talk about their interest in women taking senior positions in government, but they're not delivering. They say they applaud the idea of putting more women on the bench. Well, if so, let them expeditiously move to confirm the five excellent judicial nominees they have before them. Highly qualified women like Pamela Ann Rymer and Judith Richards Hope deserve rapid confirmation, and I call upon the Senate to do just that.

And now, fortunately for us all, most of the new jobs created in recent years have not been in the Federal Government; they've been in the private sector. In the last 5\1/2\ years, we have created 17\1/2\ million new jobs. And here, too, women have led the way: 60 percent of those new jobs are held by women. And as the economy has boomed in the longest peacetime expansion on record, women have entered top management positions as never before. In fact, from 1980 to 1987, women in the top ranks have increased by a remarkable 65 percent. And more women own their own businesses today than ever before; nearly 3 out of every 10 small businesses are owned by women.

Today, we begin to put into practice the nuclear missile reductions called for under the INF treaty, which General Secretary Gorbachev and I signed last December. The first destruction of one of our American missiles will take place today, but this treaty is a victory for American steadfastness and resolve.

Over the next 3 years, the Soviet Union will destroy 1,752 nuclear missiles, more than twice the number that the United States will eliminate. But those are the terms of the treaty. The Soviet Union began destroying its first missiles in July, and, as I say, today we'll start eliminating those that are designated under the treaty. And Vice President Bush, who has played a major role in our INF policy at every step, is representing me at this event. I told him not to get too close to where it was going on. [Laughter] I think this step for peace is something that we all can be very proud of.

I'm just thankful for all the talented women like all of you in America, who America has been able to call upon. So, I think it's about time that we all get back in the shade, and I'll just say, thank you, and God bless you all.

D.A.R.E. is concerned with children from kindergarten through junior high school and with their parents. It offers information and wise counsel on resisting peer pressure and avoiding illegal drug use and alcohol abuse. Police officers, experienced in the effects of drug and alcohol abuse, are trained to help students recognize the risks of drugs and to learn strategies for handling stress without resorting to dangerous substances.

D.A.R.E. instruction programs have already touched the lives of more than a million and a half students and contributed to improved study habits, better grades, and greater respect for authority. In short, this positive program of drug abuse prevention is effective.

The number of older Americans continues to grow, thanks in part to advances in medical care and technology and better understanding of the ways nutrition, behavior, and environment affect health. Most senior citizens are active in their communities; but some cannot be so. For them we seek ways to continue or initiate every possible measure of independence, dignity, and integration in family and community life. We do so not only out of recognition of all that today's older citizens have achieved over the years, but also because of our long national history and heritage of respect for the elderly and reverence for the individual dignity and worth inherent in each of us alike.

One way that Americans are helping older citizens is by establishing adult day care centers. Some 1,200 such centers now serve older Americans who are frail, disabled, or requiring regular medical care and who might otherwise need care in a long-term facility. These centers often exist in hospitals, nursing homes, and senior centers; they offer a range of programs from health services to therapy, meals, and social activities. The centers benefit the elderly -- and give a vital assist to dedicated family caregivers so they can meet their own needs.

The number of adult day care centers has grown rapidly over the past two decades, and State and Area Agencies on Aging, as well as social service and health care agencies, support the creation of additional centers across our country.

America, do hereby proclaim the week beginning the third Sunday of September 1988 as National Adult Day Care Center Week, and I call upon the people of the United States to observe this occasion with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

All of us, and people around the world as well, appreciate the men and women of American agriculture whose knowledge, skills, and hard work enable them to provide so much of our food and fiber. Because of the high rates of occupational and nonoccupational mishaps they incur, however, we also express our concern for the safety and health of these fellow citizens and their children and our pride in their efforts in behalf of farm and ranch safety as they go about daily living.

Fortunately, many disabling and fatal work and off-the-job injuries and illnesses are preventable, and in simple and practical ways. We can invariably work, drive, and live safely by taking full advantage of protective equipment and other safeguards and by using extra care throughout the day. Many engineering improvements in the tools of agriculture have been made through the years, and they have been a great boon. But individuals also make a difference in eliminating risks from agriculture and rural living by their willingness and ability to exercise care and expertise in every daily activity, whether at work or play, whether at home or on the roads and highways.

National Farm Safety Week and throughout the year, we should express our esteem and gratitude to all who live and work on farms and ranches for their inestimable contributions to our way of life and for their continued efforts in support of safety and health.

Constitution and laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim the week of September 18 through September 24, 1988, as National Farm Safety Week. I urge all who live and work on farms or ranches to take necessary precautions for safety and health, both on the job and off, both at home and on the roads. I also urge all who serve and supply agricultural producers to support community safety and health efforts in every way. I encourage all Americans to take part in appropriate events and activities in observance of National Farm Safety Week and to note all that Americans in agriculture achieve for our Nation.

I have approved the recommendations contained in the first 11 sections of the Family Report directed by the Executive Order on the Family. These recommendations address one particular issue that falls within the purview of your Department.

I am directing Gary L. Bauer, Assistant to the President for Policy Development, to monitor progress on our response to these recommendations and to provide me with status reports in September and December 1988. Please provide Mr. Bauer with appropriate information about your progress.

Parental Role in Education to plan a White House workshop on choice in education to highlight the advantages of choice for educational reform and to recognize the people who have contributed to the movement for greater parental choice in American education.

Ensure that all human sexuality and family planning educational and informational materials developed for teens by Federal agencies and, to the extent permitted by law, grantees focus on promoting and encouraging abstinence.

Propose legislative initiatives or to take such necessary administrative action consistent with the law to prevent the use of Federal funds for the distribution of contraceptives or prescriptions for contraceptives in schools without parental permission for these services.

Office of Personnel Management to develop a model policy that agencies could use to make the receipt of Federal funds contingent upon institutions taking appropriate steps to create a drug-free environment.

Executive order, or other actions if appropriate, that would, to the extent permitted by law, protect unborn or newborn children from experimentation, research, and organ transplantation, except in cases where the unborn or newborn child would itself directly benefit by any such procedures to which it was subjected.

Issue by September 7, 1988, the final rule implementing Public Housing Resident Management and a Federal Register? notice for public housing homeownership and management opportunities, as authorized in the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987; and expeditiously implement these provisions to bring about substantially increased resident management and homeownership of public housing projects.

A study of methods whereby tax changes can be directed toward families with dependent children, either through an increase in the personal exemption for dependent children, targeted tax credits, or other methods. Such tax relief would be contingent upon the need to maintain the government's revenue base and must not be at the expense of higher marginal rates. The study should be submitted for further analysis to the Economic Policy Council within 120 days.

A study of the idea of allowing spouses without earned income to contribute the same amount to an IRA ($2,000) as those who work outside the home. A report should be submitted to the Economic Policy Council, within 120 days, containing budget-neutral options for achieving this reform.

Prepare for my signature a memorandum advocating implementation of the major recommendations of the Attorney General's Task Force on Family Violence of 1983, with special emphasis on the following: that family violence be treated by law enforcement agencies as a criminal law violation, not primarily a social service problem; that the public be educated about this serious and often secret crime; and that prevention and early intervention are the best ways to stop violence and to build healthy families.

Develop a legislative proposal requiring that no bill be reported to the Senate or House of Representatives by any Committee of either House unless such bill is accompanied by a Family Impact Statement.

Work with the National Drug Policy Board, the Department of Education, and the Department of Health and Human Services to develop a model policy that agencies could use to make the receipt of Federal funds contingent upon institutions taking appropriate steps to create a drug-free environment.

Services, and the Office of Personnel Management to develop a model policy that agencies could use to make the receipt of Federal funds contingent upon institutions taking appropriate steps to create a drug-free environment.

National Alliance of Business, I thank you all. And let me give a special welcome to representatives of the Denver Nuggets, who next week are going out on the ``Fastbreak for Life'' tour, and also to the dancing drill team, the Kansas City Marching Cobras. You know, I used to be in the entertainment business, so I'm always delighted when a group of young stars comes to visit.

Youth 2000 Week helps remind us all that the 21st century is just around the corner. Now, I still remember when they said that the 20th century was just around the corner -- [laughter] -- and before that it was the 19th century that was around the corner. When you get to be my age, you notice that every 100 years they start talking about the next century being just around the corner.

You see, I did a little arithmetic before this ceremony -- I figured I might as well set a good example -- and what I calculated is that the children entering first grade this fall should graduate from high school in the year 2000. Now, America's next century will be an exciting time. There will be new technologies, new industries, new jobs. It'll be a period rich with opportunity. And what Youth 2000 is all about is giving each of our children the greatest chance to take full advantage of those opportunities.

Men and women like you here today are reaching out a hand, showing young people that you care about them, and asking them to care about themselves. America will spend over $300 billion this year on education, but for children facing tough odds, what ultimately will make the difference is the time, concern, the love that people like you are willing to give them just because you care. In Indianapolis, you're helping to link what children learn in school to the jobs being offered by area employers. In Pueblo, Colorado, the Girls' Club is helping to enroll troubled youth in a work experience program. And across America, people like you are working together and making a difference, one child at a time.

But since our administration began, it's been our vision that to create a better future for our children we need, as a matter of policy, to defend and strengthen the family, the bedrock of our society. We need to reform our welfare system so that it encourages work and is profamily and does not perpetuate poverty from one generation to the next. Our schools must teach basic skills and sound values. They must provide discipline and be free of drugs. We need a criminal justice system that makes neighborhoods safe places to live and work, that punishes criminals instead of shackling police officers. Now, these may be old-fashioned and simple ideas. But they worked yesterday. They're working today. And they'll work tomorrow. And they offer hope for a future in which none of our children get left behind.

Technology will change a lot in the future, but the permanent truths that built America and that govern our lives won't change. We can help our young people by showing them that education and hard work have always paid off and will always pay off. We can show them the way by helping them to stay in school, by helping to prepare them for careers and to be self-reliant, and to rid our communities of the menace of illegal drugs and to keep those drugs from robbing us of our future. We need to ask each child to make a personal commitment to just say no to drugs.

Altogether, it's a vital task and a tall order. But that's what all of you are doing in your communities across the Nation. Business people, religious leaders, educators, community leaders are working together to help our young people and to help America in ways that will enrich our people and our nation for decades and decades to come.

McLaughlin. Thank you, Mr. President. I'd like to begin by saluting the young people here today and all the American children who started school this past week. This country's role on the world stage, as the President points out, in the 21st century will be determined by their preparation today.

Youth 2000 is based, importantly, on five priorities: employment and economic self-sufficiency; improved literacy and education; reduced teenage pregnancy; lifestyles free from drugs and alcohol; and reduced violence, accidental injuries, and death. The life of every young person growing up in this country today can be an American success story if we bring employers, service agencies, young people, and their parents into the discussion.

Now, let me end by speaking directly to the young people with us here today: You matter. As Secretary of Labor, I know very well the important role that you will play in the future of our country. Now, we're all depending on you. We believe in you. We're proud of you. But if you work hard at whatever you decide to do, you will meet with a success beyond even your highest expectations.

Bowen. Thank you very much, Secretary McLaughlin. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen, it's a real pleasure for me to take part in this recognition of the Youth 2000 project. Mr. President, I'd like to introduce to you some of these young people who are what this program is all about.

First, there is Annette Pino, of Boulder, Colorado. Annette became a parent at the age of 15 and dropped out of high school. But she later completed her high school education and is now in a work experience program with the Girls' Club of Pueblo.

Then we have Ed Lucero, of Denver. He has begun a Youth 2000 program and fundraising effort for young people at Elitch Gardens Amusement Park in Denver, which is a summertime employer of a great many teenagers.

Next is Peggy Lee Rogers, of Denver, one of nine children raised by her mother alone. Thanks to a local school-to-work action program, she adjusted to a new school, decided not to drop out, and now has her sights set on becoming a teacher.

Andrea was chosen Miss Cobra this year because she sold the most tickets in the annual fundraiser for the 20-year-old organization, which is designed to build character, self-esteem, and scholastic achievement among young people.

America is at once the world's oldest Republic and a Nation whose spirit is made forever young by our heritage and our future of liberty, justice, and opportunity. The American people cherish the children God has granted us. We seek to give young people a good start in life through our care, encouragement, and training and our transmittal of the enduring values that provide stability, vision, and strength. Youth 2000 Week, 1988, offers us a chance to reflect on our success in these areas; on the good qualities and countless achievements of young Americans; and on all we can and must do to guide and assist youngsters into responsibility, self-reliance, and fulfilling lives as adults -- into saying yes to life and to healthy attitudes and behavior.

Just as in generations past, the continued well-being of our country depends on the development and preparation of youth in the skills they will need and on their understanding and awareness of the freedom, faith, and opportunity that are at the heart of America's greatness and goodness. These goals will be attainable in coming years if all of us -- private citizens, business, labor, voluntary and professional organizations, church groups, educators, government, parents, and young people themselves -- work together, building on the strengths of family, community, and country.

America's economic freedom and the spirit and ingenuity of our people have long guaranteed our progress and prosperity. We can continue and expand these strengths as we approach and enter the 21st century. Employment opportunities will abound in the year 2000, but these new jobs will increasingly require workers who are able to read, compute, and learn new skills, and who have acquired education or training beyond high school. This is a goal we can reach if we remain true to the selfless volunteer spirit and the confident, forward-looking vision that have always sustained us.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

President regrets the Senate's vote to pass the textile bill. The President vetoed the 1986 textile bill and will veto the 1988 version if it reaches his desk. The bill the Senate passed today is protectionism at its worst. It would bring retaliation against U.S. exports, harm U.S. international competitiveness, and cost American jobs. That is a disastrous prescription for America's economic future.

Pursuant to the same authority, I also hereby extend to the members of the administrative and technical staff and members of the service staff of the Delegation of the Commission of the European Communities assigned to Washington to represent the Commission to the Government of the United States and duly notified to and accepted by the Secretary of State, and to their families, the same privileges and immunities, subject to corresponding conditions and obligations, as are enjoyed by members of the administrative and technical staff and members of the service staff of diplomatic missions accredited to the United States.

This order is not intended to abridge in any respect privileges, exemptions or immunities that the Delegation of the Commission of the European Communities may have acquired or may acquire by international agreements or by congressional action.

How far we've come these last 8 years, not only in transforming the operations of government, not only in transforming the Departments and agencies and even the Federal judiciary, but also in changing the terms of national debate. And nowhere is that change more evident than in the rise of the Federalist Society on the campuses of America's law schools. To think of it, in schools where just a few years ago the critical legal studies movement stood virtually unchallenged, like some misplaced monster of prehistoric radicalism -- [laughter] -- today you are vexing the dogmatists of the left.

Federalist Society is changing the culture of our nation's law schools. You are returning the values and concepts of law as our founders understood them to scholarly dialog and, through that dialog, to our legal institutions. Yes, you are insisting that the Constitution is not some elaborate ink-blot test in which liberals can find prescribed policies that the people have rejected.

Well, we replied that the principal errors of recent times had nothing to do with the shortcomings of the Founding Fathers. They had to do with courts that played fast and loose with the instrument the Founding Fathers devised. Yes, some law professors and judges said the courts should save the country from the Constitution. We said it was time to save the Constitution from them.

We pointed, in particular, to a bizarre twisting of values that had crept into our criminal law, to the confusing of criminals and victims, to an attitude that the law was not a vehicle for uncovering truth and administering justice but a game in which clever lawyers tried to trip up the police on the rules.

We said that we intended to nominate judges and justices who didn't share the skepticism of our extreme liberal friends about the fundamental values that underpin our laws and our society. We would select judges who would reaffirm the core beliefs of our free land. And we have. You know the names on the court criers list, including Rehnquist and O'Connor and Scalia, Kennedy, and of course, Judge Robert Bork.

Well, already we can see the new realism that these and so many others have brought to our courts. I'm happy to report that as more and more of our appointees have served, Federal courts have become tougher and tougher on criminals. The average Federal prison sentence grew by almost a third from 1980 to 1986. And what's more, as our judges by argument and example reversed longstanding attitudes about crime and criminals that prevailed in both Federal and State courts, we also started to see crime rates drop. Between 1980 and 1987, the overall crime rate fell by nearly 7 percent, while nearly 2 million fewer households were hit by crime in 1987 than in 1980.

Yet these statistics, heartening as they are, reflect only the surface of the changes of the last 8 years, changes that have extended out beyond the judiciary into every aspect of law enforcement on the Federal and even State level. Eight years ago, even the idea of a war on drugs was greeted with amused smiles in this smug capital. The last liberal administration had started to lose interest in narcotics cases all together. Each year they brought fewer cases to trial, and by their last year in office, convictions were down by half. We changed that. We hired more than 4,000 new agents and prosecutors, and under the Vice President's leadership, Federal, State and local law enforcement officials started working together to stop the smuggling of illegal drugs into our nation.

Still, some failed to take our emphasis on crime seriously. Their friends in Congress held up our reforms of the Federal Criminal Code for years. And more recently, they cut funding for the Coast Guard -- among the most important agencies in our battle against the international drug rings -- and gave the money to Amtrak.

While others have talked about beating back the drug lords, we've delivered. During our administration, drug convictions have nearly tripled and have included such notorious kingpins as Juan Ramon Matta, while cocaine seizures are up over 1,800 percent. And for the first time we are, thanks to the legal reforms I mentioned, seizing assets that have been acquired with drug money. Some time back I visited Florida. I was told of the dozens of boats and planes that we had confiscated from drug dealers. And on a table I saw for the first time in my life what $20 million looks like. It had been seized from the drug rings, too, and it was stacked up on that table.

The liberals have scoffed when I've said we're winning the war on drugs. But since we came to office, thanks to the work of a certain lovely lady, Americans, and particularly young people, have heard our plea and are just saying no to drugs.

Well, today there are over 12,000 Just Say No clubs in the schools of America. And among high school seniors, for example, the overall number of illegal drug users has dropped; and in fact, the number using cocaine dropped an unprecedented 20 percent last year. So long as anyone uses drugs, the number will be too high. Still, we've made enormous progress.

Are we hurting the drug rings? Well, the drug lords may have answered that question themselves a few weeks ago with an assassination attempt on the Secretary of State. There were reports that the attempt was linked directly to the drug trade, and if true, this desperate move is a clear sign of the toll we're taking. But we're not satisfied. We're proposing to step up the pressure to make convicted drug kingpins subject to the death penalty.

And let me offer here my thanks and congratulations to the House of Representatives. Yesterday a broad bipartisan coalition passed the Gekas amendment, providing for the death penalty against those who commit murder in the course of a drug felony; the McCollum amendment, denying Federal benefits to those convicted of certain drug crimes; and the Lungren amendment, allowing a good faith exception to the exclusionary rule. These provisions, if they also pass the Senate, will represent a giant step forward in the war on drugs and an achievement of things we have long sought.

And yet, as at other junctures in the war on drugs, once again too many liberals oppose us. But now they turn around and charge that we're running a phony war on drugs. Well, I have a hunch that in November the American people will decide who's bogus and who's for real.

Senate could help us in this and our other battles against crime by bestirring itself and acting on the 28 judicial nominations that we have submitted, but that have not yet been confirmed. The Senate's inaction has become a matter of such serious concern that recently the judicial conference declared a state of judicial emergency in various districts and circuits -- too many courts are too far under strength. This is not politics as usual. In 1980 only 17 nominations had not been acted on by the end of the year, and of these, all but 5 had been nominated on or after the end of July. Some of our nominees have been waiting for a year.

For example, Pamela Rymer, who has already proven herself to have a thorough understanding of the problems of crime and the criminal justice system as a district court judge, has been waiting for Senate approval as an appeals court judge since April, even though she received the ABA's highest rating of competence.

I don't need to tell anyone here the principal reason for the delays. The liberals may talk about crime and drugs, but the thing that they care about is their agenda and protecting, as best they can, the one branch of government where their agenda has clearly held sway.

Yes, they're hoping that within a few months they can wipe the slate clean and nominate judges who reflect their values and vision of the law. For us conservatives, the task must be to pin down just what that vision and those values are, which is not necessarily an easy task in a time when liberalism has become the masked marvel of American political discourse. [Laughter] And while we're asking questions about the liberal agenda, we must be forthright about our own: a decent respect not just for the rights of criminals but for those of the victims of crime, a respect for the real world in which the police work day to day, and an end to the kind of fanciful readings of the Constitution that produce such decisions as Roe versus Wade.

Too much is left to do. The battle is far from over. And all is yet to win or lose. But we stand with the founders of our nation in this ongoing struggle to protect our freedom. Thomas Jefferson reminded us that ``Our peculiar security is in the possession of a written Constitution.'' And he implored, ``Let us not make it a blank paper by construction.'' For as James Madison wrote, if ``. . . the sense in which the Constitution was accepted and ratified by the Nation is not the guide to expounding it . . . there can be no security for a faithful exercise of its powers.'' It was true then. It is true now. It will be true always.

And so, I was able to tell him of our pride in him and how much we appreciated his great sacrifice and all and how much he would be in our prayers as the time went on until he is healed, and then said goodbye. And again he tapped on the phone with his finger to let me know that he had heard. And his father came on, and I said goodbye to him. And his father then said he had just been handed a slip of paper by his son. He said his son was thanking me for the call.

Well, this morning, earlier, I had read some of the statements by the opposition Congressmen to this death penalty amendment that was passed yesterday and that I mentioned earlier. And I heard their sheer horror at the idea that we should be taking someone's life or just killing someone else in connection with drugs.

I have signed S. 2641, the ``Temporary Emergency Wildfire Suppression Act.'' In practical terms, this legislation will facilitate assistance from Canada in fighting the current wildfires in the western United States. This important and much needed legislation authorizes the Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of the Interior, in consultation with the Secretary of State, to enter into reciprocal agreements with foreign fire organizations for mutual aid in wildfire protection. Specifically, this allows us to bring in needed equipment and personnel from our Canadian neighbors to help combat these wildfires.

Just yesterday, I directed the Secretaries of Agriculture and the Interior, with participation from the Secretary of Defense, to survey the fire-fighting areas and report back to me as soon as possible with a plan to help control this critical situation.

National Forests, has been particularly hard hit. Other areas of Idaho, Washington, Oregon, and California are also experiencing major wildfire problems. Over 30 major fires affecting some 1.7 million acres remain uncontrolled today.

The large number of fires has severely taxed fire-fighting forces from the Federal natural resource agencies, the Army, the National Guard, State forestry agencies, forest industries, and others. Thousands of fire fighters have been on the lines for over 3 months.

I applaud the leadership and members of both the House and Senate for their rapid passage of this emergency legislation. I will take every action possible to control the remaining fires and prepare for the fires that may yet come.

September, a time when our children once again return to school, bright with promise and eager for instruction. I'm happy to report that if the record of the past 8 years is any indication the prospects for their education are bright -- brighter than they've been for more than two decades. Test scores are up, reversing a calamitous drop in scores over the years between 1963 and 1980.

The recovery of our schools has been a genuine grassroots accomplishment, and it proves the solution to problems is not to throw money at them but to come up with commonsense answers and start applying them. I'm proud that during our administration George Bush and I have been there with a sympathetic ear and a helping hand. But we've only just begun. Far too many American students are graduating from school without the skills they will need to prosper and the knowledge they'll need to grow as adults. And no one knows this better than America's parents, who rose up at the beginning of the decade and said: Our children are not getting the education they want, need, and deserve.

I believe that the education of all Americans must be rooted in the self-evident truths of Western civilization. These are the truths that have been passed down like precious heirlooms from generation to generation since the generations began. Since the founding of this Nation, education and democracy have gone hand in hand. Thomas Jefferson not only wrote the Declaration of Independence and served as our third President but also founded one of our most distinguished institutions of higher learning, the University of Virginia.

This is our precious heritage. And our political freedoms -- the freedom to speak, to practice our religions, to assemble peacefully -- are the product of ideas that were born and nurtured in the great tradition of Western civilization.

That's why I've supported, and continue to support, all efforts to teach our children about our culture, to read great texts and learn their lessons. Bill Bennett, our Secretary of Education, has just reported on the state of elementary education in our country. That report, entitled ``James Madison Elementary School,'' presents an outline for what every elementary school curriculum should include. It is suffused with the glory of Western civilization, and I salute it.

We owe our children no less than to instruct them in what Matthew Arnold called the best that has been known and said. And yet, just as forcefully, I want to say that this curriculum is only a guideline for school districts to follow if they think it right. The final arbiter of what a child should learn is not the state, but the family and the community in which the child lives.

America's earliest hours as a free Nation, we have known that the cost of liberty is steep. The bill has been paid in full by the courageous members of our Armed Forces. We owe a great debt to all who have served so faithfully and sacrificed so much for our land. Among their ranks are former prisoners of war and those still missing in action, including men known to be alive after the end of hostilities.

We have a deep moral responsibility in this regard -- a duty to make every possible effort to account for and return missing Americans to their homeland and to their loved ones. Until the P.O.W./M.I.A. issue is resolved, this issue stays, and will stay, among our Nation's highest priorities.

Similarly, our country has recognized the prolonged and acute suffering of the families of those who remain missing or unaccounted for. We pledge again our unflagging determination to obtain the fullest possible accounting of those still missing, to repatriate all recoverable American remains, and to relieve the suffering and uncertainty of their families.

We will also continue our intelligence efforts to confirm reports of Americans still held in captivity in Southeast Asia. Each of these reports is investigated thoroughly, and both the Executive branch and the Congress scrutinize them. We have not yet been able to confirm such reports; but, if we do, I have pledged to take decisive action to return our men. We have raised this issue repeatedly in negotiations with governments involved, despite their denials.

Our search for the truth is bound up closely with our heritage as a Nation that respects the inherent dignity and worth of every individual. Our liberty is secure because every life is precious to us; we, therefore, can write no final chapter to the story of those who answered their country's call and did not return. They gave without limit, and we owe them, and their families, no less.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twelfth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

President today announced his intention to nominate Mary L. Schapiro to be a member of the Securities and Exchange Commission for the remainder of the term expiring June 5, 1989. She would succeed Aulana L. Peters.

Well, please be seated, and welcome to the White House. You know, today is a day I've been waiting for, for 8 years. About this time 8 years ago, I noted that homeownership is ``among the foremost values of the American people'' and that this value was seriously in danger. The danger I was addressing then was economic. According to real estate industry economists, the average family at that time was making only 75 percent of what it needed to buy a home. And as Secretary [of Housing and Urban Development] Pierce's predecessor said, ``For many hard-working families, housing is growing beyond their reach.'' Well, today interest rates are down.

When it comes to housing for low- and medium-income families who rent, national vacancy rates today average just under 8 percent, up from 5 percent when we took office, with even more progress for low-income units. This reflects that today we have an abundant supply of affordable rental housing for all Americans.

Today we address, at last, the other important obstacle to homeownership and rental: discrimination. Discrimination is particularly tragic when it means a family is refused housing near good schools, a good job, or simply in a better neighborhood to raise children. This bill is the product of years of bipartisan work and repairs a significant deficit -- or defect, I should say -- deficit is on my mind too -- in civil rights law.

Civil Rights Act of 1968 included, for the first time in our history, a fair housing provision. That was a major achievement, one that many Members of Congress, including a young Congressman named George Bush, had to show enormous courage to vote for. Unfortunately the fair housing title didn't work as well as had been hoped. It lacked teeth. Its conciliation provisions were ineffective, when used. And that's why our administration, and Secretary Sam Pierce, in particular, has devoted 8 years to redress the absence of penalties and the inability of the Government to initiate actions except when a pattern of discrimination could be proven. These were shortcomings that made the statute difficult to enforce. In my State of the Union Address 5 years ago, I joined with Members of Congress on both sides of the aisle in vowing that ``We will work to strengthen enforcement of fair housing laws for all Americans,'' and now we've achieved that goal.

The bill I sign today has a number of significant features. First, the law extends protection to families with children and persons with handicaps and continues to recognize and protect the special needs of the elderly. Second, for the first time, aggrieved parties may avail themselves of an administrative enforcement procedure. Moreover, the administrative law judge may assess penalties against those who discriminate. The penalties are a $10,000 fine for the first violation, $25,000 for the second, and $50,000 for the third. Third, for the first time, in cases initiated by the Department of Justice, the Department may obtain monetary relief for victims and civil penalties of $50,000 for a first violation and $100,000 for subsequent violations. Fourth, the constitutional rights of all parties are protected. Both defendant and plaintiff have the option of a jury trial, or they can agree to the faster, simpler administrative procedure.

At the same time, I want to emphasize that this bill does not represent any congressional or executive branch endorsement of the notion, expressed in some judicial opinions, that title 8 violations may be established by a showing of disparate impact or discriminatory effects of a practice that is taken without discriminatory intent. Title 8 speaks only to intentional discrimination.

And then there's Representative Hamilton Fish, who has worked for decades to strengthen our fair housing laws. Ham Fish was the architect of the key provisions in the bill that protect the constitutional right of Americans to civil jury trials.

Senator and Representative standing up here with me today played an important role in the passage of this landmark civil rights bill, and I want to mention especially Representative John Lewis. Twenty-five years ago, as a young leader of the civil rights movement, Congressman Lewis was standing in this very Rose Garden pressing for Federal action to eliminate housing discrimination. John's hard work to achieve that has brought us one step closer to realizing Martin Luther King's dream. To all of you and to everyone involved in the passage of this legislation, the Nation says thank you.

Yes, we gather to salute the Hispanic heritage. It's not only the heritage of these 19.4 million Americans of Spanish-speaking descent, it's part of my heritage, too, and my family's heritage and the heritage of every American as well. We have all been enriched by the contributions of Hispanics in every walk of American life. The Hispanic heritage is many and many things.

It's the abrazo, the hearty and heartfelt greeting that binds the community together. It's the iglesia, a place for contemplation and confession and communion with God. It's the escuela, where children learn to understand the world around them. And most of all, it's the casa, the almost mystical center of daily life, where grandparents and parents and children and grandchildren all come together in the familia. As the great poet Octavio Paz has said: ``In Hispanic morals, the true protagonist is the family.'' Well, there's a special intimacy here and a sense of continuity between past and future that is more precious than rubies.

These traditions are the bedrock of all Hispanic culture. They're what Mexican-Americans and Puerto Ricans and Cuban-Americans and all other Hispanics have in common. And they're traditions that suffuse the American experience as a whole. But I fear that too often, in the mad rush of modern American life, some people have not learned the great lesson of our Hispanic heritage: the lesson of family and home and church and community.

I want you all to know that in this administration George Bush and I have worked hard to support these bedrock traditions -- family and hope and church and community. We fought for the tax cuts that gave all Americans more of their own money to build a better future. We sponsored tax reform that removed an estimated 450,000 disadvantaged Hispanic families from the Federal income tax rolls. We've stood up for the principle that every child should have the right to say a prayer in school. We've seen to it that the violent criminals who prey on our community are given what they deserve -- a jail term instead of a slap on the hand.

And our commitment to the sanctity of the family is stronger today than it ever was. George has proposed an innovative measure to help families in need of child care assistance with a tax credit. Now, this will allow parents to choose among a variety of options if they need child care assistance. Like many Americans, Hispanic families often look to grandparents or other family members to help with their child care. Experts like Penelope Leach tell us what common sense always has: The best people to take care of children are family members.

Now, compare this plan with the one offered by the liberals. They've written a bill that gives assistance not to the parent but to the person who provides the care. And why? Because they want to make sure that they have control over the kind of care your child receives. And that means if you want to leave your child with his grandmother during the day she will have to be licensed under Federal standards if she's to be given assistance for helping to raise her grandchild. Licensing grandmothers -- can you believe it?

Instead of listening to these new and untried ideas about our children, I believe we should listen to the glorious traditions at work in Hispanic culture -- the tradition of caring for your own. Children are the future, and they deserve the best. And that's why education is so strong a part of Hispanic life and why you've been so stout in demanding that your children be given every opportunity to learn. In Texas your concerns led to the overhauling of an inefficient State school system, providing a model for the rest of the country to follow.

Across the centuries and all around our land, people of Hispanic descent from Europe and throughout the Americas have written countless chapters in the unique saga of the United States. Let us pause during National Hispanic Heritage Week, 1988, to reflect on the many and varied cultural heritages of Hispanic Americans and on the continuing and growing part these citizens play in affirming America's heritage of faith, freedom, brotherhood, and opportunity, and in creating that heritage anew.

Americans give many gifts to our Nation, such as perpetuating the traditions of their ancestral homelands and offering a great array of talents and insights as they achieve and excel in every area of endeavor. But perhaps their most notable gift is their testimony about the power of the American dream to inspire miracles. The accomplishments of Hispanic Americans through the years remind all of us that in America we are blessed with the freedom to live, work, and worship in peace and to build a better life for ourselves and our children. Generations of proud, hardworking, enterprising Hispanic Americans have strengthened our communities and fought for our country. They have believed in America's miraculous promise and have helped preserve that promise for the future.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Outpatient Ambulatory Surgery Week, 1988, reminds us that more and more surgeries are being done on an outpatient basis in either hospital outpatient departments or separate ambulatory surgery centers. Almost 87 percent of hospitals offered ambulatory surgery in 1986, compared with 65 percent in 1980.

Outpatient surgery is also found to reduce hospital costs and to provide good health care -- and professionals believe that its combination of superior health care and little disruption to patients' daily lives does speed recovery. As America's scientific and medical research efforts continue to foster improvements in medical techniques and equipment, the public can surely benefit from further awareness of outpatient surgery. That is the purpose National Outpatient Ambulatory Surgery Week seeks to fulfill, and the reason all of us should heed its message.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

United Nations $44 million withheld pending reforms in the U.N. system. This action represents recognition of the renewed effectiveness of the United Nations as an organization serving the cause of world peace and stability.

Reflecting concerns shared by the administration regarding U.N. administrative and budgetary practices, Congress established requirements for release of fiscal year 1988 and 1989 funds for U.S. contributions to the United Nations. The U.N. has made progress toward a consensus budget process, limitations on secondment of staff to the Secretariat, and Secretariat staff reductions. The President has determined that these actions fulfill the legislative requirements for release of outstanding fiscal year 1988 funds. The Secretary of State has been directed to inform Congress, as required by law. The President expects that similar determinations will be possible for releasing fiscal year 1989 funds as they become available.

In addition to adopting important organizational reforms, the United Nations is also undertaking major new peacekeeping operations in Afghanistan and the Persian Gulf, and prospects for further peacekeeping exist in other critical areas. In its peacekeeping efforts, the U.N. is directly serving important, long-term objectives of this administration to end regional conflicts and advance peace and freedom around the world. The President's action makes it clear that the United States is prepared to meet its obligations in support of these peacekeeping efforts. As an indication of our commitment to an effective United Nations, the President also announced his intention to include full funding to meet the U.S. contribution to the U.N. system and U.N. peacekeeping in the fiscal year 1990 budget, which he will submit to Congress in January.

In announcing these decisions, the President called on the United Nations to continue progress in areas where reform remains incomplete. The President reiterated the commitment of the United States to assist the U.N. in its reform program as well as in its new peacekeeping efforts.

In a Rose Garden ceremony held by the President a year ago, Secretary of State George P. Shultz and Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard A. Shevardnadze signed the agreement between the United States of America and the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics on the establishment of Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers (NRRC agreement). The agreement marks a practical step forward in the ongoing efforts of the administration to reduce the risk of conflict between the superpowers as a result of accident, miscalculation, or misunderstanding. The centers which it established in Washington and Moscow provide a direct communications link between the two governments, capable of transmitting messages relating to arms control and confidence building.

We are particularly pleased to mark the first anniversary of the signing of the NRRC agreement. The establishment of the centers not only serves as a concrete example of our commitment to reduce the risk of conflict but also complements our ongoing work toward the President's objectives of meaningful, equitable, and verifiable reduction in the U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals.

The agreement to establish the centers was the result of a U.S. initiative, an initiative characterized by close and productive cooperation among the executive branch, the Congress, and private groups of individuals who shared the common goal of reaching a practical accord with the Soviets that advances our efforts to strengthen peace and security. In particular, we wish to express appreciation for the counsel and leadership provided by Senators Sam Nunn and John Warner, who worked over the years to help to make the Nuclear Risk Reduction Centers a reality.

Today at the Soviet nuclear test site at Semipalatinsk, the United States and the Soviet Union conducted the second and concluding phase of the Joint Verification Experiment (JVE). As in the successful first phase of the JVE last month at the U.S. nuclear test site in Nevada, U.S. and Soviet scientists, technicians, and observers were present to measure the yield of the explosion.

JVE process is the result of a U.S. initiative embodied in the agreement reached at the Moscow summit which provided for one underground nuclear explosion experiment at the U.S. test site in Nevada and another at the Soviet test site. Following today's phase of the JVE, U.S. and Soviet negotiators return to Geneva to continue the current round of negotiations on nuclear testing. Our objective for these negotiations is to conclude an agreement on effective verification measures for the unratified Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET). Today's JVE at Semipalatinsk moves us further toward achieving agreement on the effective verification protocols which are essential for the two treaties and reflects the success of the administration's practical and measured approach to nuclear testing issues.

But before we begin, I have an announcement to make. The latest trade figures were just released by the Department of Commerce this morning, and the news is very good. The trade deficit has declined by $3.6 billion for the month of July.

This continues the steady progress that we've seen. In fact, the trade deficit for the first 7 months of this year is over 18 percent lower than for the same period last year. And the long-term trend is excellent: The deficit is now at its lowest level since 1984. And today America's exports are nearly at an all-time high, and imports are declining. And I'm happy to say that by resisting protectionism we've kept our economy growing at a strong rate, created millions of new jobs, and kept inflation low. And I can tell you, the message is going out to every corner of the world: When America goes into the market to compete, we plan to win. Others may talk, but we deliver.

I can't think of any place that gives a better welcome than Southeast Missouri State. And who can match your champion cheerleaders and the award-winning Golden Eagle? Now, you know that as President I can't favor one college team over another. [Laughter] But with all the support that Congressman Emerson has given me, when he asked me for a favor, how could I refuse? So, let's just say that this fall there will be at least one cowboy who will be rooting for the Indians.

Now, let me take just a moment to talk about the positive achievements of the past 8 years. We do have, as you've been told already, a robust, growing economy with low inflation. Young people starting out can look forward to jobs and opportunity, a secure future to start a family. We're beginning to turn around the decades-long decline in education by returning to basics and demanding nothing less than excellence. We're restoring our judicial system by appointing serious-minded judges who respect the Constitution and America's traditional values.

Our nation is again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong. And America is at peace. And we've rekindled an ancient pride, a noble patriotism that loves America and would extend our blessings to the world.

What more can we say than that the parents of a child born today can look forward to the 21st century with hope and optimism that their child will know the brightest future the world has ever seen. And let me say something to each one of you here today: That bright future is also yours; it is your birthright as Americans. And what we have seen in the last years is only the beginning. Soon you will be out there with all your energy and creativity, taking advantage of the greatest opportunities on Earth. And when that moment comes, well, all I can say is, Katie, bar the door.

America has traveled such a remarkable distance in the last 8 years that the memory has faded of the economic and foreign policy crises that we faced when Vice President Bush and I took office. The truth is that when you take a walk down our opposition's memory lane it starts to look like ``Nightmare on Elm Street.'' And if you want to remember how things really were just a few years back, think of the year 1979.

Let's remember one thing: When the American people saw that under the other fellows the economic misery index was soaring off the charts -- and I think I'd better stop right there and explain to you what the misery index was. The misery index was created by adding the rate of inflation to the rate of unemployment. And it took place in the Presidential race between Jerry Ford and Jimmy Carter. And it was invented by the Carter people because that misery index then was somewhere around 12 percent or so. And they said that any man with a misery index of that size didn't have the right to even seek the Presidency. Well, something happened about that because you never heard of the misery index in 1980 -- because it was somewhere in the twenties by the 1980's. And now the misery index, if they wanted to use it, is less than 10 and continues to go down.

Today we have peace and prosperity, and the liberals are trying to pretend those economic and foreign policy nightmares they gave us never happened. One political commentator noticed this at their recent convention in Atlanta. And believe me, I just don't think I can improve on this paragraph.

Of course, the liberals still don't understand why we were able to turn the economy around, so they're treating good times as if they're a given. Their message is: ``You can take prosperity for granted.

I don't think I have to tell you that some liberals have tried to take refuge in our words and phrases, like ``community,'' ``family,'' and ``values.'' But we know that what matters isn't the words they use; it's what they really believe and what they really would do.

Well, you know, that reminds me of a little story. And it's okay, isn't it, if I tell one of my little stories? [Applause] It's about Mark Twain. And one day Mark Twain was there at his dresser, and he was going through shirt after shirt and just couldn't get one with all the buttons on it.

And finally, losing his patience, he started using some very choice words. And then, as the story is told, about the time he was through, he turned, and there was his wife standing in the doorway. And very carefully and slowly and without a trace of emotion she repeated every naughty word just uttered by her husband.

Well, you know that's true about the liberals. They can try and adopt our words. For example, only in the past few days we've heard talk about how the opposition really is in favor of a strong defense. We haven't seen such a radical transformation since Dustin Hoffman played ``Tootsie.'' [Laughter] But as long as we get out there and give the American people the music, there isn't a chance they'll get away with just the words.

Ultimately, the choice before the American people is the choice between two visions: on the one hand, the policies of limited government, economic growth, a strong defense, and a firm foreign policy; and on the other hand, policies of tax and spend, economic stagnation, international weakness and accommodation, and always, always, from them, ``Blame America first.'' It's the choice between the policies of liberalism or the policies of America's political mainstream.

Well, all this is very good, but it isn't good enough for us. We want more: more growth, more opportunity, more jobs. And we intend to ensure this kind of economic prosperity right through the nineties and into the next century by guaranteeing the Federal Government can never again spend and tax the American people into another economic nightmare. We will do it by passing the line-item veto, the balanced budget amendment, and limits on the congressional taxing power.

And there's one last issue. Yes, it's more important than even all the other crucial matters we've already discussed. Ladies and gentlemen, just a few years ago, I wonder how many of us could really have believed then that so many of our fondest hopes and dreams for America could come true. And of all those things that have happened, how many of us could have imagined 8 or even 4 years ago that one day an American President would have an opportunity to stand as I did a few months ago there in the Lenin Hills, at a podium at Moscow State University, and tell the young people of the Soviet Union about the wonder and glory of human freedom. With the beginning of change that we have seen in the Eastern bloc and with the development of concepts like a Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI, that destroys weapons, not people, it's just possible that we have a chance now to end the two great nightmares of this century and give our children a future free of both totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

Well, this is now what is all at stake. We must hold to this moment of hope, and we must be allowed to complete that which we have begun. So, let us go forth then, you and I, to tell the American people what's really at stake: the fate of generations to come, the hopes of peace and freedom for our children and for all the children of the world. Yes, some say that it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, we are the change. It started 8 years ago.

I want to thank you all. This is very heartwarming, believe me, for me to be here with you today and to talk to you about these things. I just want to -- oh, I can't resist. I'm supposed to quit right here.

What do you suppose they mean? [Laughter] When we took office 8 years ago, America was in the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression. We turned that around. And since our expansion began, we've created more than 17\1/2\ million new jobs, reduced unemployment to nearly the lowest it's been in 14 years, and presided over the greatest flowering of new businesses and new technology in the history of the world. And today a greater proportion of our potential work force -- maybe you don't know the definition for that, ``potential work force.'' That is everyone, male and female, from the age of 16 and up, in the United States. And a greater proportion of that work force is employed than ever before in the history of the United States of America. And you think about how many people in the younger levels of that potential pool are still getting an education and so forth, and then stop to think that almost two-thirds of that whole pool is today employed here in the United States.

They dismiss our accomplishments in education. And again, that's strange. Do they really want to remind Americans that when they last controlled the House, the Senate, and the White House, the SAT scores -- those scores for proving qualification to get into college -- fell steadily, or that since our back-to-basics campaign got rolling around the country, those SAT scores, as they're called, have begun to rise again? And let me add, we won't be satisfied until they're back where they were at their peak and still going up.

They deride our war on drugs -- stranger still. You wouldn't think they'd want us to remember that during the last liberal administration the Justice Department started to lose interest in narcotics cases. Each year it brought fewer cases, and convictions were down by one-third in their last year in office. Well, since we took charge, Federal narcotics convictions have more than doubled. And while the number of drug users soared during the last administration, it's dropping now. And earlier this year we got the best news of all: High school students are saying no to drugs, including cocaine, as never before. But as a certain lovely lady keeps reminding me, as long as even one American uses illegal drugs, that number will still be too high.

Our opponents talk about the courts. But do they really want to remind the Nation of the kind of judges they have appointed in the past -- or that we have worked to place on the bench judges and justices who are not just concerned about the rights of criminals but also about those of the victims of crime?

And our opponents talk about competitiveness. Do they want to remind people that when they were last in office, manufacturing productivity increases slowed to a crawl -- or that since we came to office, productivity is up sharply, by over 30 percent, and that America is exporting more than almost any time in history?

I announced earlier today, the Department of Commerce released the latest trade figures early this morning. I know that they've made Jack Danforth, who's been one of the Senate's leaders in helping us open up international markets, very happy. Yes, in July the trade imbalance dropped like a stone. So far this year it's down nearly one-fifth from the same period last year.

This year the liberal opposition has fielded candidates who don't know left from center. [Laughter] Many of them talk about reaching for the center; but on issues like national defense, as former Secretary of Defense James Schlesinger wrote recently, too many of their candidates seem to believe that, and in his words, ``the way to deter war is to be unprepared to respond.'' They would cut the B - 1 bomber, the Midgetman missile, our Strategic Defense Initiative, and wipe out two carrier battle groups in our Navy.

So, you tell me, when the liberals try to tell the American people they won't raise taxes, but fail to mention the new spending programs they've promised every liberal special interest group in Washington, are we going to stand by and let them get away with it? When the liberal leadership tried to portray themselves as the newly ordained champions of law and order, but forgets that they have to mention that they've given a virtual veto power over the Supreme Court appointments to fellow liberals like the Civil Liberties Union, are we going to stand by and let them get away with it?

The President. When the liberal leadership tried to tell the American people that they're the party of peace, but forgets to admit they jeopardized the chance for peace and tried to tie my hands in arms negotiations by favoring a nuclear freeze, cutting defense, and gutting SDI, are we going to let them get away with it?

The President. I thought you might object. [Laughter] I wonder how they believe that we got where we've gotten in the three summit meetings with the General Secretary of the Soviet Union if it wasn't by strengthening our defense and making it plain that we would continue to do so as long as it was necessary to remain -- [applause].

Yes, my friends, when our liberal opponents refuse to even whisper the ``L'' word and insist that ``this election is not about ideology, it's about competence,'' they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go.

They know, as well as you do, and as well as our nation does, that the one issue, the only issue, that will matter after Inauguration Day is the issue of direction. Will we reelect peace and prosperity? Or will we play ``Truth or Consequences'' with trenchcoat liberals?

Now, let me say a word about a Bush administration, and it's very simple. There's one way that I hope it will be different from ours. If it hadn't been for a Republican Senate in our first 6 years, we wouldn't have accomplished half of what we did. If we'd had one these last 2 years, we could have done much more.

Some people say that having both Houses of Congress in the hands of the other party is a check on the President. But from what I've seen, when both Houses are in the hands of our opponents, there is very little a President can do to check them. That's why I've wanted a line-item veto -- to help the President rein in Congress. But until the President gets such a veto, he must have at least one House in his own party if he's effectively to check congressional powers.

I hope that we can make sure that George Bush has more friends on Capitol Hill than he had on that Pacific island where he was shot down. You know, if you do know some people -- and I know some that really honestly think that, the Congress being the way it is, that that's a part of our checks and balances. The people nationwide elect the President -- the only office, that and Vice President, elected by the entire public. But then they turn around and let a Congress come in that is pledged not to let the elected President do the things he said he was going to do and for which he was elected.

Well, there's no better way to start helping George Bush in the way that I said than to return Jack Danforth to the United States Senate and to elect our Republican congressional candidates to the House. Now, nothing would please me more than for President Bush to have on Inauguration Day a gift -- a Republican Congress. And I'd also like it if he knew that when he needed a view from a statehouse he could turn to a reelected Governor John Ashcroft.

We must win Missouri this year if all those who stand for what we stand for are to be able to stop playing defensive ball in Washington. And that just doesn't mean just the top of the ticket. It means Governor Ashcroft. It means Senator Danforth. It means our congressional candidates -- every one. So, here's my request to you -- I enjoy saying this: Go out and win one for the Gipper.

Brady has served as the United States Senator from New Jersey and has been a leader in the investment community. I cannot imagine anyone more qualified to step in as Treasury Secretary. Now that he has been confirmed by the Senate, he will become the chief economic spokesman for my administration. Nick's sure hand at the helm will ensure the steady continuation of the economic policies that have brought about the longest economic recovery in our history and job opportunities that have resulted in the lowest unemployment rate in 14 years.

I am confident that Nick Brady will serve the Department and his country well. I look forward to having a full Cabinet once the Senate has confirmed my nominee for Secretary of Education, Lauro Cavazos.

As the 20th century approaches its close, medical researchers are peering ever deeper into the mysteries of living processes. Their investigations and discoveries are yielding a rich harvest of information and insight, suggesting strategies for alleviating countless ailments that afflict or kill millions of our fellow citizens each year. National Medical Research Day, 1988, gives us the opportunity to pause in gratitude for all that American medical research has done through the decades to save lives and preserve health.

The progress made by today's medical researchers is part of a long tradition in American biomedical research. In the past century, researchers have triumphed over such formerly deadly diseases as diphtheria, polio, and tetanus.

Furthermore, vaccines and treatments developed in America's biomedical laboratories have helped lead to virtually global elimination of formerly deadly epidemics such as cholera, smallpox, yellow fever, and bubonic plague.

Medical research has also resulted in the development of new drugs and surgical procedures and improved understanding of environmental and behavioral components of individual health. These advances have benefited Americans and all humanity.

Such successes occur because of our continuing commitment to such Federal agencies as the National Institutes of Health; the Alcohol, Drug Abuse, and Mental Health Administration; and the Centers for Disease Control, which support studies not only in their own laboratories, but also at universities and research institutions throughout the country; and because of the work of academia, industry, and voluntary organizations. Such cooperation in medical research has led to products that contribute to America's economy and to our Nation's ability to compete successfully in international trade.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of September, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

We consider fire an essential part of our daily lives, because with it we cook our food, heat our homes, and generate the energy that fuels businesses and industries across our country. But uncontrolled, fire becomes an enemy that threatens our homes, friends, and families.

Fire exacts a heavy price in the United States, disproportionately striking young people and senior citizens. Fire is deadliest in the home, where it can strike without warning, late at night, when we are least prepared to defend ourselves. Each year, hundreds of thousands of fires in the home cause thousands of civilian deaths and injuries, and billions in direct property damage.

Human error is largely responsible for the tragedy of fire in the home -- and human intervention can do much to stop that tragedy. Each of us has the ability to prevent needless suffering from the destructive power of fire.

This fall, Fire Prevention Week will be an opportunity for Americans to show their best, as they help one another learn and practice fire safety steps. The tools we need to protect our homes and our loved ones from fire are simple. This year, the National Fire Prevention Week theme, ``A Sound You Can Live With -- Test Your Smoke Detector!'', emphasizes easy steps we can take to give us valuable time to escape a home fire.

Fire Prevention Week, all Americans should test their home smoke detectors, replace the batteries if needed, and learn the simple maintenance practices that will keep a smoke detector ready to protect the home. Replacing batteries and keeping a smoke detector dust- and dirt-free are a small investment of time that can make possible the precious minutes members of a household need to reach safety. Families across America should also use Fire Prevention Week as a time to practice a home escape plan. We should likewise spend time checking our homes for fire dangers -- improperly stored flammable liquids; electrical problems; creosote buildup in chimneys; lack of spacing around home heating equipment such as woodstoves, or flammable materials too close to portable heaters; and other hazards.

Every small measure we as individuals take to prevent fire increases the level of fire safety throughout our country. Many organizations dedicated to fire safety across the United States will sponsor activities during Fire Prevention Week; they deserve our cooperation and gratitude.

We should honor the dedicated men and women of these organizations, especially the thousands of fire fighters throughout the United States. We pay special honor to the selfless fire fighters who have made the ultimate sacrifice, losing their lives in the line of duty so that others might live.

Illness Awareness Week, 1988, offers all Americans a welcome and much-needed chance to expand their knowledge about the nature, causes, and treatments of mental illness and to grow in understanding concerning those afflicted; their families; and appropriate attitudes toward, and assistance for, victims of mental illness. This is an opportunity we surely should utilize, because it can do much good throughout our land.

We have also learned that people can take purposeful steps toward improving the lives of their loved ones, friends, and fellow citizens who are affected by mental illness -- and that many of the burdens experienced by family members as they care for the mentally ill should and can be shared by the wider community.

During Mental Illness Awareness Week and all year long, we can recall and be thankful for our continuing progress into diagnosis, treatment, assistance, and understanding for all those of every age and condition who cannot reach their potential or lead independent, fulfilling lives because of mental illness. Let us also resolve to put into practice, as individuals and in private and community efforts, all that we have learned and achieved regarding ways to help, encourage, and befriend mentally ill Americans and their families.

America, do hereby proclaim the week of October 2 through October 8, 1988, as Mental Illness Awareness Week. I call upon the people of the United States to observe this week with ceremonies and activities that will enhance the well-being of our Nation by increasing knowledge and understanding about mental illnesses and their treatments.

I took office I set in motion a plan to improve and rationalize the regulatory activity of Federal agencies. The program was designed to ensure full analysis of possible regulatory impacts, to bring about greater coordination within the government, and to increase public information about and participation in the process.

To enhance presidential oversight, I issued Executive orders directing regulatory agencies to justify their exercise of regulatory discretion, demonstrate the likely benefits and costs of individual regulations, and better inform the public of their plans and activities. To provide leadership for these efforts to improve the regulatory process, I established the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, chaired by Vice President George Bush. I believe these steps have served the American people well and assured greater constitutional accountability.

Experience over the past 2 decades suggests the need for the President to establish publicly the overall direction for regulatory agencies by announcing the general, government-wide principles, both economic and social, to which regulatory agencies should adhere as they implement their statutory responsibilities. Our Administration has established a process in which the Office of Management and Budget issues an annual Regulatory Program of the United States Government setting forth the regulatory proposals of my Administration for the coming year. The Regulatory Program improves agency regulatory management by requiring agencies to observe the President's regulatory priorities and coordinate with OMB and one another. In addition, these reports provide the Congress and the American people -- before the publication of any proposed regulation -- with a comprehensive outline of how the Administration intends to exercise the discretion the Congress has provided.

President must also provide for day-to-day oversight of agency regulatory developments. This oversight process, carried out through the Executive Office of the President, includes monitoring agency activity, coordinating government-wide issues, identifying issues of concern, and, with appropriate interagency discussion, ensuring that any remaining issues are resolved.

Today, more than 100 Federal agencies maintain thousands of regulations that have an enormous impact on how we live and what we do. Regulations tell us what is safe and what we can buy. Government regulates how we make, price, sell, transport, use, and discard the products of everyday American life.

This pervasive government power can be used for good or ill. And as regulation grew over the past 5 decades, government ``red tape'' became a great burden on our free enterprise system. Over the last 7\1/2\ years, we have substantially reduced that burden, cutting red tape and slowing the pace of new regulation.

I became President in 1981, I directed that Federal agencies, within the scope afforded by law, should reduce the excess burden of government regulation that is borne by every worker, consumer, business, and State and local government in this Nation. Under the guidance of the Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief, Federal agencies have eliminated unnecessary regulatory costs ranging in the tens of billions of dollars. Federal reporting requirements have been eased wherever possible, and we have worked hard to ensure that the paperwork burden imposed on the American people does not get out of control. As we have weeded out and eliminated wasteful, unnecessary, and intrusive regulatory standards, we have also encouraged the development of useful regulations that will increase benefits to society as a whole.

The steady but enormous progress the Vice President and I have made over the past 7\1/2\ years to improve the way government regulates has been one of our Administration's proudest achievements. However, much more remains to be done.

Managing the Federal regulatory machinery will continue of necessity to be a high priority for Presidents in the years ahead. For this reason, I am certain the new Chief Executive will want to continue this endeavor to serve the public interest by insisting that regulatory activity be productive.

The President. Well, good morning. I know you've already heard from Dick Thornburgh and Bill Bennett, and they're a tough act to follow. So I'm taking this opportunity to announce the nomination of my fellow Californian, Ferdinand Fernandez, to the Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. Judge Fernandez is currently a Federal district judge for the Central District of California, and he'll make an outstanding addition to the Ninth Circuit, which is one of the circuits the Judicial Conference recently declared to be in a ``judicial emergency'' because of the number of vacancies.

And nowhere have we seen business opportunities expand so as in your own field of Hispanic media. With more than 500 television affiliates, more than 200 radio stations, and 76 newspapers, you've created the most vibrant ethnic media this nation has ever seen. And most of this growth has taken place in the last few years.

Yes, opportunities are opening up everywhere, and the same is true everywhere in the Americas. Immigrants know better than anyone how precious freedom and democracy are. And in the past 7 years, there's been a democratic explosion throughout the Americas. Before George Bush and I came into office, less than 30 percent of the population of Central and South America lived in democracies; now over 90 percent of the people live in nations that are either fully democratic or well on the way there.

As most of you know, however, sadly, two peoples are struggling to get out from under the suffocating embrace of Communist domination. The word glasnost is spoken daily in the Soviet Union, but there's no translation of it for the people of Cuba, who are still living under the yoke of Stalinism. And of course, there's Nicaragua. It happens that today, September 15th, is Central American Independence Day. On this day in 1821, the nations of Central America declared their independence from colonial domination. Now, 167 years later, the Nicaraguan people yearn for a new independence from Communist colonialism and aggression.

A true, democratic Nicaraguan declaration of independence would guarantee freedom of speech, a human right that's been trampled upon in recent months with a constant intimidation of La Prensa. It would guarantee freedom of religion, a human right that's been trampled upon by the bullying of Radio Catolica. It would guarantee freedom of assembly, a human right that's been trampled upon by the suppression of independent labor unions. It would fulfill the promises the Sandinistas made to the Organization of American States in 1979. And it would free the Nicaraguan people from totalitarianism.

Of course, that declaration will not willingly come. Those that rule by intimidation do not surrender dictatorial power willingly, only when they're pressured to do so. And that's why I continue to support the freedom fighters in Nicaragua, who represent the best hope that the Nicaraguan declaration of independence will one day be the foundation of a democratic state in Nicaragua. The freedom fighters run out of money on September 30th, and Congress must see to it that the freedom fighters are not left without food and supplies.

I'm also waiting for Congress to send the responsible defense legislation. I want legislation that will help my successor continue the policies that have brought the Soviets to the bargaining table and led them to begin pulling out of Afghanistan, as well as prompting a cease-fire in the Persian Gulf and liberating Grenada. Secretary Carlucci is prepared to work with Congress to come up with legislation that merits my approval and keeps our defenses strong.

I went to Capitol Hill for the State of the Union, I vowed that I would never again sign a catch-all spending bill of the kind I received last year, a 14-pound, thousand-page monster. And I wasn't making believe when I did this after I put it down. I had caught my finger. It was sore for about 3 days.

I fear Congress has gotten distracted from the task of tending to the Nation's fiscal business and instead is spending its time trying to score points before returning home for the election. I challenge the congressional leadership to send me all 13 spending bills by October 1st and accomplish something that hasn't been accomplished since 1948: getting the Nation's business done on time.

Reagan country. [Laughter] Do you feel frustrated as you leave the White House that Cuba and Nicaragua are still under Communist insurgency, spreading hegemonously across this hemisphere, although many countries desire democracy? And what went wrong?

The President. Well, I think what is at stake is the very policy that from the first we set out. I hadn't been here very long when I made a trip down through Central and South America. And my trip was one -- because I believe, with the best of intentions, in the past leaders of our country have come up with plans for friendship and mutual aid and so forth, but it was always kind of the big colossus of the North coming up with the idea and wanting everyone to sign on. Well, I wanted to make a trip down there and find out what the people -- our Latin American neighbors -- what they thought might work. So, it was kind of rewarding because every time I'd get there and sort of a -- kind of austerely, people I met with would start by saying, Well, what are you proposing? And I said: I'm not proposing anything. I'm down here to find out what your ideas are and how can we become closer. Here we are in this Western Hemisphere. We all had the common heritage. We all came from other countries, and mainly from Europe, to create this new world, this new Earth. And we all worship the same God. And we're only divided by three languages that separate us, not the dozens of the rest of the world.

And of course, there's been a great disinformation campaign abroad and in our land that has confused a great many people about the Nicaraguan situation. But we must set them straight and make them realize it is plainly a battle between freedom fighters and dictatorship. So, I want that to continue.

Miriam Lesnick, Replica magazine. After serving two terms as President, Mr. Reagan, what is, in your opinion, the three major accomplishments this administration has achieved in furthering the plight of Hispanics in this country? And what does the Bush administration have to offer Hispanics that Dukakis' administration won't?

The President. Well, I know how George feels -- and I think that you would be reassured if you don't -- about his warm feeling that he has with regard to Hispanics. And the three things that you say that we have done -- well, I think, for one thing -- I'm thinking overall terms -- our whole economic policy has been across the board. It hasn't just been to benefit one segment of our society. And in the improvement in the economy of wages, of getting jobs, and so forth, Hispanic Americans have benefited as well -- in some instances, even better -- than the general improvement. So, I think that the economic benefits that have accrued, the changes that have come about in education, and -- I'm going to be meeting with some of the educators, recognizing those today later -- I think all of those are different than what our past policy has been.

Milwaukee Hispanic Associates, and I'm also working in TV - 65 in Milwaukee and Chicago. I have a question for you. This year, being a year of elections, it seems that the Presidential candidates are making a special effort to appeal to the Hispanic voters. We saw it with candidate Dukakis in Spanish, and we saw it with candidate Bush telling us that he was familiar with the Hispanic culture because of his relatives. My question is: If assuming that you would run again yourself, in your opinion would you try to make a special appeal to the Hispanic voters, and why?

And so, I think it's natural to know that you appeal to the interests of people in politics as to what they expect from Government and what they believe their particular problems may be. And so, none of us forgot our heritage. You don't quit loving your mother because you've taken unto yourself a wife. So, we, all of us, are proud of where -- whether we or our ancestors -- came from. And I think it's only natural that you reach out to establish a rapport with these various groups and let them know that you are conscious that they may have, in some instances, problems that are not general.

Mr. President, the Cuban exiles have had high hopes that your administration was going to help them win freedom of their land. What do you think has been the major cause that has prevented your administration to help establish democracy in Cuba, specifically?

The President. Well, I think one of the things we've been working for is the source of Cuba's strength, of Castro's strength, and that is our dealing with the Soviet Union. In all of our dealings, they know very definitely how we feel about things of this kind and about Cuba and about the help that they have provided to the Sandinistas in Nicaragua. And so, we think that that has been more direct, and we've taken some encouragement from the fact that they are now withdrawing their military forces from Afghanistan. But all of this comes up in our discussions with the General Secretary and has from the very first.

You have only 2 more months of Presidency. And there are several issues that are hanging, like contras, aid to Nicaragua; the Manuel Noriega situation in Panama; the situation of Fidel Castro in Cuba; drug transactions, drug trafficking coming through Cuba; deportations of Mariel Cubans; the situation of Dr. Orlando Bosc in jail in Miami -- all of these issues are going to be hanging on the air. What can we expect in the next administration?

The President. Well, I have great confidence because George Bush has been, as Vice President, a part -- and a major part -- of everything that we've done and all of the accomplishments that we've had in the economy and everything else, and our building up of our security and all. And I am convinced that, basically, the policies that have been in effect for these last several years will continue under him. And he will, in addition, do additional things that, as problems arise, that have to be done.

I have a feeling that, if the election should go the other way, that there will be a turnaround, that they don't believe at all in what we've accomplished or what we've done, and we will be back to trying to solve our problems with higher taxes and that sort of thing.

Well, good afternoon. It's a pleasure to be with you today as we recognize and honor 287 elementary schools. Of course, education has been a part of our culture from its very beginning. Moses, for example, was known to his people not as a king or as a prophet but as a teacher. And when I had him, that's what I called him: teacher. [Laughter] And boy, was he strict. If you made a mistake, he'd do that trick where he turned his cane into a snake.

Well, seriously, though, I can't think of an event that I'd be happier to attend. As you know, education has been a particular concern of this administration, and I'm proud to be standing here with one of my two master teachers, Bill Bennett.

Now, replacing Bill, after the Senate gives its okay, will be Lauro Cavazos. Both Bill and Lauro are examples of what education can produce. Lauro is a zoologist and physiologist, Bill a philosopher and a lawyer. They've taught kids, and they've managed institutions of higher learning. And it was their hard work, determination, and the drive they had when their hunger for knowledge was fulfilled that brought them so far. They don't simply speak well about American education: they represent American education at its best, as students, teachers, and administrators.

But let's talk about your schools, the schools we honor today. They're very important places because they provide the children who attend them a solid foundation for literally everything they will have to know to be good and useful people.

Wordsworth said that ``the child is father to the man.'' Well, it's a profound thought and not as straightforward a statement as it sounds. It means that the experiences we have as children have a great deal of influence over what we become later in life. And when a youngster's early educational experiences are not good ones -- if the youngster goes through childhood baffled because nobody answers those basic questions about life and the universe -- his thirst for learning will decrease. And when we lose our desire to learn, the world around us begins to shrink. Opportunities shrink. And our natural desire for self-improvement deteriorates. Tragically, we see this happen time and time again in schools that seem to serve more often as places that kids go during the day to kill time rather than places where they go to learn and grow.

Well, the children that attend your 287 schools are in little danger of being unfulfilled in their educations. Instead, they arrive in school bright with promise, and they're met with a concerted effort to make sure they fulfill that promise. And that means principals and teachers taking a firm hand and telling their students: This is what you must know, this is how hard you must work to know it, and your reward is the knowledge itself.

There's an hour a day of mathematics instruction, instruction that emphasizes problem-solving skills. And what do the students have to show for it? Eighty percent of the school's students are above average in math proficiency.

Students have to take 2 hours a day of reading and language arts, with a curriculum heavy on literature and light on textbook formulas. And what's the result? The scores of K.R. Smith students on the 1987 California survey of basic skills for writing were the highest in the San Jose School District. And that's in a school whose kids are predominantly immigrants or from families that move around a great deal, kids whose first language isn't English.

Excellence is a philosophy. It says: Do your best at all times because you owe yourself no less. That kind of philosophy spills over into everything and helps children to develop not only good study habits but good character as well.

The demand for excellence is a booster to the all-important self-esteem that kids must have to sustain hard work and resist the temptations to sloth or self-indulgence that the world and the devil place in their path. It's the best preventative against the scourge of drugs that I can think of, because if you give children a sense of the past and the future, they won't be so tempted to obliterate the present with drugs.

American elementary schools can learn from your example. And to make that easier to accomplish, the Department of Education has just released a report called ``James Madison Elementary School: A Curriculum for American Students.'' It's a portrait of a model American elementary school, complete with a full-scale curriculum in all relevant subjects. And how did Bill Bennett come up with the curriculum we propose in this volume? Well, from you, your schools, and your programs.

All of you here today have proved that excellence cannot be bought. If it could, some of our most troubled school systems would be our best. No, excellence is the product of dedicated people like you -- working hard, relying on a rigorous curriculum, and always demanding the best from your students.

President today announced his intention to nominate John Condayan to be Director of the Office of Foreign Missions, with the rank of Ambassador, at the Department of State. He would succeed James Edward Nolan, Jr.

Now you know, the Capitol Steps might be getting some competition. What with glasnost and all, the Soviets have started a similar group: They're called the Russian steppes. [Laughter] Now, political satire is still new over there, but the group has caught on fast. They've only performed once and already they've been booked solid. Each one of them got 20 years.

But seriously, this is always a great pleasure to have you all here. And tonight it's a very special pleasure for Nancy and me, because this is our last congressional barbecue. One of the great things I've found in Washington is that whatever the issue may be or whatever might be said during the day, after 6 o'clock we all take off the cleats and all come together as friends and colleagues. And these barbecues for me have come to represent that friendship and respect that overrides any partisan or political difference.

So, let me just say how glad I am that you could join us tonight. It meant a lot to us. And I think it's going to be clear through to January to try to thank you for these 8 years. So for tonight, let me just say thank you. I'll pardon those I've just arrested. [Laughter] Thank you all, and God bless you all.

The President. Well, let me begin by welcoming all of you here today, with a special welcome for Nick, Kitty, and the Brady family. It's a happy occasion for me to be welcoming Nick Brady into the Cabinet as America's 68th Secretary of the Treasury. In fact, I can think of no one more qualified for this post.

In an investment banking career that has spanned three decades, Nick Brady has earned the respect of the financial and economic communities for his integrity and professional accomplishment. As a Member of the United States Senate, he won the respect and friendship of his colleagues. And he received national recognition for his work investigating the events in the financial markets of last October, leading the task force that came to bear his name. Now this, in fact, is the sixth time he has answered my call, and he has distinguished himself each time.

Brady will be chief economic spokesman for the administration, and I will be relying on him to continue our policies that have proved so successful. Just this week, excellent new trade numbers came out, showing a continued decline in the Nation's trade deficit, giving us the lowest trade deficit since 1984. America currently is in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record, employment is at an all-time high, and the unemployment rate recently hit a 14-year low. In fact, a larger percentage of our potential work force is employed today than ever before: 62.7 percent. And that potential employment pool includes everyone, male or female, 16 years of age and up, whether they're even going to school or even if they're retired. You know, I had to get this job to learn that. [Laughter] Of course, I wouldn't be surprised if Nick already knew it.

Now, last January when I went before the Congress to deliver the State of the Union, I also laid out something of a challenge to the leadership there. Now, here today, with your new Treasury Secretary, I want to renew that challenge. I told the Congress that there should never again be another catchall, omnibus continuing resolution of the kind they sent down last year. And I told them that if they sent another one, I wouldn't sign it. Well, the best way to get a grip on the Federal budget deficit is for Congress to make the budget process work, and that means 13 individual spending bills all reaching my desk by October 1st.

And that must include defense legislation that maintains what Franklin Roosevelt rightly called the ``great arsenal of democracy.'' When it comes to our own security and the cause of freedom, we cannot accept naive, liberal notions that fail to keep faith with the American people and their dedication to peace through strength.

And now, even though the new fiscal year is just 2 weeks away, a number of appropriations bills are still being haggled over in conference committees. And another round of midnight budget legislation is no way to control spending and fight the deficit. So, I hope Congress will watch my lips here: I want 13 separate bills, and if it makes it any easier, Congress can just think of it as a baker's dozen. [Laughter] And unless they pull that baker's dozen out of the oven by October 1st, well, they will have cooked their own goose, because the American people will see those spending bills are behind the budget deficit.

Treasury to follow in Jim Baker's big footsteps. I come from 30 years in the banking business. And although in today's fast-moving world you don't hear the term anymore, I was always taught that the best loan you could make was a character loan, one that looked beyond the hard numbers and took a leap of faith and counted on the character and strength of the individual involved.

This principle applies to countries as well. And as you have shown the world, this principle is doubly true where the United States is involved. Your leadership has produced the longest sustained period of prosperity in most Americans' memories. Not only have the economic statistics turned out to be right, but what is more important is that they have meant better lives for Americans.

Treasury Department will do its homework, do the pick-and-shovel work to make sure the numbers are right. But we will always be guided by your faith that character is at the root of all human endeavor. Thank you.

Let me begin this talk with a special message to the people of Texas. Last night many of you endured the ravages of Hurricane Gilbert. Today, as you wait for the waters to recede and the cleanup to begin, Nancy and I and all Americans hold you in our prayers. We all have one blessing to count: warning came early. You were ready; so are we. The Federal Government has spent the last week preparing to help during and after the storm. We've offered help, as well, to our international friends who felt Gilbert's full force. As I told Jamaican Prime Minister Edward Seaga, we're ready to play an active role in helping them rebuild.

Now, on a happier note, if you're like me, you look forward every 4 years to a very special event: the summer Olympics. As you know, this week and next, the Olympics are being held in Seoul, South Korea. Last night athletes from all over the world marched around the Olympic stadium there and stood and watched as a single torchbearer climbed the steps and lit the Olympic flame, marking the start of the games.

And you can see the American spirit in the lives of every one of our team members at these games. This team comes from all over our nation, from the rough and tumble streets of our brawny cities to the quiet lanes of our vast countryside, from the suburban hills of southern California to riverfront towns in the Midwest. They represent every aspect of our country's life and a shining hope, too, a crystalline beacon of opportunity that we know is the heart of America. One athlete, raised in very modest circumstances, recalled recently that, ``We were rich as a family.'' And that wealth of love has given her the strength to achieve her dream, just as throughout our history the wealth of family love has given countless millions of Americans the strength to pursue their dreams in our land of opportunity.

Yes, our athletes have a love, a happiness, and an exuberance in being American. They're as patriotic as the Pledge of Allegiance; as red, white, and blue as the flag. They're filled with the spirit of our land in all of its magnificent diversity, a diversity you can see even in their faces. When you look at most other teams, it's easy to tell what continent or region they're from. But we Americans come from every continent and region.

Ours are the faces of all humanity, just as our nation was built by the hopes of all humanity. So, as you watch these Olympics, remember -- win, lose, or draw -- how much we have to be proud and thankful for. After all, we're Americans.

Well, thank you very much, and good morning. It's a pleasure to welcome the leadership of the U.S. Jaycees and your president, Andy Tobin, to Washington. I know you've come here from all over this country, leaving your husbands and wives and children and your beautiful homes. So, let me say: Welcome! And now I'd like to give you a little piece of advice: Go home soon. [Laughter] Because if you stay here, strange things may start happening to you.

I was happy to hear that you were coming in today because I wanted to salute you and all 250,000 Jaycees nationwide for all you've done for America. I think it's safe to say that the United States Jaycees exemplifies the values and goals of what some folks who flatter me call the Reagan revolution. Young, enthusiastic, excited by the promise of America, you brim with optimism for the future; indeed, you are the future. Many of you are managers and entrepreneurs, and you know that we have to have our house in order if the future is going to be bright. You know firsthand the truth of a principle too often forgotten by the liberal opinionmakers, which is that: You run a good shop, you have to keep your accounts in balance.

You also know something the liberals try to make the public forget: It's Congress that appropriates and spends Federal funds. The President doesn't have control over one dime of tax money. And you know that Congress' method of collecting and spending the Nation's money is out of whack. That's why you've been leaders in explaining to the American people that the President of the United States needs the line-item veto, the same veto that 43 Governors have -- I used it 943 times when I was Governor -- well, to make sure those people up on Capitol Hill don't play games and hide costs in the mammoth bills they're addicted to and that I refuse to sign. That's why we need it.

I told Congress in the State of the Union Address that I was never again going to sign another one of their 1,000-page catchall spending monstrosities. You probably remember when I slammed that bill down on the table. Well, if you happened to be watching television and seeing it there and you saw me do this -- and a lot of people thought I was just being funny -- no, I caught my finger under it when it went down, all 14 pounds of it, and it was sore for 3 days.

Now they're working on what I asked for: 13 separate spending bills. But I have to tell you, it looks like they may have lost their newfound fiscal responsibility. The new fiscal year begins in 11 days, and 7 of these 13 bills are still under negotiation between the House and Senate. I've mentioned this a few times over the last week, and I'm going to keep on mentioning it until they get the idea. I want those 7 bills on my desk and in shape to sign by October 1st. And if we do that, it will be the first time it's happened since 1948.

I particularly want defense legislation I can sign. You probably remember I vetoed it the last time. I did so because that bill would have weakened the Nation. I want defense legislation that will continue the policies of the last 8 years, the policies that brought the Soviets to the bargaining table and led them to begin pulling out of Afghanistan; the same policies that led to the restoration of our national pride and the liberation of Grenada. I want defense legislation that will expand our national security, not sacrifice it on the altar of the congressional pork barrel.

Now, there's something I've been waiting for the establishment economic gurus to say, and I haven't heard a word out of them. There's an economic idea they preach called the Phillips curve, which says that unemployment and inflation go together -- that when unemployment goes up, inflation goes down and vice versa.

Now, this notion has caused a lot of people to worry -- they actually worry -- because our unemployment rate is so low. This is the kind of bizarre thinking that makes people of common sense shake their heads in wonder. Well, I have news for the gloom-and-doomers who get good news and say it's bad news. The unemployment rate has been in steep decline during that time. We've had 6 years of low inflation during that same time. Our experience has proven one thing: This Phillips curve is just plain wrong.

Lord knows there's more, much more, very much more to be done. Some people are now saying we might as well just legalize the use of drugs. With my last breath in my body I will oppose this perverse and inhuman notion. The Federal Government must do everything it can to stem the tide of drugs coming in from abroad and sever the supply lines.

But we all know that the drug crisis is not just a supply problem: It's mainly a demand problem. And that's where the Jaycees and a certain lovely lady I'm proud to call my wife have come in. You have literally changed the way Americans think about drug abuse with three simple words: ``Just say no.'' And I'm aware the Jaycees have been vital participants in the Just Say No efforts.

The words ``just say no'' may be simple, but they are mighty. They are mighty because they reflect the profound ethic of personal responsibility that is the hallmark of our civilization. They represent a challenge and a summons to the moral greatness that is our birthright as Americans. And I am confident that we will defeat this scourge because as a nation we have hope and faith -- hope for a brighter future and faith in the values that keep us strong.

President, and now, Mr. Secretary and Mrs. Cavazos, Members of the Congress that are here, and ladies and gentlemen, thank all of you. And as I'm sure you know, we're here today to celebrate a bit of good news for the Nation: the swearing-in that has just taken place of Dr. Lauro F.

Cavazos as our country's fourth Secretary of Education and, I'm honored to add, as the first Hispanic Cabinet officer in American history. I know all of you join me in extending -- and you've shown that -- to Dr. and Mrs. Cavazos and to their family and friends a proud welcome to the White House.

Of course, September is the month when American education goes back to work, so now seems a perfect time to introduce a new Secretary of Education. Just 2 weeks ago, many American students, teachers, and administrators returned to their classrooms and offices in pursuit of knowledge and its matchless rewards.

We sometimes take this for granted, but theirs is a high calling, a grand enterprise of individual effort and collective, national purpose. And I'm pleased to say they could not have a finer colleague, advocate, and spokesman than Larry Cavazos, whose own life and career pay eloquent tribute to the ennobling possibilities of good education.

But with his scholarship and his work in academic administration; through his membership in innumerable national, inter-American, and international organizations; and by his participation in the movement for school reform where it counts -- at the grassroots -- Larry Cavazos has already made a major contribution to American education, and he brings to his new post a record of solid accomplishment that promises even bigger contributions in the future. But along with high distinction, Dr. Cavazos brings something else to the Cabinet and to the Department of Education, something even more important to our schools and to our students, something I've made a cornerstone of this administration's policies since day one. And that something is the idea of educational excellence and a passionate commitment to quality schooling for every American child.

I know that Dr. Cavazos shares my pride in the substantial progress American education has made since 1981. And I'm sure, too, that he believes, as I do, that we can and must do better still. And I have every confidence that his work as Education Secretary will continue to lead the way, that his voice will continue to reflect the great good sense Americans have always had about our children and our schools, and that his effort will be devoted to keeping a national spotlight of attention on education.

You know, I've spent some of the happiest days of my life -- and at my age, that's saying a lot -- [laughter] -- visiting American classrooms, meeting American teachers and students, and watching them work and learn. And Larry Cavazos will do the same. Larry is, to be sure, a sterling example of the magnificent contributions Hispanic-Americans have made to our national life. But I know his service in the Cabinet will speak to all Americans, from every background, in every circumstance, of the real hope and opportunity that good education always provides. With Secretary Cavazos -- hey, that sounds good, doesn't it? -- [laughter] -- American education will be in sure and loving hands.

Cavazos. Thank you, Mr. President, Mr. Vice President, Members of the Congress, ladies and gentlemen. What a tremendous privilege it is for me to be here today. Mr. President, I do so appreciate your confidence and trust, your selecting me for this position of Secretary of Education.

You've brought great leadership to our nation, and your commitment to education has truly helped this country make significant gains and strides in the battle to always educate every person. I so much appreciate the unanimous support of the Labor and Human Resources Committee and the confidence of the Senate. I'm grateful for their expeditious handling of my nomination. And I wish to express thanks to the many people that guided us and assisted us through the confirmation process. There were very many of them, and we deeply appreciate what you did. My sincerest thanks and love to my wife Peggy and to our 10 children and their spouses. One of our grandsons is here. The other two couldn't make it; they're only 2 and 3 years old. And all of our family -- most of them are here with us today.

This journey in education started in 1949, when I was a teaching assistant. Over the years, the support and confidence and love of my family has sustained me and has helped me. And I would not be here today, I'm convinced, if it were not for them and the support that they have given me, and on top of that, many, many others who are here in this room with us today who have contributed to my education, who've supported me in difficult times and who have encouraged me. There are many of you in this room, and I'd like to thank each one of you personally.

And lastly, the work ahead for us is truly enormous. We must awaken America to renew its commitment to education. We must all work together -- all of us work together. We must care for every person -- the highly motivated achieving child, the undereducated, the dropout, the illiterate, and the handicapped. All persons, majority and minority, must reach their fullest level of potential, of education, so that they will become in turn responsible citizens, and in this manner they will contribute to the greatness of America.

Air Force One this morning, en route to Texas, the President signed into law H.R. 2701, to repeal two anticompetitive restrictions on the sale of natural gas imposed by the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978. With the support of the Reagan administration and Vice President George Bush's administration task force on regulatory relief, the legislation passed Congress with substantial support.

The bill repeals the requirement that the duration of any first-sale contract for new Outer Continental Shelf natural gas be at least 15 years. The bill also repeals a requirement that producers of certain decontrolled natural gas offer their present purchaser a right of first refusal when the producer received another offer for the gas. Repeal of the contract duration and right-of-first-refusal requirements will increase the flexibility of natural gas producers and purchasers to enter into agreement that accurately reflect market conditions. It will also benefit consumers by increasing the responsiveness of interstate gas prices to a more competitive market. The enactment of H.R. 2701 represents another step in the administration's effort to eliminate counterproductive regulation of the economy by the Federal Government.

You know, now with this reception that you've given me, I have to say that once upon a time being a Republican in this area of the country felt a little bit like being Gary Cooper in ``High Noon'' -- [laughter] -- outnumbered in a big way. Well, all that, as they say, is history -- or should I say ancient history, which at my age is a subject that I'm regarded as an expert in.

And let me take just a moment to talk about the positive achievements of the past 8 years. We have a robust, growing economy, with low inflation. Young people starting out can look forward to jobs and opportunity -- a secure future to start a family. And more people are at work today than ever before in the history of the United States of America. Now, you know, I hear that number being given, and then some people say, ``Well, we've got a bigger population than we had before.'' No, that isn't the way it figures.

Everybody in the United States -- male and female, from age 16 on up -- are considered to be the potential employment pool. So, that means all of you -- and I doubt if there are any of you that are less than 16. But today 62.7 percent, almost two-thirds of that entire pool, is employed in the United States; and it's the greatest percentage in the history of this country.

We're beginning to turn around the decades-long decline in education by returning to basics and demanding nothing less than excellence. We're restoring our judicial system by appointing serious-minded judges who respect the Constitution and America's traditional values.

We've rekindled an ancient pride; a noble patriotism that loves America and would extend our blessings to the world. We've given our men and women in uniform the kind of pay, the kind of weapons, and the kind of respect they deserve. And it's a proud thing once again to wear the uniform of the United States. And because of all that, our nation is again respected in the world. Our Armed Forces are strong, and America is at peace.

Well, that's how things were abroad. At home they were just as bad. Inflation and economic stagnation gave our economy a one-two punch that had America's families on the ropes. Between 1977 and 1981, the after-inflation income of the typical American family fell by almost 7 percent. And then George Bush and I rode into town and locked up inflation. [Laughter] And since then the American family's real income has risen by more than 10 percent.

Of course, the liberals hope you'll forget why we were able to turn the economy around. Their message is: You can take prosperity for granted; it's time for a change, so take a chance on us. [Laughter] Well, that's sort of like someone telling you that you've stored up all the ice cream you could want, so now it's time to unplug the freezer. [Laughter] But whether it's a well-stocked freezer or our progrowth economic policies, you can't unplug what's working and expect things to stay the same, and that's what they're trying to do.

I don't think I have to tell you that these days some liberals are using our words and phrases, terms like ``community,'' ``family,'' and ``values.'' But while the words are the same, the meanings are different. For example, as part of their so-called profamily agenda, they propose Federal child-care assistance. Last week I told an audience in Washington that under this liberal proposal if you want assistance and you also want to leave your child with his or her grandmother that day, the grandmother will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

You know, I have an example of the difference between our two philosophies. I remember when I was Governor of California. Now, I came into office -- and it was the first fiscal year -- and found that in violation of the constitution, the State was already carrying a great deficit. And just before the end of the first fiscal year that I was there, my finance director came to me and said, ``We're going to have a surplus.'' And he thought and told me that he thought that since I hadn't been able to do anything in the nature of spending money because of that deficit that maybe now I had some pet program I was waiting to put into place and that I should announce that before the legislature found out. The legislature was dominated by the Democratic Party.

And shortly thereafter, a liberal senator from the other party stormed into my office, pounded my desk, and he said, ``I consider giving that money back to the people an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] Well, there again is the difference, as I say, between our two philosophies. To them, everything belongs to the Government; to us, everything belongs to the people.

But, as I said, in area after area this year, the liberals have tried to hide their philosophy behind our words. When they say ``opportunity,'' they mean subsidies. When they say ``closing the deficit,'' they mean raising taxes. When they say ``strong defense,'' they mean cut defense spending -- no wonder their favorite machine is the snowblower.

Now long ago, I vetoed a defense authorization bill that Congress sent to me and that embodied much of what the liberals want to do to our nation's defenses. But lately, some liberal leaders have seen what was happening to them in the polls and have had a deathbed conversion. They'd have you believe that they're born-again General George Pattons. [Laughter] But if we go the way they want to go, our defenses will run out of gas in no time.

For example, the liberals are proclaiming loudly that they're for the new Trident missile and the Stealth bomber. But then they whisper that they're also for delaying deployment of both systems pending the outcome of arms talks -- which could drag on for years -- while the Soviets could be deploying new systems of their own.

But at this time, when nightly television pictures of the destruction of U.S. and Soviet missiles under our INF treaty tell us that our policy of peace through strength is truly working, you tell me, yes or no: Is this any time to return to the liberal policies of the past?

The President. You didn't surprise me a bit. [Laughter] Well, the sad truth is that when the liberals refuse even to whisper the ``L'' word and insist that this election is not about ideology; it's about competence -- they're just acknowledging that where they want to take America, America doesn't want to go. But the one issue, the only issue, that will matter on Inauguration Day is the issue of direction. Will we reelect peace and prosperity, or will we play ``Truth or Consequences'' with trenchcoat liberals?

Now, you know, I have to tell you I'm a former Democrat. But I think you know what I mean when I raise questions about the distinction between the rank-and-file Democrats -- many of whom I hope are here -- and the liberal leadership of that party in Washington, a liberal leadership that has turned a once-proud party of hope and affirmation into one dominated by strident liberalism and negativism.

Now, it's very good, but it still isn't good enough for us. We want more -- more growth, more opportunity, more jobs. And we intend to ensure this kind of economic prosperity right through the nineties and into the next century by guaranteeing the Federal Government can never again spend and tax the American people into another economic nightmare.

Let me give you an example of what I mean: Some of you may remember that last January I went up to Capitol Hill for the State of the Union Address. I talked about some of the problems caused by the liberal leadership in the Congress, who were all there to hear it. I mentioned that in 7 years of 91 appropriations bills scheduled to arrive on my desk by the beginning of the fiscal year, only 9 made it on time.

And then along came that behemoth, the continuing resolution containing all the appropriations. You have to sign it or close down the Government. It was 1,057 pages long. It weighed 14 pounds and was 2 months late. Even Congress didn't know what was in it. [Laughter] They passed it and sent it to me so late that I had just a few hours -- yes, a few hours, not days, hours -- to sign or shut down the Government. Well, this time, I did sign. But then as I said in my State of the Union Address, next time they do that, I won't.

Well, today Congress and our administration are working to keep that from happening again. I want to receive by the beginning of the next fiscal year, October 1st, all the Government's appropriation bills for the coming year -- ones that I can sign. Our administration will pull out all the stops on our end to see to it that this happens. And I happen to think there's a good chance it will happen. And if so, it'll be the first time that the Nation's business has been finished on time since 1948.

Well, the next President deserves better than this. The American people deserve better. The liberals have been in control of both Houses of Congress for 46 of the last 56 years. And this is what it's come to: My friends, it's time for a change. It's time to have a Congress that stands up and pays attention to the American people and their agenda, not to the agenda of the liberal special interests in Washington. And a great way to start is by sending more Republicans to the House of Representatives and Beau Boulter to the United States Senate.

And there's one last issue, yes, more important than even all the other crucial matters we've already discussed. Ladies and gentlemen, just a few years ago, I wonder how many of us could really have believed then that so many of our fondest hopes and dreams for America could come true?

And of all those things that have happened, how many of us could have imagined 8 or even 4 years ago that one day a President of the United States would have an opportunity to stand, as I did a few months ago, there in the Lenin Hills at a podium at Moscow State University and tell the young people of the Soviet Union about the wonder and glory of human freedom? I was well-received. But I was amazed later to discover not all the student body could fit into their auditorium, so they had seen that all who did were members of the Young Communist League. And yet they seem to respond pretty good to talking about individual freedom.

But with the beginnings of change we've seen in the Eastern bloc and with the development of concepts like the SDI that destroys weapons, not people, it's just possible that we have a chance now to end the two great nightmares of this century and give our children a future free of both totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

What a great moment we have before us, and, oh, how future generations will dishonor us if now, in a moment of sudden folly, we throw it all away. And this is what is now at stake. We must hold to this moment of hope, and we must be allowed to complete that which we have begun.

And when I say ``we,'' I mean you. You can determine the future of our nation and the world. That is what America means: a nation that is in your own hands. Think of how different you are and how much more privileged than so many of those Soviet college students that I addressed. Unless they get into and rise in the Communist party -- and few ever do -- they have little or no voice in how their nation is run. Not you, not if you vote; there's no more precious right in the world. So, take the world, take history in your hands this November, and join us in our crusade for a bright and shining future for this bright and shining city on a hill we call America.

I just want to point out to you one thing: All of you between the ages of 18 and 24 now constitute the biggest voting bloc in the country. But surprisingly, you have the lowest voting percentage of any age group in the country. So, what I'm asking you today is not only pledge yourselves that you're going to register if you haven't -- it isn't all that difficult -- and then you're going to vote, but also be missionaries. Buttonhole others that may not have thought the same as you and tell them that you in that youthful age group can determine the future of the United States by how you cast your votes and the fact that you do cast votes. The late Will Rogers many years ago said: ``The people in public office are no better and no worse than the people who send them there. But they're all better than those who don't vote at all.'' So, get out there and register and vote.

So, yes, some say that it is time for a change. Well, let me just remind you: We are the change. We started it 8 years ago, and we're going to continue it if you do the right thing at the polls on November 8th. And I think George Bush explained it correctly at the convention when he said, people that tell you you should change horses in the middle of the stream -- well, don't change to one that's going the opposite direction.

I'm supposed to say a thank you and get off of here right now, but I am -- my people just -- they're in terror of me because I have a new hobby. I collect stories that I can prove are told by the Russian people among themselves and that kind of show the attitudes to their government. And I've been collecting them, and I'm going to leave you with one that I told to General Secretary Gorbachev.

The President. Thank you, Jim, and thank all of you very much. It's a great pleasure to be here at NASA's Johnson Space Center, to be here with the men and women who are leading America upward in her climb to the stars. It's important to remember that it is not some impersonal technology that puts our astronauts in space. It's the dedication and expertise of thousands of men and women of vision, people like you who see no limits, only possibilities.

The truth is, our space program doesn't invest in machines; it invests in people. And you don't only launch rockets, you launch dreams. This is the age of technology, but technology is only a tool. Ladies and gentlemen, you are the space program, and America is proud of you.

And soon the world will be watching as five brave Americans lift off from Earth on the space shuttle Discovery. America is going to space again, and we're going there to stay. Commander Rick Hauck, pilot Dick Covey, and mission specialists Pinky Nelson, Mike Lounge, and Dave Hilmers are space-age pioneers, but their spirit is rooted deep in our heritage. We're a nation born of pioneers, and we'll always create our future on the frontier.

Our early settlers knew great risks and made great sacrifices, but with their sacrifice, they moved the frontier forward and built a great nation. Neither can we stand still nor be content, and we're not afraid. Ill fortune can slow us down, but it can't stop us. You can delay our long trek to greatness, but you cannot halt it. How better can we pay tribute to those who came before us than by continuing their quest for knowledge, their struggle against limits, by continuing to push toward the far frontier?

And when we launch the space shuttle Discovery, even more than the thrust of Discovery's great engines, it will be the inspiring courage of our heroes and the hopes and dreams of every American that will lift the shuttle into the heavens. And may the hand of God bring it safely back to Earth.

And when the Discovery takes off, seven precious souls will soar beside it, the seven heroes of the Challenger. With their lives, they moved a nation. They summoned America to reach higher still, as they wrote man's destiny into the stars. We pledge ourselves to pursue their vision of mankind's infinite, limitless destiny.

And there's a place for everyone in this future: Technology does not leave people behind; it carries everyone along. I've seen throughout my life that as the technology advances it becomes easier to use, not harder; and the benefits become more universal. Today our satellites make it possible to watch the Olympic games live from Seoul, Korea; to rescue downed fliers and shipwrecked sailors; to predict the path of hurricane Gilbert; and to monitor arms control agreements between the superpowers. And these are just the first moments of a great new era that we're entering.

I believe the American people today are casting their eyes toward space with greater eagerness and anticipation than ever before. An entire generation is rediscovering their interest in space, the interest they had as children when -- in the 1960's, in grade schools throughout our country -- they watched on television, together, the lift-offs of Glenn and Shepard. And as for our young children, the children of the 1980's, well, I can tell from the letters they send me that they're ready to go and that the sky is not the limit.

A young author in Poland has written a book of fables in which he describes countries in terms of color. ``The United States,'' he says, ``is blue, like infinity. The possibilities are endless.'' Well, I would agree. And I would agree that for America the deepest blue, infinity, is found in the endless possibilities of space.

The commercial development of space will unleash a new age of entrepreneurship for companies large and small. There'll be new medicines, new materials, new products, and a communications revolution. The vibrance and creativity of the free market will plumb the full range of possibilities that lie ahead. The dramatic advances in technology mean that what today we can only dream of will be by tomorrow not only feasible but inevitable.

You know, back in Washington, in the Oval Office, I have a sign with a simple four-word message that I keep on my desk. And all of you embody that message. Those simple four words: ``It CAN be done.'' Can America develop an aerospace plane that will be able to take off from a runway and go into orbit and then land on any corner of the globe in a couple of hours?

And you and I know that we're the nation that must do it, because in the next century, leadership on Earth will come to the nation that shows the greatest leadership in space. It is mankind's manifest destiny to bring our humanity into space; to colonize this galaxy; and as a nation, we have the power to determine whether America will lead or will follow.

I say that America must lead. The Nation that has achieved the greatest human freedom on Earth must be the Nation to create a humane future for mankind in space, and it can be none other. It is only in a universe without limits that we will find a canvas large enough for the vastness of the human imagination.

Mankind's journey into space, like every great voyage of discovery, will become part of our unending journey of liberation. In the limitless reaches of space, we will find liberation from tyranny, from scarcity, from ignorance, and from war.

I also want to take this opportunity to thank Frank Fahrenkopf for the outstanding job he's doing as chairman of our party. And let me recognize a man who's leaving the great State of Texas to answer the Nation's call as our newest Secretary of Education, Larry Cavazos.

Well, a greeting like the one you've just given me really does make me humble. But then I guess you all know there's a special place deep in my heart for Texas. I've been all through this glorious State. Every time I come here, I'm reminded of the words of that great old song: ``Like a storybook ending, I'm lost in your charms.'' Nancy and I agree that when our time in Washington is done, there's no storybook ending we'd like more than to waltz across Texas with you.

I'm also fond of Texas because I have so many good friends here like Bill and Rita Clements and Phil and Wendy Gramm. Bill and Phil, you've proved that Republicans can win Statewide races; and through your efforts, and the efforts of hundreds of Republican volunteers, more than 1 million Texans voted in the Republican primary in 1988. Yes, the old Republic of Texas is fast turning into the new Republican Texas. And I'm sure that will even be truer on November 8th.

Texans have served in this administration with great distinction, particularly my good friend Jim Baker. Jim was responsible for some of the finest victories of this administration. Well, now, Jim, as I said when you left, I expect you to do it for a guy who is, I have to admit, my very favorite Texan -- and you all know his name. And there is another Texan who has worked both in our administration and the Senate, and he's the first Republican elected to statewide office since Reconstruction. He was a leader in the Senate of the fight for a stronger defense. He was one of our arms negotiators in Geneva. He's a giant of our party, of the Senate, of the world: Senator John Tower.

You know, we've been reminded recently of the importance of pledging allegiance to our flag and to the Republic for which it stands. But I'll bet that every Texan on this platform quietly throws in an extra pledge in there to the Lone Star State and the republic for which it stands, too. This republic stands for the very things that have made America a light unto the nations: the bedrock principles of family and freedom, peace and prosperity, a strong community, and a strong America.

Texans have been through a rough patch lately, but instead of griping and looking for handouts, the Lone Star State is fighting back and winning. The State's economy is growing again. And to hasten that process, I've just signed a measure Phil Gramm worked very hard on, a measure to repeal one of the biggest mistakes in social policy this country ever made, the so-called windfall profits tax. That tax sure was a windfall -- a windfall for liberals and their government programs, that is.

Well, in 1980, thanks to people like you, those folks felt the winds of change at their backs, and those winds blew them all the way home to Georgia. [Laughter] The windfall profits tax is the kind of thing we've come to expect from the liberals.

It's not just bad tax policy; it's an example of two different ways of looking at the world -- ours, committed to limited government and freedom; and theirs, which confuses good government with big government.

We've been dedicated to lowering taxes and liberating the American economy from the regulations and confiscations of the malaise years. When we came into office families everywhere were bleeding from tax rates that sapped our nation's initiative. We took that money out of the grasping hands of the Washington bureaucrats and put it back in the wallets of the people from whom they took it in the first place -- the working men and women of America. The results have been amazing. In the past years we've seen an explosion of hard work across this country, people putting their shoulders to the wheel and shifting their entrepreneurial energies into overdrive. And now more Americans are hard at work today -- 62.7 percent of all Americans, 16 years of age and up. That is a higher percentage of that citizenry than ever before in the history of the United States of America.

Texans know the value of hard work. The main reason we can all be full of optimism about the future in this State is that you all know the dignity and purpose of a job well done. Well, I've just come from another place, Washington, DC, where some liberals seem to think that work is a dirty word.

It's our task not only to preserve our prosperity but also bring it to people who have not yet shared it. We Republicans believe that the key to solving poverty is hard work. And that's why we want to replace welfare with workfare and get people off the dole and into the work force. But many liberals in Congress are complaining about workfare. They think the only thing wrong with the current welfare system is that it doesn't have enough money.

Texans know that the bedrock of a strong America is a strong family, and that we must raise our children well if the future is to be bright. We believe that parents need help in that noble task -- must be allowed to choose the right care for their children. And Texans, whose commitment to family is legendary, seem to have it all figured out. You look to the family for help, you look to grandmothers. Now, look at what the liberals have done. They've written a bill that gives assistance not to the parents but to the person who provides the care. And that means if you want to leave your child with his or her grandmother during the day, grandma will have to be licensed under Federal standards if she's to qualify for Federal aid for helping raise her grandchild.

But then, what can you expect from people who often seem to concern themselves with the rights of criminals and forget about the rights of the people the criminals prey on? We believe justice demands that a crack dealer with a machine gun who murders a police officer in the line of duty should give up his life as his punishment. We must protect our protectors and that means the death penalty for these vicious killers.

If you ask me, there are no Americans braver, and no citizens more precious, than the men and women who guard us -- our State and local police. But the liberals oppose the death penalty in every case. They're more interested in the rights of the murderer than the basic human rights that a criminal destroyed -- a police officer's right to life.

And that brings up another fundamental difference between us and the liberals. They do not believe that the unborn have a right to life. With all our hearts and souls, we do. And we pray this nation will turn away from abortion and choose adoption instead. Saving innocent lives -- we believe there's nothing more important than this.

These fundamental differences, this clash of visions, we see at work in our foreign and defense policies, too. The ideas that hold sway over the Democrats these days would make Lyndon Johnson and Sam Rayburn shake their heads in wonder and confusion.

There are people in this room who knew and learned from these two men, people like Phil Gramm and me who watched in horror as their once-proud party, which used to stand for economic growth at home and expanding the frontiers of freedom abroad -- a proud bull with a passion for justice and liberty -- became a stampeded steer, cowed by special interests at home and the enemies of freedom abroad.

The liberals have been all over the map about the B - 1 bomber, which is based at Dyess Air Force Base. Yesterday they were against it. And today, once their pollsters told them to change their tune, they're for it.

We've worked for freedom. We've fought the toughest battles of our administration over the issue of aid to the valiant freedom fighters who are seeking to liberate Nicaragua from the darkness of the totalitarian night. Those freedom fighters are the best hope we have for stanching communism in Central America. Texas is on the front line in that fight, because Texans will be the first to feel the gale force of the winds if the hurricane of communism sweeps north.

But that's part of a larger problem. The liberal leadership has always been critical when we found it necessary to use military force, whether in the Persian Gulf, or Libya; or yes, even in the liberation of the freedom-loving island called Grenada. Well, I have no regrets. And I'll tell you now, I'd do every one of these things all over again, and I bet George Bush would too.

Treasury-Postal bill is the fourth Fiscal Year 1989 appropriations bill to be enacted into law. It provides funds at levels similar to those I proposed in my Fiscal Year 1989 budget. The Congress completed action on this bill on time and within budget and generally preserved our priorities. I urge the Congress to do the same with the remaining appropriations bills before the new fiscal year begins on October 1.

Act also provides a well-deserved 4.1 percent pay raise for most Federal civilian and military personnel. To ensure that the Federal pay increase is consistent with reduction of the Federal deficit, I urge the Congress to continue to provide in the appropriations bills that departmental and agency budgets must absorb the cost of the pay raise.

I must, however, note my objections to section 619 of H.R. 4775, which purports to forbid the implementation or enforcement of certain agreements between the United States Government and its employees. This provision raises profound constitutional concerns. Indeed, a provision in last year's omnibus continuing resolution (Public Law 100 - 202) identical to section 619 was recently declared unconstitutional by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia. The Court concluded that restrictions on the implementation or enforcement of nondisclosure agreements required of Government employees with access to classified information impermissibly interfered with my ability to prevent unauthorized disclosures of our most sensitive diplomatic, military, and intelligence activities.

President of the United States, I have the constitutional responsibility to ensure the secrecy of information whose disclosure would threaten our national security. Our Nation's security depends upon our success in diplomatic, military, and intelligence activities, and that success depends upon our ability to protect the Nation's secrets. The Supreme Court has recognized my authority in this area. In accordance with my sworn obligation to preserve, protect, and defend the Constitution, section 619 will be considered of no force or effect unless and until the ruling of the District Court is reversed by the Supreme Court.

Well, thank you. You know, when you reach what the French call ``a certain age,'' you discover there are a few things that keep you young. There's fresh air, a beautiful sunset, Sam Donaldson's [ABC News] yelling at you in the White House Rose Garden. [Laughter] Of course, I can't help but tell you that there are a few signs of advancing years -- three particularly. One, you tend to forget things and -- I can't remember the other two. [Laughter] And one of the things that keeps me young is helping dynamic Republicans who are going to continue the great tradition of our party.

You have a great slate of candidates running on the Republican ticket this year, guys like Jim Smith; Tom Gallagher; and the fellow who's running a tough-as-nails race to become the next Representative from this very district -- and he'll make a super Congressman -- Ken Adams. And then there's Connie.

All Florida knows there hasn't been a more outstanding Congressman these past 6 years, and based on his record, you can be sure he's going to make a great Senator for the State of Florida -- your friend, my friend, and a friend to all those who yearn for freedom, Connie Mack.

I want to tell you why I think voting for Ken Adams and Connie Mack is so very important. When we fight for the death penalty and for revising the exclusionary rule and for judges who are tough on crime and on the drug traffickers in Florida and everywhere else, they are the kind of people who stand with us. These are the kind of people who have stood side by side with George Bush and me in the battle to make our economy grow and our nation to stand tall again.

The history books will reflect this. We stand for growth, not limits. We stand for a strong and dynamic economy at home, not protectionist gloom and doom. We've cut interest rates in half. We've created, as you've been told, more than 17\1/2\ million new jobs. And today there's something very interesting about that -- 62.7 percent of our countrymen, everyone male and female who is 16 years and up -- that percentage, they are employed, and that is the highest percentage in the history of the United States of America. When the history books are written, they'll say: They brought America back from the brink.

We know the limits of government. We also know its responsibilities, and we've fought for them. Yes, when the history books are written, ladies and gentlemen, we are the people of whom it will be said: They saved Social Security.

We know that we must not allow a second Cuba to sprout on the mainland of the Americas. We can be sure that those who worked against our efforts will be judged and judged harshly. And when the history books are written, they'll say that we did everything we could to free the people of Nicaragua from Communist tyranny.

We know the importance of sustaining and expanding upon our unique and special commitment to our closest democratic ally in the Middle East. Yes, when the history books are written, they will say: These were the people who formed an important strategic relationship outside NATO with the proud and democratic State of Israel.

Later today I'll be meeting with Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze, and we'll continue our efforts to ease tensions throughout the world. And here, truly, is one for the history books. They will say: These were the men and women who eliminated an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

But history tells us what the last 8 years have made very clear: It was only because we rebuilt our defenses and made clear that we and our allies would not waver in our resolve that the Soviets realized they had to come to the table.

Before we took office in 1981, the world was reeling from a series of events that seemed to place the free world in jeopardy. In Europe and Asia, Soviet medium-range missiles were threatening the territory of our allies. There was only one way to get the Soviets to pull those missiles out, and that was to deploy some missiles of our own. Now, I told the Soviets that we wouldn't deploy ours if they pulled theirs out; and liberals all over the world said it was a publicity stunt, that I didn't mean it, and that we should accept whatever deal they offered us.

It was one of the most important diplomatic efforts of this administration. The mission was a triumph; the missiles went in. And 2 weeks ago that man watched as the first of our missiles was destroyed. His name is George Bush.

Okay, let's talk about competence. I just happen to think that the former captain of the Yale baseball team; the youngest flier in the Navy with 58 combat missions; the former Texas wildcatter who turned down a soft job on Wall Street to make his own way; the former Member of the House of Representatives from Texas; the former Republican National Chairman.

Hang on, there's more -- the former Ambassador to the United Nations; the former de facto Ambassador to China; the Director of Central Intelligence; and the current Vice President of the United States, who's handled every tough issue from deregulation to drugs to terrorism -- frankly, I think the fella with that resume has it all over anybody else in the competence department.

The great victories of 1980 and 1984 were based on the votes of millions of independents and rank-and-file Democrats who came our way. Their votes -- especially those independents and traditional Democrats -- that is the key battleground. And here we have an advantage because on economic, social, and foreign policy issues, those conservative-minded Democrats agree with us.

A party that once stood for the broad interests of America's working men and women has become a party fixated on the narrow agenda of the liberal elites and special interest groups. Yes, I would say to rank-and-file Democrats, a once-proud party of hope and affirmation has become dominated by strident liberalism and negativism. The party of ``yes'' has become the party of ``no'' -- ``no'' to help for those fighting to keep Central America safe from communism, ``no'' to liberating Grenada, ``no'' to a negotiating stance that has brought us the first nuclear arms reduction treaty in history, ``no'' to the foreign policy of strength and purpose that has told the truth about communism and helped bring the first signs of change to the Soviet Union in seven decades.

I would also say to those good Democrats here in Florida: In all these ways, the liberal leadership of your party in Washington has been saying ``no'' to you. And now it's time for you to start saying ``no'' to them. And the best way you can do that is by saying ``yes'' to the Republican Party.

You may remember that in January, when I went up on Capitol Hill for the State of the Union Address, I talked about some of the problems caused by the liberal leadership in the Congress. I mentioned that in 7 years, of 91 appropriations bills scheduled to arrive on my desk by a certain date, only 9 made it on time.

But today Congress and our administration are working to keep it from happening again. I want to receive by the beginning of the new fiscal year, October 1st, all the Government's appropriation bills -- ones that I can sign. Our administration will pull out all the stops on our end to see to it that this happens. I believe there is a good chance all of the Government's appropriation bills will reach my desk by October 1st, and if so, it will be the first time the Nation's business has been done on time since 1948.

The liberals have controlled one or both Houses of Congress for 36 of those 40 years since 1948. And my friends, the next President deserves better than this, and so do all the American people. Let's spare him this. In February, to get contra aid approved, we only need 5 more votes. To get some of our crucial budget votes passed, we need only a few more votes. My friends, this year I say Florida can do it: Florida can send a Republican Senator named Connie Mack and more Republican Representatives like him to Congress and give George Bush what he needs -- a new Congress, a better Congress, a Republican Congress.

And you know, it didn't bother me a bit. In fact, I kind of liked it. They couldn't get all the students in the auditorium, so they picked the students that could come. And after it was all over, I found out they had picked all members of the Young Communist League. Well, they heard something about freedom; and you know, the funny thing is, they seemed to react pretty favorably to it.

What a great moment we have before us; and, oh, how future generations will dishonor us, how the history books will judge us, if in a moment of sudden folly we throw it all away. And this is what is now at stake. We must hold to this moment of hope, and I tell you with every ounce of energy and every fiber of my being: Only electing the Republican ticket can accomplish that. So, let's go forth then, you and I, to elect George Bush, to give him Connie Mack in the United States Senate and Ken Adams in the House, to tell the American people what's really at stake: the fate of generations to come, the hopes of peace and freedom for our children and grandchildren, for all the children and grandchildren of the world.

I'm going to do something my people are always afraid I'm going to do. I did do it for a few of you before I came in here. But I've got a new hobby. I'm collecting stories that I can prove are made up by the people in the Soviet Union and told among themselves. It shows they've got a great sense of humor and also they've got a kind of cynical attitude about their system. I told a couple of those stories to General Secretary Gorbachev, and he got quite a laugh. The second one I told was about an order that was given out. Now this is their story.

An order was given out by the Government that anyone caught speeding in the Soviet Union must get a ticket, no matter who it was. Well, that's significant because, you see, most of the automobiles in the Soviet Union are driven by the bureaucrats in government.

President today accorded Joseph F. Salgado the personal rank of Ambassador in his capacity as the United States Representative to the 32d Session of the General Conference of the International Atomic Energy Agency.

Yesterday the House of Representatives passed the bipartisan Omnibus Drug Initiative Act of 1988 by a vote of 375 to 30. The overwhelming vote in favor of the legislation reflects the strong commitment of the American people to ridding our society of illegal drugs. We urge the Senate to act swiftly on the legislation.

House bill contains provisions that will strengthen substantially our ability to detect, try, and punish those who are engaged in drug trafficking and related criminal conduct. Under the House bill, drug kingpins and those who are responsible for drug-related deaths will themselves face the death penalty. The bill will also significantly improve the search for truth in the criminal justice system by revising the so-called exclusionary rule that in some circumstances keeps evidence seized in good faith by police officers from being used in court against criminals such as drug offenders. Among the bill's most important provisions are those holding drug users accountable for their drug abuse. The American people have zero tolerance for illegal drugs.

Mr. President, what do you think you've accomplished in improving the relationship over these years? Excuse me. What do you think you've accomplished? What is the most important thing that you've accomplished since your first meeting with Minister Shevardnadze?

The President. I know we haven't time to have a press conference here, but I think I can answer that by simply saying that I think on virtually every subject that we have discussed, we have made sizable progress.

During the two days of detailed and frank discussions, the sides thoroughly reviewed progress in implementing the agreements and understandings reached by President Reagan and General Secretary Gorbachev at the Washington and Moscow summits. They noted that, although important differences remain on certain issues, both sides are convinced that solutions are possible. The record of achievement since the November 1985 summit in Geneva attests to this: goals that seemed impossible have been reached, and other important goals have been brought within sight. Continuity of effort, consistency of purpose, and commitment to a process of candid dialogue aimed at finding practical and enduring solutions to problems will be as indispensable in the months and years ahead as they have been over the last three years.

Toward this end, Secretary Shultz and Foreign Minister Shevardnadze agreed that the negotiators and experts of the two sides will continue to seek progress across the agenda set forth by President Reagan and General Secretary Gorbachev in their Joint Statements from the Washington and Moscow summits. These statements comprise a detailed and concrete program of action for building a more stable and sustainable relationship between the United States and the Soviet Union, and for contributing, with other nations, to a world at peace.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister noted the active and serious effort underway to resolve outstanding issues in the Geneva nuclear and space talks. They received updated joint draft texts of a Treaty on the reduction and limitation of strategic offensive arms and its associated documents. They welcomed the further elaboration since the Moscow summit of these drafts.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister also reviewed the negotiations to work out a separate agreement concerning the ABM Treaty, in accordance with the joint statements issued at the Washington and Moscow summits. They noted certain progress achieved in the preparation of an associated protocol during the current round of negotiations in Geneva. They instructed their negotiators to intensify their efforts in preparing the Joint Draft Texts of the separate agreement and its associated protocol. They also agreed to continue discussion concerning space-based sensors.

Verification Experiment (JVE) at the nuclear test sites of the U.S. and the USSR, which demonstrated an unprecedented degree of cooperation and openness on verification of nuclear testing limitations. They directed negotiators to finish the new verification protocol for the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty, which is nearly complete, and the new verification protocol to the Threshold Test Ban Treaty. They agreed to work for the earliest submission of these documents for ratification, and to continue stage-by-stage negotiations toward the objectives specified by the leaders at the Washington and Moscow summits.

The sides reaffirmed the objective of concluding as soon as possible a global convention on the comprehensive prohibition and destruction of chemical weapons, encompassing all CW-capable states. In reviewing progress toward this goal, the sides exchanged views on such issues as laboratory synthesis of super toxic chemicals for medical and research purposes, bilateral data exchanges and other confidence-building measures. They agreed that the tenth round of U.S.-Soviet bilateral consultations on chemical weapons will take place in Geneva from November 29-December 15. The sides expressed deep concern about the recurrent use of chemical weapons, in particular against civilian populations. They shared the view that the expanding proliferation and use of chemical weapons continue to impart a sense of urgency to their discussions and highlight the absolute necessity of negotiating an effective and verifiable CW ban. They reaffirmed their support for the role of the UN Secretary-General in carrying out prompt investigations in order to ascertain the facts of such use. They further agreed that U.S. and Soviet experts would meet on December 16, 1988, for a new round of talks on measures to halt the proliferation of chemical weapons.

The sides also stated their serious concern about the proliferation of ballistic missile technology and announced that, pursuant to the Moscow summit joint statement, U.S. and Soviet experts will meet on September 26 in Washington to discuss this growing problem.

The sides held a thorough discussion of both progress to date and continuing problems in the area of human rights and humanitarian issues. The Secretary and the Foreign Minister underscored the value of regular bilateral discussions on these issues and the need further to develop constructive dialogue.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister expressed the special importance their governments attach to achieving promptly a balanced conclusion to the Vienna Follow-Up Meeting of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE), and called on all participating states to work intensively toward this end. They reaffirmed the necessity of an outcome at Vienna which encompasses significant results in all of the principal areas of the Helsinki Final Act and the Madrid Concluding Document and which further strengthens the CSCE process.

The Secretary and the Foreign Minister also stressed the importance of the ongoing effort with other states to resolve remaining issues on a mandate in order to begin as soon as possible a new negotiation with the objective of enhancing stability and security in the whole of Europe at lower levels of armed forces and conventional armaments.

Secretary and the Foreign Minister welcomed the increasingly active contribution of the United Nations to regional conflict resolution, especially the effort to achieve a durable settlement of the Iran-Iraq war. They also favored further efforts aimed at bringing peace to Cambodia. They agreed that U.S. and Soviet experts would continue to meet as appropriate to support the search for peaceful solutions to regional conflicts.

The two sides welcomed the continued development of bilateral cooperation and interchange as set forth in the Moscow summit joint statement, as well as further development of contacts among defense and military officials. They strongly believe that expansion of bilateral ties on the basis of mutual benefit is in the interests of both sides. The Secretary and the Foreign Minister exchanged views on prospects for developing trade and economic relations, and reiterated the goals set forth in this field in the Moscow summit joint statement.

Three hundred and five years ago, 13 families from the city of Krefeld on the Rhine River landed near Philadelphia. In the 3 centuries since then, more than seven million other Germans have followed them to America in search of freedom and a more prosperous future for themselves and their children. Today nearly one in every four of us can trace our ancestry to German forebears. These facts, and our recognition of everything that Americans of German descent have achieved for our Nation, give all of us ample cause to celebrate on German-American Day, 1988.

German-American bonds of international friendship are stronger than ever. As partners in the NATO Alliance, the United States and the Federal Republic of Germany work side by side to maintain peace and freedom. Allied unity and resolve made possible the successful conclusion of the U.S.-U.S.S.R.

Republic of Germany share a common, deep-seated commitment to an open and expanding world economy. The personal ties between our nations now extend beyond immigration to include lively foreign exchange programs, booming tourism in both directions, and the presence in the Federal Republic of Germany of American military personnel and their dependents. Our mutual resolve in the common defense of Western liberty is exemplified by the great city of Berlin and its brave residents.

Kohl's visit to Washington earlier this year visibly reaffirmed the priority our governments have long assigned to preserving and fostering German-American relations. Common traditions, shared convictions, and mutual interests commit us to strengthening cooperation at every level to meet the challenges of the future. The recently completed German-American Friendship Garden, which will be dedicated on the Mall in our Nation's Capital this autumn, symbolizes the close and friendly relations between the Federal Republic of Germany and the United States. It also reminds us of the need to cultivate our special ties so they might further prosper.

This will be my seventh and final appearance as President before the U.N. And on each of these occasions, as with each time I've represented America in my trips overseas, whether to the Berlin Wall or the demilitarized zone in Korea, to the canals of Venice or the Palace of Versailles in France, to the Great Hall of the People in Beijing or St. George's Hall in Moscow -- yes, whenever I've carried our flag into meetings with foreign leaders -- I have felt a special pride. We Americans have so much of which to be proud, so much that others can only dream of, most of all our freedom and our democracy; and we stand for so much that is good and decent and honorable in the world.

I step up to the podium on Monday, I will see before me the representatives of nearly all the countries on Earth. Some, like Western European nations, Canada, and Japan, are longstanding democracies, major industrial powers, and good friends. Others, like the Philippines, South Korea, and many countries in Latin America, are fledgling democracies with economies that hold great promise, even if -- as is the case in the Philippines right now -- those economies are troubled. Others struggle toward democracy or economic strength, or both. And too many others still live in lands that know neither. My message this year to the delegates of the United Nations will be a message of hope.

Nowhere is this clearer than in U.S.-Soviet relations. Just 8 years ago, our critics at home were calling our plans to restore America's strength a threat to world peace. These were often the same people who later criticized our rescue mission in Grenada, when we freed that tiny island nation from the grip of a Communist tyranny, or who were to condemn our strike against Qadhafi's Libya. And, yes, in the fall of 1983, when the Soviets walked out of the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces talks in Geneva, many of these same critics said we were to blame. Our firm stance in negotiations and the resolve of our allies precipitated the breakdown in the talks, they said. And they criticized our zero-option proposal that called for the elimination of an entire class of U.S. and Soviet ballistic missiles. They said it was unrealistic and a sign that we were not serious about arms reductions.

Well, as you know, we continued to hold firm; and finally the Soviets returned to the bargaining table. Just a few months ago, Soviet General Secretary Gorbachev and I stood in the gilded splendor of one of the Kremlin's most splendid rooms and exchanged the instruments of ratification for the INF treaty, a treaty that will, for the first time in history, eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

At the U.N. on Monday, I'll talk about this and other successes for our philosophy of peace through strength. A firm show of strength by America and its allies has kept the vital international shipping lanes of the Persian Gulf open and was a key factor in pushing one of the bloodiest wars of this century to a cease-fire.

From Cambodia to Afghanistan to Angola, our strength, our assistance to those who would fight for freedom, has given both peace and freedom a new breath of life and given the people of those countries new hope. Yes, the world today is filled with realistic hopes for peace and freedom that would have seemed totally utopian just 8 years ago. After all, 8 years ago, who would have thought that a President of the United States could stand before an assembly of students in the Soviet Union and speak to them about the wonders of freedom?

The great question now is: What next? Where does the world go in the next 8 years and the next 80 years? What are the steps we might take toward a safer, better, freer world? And I'll have some thoughts of my own on Monday.

One thing is certain. If we're to continue to advance world peace and human freedom, America must remain strong. We must turn a deaf ear to those born-again patriots who talk about strength while serving up the same old menu of weakness. If we have learned anything these last 8 years, it's that peace through strength works.

The President. I think the simplest statement about the defense budget and who is to blame for what is happening is the fact that over a 5-year period the Congress cut $125 billion from the budgets I've presented, but added $250 billion to the nondefense spending.

After reviewing the current cease-fire in the Persian Gulf, which has been in effect since August 20, and consulting with allies and friends in the region, the President has decided to modify our present method of providing protection to U.S.-flagged shipping in the Gulf. The modification entails a change from a tight escort procedure to an ``accompany'' regime. In an accompany regime, U.S. forces will be positioned such that they can take appropriate action if U.S.-flagged ships are directly threatened.

In making these adjustments, we would reiterate that the United States intends to maintain in the Gulf the forces required to protect U.S.-flagged shipping and support our national objectives. These changes in no way alter our commitment to freedom of navigation in the Gulf.

Americans view with respect and rejoicing the progress and prospects of our more than 100 historically Black colleges and universities. In the past century and more, these institutions have enabled countless students, many of them disadvantaged, to discover and utilize their capabilities and to seize the world of opportunity afforded by higher education. We can be grateful for the alumni of these schools, for their historic contributions, for their continuing achievements, and for the distinction that is theirs in every field of endeavor across our country and around the globe.

We can all be grateful, too, as this observance brings to mind a movement of decisive national significance in which many students and graduates of historically Black colleges and universities played a large role. The courage and witness of thousands of students from these institutions were key components of the civil rights movement. Their words and action sparked America's conscience and helped lead to the ending of legal sanction for racial discrimination and segregation.

Black colleges and universities now benefit from the broad recognition they have earned and from closer ties with one another, with research centers, and with private enterprise. These institutions have built a base of scholarship and accomplishment that channels a wealth of talent and creativity into the service of the well-being of Black Americans and the strength of our entire Nation. On the foundation of emancipation in the aftermath of the Civil War, historically Black colleges have erected an impressive edifice of educational experience and excellence. Their legacy of learning and their sustained success will surely remain a tribute to their students, staffs, graduates, and friends and a blessing for every American in the years to come.

Although on balance the Act merited my approval, the Congress has not demonstrated the fiscal responsibility with this Act that it exercised with the previous four appropriations Acts for the coming fiscal year. This Act appropriates $680 million more than I requested and brings the Nation $198 million closer to a Federal budget sequestration under the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings law. This congressional overspending cannot continue if the Nation is to avoid the uniform, across-the-board cuts that a sequestration inflicts equally on lower priority programs and on the high priority programs upon which many Americans depend.

Congress included in H.R. 4867 another extension of the moratorium on granting oil and gas leases for certain areas of the Outer Continental Shelf. The Congress increased the damaging effect of the moratorium by extending it to apply to grants of permits for drilling and exploration activities under leases already granted. For the Congress to prohibit the issuance of such permits to those who already had obtained leases is unfair.

Many provisions of H.R. 4867 reflect a growing and disturbing trend on the part of the Congress to include unconstitutional committee approval or veto requirements in appropriations bills. This Act includes, for example, provisions purporting to require the approval of congressional committees for (1) changes in Forest Service regional boundaries, or movement or closure of regional offices, (2) changes in the Forest Service appropriations structure, (3) reduction of personnel in the Indian Health Service, and (4) assessments against certain programs and activities.

In granting authority or making appropriations by law, the Congress may not reserve to its committees approval or veto power over the exercise of that authority or the expenditure of those appropriations. The reservation of such power to congressional committees clearly conflicts with the constitutional principles the Supreme Court enunciated in INS v. Chadha, 462 U.S. 919 (1983). The Executive branch will continue to provide committees the notification and full consultation that interbranch comity requires in matters in which the Congress has indicated such a special interest.

Finally, two provisions of the Act purport to require the Executive branch to submit requests for supplemental appropriations to replenish certain expended Department of Interior funds. The Constitution grants exclusively to the President the power to recommend to the consideration of the Congress such measures as he judges necessary and expedient. Because the Congress may not by law command the President to exercise in particular circumstances the power that the Constitution commits to his judgment of necessity and expedience, such provisions have been consistently treated as advisory, not mandatory.

America's creed of liberty has never been expressed better than in the words of the Book of Leviticus emblazoned on the Liberty Bell, ``Proclaim liberty throughout all the land unto all the inhabitants thereof.'' The American people have long recognized that the liberty we cherish must include the freedom to worship God as each of us pleases. We can all rejoice in noting that a critical step in the history of this freedom was taken nearly two centuries ago this month.

September 25, 1789, the Congress proposed and sent to the States for ratification a series of 10 Amendments to the new Constitution. This Bill of Rights would safeguard and perpetuate the rights and liberties for which the American people had fought the War of Independence and the States had ratified the Constitution. Because of the First Amendment's vital clauses -- ``Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; . . .'' -- the 199th anniversary of the introduction of the Bill of Rights is a fitting time to begin a week in celebration of religious freedom.

The religious liberty described in this Amendment is the protection of religion and conscience from government interference. It creates neither hostility between government and religion nor a civil religion of secularism. The fundamental principle of religious liberty, that government can neither forbid nor force the people's practice of religion, was essential to the founding of our Nation.

Washington proudly called this policy ``enlarged and liberal'' and ``worthy of imitation.'' Through the years, Americans of goodwill have echoed these sentiments, seeking freedom, brotherhood, justice, and reconciliation. We will always do so if we continue to revere the First Amendment's protection of religious freedom.

I am returning without my approval H.R. 1154, the ``Textile Apparel and Footwear Trade Act of 1988,'' a bill that would have disastrous effects on the U.S. economy. It would impose needless costs on American consumers, threaten jobs in our export industries, jeopardize our overseas farm sales, and undermine our efforts to obtain a more open trading system for U.S. exports.

This bill represents protectionism at its worst. The supposed benefits of the bill would be temporary at best. Protectionism does not save jobs. Only improved competitiveness can truly protect jobs, yet there is nothing in this bill that would encourage domestic industries to become more competitive. At a time when American exports are booming, the United States must not embark on a course that would diminish our trade opportunities.

Arrangement -- the multilateral agreement that sets the rules for trade in textiles -- in order to strengthen our ability to control textile and apparel imports. That task was accomplished on August 1, 1986.

Under this Arrangement, we have negotiated tough, new agreements with our largest textile trading partners. Nearly 1,500 quotas, in addition to textile and apparel tariffs averaging almost 18 percent, make this industry the most protected sector of our economy. Indeed, textile and apparel imports increased only 2 percent in 1987 and have decreased almost 10 percent during the first 7 months of 1988. There is no need for further protection from imports.

At the same time I am sensitive to the difficulties that families and communities face because of internal restructuring in the textile, apparel, and footwear industries. This bill would not stop these trends. They are the inevitable result of a dynamic, expanding economy. The best way to help displaced workers is to retrain them for new jobs. Thanks to dislocated workers assistance, Trade Adjustment Assistance, and the Worker Readjustment Assistance Program I proposed, many services are now available for workers who must shift jobs as the economy adjusts to competitive challenges. Our goal must be to retrain and move dislocated workers into the industries of the future, not to maintain them in noncompetitive and inefficient facilities at all costs.

Our free and fair trade policies have created 17 million new jobs in the past 6 years. The percentage of the working-age population now employed is the highest in our Nation's history. Exports are running at record levels, and our manufacturing industries are stronger and more competitive than they have been in a decade. H.R. 1154 would threaten these gains by setting off a dangerous chain reaction of retaliation and counter-retaliation in the international trade system.

Three years ago I announced an aggressive, growth-oriented trade strategy aimed at opening markets currently closed to American exporters. Since then we have challenged unfair trade practices around the world and negotiated trade agreements that have created significant export opportunities for American firms. In August I signed into law the ``Omnibus Trade and Competitiveness Act of 1988,'' which provides additional tools for prying open closed foreign markets. And today I am approving legislation to implement the U.S.-Canada Free Trade Agreement, a historic trade pact that will create the world's largest free trade area. The protectionism of H.R. 1154 is the antithesis of the free trade principles of these two laws.

America's export opportunities have never been brighter and our prospects for continued economic growth have never been better. Increased trade means more jobs and a better standard of living. It would be a tragic mistake to change course now that American businesses have regained their competitive edge and are winning sales around the globe. Accordingly, I am disapproving H.R. 1154.

This agreement brings down the tariff walls between our two nations and, in so doing, creates the world's largest free-trade area. Businesses and consumers in both our countries will have unprecedented freedom to choose among a staggering array of goods and services. It'll mean lower prices for consumers, jobs galore for workers, and new markets for producers. It'll stimulate investment in both economies, which will mean the rapid advancement of new technologies. It means a stronger and freer marketplace for the United States and Canada. There'll be a rich flow of agriculture and energy resources from one country to the other in a way that will profit both. We also deal with the service sectors of our economies, providing for the first time an explicit assurance that in such areas as accounting, tourism, insurance, and engineering our peoples will be free to choose their suppliers.

U.S.-Canada Free-Trade Agreement, which recognizes the similarities between our economies and our political systems, also respects our different histories, aspirations, and densities -- the reality that Canada and the United States are two distinct variations of a common theme of freedom, democracy, and human rights. As leaders of the free world, Canada and the United States are pointing the way toward the future. Canada's visionary Prime Minister, Brian Mulroney, and its able Ambassador, Allan Gotlieb, understand well that free trade is an idea whose time has come. One of the signs of this change is the very passage of this bill. We must make sure the freedoms we enjoy include the freedom to choose at home and the freedom to be chosen abroad. This nation, which was born to nurture human freedoms, must take the lead in establishing the principle that one of the most important human freedoms is free exchange.

That principle was the animating force behind the sterling work of Ambassador Clayton Yeutter [U.S. Trade Representative] and former Treasury Secretary James Baker. The cooperation among them, the administration, and Members of Congress on both sides of the aisle was decisive. The congressional leadership promised and delivered prompt action, and the result was overwhelming approval by both Houses. They deserve the Nation's thanks for a job well done.

This legislation reflects overwhelming support for the elimination of barriers to trade between the United States and Canada. It reflects the sound economic principles of free trade that benefit American businesses and workers.

That is why we look forward to continuing the midterm review of the Uruguay round [multilateral trade] negotiations in Montreal later this year. This agreement is a model for those talks to follow. Just as the pessimists were wrong about this agreement, so will the pessimists be wrong about the Uruguay round. Today we not only commemorate this legislation as the happy conclusion of a bilateral pact but pledge our commitment to the successful completion of the Uruguay round by 1990. The midterm review will be the most important trade matter in the last months of this administration, and I urge our trading partners to be ready to do business in December. We sure will be.

Let the 5,000-mile border between Canada and the United States stand as a symbol for the future. No soldier stands guard to protect it. Barbed wire does not deface it. And no invisible barrier of economic suspicion and fear will extend it. Let it forever be not a point of division but a meeting place between our great and true friends. This bill is the product of the vision of the American and Canadian people, who are leading the way toward a new era of freedom. Now, I thank you. May God bless all of you. And I shall now sign this agreement.

Now, it goes without saying that I'm sorry to see Jim go. He's made an outstanding contribution to our administration and our nation these last 8 years. He was part of the team that showed up for work on our first day in office. He started at OMB, where he was our first Administrator for Information and Regulatory Affairs and the Executive Director of Vice President Bush's Presidential Task Force on Regulatory Relief. He then spent 4 years as Chairman of the Federal Trade Commission, returning to OMB in October 1985 as Director. In each post, he served with distinction. In his first stint at OMB and as the head of the FTC, he played a leading role in removing the shackles of excessive regulation from our economy. I believe that a great deal of the credit for our recovery goes to that effort. Since becoming Director of OMB, he has been at the center of our battle to bring the deficit down. And it says something that it's been coming down almost from the day he took over.

It will be hard to fill Jim's shoes, but if there's a man to do it, it's Joe Wright. And Joe is also what the Navy calls a plank holder. He's been here from the very first day and has been Deputy Director of OMB since 1982. Joe has headed our management improvement programs, which are among the least heralded but, for my money, most important accomplishments of our administration. He has also chaired the board that oversees our inspectors general and their employees. If there's any man who can say that he has saved the American people billions of dollars in our campaign against waste, fraud, and abuse in the Government, it's Joe Wright. And, like Jim, Joe has also been up to his neck in our budget negotiations with Congress. Joe, you're already aboard, so I won't say, welcome aboard, but I will say it'll be great to know that your sure and steady hand is on the tiller at OMB.

Now, for those of you who don't work here, let me say, welcome to the White House complex. White House complex -- that's because nothing in Washington is ever simple. But as all of us here know, particularly Jim and Joe, there is nothing in this city of puzzles that is more complex, more obscure, more of a puzzle than the budget process.

And the budget process is why we're here today. You are the ones who are changing this never-ending government game of Dungeons and Dragons -- and changing it for good. You are showing those who thought they had a monopoly on Washington wisdom and who said that the budget process was an impossible scrabble and who said that anyone who tried to reform it would do it only at his or her own risk -- you are showing them they didn't have a clue. And that's why, in my book, you should go to the head of the class. With your help, we are overcoming, at last, 40 years of government, and particularly congressional, indecision, mismanagement, and delay. The history here is astounding. I doubt that there's 1 American in 10,000 who knows how bad things had become or how hard and long we in our administration and our friends in Congress have fought to fix them.

But think for a minute of the record of the last 40 years. Since 1948 not once have all of the Government's appropriations bills been passed by Congress, forwarded to the President, and approved by the start of the fiscal year. Only once were all 13 appropriations bills even out of Congress when the fiscal year began, and that was 10 years ago. Some departments have been running with stopgap funding for years. Treasury, for example, has had only one appropriations bill in the last 8 years. For the rest of the time, it was funded entirely through continuing resolutions, a practice which, among other things, can disrupt major contracts and undermine the critical business of the Government.

And the warning's been taken to heart. Already Congress has passed and I have signed six appropriations bills: Energy and water, HUD, Labor and HHS, Treasury and Postal Service, Interior, and military construction. I also expect to receive three other bills shortly: Transportation; foreign operations; and Commerce, Justice, and State. And that will leave just three bills with which we have problems. Congress and our administration are working together to iron out the differences and finish the Nation's business when it should be finished. I've said many times that I want to receive all the remaining appropriations bills, ones that I can sign, by this Friday. On our end of Pennsylvania Avenue, we're pulling out all the stops to see that this happens.

And when I sign the last of these bills, I expect that my thoughts will turn to a special American. Forty-one years ago, just before the Government started down the path of never getting its business quite done, a man came to Washington who was destined to become one of our great Senators. Today, on the eve of his retirement, he is chairman of the Senate Appropriations Committee and second ranking majority member of the Armed Services Committee. He has been a supporter of our drive to restore America's strength. He's working with us as we fight to restore the integrity of the budget process. And that's exactly what the issue is: integrity -- making sure all the cards on how the Government is spending the American people's money are on the table for the American people to see.

John Stennis is a man of integrity, and he is a patriot. He knows how much it means to our nation's future to get the budget process back on schedule. I'm dedicating our drive to finish the budget process on time this year to Senator Stennis. And I hope every Member of the Senate, as well as the House, will think of their votes on timely appropriations bills as a way to salute Senator Stennis and to thank him for 41 years of service to our beloved land.

And to each of you, let me also say thank you. You are the unsung heroes of this momentous change in how Federal business is conducted. Without you, it wouldn't be happening. Because of you, our nation will be stronger in the years to come.

Miller. Thank you, Mr. President. Thank you for those nice things you said about me. You can't imagine the importance of your support and confidence in me over the last several years in boosting my morale. I certainly look forward to working with new colleagues: Jim Buchanan, Bob Tollison and Richard Fink, David Kaplan, Mark Crain, and Betty Tillman. But when we talked this morning, I indicated to you this OMB staff is something very, very special in Washington. It is the cream of the crop, and I have been mightily privileged to be associated with them. They work without waver. They work endless hours. They work with enormous loyalty to the Presidency, and they have served you well.

President, in choosing Joe Wright as my successor, you could not have chosen more wisely. Joe is a loyal, knowledgeable, indefatigable leader, and I am sure that he will provide the best leadership for OMB in the coming months. And I assure you, moreover, Mr. President, of a smooth transition. The transition will be as smooth as a muddy, shallow lake in the calm day in Georgia or in Virginia, either one. [Laughter] You won't miss me, Mr. President, it will be so smooth.

Mr. President, thank you for the challenge and the opportunity to have served you these past years. Eight years ago, before your election, I signed on to the Reagan-Bush team, and I have cherished every second of that opportunity. It's been the most rewarding of my career. I would not take anything for it. I feel about my experience working for you, Mr. President -- and I've drawn this analogy before -- it reminds me of when I received my Ph.D. from the University of Virginia, and unlike Joe Biden, I really am the first in my family to have received a college education. [Laughter] And when I received my Ph.D., my mama came up to me and threw her arms around me and said: ``Jimmy, this is something no one can ever take away from you.'' And I feel that about my experience working for you. Thank you, Mr. President.

Director Wright. Well, Jim, let me start out by saying that's not true. We'll miss you a great deal -- a great deal. In your 1978 campaign, Mr. President, you stated: ``I pledge to you to restore to the Federal Government the capacity to do the people's work without dominating their lives. I pledge to you a government that will not only work well but wisely.'' That was at the 1980 convention, and you cannot imagine the impact that had on a great number of us that decided: Now, that is the administration that we want to be in. That is the person that we want to come in and work for and follow.

I had the pleasure of spending my first year in your administration under Secretary Mac Baldrige. He was truly a terrific person and a good Cabinet officer. But I had no idea what a wonderful challenge it would be until I joined OMB 6 years ago -- in following your policies because at that time we were losing $1 billion to $1\1/2\ billion a week to the deficit as a result of the recession that you inherited from your predecessor. But the bank that I was in before -- if that would have happened, you would have devalued the portfolio of the predecessor and then started fresh. But we couldn't do that, so we started working with diligence to get that deficit down.

As a result of the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings bill, the balanced budget agreement, and, Mr. President, your slogan of just say no to tax increases, by golly, we were able to go ahead and make the most significant reduction in the deficit that's happened. And we're still working on it, and we will win on that deficit. It will come down. During the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings and balanced budget agreements, Jim Miller was right out there in front the entire time. Mr.

But while also doing that, I had the excitement of being your point man, for example, on the welfare reform bill that was just passed. And I think it's absolutely amazing that we could get meaningful work requirements as part of the reform of our welfare system. And we couldn't have done it without you.

It's a tremendous achievement. Also on the housing bills, the highway bills -- and to also have the true privilege of following your guidance on the Reform '88 management improvement program -- as when you said we did not come in here, Joe, to just make changes; we came in here to make fundamental changes in the way the Government operates.

President. It's an important time right now, preparing your last budget and hopefully George Bush's first, working with the National Economic Commission as they come in with their recommendations. I am honored that you selected me for this task, truly honored.

I've got to say that I've got the most competent group of professional work force and workhorses in front of you that you've got in the entire Federal Government -- the professional staff of the Office of Management and Budget.

Americans are naturally proud of their practical genius; their love and mastery of domestic crafts, handed down from generation to generation, are among our prime national virtues. Throughout American history, one such craft has been the art of sewing. National Sewing Month, 1988, celebrates the American tradition of sewing in the home and salutes the estimated 90 million citizens who partake of its challenges and rewards.

Home sewing is an enjoyable and productive pastime that serves a variety of useful purposes. For instance, it inspires people to pursue sewing-related occupations; sewing skills learned at home or during more formal instruction help foster lifelong careers in fields such as fashion, pattern-making, retail merchandising, and interior and textile design. Many people find that home sewing is a boon to friendship among neighbors, or a good way for caring citizens to assist their fellowman through volunteer projects. Sewing's closest link to most of us, however, is undoubtedly its familiarity as a part of daily life in the home. That is because the sewing circle has so often been a link between grandparents, parents, and children; in its pleasures and satisfactions are found both a sense of individual accomplishment and an intuition of a larger human endeavor.

American Indian Heritage Week, 1988, offers us a fine opportunity to reflect upon the profound, many-sided, and lasting impact of American Indians and their forebears on our Nation, history, and way of life. During this time, we can all join American Indians and Alaska Natives in celebrating their ancient and diverse heritages. We can also thank them for their achievements in every area of endeavor.

Those achievements continue today. Despite past periods of conflict and changes in Indian affairs policies, the government-to-government relationship between the United States and Indian tribes has endured. The Constitution, treaties, laws, and court decisions have consistently recognized a unique political relationship between tribal elected governments and the United States. We look to a future of increasing economic independence and self-sufficiency on Indian reservations, and we support efforts to foster greater Indian control of Indian resources.

May our national observance of this truly special week in tribute to American Indians inspire us to seek a deeper understanding of our past and a wider hope for the future we must walk together in this great and bounteous land.

Immigrants from nearly every nation on Earth have taken part in the founding, settling, building, and defending of our land. Prominent among the proud list of our forebears and fellow citizens are Polish Americans, and we can all be grateful for the opportunity given each of us by Polish American Heritage Month, 1988, to recognize their accomplishments.

These achievements have permeated every aspect of American life. The most special characteristic of the Polish people, wherever they may be, has always been a loyal and courageous passion for faith and freedom. Poland's devotion shines so brightly through the centuries, in years of peace and in times of hardship, war, and occupation, that it inspires the people of free nations to a deeper appreciation of their liberty and the people of captive nations to a higher plane of hope.

Poland has given humanity much through the genius of such giants as Copernicus, Madame Curie, Henryk Sinkiewicz, Joseph Conrad, Chopin, and Paderewski. Poland has likewise given America much -- through patriotism like that of Pulaski, witness like that of John Cardinal Krol, and the innumerable contributions of generations of Polish immigrants and their descendants. Poland's legacy continues to bless America and all mankind in countless ways today, especially through the leadership and example of Pope John Paul II, Nobel Peace Prize winner and Solidarity Labor Federation leader Lech Walesa, and other lovers of faith and freedom.

Polish Americans is on the march in every continent today, because freedom is a universal and eternal cause. As we celebrate Polish American Heritage Month, 1988, we celebrate the promise of freedom, the power of faith, and the best in America's history and future.

Forty-two years ago, just after World War II, America began the National School Lunch Program -- a partnership in which State and local governments were to administer Federal food assistance in schools around our country. Today, after more than 4 decades, this program has helped provide good nutrition for millions of American students. National School Lunch Week gives all of us a chance to recognize the vision and concern of everyone associated with this project through the years and to congratulate the many citizens who continue to make it a success.

We can all be proud of the skills, devotion, and hard work supplied to school lunch programs nationwide by parents, school and community officials, and nutrition staffs. These Americans do everything necessary to make sure that the students of their areas enjoy the sound and satisfying lunches that are so important to the school day. Let us all be sure to express our gratitude and appreciation for these efforts, and to offer our cooperation as well -- during National School Lunch Week, 1988, and always.

On his 11th-century voyage to ``Helluland, Markland, and Vinland,'' Leif Erikson exemplified virtues universally admired throughout world history. This explorer with a missionary spirit challenged the unknown with courage and faith. He triumphed, and his example has inspired many another to do the same. On Leif Erikson Day, 1988, we recall and revere the achievements of this man and of the Nordic people who have followed him to North America through the centuries.

Leif Erikson Day we also salute all Americans who have left their homes abroad, arrived on our shores after much struggle, and built a new life in this land of freedom and opportunity. Like Leif Erikson, none of them could be sure of success; but, like him, they were willing to take on and conquer adversity. Through the generations they and their descendants have helped America meet many challenges -- the cultivation of the land and the construction of cities, the winning of our liberty and independence, and the defense of our country's cause.

Leading a cavalry assault at the siege of Savannah, he was mortally wounded. But the cause for which he fought so courageously was to prevail, and his immortal example of service and sacrifice was to inspire lovers of freedom around the globe forever after. America does well to pause in remembrance on the anniversary of General Pulaski's death and to swear eternal allegiance to the principles of liberty and justice he held dear.

Casimir Pulaski had also fought for liberty in Poland, his native land. When victory eluded the brave Polish people, he sought a kindred cause and found it in America. There ``the shot heard 'round the world'' had sounded warning to tyrants and hope to mankind. Like Polish patriots to this day, Pulaski knew that freedom's call is universal -- that a battle for freedom anywhere is a battle for freedom everywhere; that liberty is diminished everywhere as long as tyranny reigns anywhere. In fighting for America, General Pulaski fought also for the unalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness -- rights that America had boldly declared, rights that God had granted Americans and Poles and all humanity alike.

America's struggle for freedom was victorious, thanks to Casimir Pulaski and to countless men and women like him. Tragically, freedom has not yet come to some nations, and it has been snatched from others. But freedom is on the move. Just as General Pulaski stood with us, so will we continue to stand for liberty throughout the globe. So will we stand for the people of Poland, in whose hearts faith and freedom and the spirit of Pulaski burn ever brightly. Let our observance of General Pulaski Memorial Day, 1988, remind us of all this Polish hero and his fellow Poles have done for America; let it remind us as well that his work and ours, the cause of freedom, goes on today and every day.

World Food Day, the United States joins 150 other nations in reaffirming our determination to end world hunger. We Americans are a generous people, and we are blessed with the liberty and the bountiful natural resources that make prosperity and opportunity possible. Through private and public efforts, we gladly share our abundance in the fight against hunger; we have done so more generously than all other countries combined. This year, we are sending about $1.4 billion in food commodities abroad to help the hungry.

Some estimates suggest that one third of the people of the developing nations lack enough food to lead active working lives. That must change. Clearly, more needs to be done. Permanent progress in this regard will not be achieved, however, unless, along with remedial assistance, needy nations receive a transfusion of incentive- and market-based ideas. The tide of freedom and democracy now sweeping the globe offers the greatest long-term promise for success in the fight against hunger and economic stagnation.

Finding a lasting solution to world hunger requires agricultural and trade policies with one irreplaceable ingredient: freedom. Freedom alone can build economic progress, cooperation, and stability for nations at every level of development.

We need to move toward a time when government intervention no longer distorts individuals' production and trade decisions. We also need thriving international markets to which all farmers have broad access.

That is something for all of us to remember this year especially, when World Food Day focuses on rural youth. These young people often migrate to the cities. We must develop policies that will encourage and enable them to remain in their agricultural and rural communities and improve their families' food productivity and income. Stabilization of developing countries' agricultural base accompanied by structural reforms to increase farmers' earnings are crucial steps in the drive to conquer hunger worldwide.

During congressional consideration of H.R. 2342, my Administration expressed serious concern about Section 30 of the bill, which might have been misconstrued to call for inappropriate competition by the Coast Guard Auxiliary with private sector towing operations when rendering nonemergency assistance to disabled vessels.

September 22, the House of Representatives passed a bill containing a number of essential provisions. Of particular importance, the House-passed bill permits the Federal death penalty for drug-related murders, significantly improves the search for truth in the criminal justice system by reforming the exclusionary rule, establishes requirements for drug free-workplaces, and increases the accountability of drug users to society for their drug abuse.

Senate has not scheduled drug legislation for consideration. I strongly urge the Senate to schedule the drug bill for consideration forthwith to ensure that effective legislation to combat illegal drugs is enacted before Congress adjourns. The health and safety of Americans depends upon it.

Now, unless someone else has broken the news already, before we begin I'd like to tell you that at 11:37 the space shuttle Discovery lifted off at the Kennedy Space Center, and it's now headed into orbit. And America is back in space. We're now looking forward to the successful completion of the Discovery mission and the safe return of her five-member crew. We salute the bravery of Rick Hauck, Dick Covey, Pinky Nelson, Mike Lounge, and Dave Hilmers; and we ask God to bless this important voyage. They sure were considerate in their timing -- just gave me time to get out here without being late.

Well, all of you are the people that she was talking about. She was talking about this country where last year total charitable giving exceeded the combined profits of all the companies on the Fortune 500 list. That's the kind of country America is.

One of the great joys for me during my nearly 8 years in office has been the rare chance I've had to see the American people at their best -- their commitment, their compassion, and their concern for one another. These values are so powerful and abundant in our land. America has been blessed in so many ways, but isn't it great that our greatest blessing, really, is that we have each other? There are few things more inspiring than the pure generosity of a neighbor's helping hand, that distinctively American spirit which says: We can; we care. That generous spirit is what the citation program is all about.

I should say, the ambassador's wife whom I just mentioned would, I know, be very thrilled to see how other countries are joining in. The first International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives was held in Paris 2 years ago. We got a call that they wanted some people to come over and tell them how it's done.

Well, last year, during the economic summit in Venice, I had the chance to address the first gathering of Italian business leaders who were developing this concept in their own country. And just this spring, the first British-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives was convened, with his Royal Highness the Prince of Wales and Prime Minister Thatcher in attendance. So, what you are all a part of has become a different kind of international conspiracy: a conspiracy of compassion. And the work being done by Americans is also changing lives not just in the United States but around the world.

I can't tell you how much it means to me to know that the work that all of you are doing will continue and expand. You know, in the last 8 years charitable giving in this country has nearly doubled. And more new voluntary programs are being started, literally, every day. Now our Board of Advisors on Private Sector Initiatives is working with our nation's business schools to plant the seed corn for a new generation of corporate support for voluntary programs, and in many instances, it is the students themselves who have taken the first steps. So, thanks to people like you, America's future is one that is bright and filled with generosity and compassion.

Before closing, I want to recognize our Board of Advisors on Private Sector Initiatives for their help and especially to thank John Phelan for his leadership. Also, I want to thank Eddie Fritts for his support and Bill Taylor for his untiring dedication to this effort. Bill, I know that you and the American Society of Association Executives devoted great time and resources to help administer the citation program and to make it such a success, and I know that under your guidance it will continue.

Combined Federal Campaign (CFC) allows Federal employees an opportunity to demonstrate their unmatched record of generosity and concern for the less fortunate. As leaders in the Federal government, it is important that we take visible leadership roles in the Combined Federal Campaign in our agencies.

Your personal interest, visible support, and participation are essential. Thousands of Federal employees participate, but many others remain on the sidelines. Make a special effort to encourage all of your employees, both in the Washington area and in all CFC locations worldwide, to support the Campaign.

This year's Combined Federal Campaign, the last to begin during my term of office, offers Federal employees the opportunity to continue an unmatched record of generosity and to show our concern for the less fortunate in the United States and around the world.

No matter where we are, whether here in Washington or serving in uniform far beyond our Nation's borders, the Combined Federal Campaign makes it possible for us to demonstrate the generosity that has made the United States of America the world leader in charitable giving.

For parents, nothing in life can be as important as knowing that the children God gives them are healthy and free to live and grow up safe from harm. For 6 decades, the American people have set aside Child Health Day each year to remind ourselves and the world that, as individuals and a Nation, we seek to ensure the good health of each and every American child. Our national observance of this day will fulfill that mission so long as we keep in mind our duty to safeguard our children's physical well-being; to shelter their God-given innocence; and to shield the unalienable rights to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness that are theirs as Americans and as human beings.

These duties are best met in the family, society's fundamental unit. But responsibility for the health and safety of youngsters often requires the assistance of the wider community, including, for example, the members of private groups, voluntary organizations, and religious orders who care for children; and government officials at the local, State, and Federal levels as well. Since the early part of this century, the Federal government has worked in partnership with all of these entities to protect the health and safety of children.

America has stopped many illnesses that once claimed children's lives. We have helped provide basic health care services to poor and underserved children. We have established systems of services for children with special health care needs, such as chronic illnesses, birth defects, and related conditions, so that these young people can remain in their families and take part in community life. We have also focused increased attention on reductions in premature and low-weight births, on nutrition and nutrition education, and on prevention of playground and street accidents.

We must also reduce the incidence of teenage pregnancy -- as well as the spread of venereal diseases and the HIV -- by giving young boys and girls good example and solid teaching about affirming life and avoiding sexual relations outside of marriage. And teenagers who do become pregnant need our help as individuals, families, and communities, to see them through their difficulties, not to condemn them or abandon them to the dead end of abortion.

Advances in technology continue to help us save the lives of many fragile infants and to rescue babies whose premature birth would once have meant certain death. We are also more and more able to treat children in the womb for a variety of illnesses and conditions. These developments demonstrate a stark contradiction in one aspect of our national child health policies -- the social environment that fosters often heroic efforts to save little ones whose parents want them, but denies legal protection to the unborn whose parents do not want them. We must restore the right to life and our respect for the dignity and worth of every individual.

As the Congress has recognized, secrecy is essential to success in the intelligence activities upon which the Nation's security depends. To maintain that essential secrecy, the programs and funding levels for which the Act provides are classified. The Act authorizes appropriations at approximately the level I requested in my Fiscal Year 1989 budget.

Thank you, Jim, and thank you all very much. And I'd like to just say a word myself about the late Al Mazewski. And, yes, I did know I was sitting beside her at lunch. And you all know he was a major supporter of the Polish Solidarity union, and he made such a contribution to our beloved America. Yes, we will always remember him.

From the sounds of the streets to the tidy homes that have passed from one generation to the next and the churches that anchor your great neighborhoods, you can sit on your front steps and see the world walk by and know that God has been good to America and that He certainly loves Chicago.

His Holiness Pope John Paul II came to Chicago 9 years ago, he was met by a vast audience of some 1\1/2\ million people. I know that many of you were there that October day in Grant Park. As the wind blew off Lake Michigan, the Holy Father spoke of our ancestors, and he said: ``They came from many different countries'' and had ``thrown their destinies together and now write a common history.'' Yes, to write a common history -- and for the past 8 years we've been writing what is one of its most exciting and remarkable chapters.

We've brought employment to an all-time high and are now in the longest peacetime expansion ever recorded in our nation. But our strength as a nation, as you all know so well, is that we can march into the future, leading the world into a new age of growth, technology, and innovation. But we can do so without leaving behind the vital moral foundation: the basic values of faith and family that make ours a great nation and on which all that we accomplish has been built.

Yes, the family is the bedrock of our nation, but it is also the engine that gives our country life. And it's the reason that we produce. It's for our families that we work and labor, so that we can join together around the dinner table, bring our children up the right way, care for our parents, and reach out to those less fortunate. It is the power of the family that holds the Nation together, that gives America her conscience, and that serves as the cradle of our country's soul.

You know, I've said before, there really are only two things the liberals don't understand: the things that change and the things that don't. The economy, technology -- these things change, and under us for the better. But America's basic moral and spiritual values -- they don't change.

Some of you favor the Cubs, and others favor the White Sox. [Laughter] But in fact, as I watched a certain debate this past Sunday, it struck me that the difference between the liberals and Wrigley Field is that the liberals are still in the dark. You know, after the debate, I had to say, Isn't that just like an ACLU member? He didn't even have a prayer when he needed one. And this is only the beginning; after the next debate, I think we'll be up 2 to nothing.

Well, the truth is that on issue after issue the liberals have, in the words of the writer G.K. Chesterton, submitted to ``the modern and morbid weakness of always sacrificing the normal to the abnormal.'' They've turned principles at the core of our common culture and common history into partisan issues that hang in the balance as we prepare to elect a new President and Congress.

Now, unlike some liberal organizations, we don't believe that separation of church and state requires ending the Catholic Church's tax exemption or removing the words ``under God'' from the Pledge of Allegiance. And we don't favor the right to retail what they call nonobscene child pornography, nor do we think that the criminal penalties for selling marijuana should be repealed. We don't think tuition tax credits for children in parochial schools are unconstitutional or that prostitution should be legalized or that children should be denied the right to begin their schoolday by joining with their classmates in a voluntary prayer. No, that's not what we believe. And I think it's time for us to say that America's most basic and fundamental values are not unconstitutional.

I'm not saying that all liberals agree with all of these views. But these issues -- and there are other examples -- raise an important question. You'll recall a few years back, political figures had to disassociate themselves from groups on the right with far-out right views. Well, isn't it now time for responsible people to do the same thing with far-out groups on the left?

Let me tell you what's exciting, what, in fact, is the big news of the 1988 campaign: that this campaign is developing on the issues and the American people are finding out what I said some time back -- that the politics of the opposition can be characterized as liberal, liberal, liberal! Now, I'm a former Democrat. But I think you know what I mean when I raise questions about the distinction between rank-and-file-Democrats and the liberal leadership of that party in Washington. The liberals may try to mouth some of our words, but when they talk about values and family, they mean something very different. For example, as part of their so-called profamily agenda, they have proposed a Federal child-care assistance program. But under the liberals' program, if you want assistance and wish to leave your child with his or her grandmother that day, Grandma will have to be licensed by the Federal Government.

Now, there are other values that we should think about this year. I hope I'm not the only one here old enough to know that today is an important date. Today is the 50th anniversary of the Munich pact, the naive gesture of appeasement that brought us the great nightmare of this century: the Second World War. The vain boast that we had achieved ``peace in our time'' was followed 5 months later by Hitler's invasion of Czechoslovakia and 6 months after that of Poland. The lesson from Munich is too clear and too important to be forgotten. That sad lesson is that to be weak is to invite war.

But even today there are those who've forgotten the ancient principle of peace through strength. And their innocence and naivete would put in question all that we've achieved since Vice President Bush and I took office, all the progress toward ending the twin evils of totalitarianism and nuclear terror.

Yes, they would break faith with anticommunist freedom fighters. They oppose a strategic defense against nuclear missiles. They would cancel essential defense systems and receive nothing in return. They're against the B - 1 bomber, and they would wipe out -- their proposed budget would eliminate two carrier battle groups from the Navy. And even when they say they now favor weapons like the new Trident missile and Stealth bomber, listen closely and you hear them whisper that it's just in theory that they favor these systems. They're not prepared to deploy them.

I remember the consequences of weakness, and I know you do, too. When freedom was threatened, it was boys on this block who took off their baseball caps and put on their helmets and donned their country's uniform and went to war. Those who would deny America the means to keep the peace have forgotten their history. They have forgotten our veterans and our war heroes, and they've forgotten the boys on this block. But America must not, and will not, ever forget.

Well, over the last 8 years, America has begun a great enterprise of resurrection. We've worked to recover the bedrock values that you and most Americans never departed from. We have rebuilt our defenses. Our country is at peace, our economy is strong, and our future is bright. When I took office, on any given day, fully half of our military aircraft could not fly for lack of spare parts. Half of our naval vessels couldn't leave port for lack of spare parts or crew. Well, all that has changed. And incidentally, if you haven't had a chance to see some of them lately, today's young people in uniform -- of all the things I'm proud of, I'm more proud of them than anything I've seen.

Well, what a great moment we have before us, and, oh, how future generations will dishonor us if now, in a moment of sudden folly, we throw it all away. So, let us go forth then, you and I, to tell the American people what really is at stake: the fate of generations to come, a hopeful vision of a world of freedom, and a bountiful future of reverence and peace for our children and all the children of the world.

So, yes, some say that it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen, let's just remember: we are the change. We started it 8 years ago, and we're going to continue it and extend it to Congress if you do the right thing at the polls on November 8th. I think George Bush had it right at the convention: If you have to change horses in midstream, doesn't it make sense to switch to the one who's going the same direction you are?

I can't leave you without admitting to you that I have a new hobby. I have discovered that the people of the Soviet Union make up stories, jokes, and tell them among themselves, which reveals they've got a great sense of humor, but also a little cynicism about their way of life. And just as I was coming home from the Moscow summit, I got another new one that was handed to me. This is their story, this is the way they treat it, and it shows a little difference between two systems.

The story has it that I and Gorbachev are in his limousine. And I had the head of our Secret Service unit, and he had his chief security man with him. And we were sightseeing. And we got out to where there was a waterfall. And we got out of the car to look at the waterfall. And the Secretary General Gorbachev said to my man, ``Go ahead, jump. Go over the fall.'' And my man said, ``I've got a wife and three kids.'' So he turned to his own man and said, ``Go on, jump. Go over the fall.'' And he did. And my man went down the rocks around the fall to see if he could be of help. And there he was down there wringing out his shirt.

Thank you very much. And, Jim, I thank you for that introduction. And thank you, Mike Galvin and Dick Morrow. And I'd like to say hello to Congresswoman Lynn Martin, who happens to be the Congresswoman where my hometown is -- or was. And my valued friend and old colleague, Howard Baker. And again, a special thank you to Jim Thompson for that marvelous introduction.

Seriously, it's a great pleasure to be here on the floor of the Merc because this is a place devoted to the future. And believe me, when you've had as much past as I have, you just love the future. [Laughter] Just think, only a few hours ago traders and brokers were waving their arms, screaming themselves hoarse, betting on the future. Come to think of it, they were a lot like the crowd in New Orleans during and after one of the finest speeches I've ever heard, given by one of the finest men I've ever known, a fellow by the name of George Bush.

Some people want to talk this year about competence. Well, I say, fine, let's talk about competence. I just happen to think that the youngest flier in the Navy with 58 combat missions, the Texas wildcatter who made his own way in the world, the Republican Congressman from Houston, the chairman of the Republican Party, the de facto Ambassador to China, the Ambassador to the United Nations, the Director of the Central Intelligence Agency, and the Vice President of the United States has it just about wrapped up in the competence department. We've all seen what a brilliant job he's done in the past, and I can promise you he's going to do an even better job in the future.

George and our party look to the future -- a future of continued growth, a future of expanded opportunity, a future of peace. I hear some people say it's time for a change. Well, ladies and gentlemen: We are the change. We began the change 8 years ago.

Now, let me talk a little bit about that change: We're in the 70th straight month of economic recovery. We've been dedicated to slashing taxes and liberating the American economy from the regulations and confiscations of the ``malaise'' years. When we came into office, families everywhere were reeling from tax rates that were sapping this nation's initiative. We took that money out of the grasping hands of the Washington bureaucrats and put it back in the wallets of the people from whom they confiscated it in the first place: the working men and women of America.

But you know, I have to interrupt myself right here with just a little anecdote from my previous days as Governor of California. I came into a situation there as Governor that was about the same as I came into in Washington a few years ago. But the difference between the two parties is evidence of this. We began to have surpluses, and about the fourth surplus was the biggest. And each time that we had a surplus, we gave it back to the people by way of the tax system. Well, this fourth one was big enough, and each time I would have to -- I'd find out first that we were going to have a surplus so that I could go public and tell the people what we were going to do with it.

I had a Democratic legislature, and then they couldn't quite take on the people after they'd heard that I was giving them back the money. [Laughter] And this particular day, a leader -- Democratic leader in the senate -- stormed into my office and hit my desk. And he said, ``Mr. President, giving that money back to the people is an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] I think that kind of sums up the difference between our two philosophies.

The result has been astounding. In the past years, we've seen an explosion of hard work and innovation across this country, people putting their shoulders to the wheel and shifting their entrepreneurial energies into overdrive. And now more Americans are at work today, an amazing 62.7 percent of all -- this is what is considered to be the potential employment pool -- of all Americans, male and female, from age 16 and up. And 62.7 percent of that group have jobs.

Yes, let's take a little journey back to the years before George Bush and I were sent to Washington. In just one year, 1979, Iran, Nicaragua, and Grenada were all lost. Our Ambassador to Afghanistan was murdered by Communist gunmen, and that country invaded by Soviet troops. And add to that what was going on at home.

The misery index -- which you determine by adding the rate of inflation to the rate of unemployment. And that had been invented in the 1976 election, and it was used by candidate Carter -- or President Carter against Jerry Ford. He used this because the misery index was 13.4, and he said no one has a right to ask to be President with a misery index that big.

Now, if only we could get Congress to follow Walter's example. Maybe you didn't hear me a moment ago. He's that 1,200-pounder who's lost 700 pounds -- if we could get Congress to follow Walter's example and cut the fat out of their diet. I think we ought to put them on a diet, a diet called the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. Now, you know when I'm talking about the Congress this way, present company is excepted -- [laughter] -- and a lot of her kind that are there on our side.

Well, back in 1979, Americans were waiting in lines a mile long to buy gasoline. And a President went on television that year to blame it all on the American people, telling them it was all their fault. They were suffering from some kind of malaise. Well, it wasn't the American people: It was the guys in Washington who had the malaise.

You can hardly blame them for trying to convince the country that good news is actually bad news. After all, what issues do they have to run on? Take defense -- they opposed rebuilding our military defenses. They opposed the deployment of the missiles in Europe to counter the Soviet threat. They opposed the liberation of Grenada. They opposed the raid on terrorist Libya. They oppose our policy of helping freedom fighters advance the cause of liberty around the world.

Well, now they're trying to get elected, and so they say the Nation's defenses are safe with us. Well, ladies and gentlemen, I've been Commander in Chief for almost 8 years now, and I've studied their record and their positions. And based on my research, I'm going forth with a message for the American people: When they talk about a strong defense, I don't buy it.

They oppose the death penalty, even for a crack dealer with a machinegun who murders a police officer in the line of duty. George and I fought to protect the noble men and women who protect us, and that means the death penalty for these vicious killers. If you ask me, there are no Americans braver and no citizens more precious than the men and women who guard us: our State and local police.

But the liberals, like their flagship, the ACLU -- [laughter] -- often seem to concern themselves with the rights of criminals and forget about the rights of the citizens those criminals prey upon. But now they want to get elected, and so they claim they're tough on crime. Well, I've examined that record, and we've all got to go out and tell the American people: When they say they're tough on crime, don't you believe it.

The liberals opposed our tax cuts, our tax reform efforts, our economic program that slashed interest rates in half and put America back to work. Now they say they want to help the American middle class. And what they're planning to do for the American middle class is to tax them. Well, the traders on this floor would understand what they're doing, and it's a message we all have to bring to our fellow Americans: The liberals are selling the middle class short.

The liberals have been slashing away at our nation's defenses while passing budget-busting bills through Congress -- $87 billion here, $23 billion there; and as Everett Dirksen might have said, pretty soon you're talking about real money. [Laughter] Every time they see a problem, they think a big government program run by bureaucrats in Washington is the solution -- the same bureaucrats who do so much to stifle individual initiative and economic growth.

I brought with me to Washington a little memory of what I had learned about a gentleman who had a job in Washington. He sat at a certain place, and documents and bills and so forth came to his desk. And he decided which department they should go to and initialed them and sent them on. And one day a classified paper came to his desk marked ``secret.'' And he initialed it and sent it on. In 24 hours it came back to him with a memorandum attached that said, ``You weren't supposed to see this. Erase your initials and initial the erasure.'' [Laughter] Well, now the liberals are talking about fiscal responsibility and how they'll pay America's debts. Well, once again, we've got to go out to the American people with a message: Don't look to a big spender to pay America's bills.

There's a solution to the spending crisis. That solution is so simple only a liberal could miss it. [Laughter] We just have to spend less. But big spending is as seductive as anabolic steroids, and it's time the big spenders were disqualified. We can accomplish that by giving George Bush what he needs to do the job: a new Congress, a better Congress, a Republican Congress. And people in this area can help get the job done by reelecting a terrific first-term Congressman from the Fourth District. He's got a tough race, but he's a tough-as-nails guy: Jack Davis. Send him back there.

We're working hard to solve the drug crisis in this country, but we're facing some resistance. Guess where? With the liberals on Capitol Hill, that's where. The House has passed a drug bill with a lot of good and tough provisions. But now that bill is stalled in the Senate. I tell you this: If the Senate were controlled by Republicans today, we'd already have signed into law that drug bill, and dealers and users everywhere would know this country stands united behind two powerful words: zero tolerance.

What it all comes down to is a clash of principles, of values, of visions. The liberals look at this country and see problems, woes, gloom and doom. And you know, that's the kind of thinking that can turn into a self-fulfilling prophecy. We look at this country, and we see expanded opportunities, a glorious future, a future in which this nation is strong, protected by land and sea and air and, yes, space -- courtesy of the Strategic Defense Initiative. We look to the future and see a nation healthy, a nation strong, a nation at peace. I know all of you want to send the Chicago Bears to the Super Bowl. Well, on November 8th, the American people will be sending the gloom-and-doom liberal bears into hibernation.

So, let us go then. Let's bring our messages and our optimism to every man, woman, and child across this great State and across this great nation. Let them know that a vote for us is a vote for peace, a vote for prosperity, and, yes, a vote for the future.

I'd hoped to return tonight to sign the last of the required 13 appropriations bills, but they're not all here. So, Congress is going to have to stay and work so that all remaining bills will be complete and in a form I can sign. So, goodnight, and pleasant dreams.

Last night I signed a bill that raised the debt ceiling to more than $1 trillion. It was necessary to do that to continue government operations. But it heightens the significance of this first day of the 1982 fiscal year, because on this day our economic recovery program begins.

The $1 trillion debt figure can stand as a monument to the policies of the past that brought it about -- policies which as of today are reversed. Tax cuts and spending cuts that take effect today will put America back on the road to economic recovery. In the next several years, we can create 13 million jobs, reduce inflation, and reward the spirit of liberty and enterprise that were responsible for our Nation's economic might. Our programs won't be instantaneous. The mistakes of four decades can't be turned around in 8 months.

There's recently been some improvement in the area of short-term interest rates. The prime rate has begun to turn down. Rates on treasury bills that were almost 16 percent when I took office are down to 14\1/2\. Fluctuations in the various economic indicators such as inflation and unemployment rates will probably continue for several months, but we will not be swayed from our plan by every changing current, every passing trend, or every short-term fluctuation.

In times past, administrations have failed to come even close to their spending targets, and the Congress has ignored its own announced spending ceilings. Those times are over. I will sign no legislation that would ``bust the budget'' and violate our commitment to hold down Federal spending.

This morning Congress was notified of our intention to sell AWACS aircraft and F - 15 enhancement items to Saudi Arabia. I have proposed this sale because it significantly enhances our own vital national security interests in the Middle East. By building confidence in the United States as a reliable security partner, the sale will greatly improve the chances of our working constructively with Saudi Arabia and other states of the Middle East toward our common goal -- a just and lasting peace. It poses no threat to Israel, now or in the future. Indeed, by contributing to the security and stability of the region, it serves Israel's long-range interests.

As President, it's my duty to define and defend our broad national security objectives. The Congress, of course, plays an important role in this process. And while we must always take into account the vital interests of our allies, American security interests must remain our internal responsibility. It is not the business of other nations to make American foreign policy. An objective assessment of U.S. national interest must favor the proposed sale. And I say this as one who holds strongly the view that both a secure state of Israel and a stable Mideast peace are essential to our national interests.

Q. Mr. President, one of the original arguments for your budget and tax cuts was that they would have an immediate psychological impact, that the economy would get better once the people saw these cuts coming. That hasn't really happened yet, and the drop in interest rates, while it has happened as you pointed out, hasn't been major. With the program taking effect today, when will the actual dollar impact be felt and when will the social safety net catch the people who depend on it for health care and school lunches and so on? When will they start feeling the impact of this net under them?

The President. Well, I believe the answers to all those questions have to do with the fact that there has been some psychological improvement. It has been commented on in a number of places across the country, of a different feeling on the part of the people themselves. But also, there are material evidences of it: the announcement which I have referred to before by the Iron and Steel Institute, on behalf of that industry, that it is going to embark on the largest program of expansion and modernization in the briefest period of time in the history of that industry. And they have stated flatly that they are doing it on their optimism, based on their optimism with regard to our program. I have heard from other business sources -- the National Chamber of Commerce and their wholehearted support of the program and what we're doing.

But you must remember that for the practical effect beyond that -- today begins, for example, the tax cut for individuals, but since the first year's tax cut is only 5 percent, that's going to be reflected in a somewhat increased take-home pay for most people, but it is not going to be overwhelming to begin with. And it's going to take some time before that's reflected in increased savings and an increase in the capital pool and so forth. Now, some of our business taxes are retroactive and go back to January 1st, but, of course, they won't be felt until tax-paying time.

But I am encouraged and do believe that there is a trust on the part of most of the people in this. As a matter of fact, the polls show, and the results of the response to my own address of last Thursday on TV has been running 3 to 1 in support of the program. But the other day in this room, Congressmen and Senators of both sides of the aisle told me that their own calls and wires were running 95 to 98 percent in support of our program.

Q. Mr. President, since Saudi Arabia has agreed to an American presence on AWACS, what do you think is the possibility now of Senate acceptance of the sale? And you seem to have been telling us right now that Israel should keep her hands off what we consider American national security matters in the Middle East.

Q. Mr. President, you made clear in your opening statement your intention of staying on course with a program that you articulated when you came into office. It assumes that if certain things happen that the States will be able to gear up and take over responsibilities which are being diminished in the Federal Government. It assumes that persons, people, will be able to fill in and do things on their own. Have you seen anything in the early signs on this fiscal new year that not everything is happening so smoothly, that there may be some temporary dislocations, some suffering and, if so, would that cause you to give any second thought to the short-range effects of your program?

The President. No, and I think that what you might be referring to is the somewhat obvious effort to portray these programs, already, as being harmful to people. And I have to think that we have to expect that there are certain areas in which those who administer the programs might -- as I experienced in California -- deliberately impose them in such a way that, justifying themselves as going by the book, they then pick out the cases that the programs were never intended to affect.

But let me just say that -- for example, we asked for 88 categorical grant programs to be consolidated into block grants for State and local governments. We only succeeded in getting 57, but those 57 were integrated into six block grant programs. Now, the effect of that is going to be -- well, I can show you. Knowing that I was going to be asked about some of this [holding up the two stacks of regulations for the press and the cameras], here are the regulations for those categorical grant programs -- 318 pages. And here are the six pages of regulations that will now apply to the nine block grants.

Granted that any program of any size, and certainly any government programs, are going to have some fallout and some errors and confusion. But what we've called the safety net is still in place, and the benefits are still maintained.

The programs are spending an average of over $15,000 per elderly couple. Over 102 million meals are going to be served and are being served every day under this program, and that's 15 percent of all the meals served in the country. Twenty-two million people were eligible for food stamps before the reform; some 21 million will still be eligible today. Now, some of those may have a reduction in the amount, the number of food stamps, but those will be based on their means and their outside income. And about 40 million individuals are still provided with over $50 billion in cash and in in-kind benefits in eight major public assistance programs other than social security.

So, whatever the fallout may be, I believe that -- well, for example, in administering the block grants, I think it's something like 105 million man-hours of labor and paperwork by local government officials will be eliminated by making those block grants.

Q. Mr. President, as I think you're aware, a number of black leaders in this country have expressed some reservations about your policies, not only economic policies, but other policies. And I wonder if you might have something to say today to reassure the blacks in this country concerning your attitude and your policy? And specifically, sir, whether or not you're in favor of extending the Voting Rights Act as it is now constructed?

The President. Well, I have not had an opportunity -- the report that I've been waiting for is on its way to my office and didn't get here before the press conference. But I am wholeheartedly in favor, let's say, in principle of the Voting Rights Act, because I believe very deeply that we've had experiences in this country -- and not alone on a racial basis -- of vote fraud and discrimination. And that's a sacred right that must be upheld, and I will uphold it.

I think that possibly there are some leaders of organizations in the black community who have followed the lead of others and have been attacking, from the very beginning, our programs. But I have been gratified by the support that is evidenced to me through mail, through calls, through personal meetings with members of the black community, that have told me they believe in the program.

Q. Mr. President, thank you. You've talked about the effect of your economic program being mainly something that will affect or be adverse to administrators, and I wonder if you could talk about some specific individuals in the country who may be getting some of their eligibility -- or you have programs reducing the eligibility requirements in some programs. What do you say to the single working mother whose eligibility for Medicaid and for food stamps has been cut? What would you like to say to her today about how she cannot provide medical care for her children or feed them with food stamps?

The President. I don't believe that we're actually doing that. I don't say that there won't be some cutbacks and reductions. And I think to any of us, if there's any reduction in income, it forces us to change some of our plans and reorder our priorities.

Where the cuts have come is around the periphery -- and some may be hurt more than others -- but where we have tried to find those areas where people have other income, in addition to their public grants, and therefore we can reduce some of that public grant. But those people that are totally dependent on government, that is our obligation, and nothing is going to happen to them.

The President. I would hesitate to say that I would or that they should do this, because these cuts were not just made on a basis of saying, ``Oh, let's take a percentage of their money away from them.'' We went into what -- in the planned military buildup -- that we believe is essential to our national security. What does each cut mean? What must we eliminate?

I would like to call to your attention that before the program even went into effect or before this $2 billion cut for 1982, Caspar Weinberger, the Secretary there, had already come up himself with $3\1/2\ billion in cuts in defense spending.

The President. Well, I have always hesitated to say -- I'll talk about vetoing in general principles, such as I will veto generally attempts to bust the budget. But I have always refrained from, and it's long before I came here, from talking of specifics. I would have to see a bill and what finally winds up on my desk before I would give an answer as to veto or not.

The President. It's very difficult for me to think that there's a winnable nuclear war, but where our great risk falls is that the Soviet Union has made it very plain that among themselves, they believe it is winnable. And believing that, that makes them constitute a threat, which is one of the reasons why I'm dedicated to getting them at a table not for arms limitation talks, but for arms reduction talks.

Q. Sir, on that same subject, that same general subject. Can you reassure our European allies and anyone else -- [inaudible] -- that you're not seeking military superiority over the Soviet Union or, in fact, is that the policy?

The President. We're seeking whatever is necessary to ensure that that ``window of vulnerability'' I've spoken of has been closed and that the risk has been reduced of there being a war at all. And I think our allies, largely in Europe, do know that. I also do think that there is -- or there are groups among our allies, as there is here in America, who are increasingly vocal in carrying their own message, and it is one there of pacifism and neutrality and so forth. I think they're very unrealistic, and if we listen to them, I think we'd all be in trouble.

Q. Mr. President, some of your critics are saying that by cutting taxes and at the same time spending more for the military you are, like Lyndon Johnson, saying it was possible to have guns and butter at the same time, and that it won't work for you anymore than it did with Johnson and that it will, indeed, damage the economy. What do you say to that?

And you don't even have to stop at that one. If you look at our reductions in capital gains tax, if you go back to the twenties when Mellon was the Secretary of the Treasury under Coolidge and was doing this, every time, that kind of a tax cut brings us back -- I've told, I think, some of you before -- to a principle that goes back at least, I know, as far as the fourteenth century, when a Moslem philosopher named Ibn Khaldun said, ``In the beginning of the dynasty, great tax revenues were gained from small assessments. At the end of the dynasty, small tax revenues were gained from large assessments.'' And we're trying to get down to the small assessments and the great revenues.

Q. Mr. President, well you've just sounded a theme that you've sounded many times, that the tax cuts will, in effect, be self-replenishing and produce more revenues than they take away. If that's true, why do you have these huge spending cuts? Some of your colleagues, like Congressman Kemp, say they won't be necessary because revenues will grow. If you think revenues will grow, why are you cutting the budget?

The President. We're cutting the budget because the Federal Government is taking too high a percentage of the gross national product to allow for prosperity. And if the government is taking money out of the people's pockets which they could use as they saw fit, to continue to support things that are not properly government's business or that are not cost effective, then you have an obligation to do away with those things and let the people retain their own money.

The President. No, our projections don't show that. There are two things. I mentioned the gross national product. We are also taking in taxes a higher percentage of the gross national product than has been taken in, other than in war time, in our entire history. And if you go back to the beginning of this century and the classic economists, you'll find that they, themselves, tied business slumps to those moments when government went beyond a certain level in its taking money from the people.

Q. Mr. President, the style of your administration is being called ``millionaires on parade.'' Do you feel that you are being sensitive enough to the symbolism of Republican mink coats, limousines, thousand-dollar-a-plate china at the White House, when ghetto kids are being told they can eat ketchup as a vegetable?

But also, you mentioned the china. Let's set that straight once and for all, because Nancy's taken a bit of a bum rap on that. There has been no new china for the White House since the Truman administration -- some partial augmentation under Lyndon Johnson, but not a full set of china. Now, breakage occurs even in the White House. I know that everyone's supposed to be walking around on feathers and that doesn't happen, but it does. And the truth of the matter is, at a state dinner, we can't set the tables with dishes that match. We have to have them mixed, so don't look too closely at other tables in there. And this was the result of an anonymous contribution, and the company making the china made it at cost. So there was nothing out of the taxpayers.

Q. Sir, you have been told by a number of Members of Congress, who say they have proof from intelligence they have, that the big central banks are totally responsible for influencing Paul Volcker of the Federal Reserve Board to keep the interest rates high. Now, they tell you that you can do something about this, despite the fact, we know, how separate the Federal Reserve is supposed to be from the executive and all that. Now, they say that the rates are now 10 percent above the inflation rate and that there's no ordinary reason for that. Now, will you do something about this?

The President. Well, those who say that, without trying to move in on the Federal Reserve, that we could do something are ignoring the simple truth of the marketplace. Those interest rates are based on the amount of money that is available for borrowing and the competition, the amount of people who want to borrow. And the truth of the matter is we will bring down inflation -- or bring down interest rates, when we bring down inflation, and when we can once and for all get the government out of the financial market and end its excessive borrowing, which is taking too great a percentage of the money that is available.

The President. Yes. But out in the open market where you go into sell bonds and so forth, and where corporations must go when they want to expand and borrow money, and individuals must go to borrow for a mortgage on a house, it is supply and demand and the competition that is generated by that. And we're hurt as much as anyone else. What has thrown our budget estimates off is the excessive interest we have to pay to borrow the money to pay for the deficit left us by other Congresses.

Q. Mr. President, you said a few minutes ago that you would not allow, you would not permit what happened in Iran several years ago to happen in Saudi Arabia. How would you prevent that? Would you take military intervention if that was necessary to prevent it?

The President. I'm not going to talk about the specifics of how we would do it, except to say that in Iran, I think the United States has to take some responsibility for what happened there -- with some very short-sighted policies that let a situation come to a boiling point, that there was no need to do that.

But in Saudi Arabia, I just would call to your attention that it's not only the United States, it's the whole Western World. There is no way, as long as Saudi Arabia and the OPEC nations there in the East -- and Saudi Arabia's the most important -- provide the bulk of the energy that is needed to turn the wheels of industry in the Western World, there's no way that we could stand by and see that taken over by anyone that would shut off that oil.

Q. Mr. President, if you're so certain that the American people are in back of your economic program, why the over concern on the part of the administration on how Wall Street reacts to it -- I mean, the constant banging away at Wall Street?

Q. Mr. President, the New York Times Sunday Magazine almost 3 weeks ago reported that unnamed Presidential strategists do not want you to give more than rhetorical support to the so-called social issues agenda; that is, such issues as abortion, busing, and voluntary school prayer. My question, sir, is do you plan to do more than give rhetorical support to the social issues agenda and, if so, what is it you plan to actually do?

The President. Well, if I had some I have less now that I've gotten that letter. But -- and that's sort of what Gary's question was, also -- it is true that we had had difficulty reconciling the stock market with the evidence that we were getting from business and industry, all the way from retail to manufacturing, about their optimism, their plans for expansion, and their outright support. Business organizations ranging from the National Chamber [of Commerce] on to various industry-type groups have been wholehearted in their support of us and what we were doing. So, it was hard to understand. But as they pointed out, if you really look at it, on Wall Street, these are people that are basing their own investment on what they see in the future.

Frankly, I think that it reflected less of a lack of confidence in us than it did in a pessimism that we wouldn't be able to get through the Congress the things we were trying to get. And that was based on long, sad experience. But now, I think that with a $35-billion cut in one package, asking for continued cuts, I think that they've got reason to be optimistic.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to take you pretty far from Wall Street to the People's Republic of China. There is a standing invitation here for you, as the American President, to go to China. In Peking they are talking about that possibility. In Cancun at that summit conference later this month, you will be there, and the head of government of the People's Republic of China will be there. What is your thinking now about traveling to Peking?

While I am signing this resolution, I want to make clear that it is only a stop-gap measure to keep the government running for the next few weeks, until the Congress acts upon regular 1982 appropriations bills.

The pattern of spending that is permitted by this resolution is far different from what the Congress or I would recommend. For example, defense spending will be held well below the levels I have requested. Spending for many other programs could, under this resolution, be far higher than I requested last March.

Furthermore, 1 week ago I outlined the steps needed to keep the Nation on the path to economic recovery. These steps include substantial reductions in 1982 budget requests so as to hold down spending and prevent a large increase in deficits. The new requests are below the levels I proposed last March and well below levels provided in the 1982 appropriations bills acted upon thus far by the House and Senate. My new proposals would reduce budget authority $26 billion below the levels proposed last March.

The Congress has made it clear during consideration of this resolution that the executive branch is expected to keep a tight rein on spending under the resolution so that we do not reduce the ability of Congress to consider fully the lower budgets I have proposed. The legislative history states that the amounts allowed to be obligated under the continuing resolution are to be considered as ceilings and not minimums. I expect all departments and agencies to follow this clear directive.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation One of America's great strengths is its private enterprise system. The personal and economic freedom enjoyed by our people turned our fledgling nation, in a few short years, into an economic dynamo that astounded the world.

As the foundation of our economic life, free enterprise depends on and serves every American. It is the enemy of poverty. It permits Americans to be the most compassionate of people, at home and to those in need abroad.

Through their insistence on the free enterprise system, our forefathers unleashed the creative energies of a people, built the foundation of our unparalleled political and economic freedom, and brought forth a vital force in the world.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Much of our history as a nation has been shaped by the ports of our sea coasts and inland waterways. Our early harbors fostered industry and trade and helped build many of America's great cities.

Today, our ports are an important resource in the Nation's economy. In 1980, the port industry handled almost two billion short tons of waterborne commerce in foreign and domestic trade. This commerce contributed over $35 billion to the gross national product and generated an additional $1.5 billion in services sold to users.

Recognizing their vital importance to America's economic health, State and local port authorities and private industry have continued to invest financial resources to improve port facilities to meet ever-increasing needs.

The growing demand for coal and other energy sources to fuel the economic growth of the United States and the rest of the industrialized world has presented the ports of this Nation with a unique challenge.

Many port authorities have begun and others have plans for the construction or expansion of harbor facilities. Some 70 million tons of annual capacity now under construction will result in a 50 percent increase over current capacity. By 1985 total investment in new or expanded facilities is expected to meet the projected demand of our industrial trading partners and to decrease our dependence on foreign oil.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Communities across the land have formed partnerships -- between disabled and non-disabled, labor and industry, employers and employees -- to assure that disabled people might share fully in the American dream. There is a real need for such partnerships and for these ties to continue and expand.

Employers throughout the country are opening their doors to qualified disabled workers. This is happening not just because of existing laws, but because disabled men and women have been establishing such fine work records. Yet not all employers have opened their doors equally wide. We must therefore continue our efforts to find more and better jobs for people with disabilities.

Gains have also been made in education, training, housing, transportation and accessibility. We need to make the 1980s years in which disabled individuals achieve the greatest possible access to our society, maximum independence, and full opportunity to develop and use their capabilities.

The President. As President, it's my solemn duty to ensure America's national security while vigorously pursuing every path to peace. Toward this end, I have repeatedly pledged to halt the decline in America's military strength and restore that margin of safety needed for the protection of the American people and the maintenance of peace.

During the last several years, a weakening in our security posture has been particularly noticeable in our strategic nuclear forces -- the very foundation of our strategy for deterring foreign attacks. A window of vulnerability is opening, one that would jeopardize not just our hopes for serious productive arms negotiations, but our hopes for peace and freedom.

Shortly after taking office, I directed the Secretary of Defense to review our strategy for deterrence and to evaluate the adequacy of the forces now available for carrying out that strategy. He and his colleagues, in consultation with many leaders outside the executive branch, have done that job well. And after one of the most complex, thorough, and carefully conducted processes in memory, I am announcing today a plan to revitalize our strategic forces and maintain America's ability to keep the peace well into the next century.

Our plan is a comprehensive one. It will strengthen and modernize the strategic triad of land-based missiles, sea-based missiles, and bombers. It will end longstanding delays in some of these programs and introduce new elements into others. And just as important, it will improve communications and control systems that are vital to these strategic forces.

Let me point out here that this is a strategic program that America can afford. It fits within the revised fiscal guidelines for the Department of Defense that I announced last week. And during the next 5 years, the entire cost of maintaining and rebuilding our strategic forces will take less than 15 percent of our defense expenditures. This is considerably below the 20 percent of our defense budget spent on strategic arms during the 1960's, when we constructed many of the forces that exist today. It is fair to say that this program will enable us to modernize our strategic forces and, at the same time, meet our many other commitments as a nation.

First, I have directed the Secretary of Defense to revitalize our bomber forces by constructing and deploying some 100 B - 1 bombers as soon as possible, while continuing to deploy cruise missiles on existing bombers. We will also develop an advanced bomber with ``stealth'' characteristics for the 1990's.

Second, I have ordered the strengthening and expansion of our sea-based forces. We will continue the construction of Trident submarines at a steady rate. We will develop a larger and more accurate sea-based ballistic missile. We will also deploy nuclear cruise missiles in some existing submarines.

We have concluded that these basing schemes would be just as vulnerable as the existing Minuteman silos. The operative factor here is this: No matter how many shelters we might build, the Soviets can build more missiles, more quickly, and just as cheaply.

Instead, we will complete the MX missile which is much more powerful and accurate than our current Minuteman missiles, and we will deploy a limited number of the MX missiles in existing silos as soon as possible.

Fourth, I have directed the Secretary of Defense to strengthen and rebuild our communications and control system, a much neglected factor in our strategic deterrent. I consider this decision to improve our communications and control system as important as any of the other decisions announced today. This system must be foolproof in case of any foreign attack.

Finally, I have directed that we end our long neglect of strategic defenses. This will include cooperation with Canada on improving North American air surveillance and defense, and as part of this effort, I've also directed that we devote greater resources to improving our civil defenses.

This plan is balanced and carefully considered -- a plan that will meet our vital security needs and strengthen our hopes for peace. It's my hope that this program will prevent our adversaries from making the mistake others have made and deeply regretted in the past -- the mistake of underestimating the resolve and the will of the American people to keep their freedom and protect their homeland and their allies.

Now, I can only remain here for a few minutes. And I will do so for just a few questions that might deal with the statement or with policy. But for all the technical matters, I am going to turn you over to Secretary [of Defense] Cap Weinberger.

The President. Well, I think in some areas we are, yes. I think the imbalance of forces, for example, on the Western front, in the NATO line -- we are vastly outdistanced there. I think the fact that right now, they have a superiority at sea.

Q. Mr. President, if there is or will be a ``window of vulnerability,'' why is the MX any less vulnerable if it's in silos, the location of which the Soviets presumably already know, unless we were going to launch on their attack?

I could say this: The plan also includes the hardening of silos so that they are protected against nuclear attack. Now, we know that is not permanent. We know that they can then improve their accuracy, their power, and their ability, but it will take them some time to do that, and they will have to devote a decided effort to doing that.

Q. Mr. President, some people already are saying that your decisions are based to a large extent on politics, domestic politics, so let me ask you about two points: One, that you never considered the racetrack system because it was proposed by Jimmy Carter, and you didn't want to have anything to do with something that he had proposed; and, two, that you're not basing the MX in Utah and Nevada because of opposition from the Mormon Church and your good friend, Senator Paul Laxalt.

Q. Mr. President, your predecessor killed the B - 1 manned bomber because he said it couldn't penetrate Soviet air defenses. The Soviets can make a lot of progress in radar between now and 1986. Can you guarantee that the B - 1 could penetrate Soviet air defenses, and is it the best plane as a cruise missile launch platform?

The President. We have to have it, because between the aging B - 52 and the bomber we are developing, the newer bomber, there is too long a time gap in there and would leave us a very lengthy, vulnerable period. And the B - 1 is designed not just to fill that gap, but it will then have a cruise missile carrying capacity later, in which it will still be worth the cost of building and worth having.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Jean Broward Shevlin Gerard to have the rank of Ambassador while serving as United States Permanent Representative to the United Nations Educational, Scientific, and Cultural Organization.

Seriously, I'm aware that the National Alliance of Business was formed to reduce the despair of unemployment, to provide opportunities where they would otherwise not exist. You've set for yourselves a noble and necessary goal. You know that a job at $4 an hour is priceless in terms of the self-respect it can buy. Many people today are economically trapped in welfare. They'd like nothing better than to be out in the work-a-day world with the rest of us. Independence and self-sufficiency is what they want. They aren't lazy or unwilling to work, they just don't know how to free themselves from that welfare security blanket.

Our economic program is designed for the very purpose of creating jobs. As I said on Labor Day, let us make our goal in this program very clear -- jobs, jobs, jobs, and more jobs. And what is more, our program will reduce inflation so the wages from these jobs will not decrease in earning power.

Part of that economic package also includes budget cuts. Now, some of these cuts will pinch, which upsets those who believe the less fortunate deserve more than the basic subsistence which the governmental safety net programs provide. Well, the fact is, I agree. More can be done; more should be done. But doing more doesn't mean to simply spend more. The size of the Federal budget is not an appropriate barometer of social conscience or charitable concern.

Economic problems or not, isn't it time to take a fresh look at the way we provide social services? Not just because they cost so much and waste so much, but because too many of them just don't work? Even if the Federal Government had all the money it wished to spend on social programs, would we still want to spend it the way we have in the past?

In all my years as Governor, and now as President, I have never found an agency, a program, a piece of legislation, or a budget that was adequate to meet the total needs of human beings. Something is missing from such an equation. I believe that something is private initiative and community involvement -- the kind the NAB exemplifies.

There are hardheaded, no-nonsense measures by which the private sector can meet those needs of society that the government has not, can not, or will never be able to fill. Volunteer activities and philanthropy play a role, as well as economic incentives and investment opportunities. To be certain, we're talking about America's deep spirit of generosity. But we're also talking about a ``buck for business'' if it helps to solve our social ills.

With the same energy that Franklin Roosevelt sought government solutions to problems, we will seek private solutions. The challenge before us is to find ways once again to unleash the independent spirit of the people and their communities. That energy will accomplish far, far more than government programs ever could. What federalism is to the public sector, voluntarism and private initiative are to the private sector. This country is bursting with ideas and creativity, but a government run by central decree has no way to respond.

Over our history, Americans have always extended their hands in gestures of assistance. They helped build a neighbor's barn when it burned down, and then formed a volunteer fire department so it wouldn't burn down again. They harvested the next fellow's crop when he was injured or ill, and they raised school funds at quilting bees and church socials. They took for granted that neighbor would care for neighbor.

The association of Americans has done so much and is so rich in variety. Churches once looked after their own members, and during the Depression, the Mormon Church undertook its own welfare plan based on the work ethic -- a plan that is still successful today. With no disrespect intended, one can't help but wonder if government welfare would exist at all if our churches had at that same time, all of them, picked up that task.

Before World War I, the Rockefeller and Carnegie Foundations together spent twice as much as the government for education and social services -- simply because there was a need. The National Foundation for Infantile Paralysis set out to conquer polio with dimes -- and did it. And in a fitting symbol of America, our own Statue of Liberty was built with the nickels and dimes of French schoolchildren and the contributions of their parents.

We all know countless stories of individual and personal generosity. There was an incident in Los Angeles a couple of years ago involving a man named Jose Salcido, whose wife had died of cancer, leaving him both father and mother of 13 children. In an accident only the Lord can explain, one day the brakes on his truck didn't hold and he was crushed against a brick wall as he walked in front of the vehicle. The children who had lost their mother now had lost their father. But they were not orphaned by their neighbors or even complete strangers, who immediately began collecting contributions. The parish church started a drive. Finally, a fund was set up at the bank and a committee was formed of citizens to take care of it. They also discovered how kind the people of this land can be.

Now, I know there are cynics who dismiss the notion of Americans helping other Americans. They say that I speak of an America that never was and never can be. They believe voluntarism is a mushy idea, the product of mushy thinking. They say that our society today is too complex or that we're trying to repeal the 20th century.

I wish the cynics would visit David and Falaka Fattah in Philadelphia. I don't know whether I pronounced their name right, but the Fattahs decided to put their hearts and minds into reducing the gang violence in west Philadelphia, which killed up to 40 persons a year in the early 1970's. They were instrumental in negotiating a city-wide peace treaty among gangs, that reduced the number of deaths from 40 to about 1 a year. This one couple did something that all the social welfare and law enforcement agencies together had been unable to accomplish. They replaced the gang structure with a family structure. They actually took a gang of 16 into their home. Their House of Umoja has helped more than 500 boys now develop into self-sufficient and productive young men. And today, they're establishing what might be called an urban Boys Town.

I wish the doubters would visit Detroit, where a few years ago hundreds of children awaiting adoption were in the foster care system. Potential black parents were judged by arbitrary income standards and not whether they could offer a warm, loving, secure family to a homeless child. But a community group called Homes for Black Children challenged the adoption practices of the local agencies with astounding results. In its first year, Homes for Black Children placed more kids in permanent homes than all 13 of the traditional placement agencies combined.

I wish the cynics would call on New York City, the New York City Partnership, an association of 100 business and civic leaders, which this past summer found jobs for about 14,000 disadvantaged youths, the majority of whom would not have otherwise found jobs.

Talk to the Honeywell people who are training prison inmates in computer programing. Those inmates who reach an employable skill level before leaving prison have a recidivism rate of less than 3 percent, compared to a national rate estimated at 70 percent.

Or look at the marvelous work McDonald's is doing with it's Ronald McDonald Houses. These are places, homes, really, usually near children's hospitals, where families can stay while their children are treated for serious diseases. Currently, 28 homes are open and another 32 are in some stage of development. Since the homes are funded mainly by the local McDonald operators and the staff is all volunteer, no taxpayer money is spent.

The cynics should ask the Fattahs if the spirit is dead. They should ask the families who have been helped by the McDonald Houses and the Homes for Black Children if the spirit is dead. They should ask the disadvantaged New York youths who have summer jobs, or the prison inmates who are developing skills for the outside world. Why can't the skeptics see the spirit is there where it's always been -- inside individual Americans?

Individual Americans like Father Bruce Ritter. Father Ritter's Covenant House in the heart of Times Square offers youths who are runaway or exploited a sanctuary from the pressures of modern life and an escape from those who would prey on them. With the help of 200 part-time and 65 full-time volunteers, Father Ritter last year aided nearly 12,000 youths.

Well, her article told a very much unrecognized truth: Volunteer cuts would be much more disruptive to the Nation than Federal budget cuts. Because they are so important, this administration seeks to elevate voluntary action and private initiative to the recognition they deserve. We seek to increase their influence on our daily lives and their roles in meeting our social needs. For too long, the American people have been told they are relieved of responsibility for helping their fellow man because government has taken over the job. Now we seek to provide as much support for voluntarism, without federalizing, as possible.

Today, I am announcing the creation of a Presidential Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives, comprised of 35 leaders from corporations, foundations, and voluntary and religious organizations. Its purpose will be to promote private sector leadership and responsibility for solving public needs, and to recommend ways of fostering greater public-private partnerships. I have asked Bill Verity, the chairman of Armco Steel, to chair the task force and act as my personal representative in expanding private sector initiatives and in recognizing outstanding examples of corporate and community efforts.

I'm instructing the Cabinet to review agency procedures and regulations and identify barriers to private sector involvement. We want to deregulate community service. For example, mothers and grandmothers have been taking care of children for thousands of years without special college training. Why is it that certain States prohibit anyone without a college degree in early childhood education from operating a day care facility?

I'm also asking the Cabinet to develop pump priming and seed money programs that offer incentives for private sector investment. In addition, the Cabinet will provide technical knowledge to develop private incentives. Furthermore, existing programs will be examined to determine those which could be more productively carried out in the private sector.

Voluntarism is an essential part of our plan to give the government back to the people. I believe the people are anxious for this responsibility. I believe they want to be enlisted in this cause. We have an unprecedented opportunity in America in the days ahead to build on our past traditions and the raw resources within our people. We can show the world how to construct a social system more humane, more compassionate, and more effective in meeting its members' needs than any ever known.

After I spoke of volunteerism several days ago, I received this mailgram: ``At a breakfast this morning, 35 chief executive officers of the largest employers and financial institutions of San Antonio met and committed to: 1) support of you and your commitment of returning the responsibility of support of many worthy, previously federally funded programs to the local level; 2) committing themselves individually and corporately to do more in being a part of continuing or establishing that safety net of services each community needs; 3) as a first step, committing to achieving a minimum 20-percent increase in our local United Way campaign which represents 60 agencies included within that safety net; and finally, committing themselves that the programs supported are needed and efficiently and effectively administered. You have our support.'' And it was signed by Harold E. O'Kelley, chairman of the board and president of Datapoint Corporation, Tom Turner, Sr., chairman of the board and president of Sigmor Corporation, Dr. Robert V. West, Jr., chairman of the board of Tesoro Petroleum Corporation, and H. B. Zachry, Sr., chairman of the board of the H. B. Zachry Company.

And just this weekend, I received a letter from the insurance industry promising to undertake new budget initiatives to reduce unemployment, especially among minority youths. The insurance companies plan to direct their financial resources -- which are in the hundreds of billions of dollars, as we know -- to further this goal. They also plan to increase their dollar contributions to these programs affecting basic human needs.

The private sector can address the tough social problems of special concern to minority Americans, and I believe that we will soon see a torrent of private initiatives that will astound the advocates of big government.

The efforts of you at this conference also show what can be done when concerned people in businesses join in partnership with government. You are a model of future action, and I'm calling upon you today to help in the cause to enlarge the social responsibility of our citizens. The spirit that built this country still dwells in our people. They want to help. We only need to ask them.

All of us, and particularly we who are parents, have worried about whether the youth of today have absorbed some of the traditions with which we're so indoctrinated. Well, a few years ago, in Newport Beach, California, there were some lovely beachfront homes that were threatened by an abnormally high tide and storm-generated heavy surf -- in danger of being totally undermined and destroyed. And all through the day and the cold winter night -- and it does get cold in California at night; sometimes in the daytime -- the volunteers worked filling and piling sandbags in an effort to save these homes. Local TV stations, aware of the drama of the situation, covered the struggle and went down there in the night to see what was happening, catch the damage being done and so forth.

Americans are needed. They're needed to keep this country true to the tradition of voluntarism that's served us so well. And they're needed to keep America true to her values. In the days following World War II when a war-ravaged world could have slipped back into the Dark Ages, Pope Pius XII said: The American people have a genius for great and unselfish deeds; into the hands of America, God has placed an afflicted mankind.

Let those words be true of us today. Let us go forth from this conference and say to the people: Join us in helping Americans help each other. And I assure you, I'm not standing here passing this off to you as solely your task, and the government will wash its hands of it. We intend a partnership in which we'll be working as hard as we can with you to bring this about.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation As we pay homage again to the memory of General Casimir Pulaski, we are reminded of his dedication to freedom, his selfless service to our Nation, and his contributions to the achievement of American independence. His tireless devotion to democratic ideals continues to inspire us, his adopted countrymen, today. His name and deeds remain similarly alive in the hearts of the people of his native Poland, and indeed of people the world over. His is a model we can all emulate.

Furthermore, in recognition of the supreme sacrifice General Pulaski made for his adopted country and for the cause of freedom, I do hereby designate October 11 of each succeeding year as General Pulaski Memorial Day.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The Constitution would establish UNIDO as an independent specialized agency of the United Nations system. It does not create a new entity, but rather revises UNIDO's existing legal framework in a way that significantly improves the position of the United States and other major donors in budget, program and assessment determinations.

UNIDO's principal purpose is to foster the industrialization of developing countries. It is currently the third largest executing agency for the United Nations Development Program. UNIDO's wide-ranging activities are geared to aid developing countries in establishing the technical and institutional skills necessary for industrialization. Many of these activities are consonant with United States development priorities, including development of indigenous entrepreneurial and productive capabilities in the private sector. United States commercial and academic interests also benefit from UNIDO activity.

In recent years, there has been growing recognition of the need to formulate more effective institutions within the United Nations system to deal with the problems of development in an increasingly interdependent world. Such institutions need to serve the interests of all member nations and to be governed in a manner that realistically reflects the political and economic situation in the world today.

The Constitution would give UNIDO a new governing machinery that will make it more responsive to its member governments and that will give greater recognition to the special role of major donors, including the United States, other industrial democracies, and the Soviet bloc. If they act together, the major donors will be able to block decisions on UNIDO's program and budgets. In this respect, the Constitution is a precedent-setting document.

The Constitution would also provide a specific right of withdrawal from UNIDO if the United States should ever determine that its interests are not served by continued membership. This could not be accomplished under UNIDO's current statute without withdrawal from the United Nations.

While the Constitution refers to the objective of helping establish a new international economic order, the United States has made clear its view that this does not refer to any preconceived notion of such an order as outlined in some UN resolutions to which the United States has taken exception.

The Constitution offers the United States important advantages over UNIDO's current status. It provides an opportunity to increase UNIDO's effectiveness in promoting economic development in the developing countries and, thus, its contribution to a more equitable and peaceful international environment. In addition to helping create a better institutional framework, ratification of the Constitution by the United States will be a strong reaffirmation of our commitment to the industrial development of the less developed countries and demonstrate our political will to pursue beneficial relations with these countries.

The President. This distinguished bipartisan group of former national security officials have agreed to the following statement of support for the sale of AWACS and other air defense equipment to Saudi Arabia. After reading this statement, both Harold Brown and Henry Kissinger would like to make a further statement of their own.

I want to thank each one of these gentlemen who are here for their recognition that this sale is in the national security interests of the Nation. Their public appearance at this time is an indication of the broad bipartisan support this sale has among knowledgeable former national security officials from both Republican and Democratic administrations, going all the way back to the Eisenhower administration.

And we believe, as I've said before, that not only is what we're talking about in the interest of our national security, but it is in the best interests of the national security of our friend and ally, Israel.

Dr. Kissinger. Mr. President, I'm aware of the intense debate that is going on on this issue, and I can sympathize with many of the concerns that have been expressed. It is my strong conviction, however, that these concerns cannot be met by rejecting the sale of AWACS. I believe the sale is in the national interests of the United States; it is compatible with the security of Israel; it is essential for the peace process in the Middle East; and it is important for the President's ability to conduct an effective and credible foreign policy. And so, I would urge those who have legitimate concerns to meet them in conversation with the administration, and to vote for the AWACS package without attaching conditions that are incompatible with the dignity of Saudi Arabia and with the effective conduct of our foreign policy.

Mr. Brown. Thank you, Mr. President. I believe that American national security depends very strongly on the preservation of peace and of a favorable situation in Southwest Asia. One can understand the arguments that well-meaning opponents of the AWACS transfer make. I believe that when these are weighed against the advantages that this sale brings to U.S. national security, that the conclusion is that it would not help U.S. security, it would not help Israeli security, to have this sale rejected.

I think that both from a military point of view and from a diplomatic point of view the transfer is advantageous to the United States -- from a military point of view in terms of the ability it gives us to have information on air movements in the area, and from a diplomatic point of view because the United States needs, if it is to continue to contribute to the peace process, to have close relations with Israel, with Saudi Arabia, and with other countries in the region. I think that would be severely damaged if this sale were overturned.

The President. Well, this concludes, but I think you can all see that there's a who's who roster here of men who have served this country over a great many years and have proven today they continue to serve any time they're needed.

Not only a distinguished gathering here on the platform but a distinguished audience out here. Today we're here for -- I'm signing the bill to make Raoul Wallenberg an honorary citizen of the United States. But in making him a United States citizen, I think we're the ones that are being honored.

That compassion also exemplifies the man we are gathered here for today. In 1944 the United States requested Sweden's cooperation in protecting the lives of Hungarian Jews facing extermination at the hands of the Nazis. In the months that followed, the United States supplied the funds and the directives, and Raoul Wallenberg supplied the courage and the passion. How can we comprehend the moral worth of a man who saved tens and tens of thousands of lives, including those of Congressman and Mrs. Lantos?

In 1945, in violation of diplomatic immunity and international law, he was seized by the Soviet Union. The Nazis were gone, and the Soviets had come in as an ally. And yet today, there is evidence that he is still imprisoned by the Soviets. Wherever he is, his humanity burns like a torch.

I heard someone say that a man has made at least a start on understanding the meaning of human life when he plants shade trees under which he knows he will never sit. Raoul Wallenberg is just such a man. He nurtured the lives of those he never knew at the risk of his own. And then just recently, I was told that in a special area behind the Holocaust Memorial in Israel, Hungarian Jews, now living in Sweden, planted 10,000 trees in Raoul's honor.

The President. Well, thank you all very much, and welcome. And believe me, it is a pleasure to welcome you to the White House and the opportunity to meet -- we call both these buildings the White House -- and talk with you in these special briefings. This is something that all of us in the administration have looked forward to.

And you don't need me to tell you the tremendous influence that you of the press and the media have on public opinion. I think that you are the first to agree that diversity of interpretation and opinion is very important to your work and to our robust tradition of press freedom.

This diversity, as you know, has been threatened recently with the sad demise of several important institutions in the newspaper field. This came home to us here in Washington recently, when the Washington Star closed up shop after more than a century of publication.

So, we do look forward to this opportunity to talk with you. You all know the fresh perspective that a new reporter can bring to an old beat, and that's why we hope these briefings will lead to some new insights and perspectives for both of us, and that the ultimate beneficiaries will be the members -- or the readers, the listeners, and the viewers in your hometowns.

This last month has been a rather busy one. It's also been a very satisfying one. We think we've brought about a sea-change in national policy. You may detect a feeling of zest and buoyancy around the Capitol, and certainly around this area on Pennsylvania Avenue where the White House is.

In the last month, there was a radio address to the Nation on Labor Day, a TV address on the economy, a news conference that covered the waterfront of issues. I've had an opportunity to do some traveling, to talk to union members in Chicago about the housing industry, to help get Westway started in New York City, assist at the dedication of President Ford's museum in Grand Rapids, Michigan, and to talk to the Republican women leaders in Denver about Wall Street and Main Street. Last week in New Orleans, I announced some major initiatives on crime and also spoke to the World Bank conference about our new development policy. And when I leave you -- and I regret that I have to be here so briefly -- I'm going to be speaking to the National Alliance of Business about mobilizing the private sector to assist the underprivileged.

We've made economic recovery, as you know, a first priority, but the approach of this administration is hardly one-dimensional. We've been moving systematically to deal with that broad range of problems we promised to do something about in the campaign last year.

There's a good bit of discussion now about our plans to sell the AWACS system to Saudi Arabia. This issue is not simply a question of balancing the interests of two nations in the Middle East; it has to be seen in the larger context of the strategic importance of the Persian Gulf area. I think this message is beginning to get through to Members of the Congress. The truth is, we intend to stand by an old and trusted ally, and we mean that for all our allies. But we also intend to look for new and dramatic ways to protect and solidify the security and peace of the Middle East.

In our recent decision to rebuild our strategic force, we've also attempted to show some balance and flexibility. Our plans for the MX and the B - 1 have these advantages: we can afford them; we keep our options open so that we can respond adequately and in time to any new Soviet buildup; and we send to the Soviets that signal that Winston Churchill once said was critical for any successful negotiations with the Soviet Union -- strength of purpose and strength of resolve.

In the area of the economy, we're now pressing for the additional budget cuts needed to keep our promise of a balanced budget. I think we've managed to take the social security problem out of partisan politics with the appointment of a bipartisan commission that is charged with one task -- finding a solution to social security's deep financial problems.

These two initiatives should be seen in the context of what else we've done in the last 9 months. When we entered office, the Federal budget was growing by some 14 percent a year. That growth has been cut in half. Federal tax revenues were scheduled to increase by more than $300 billion over the next 3 years. We've now passed the largest tax rate cut in history and almost entirely thwarted this increase. We've also indexed taxation to the rate of inflation, another historic reform.

On the regulatory front, more than 180 Federal regulations have been modified or canceled, with an estimated savings of more than $15 billion. The flow of new regulations has been cut in half. And we've also worked hard to assure a stable monetary policy.

Well, I think that our immigration policy is perhaps going to give us a better handle on that and put us back in a position of being able to control our own borders. You know that we've issued orders with regard to the interception of some who are not truly refugees, in the sense that we take those people who are fearing persecution and death in their own lands. We have been trying to diversify and spread the people that do come in, and that we take in to other areas of the country. But I believe that basically, the problem -- that we'll get a handle on it with the new immigration program if the Congress will support us on that.

Q. Mr. President, part of your economic recovery program calls for user fees, including user fees for dredging and -- [inaudible] -- rivers and canals. My town -- and once your town -- Sacramento, is among the hundred or so American port cities that would be seriously -- [inaudible] -- by the charge, by the canceling of this program.

My question, sir, is that since back about 1787, the Federal Government took from the States the privilege of collecting customs duties; and since the Federal Government now collects around $8 million a year in customs duties, in return for a variety of services, isn't it fair, sir, is it not a possibility that the Federal Government intended to provide those services to American ports?

The President. You slipped the question in that I wish you'd waited for Dave Stockman. [Laughter] No, I believe -- and I don't believe that what we have in mind is going to be onerous or going to be destructive to anyone that's involved in that. But the basic principle of good tax policy, and one we've departed too far from in the past, is that wherever possible, assess a charge or assess a tax basically to those who are receiving the service or the benefit of the government service.

The gasoline tax, for example, at the State level -- I know, in California -- is a good example of this. The people who are out on the highways and driving on the streets and so forth are the ones who are paying for it. And they've got that ability to make a direct connection -- are they getting their money's worth or not? Is the highway system up to par? Are the streets kept repaired, and so forth? And again, as I say, in a little while you can try again with this, and I think get some more specific ideas to what we have in mind. But I think it is just one of, again, shifting a burden from the general public that may not be particularly benefiting from that, to those that are getting the benefit of the service.

Q. Mr. President, what percentage of the tax cut do you assume will go to savings and investment? And will not the -- [inaudible] -- if it doesn't go to savings and investment -- be, in your clearly delightfully simple phrase, ``more money chasing the same amount of goods'' and, therefore inflationary, until the results of this investment allow business and industry to increase production?

The President. Well, I think there are two answers to that. First of all, the polls that we have seen indicate that below $15,000 of income, yes, most people, the majority of people answer that there are things they need that they would buy with the increased money, although there is a percentage, a pretty good percentage that says no, they would save. Above $15,000 it shifts dramatically -- the majority of people saying they would use that money for savings and investment.

The other part of the answer to that is that at the same time in our tax policy, the business taxes and the changes there -- we have indications already of corporate expansion and modernization and so forth. The Iron and Steel Institute is a classic example that is going to be spending -- they have already announced -- more than $5 billion. And they claim this is the largest modernization and expansion plan in the history of that industry in the limited period of time. They're going forward, and they've announced that it is basically on the basis of our plan.

The President. Well, we have the triggering device with regard to the dumping of steel. We don't think that that has been exercised in recent years the way it should. And this is where someone comes in and dumps on our market a steel at a less-than-production cost, because their government is subsidizing them in order to get that market.

We intend to enforce that. But again, as I say, it is the iron and steel industry -- yes, right now they're suffering and have been suffering over the last year or more -- beyond that, to be honest. But again, they are in the forefront of the ones that were optimistic about what our policy is going to do and are announcing this great expansion, which after some temporary pain and suffering due to this, should result in an increase and in the return of those idle workers to their jobs.

Q. Mr. President, last week the New Hampshire legislature met and acted on only two of the seven block grants that will be coming in under the new Federal program. And there was some concern that by not acting on the five others, that the State of New Hampshire would stand to lose money from the Federal Government on those other five programs. Is that so?

The President. Well now, I don't know. I wasn't aware of what you were just saying, what actions some of the States have taken already on that. Are you aware of that, Dave? He'll take care of that one when he gets up.

Q. Mr. President, I hope I'm not breaking the tradition by not asking a question. But after confirming my visit here, last Thursday and Friday I went knocking on doors in our circulation area to ask our readers what they might say to you if they had the opportunity to talk with you face to face. There were three things that came through, and I thought I'd like to share them with you, from our readers.

They're encouraged that there seem to be signs in Washington that there is someone here who's finally doing something about the economy. They're not sure yet whether it's working or going to work, but they're pleased that there is movement.

And number three, I thought was a poignant remark from a woman who said that in deciding where to make budget cuts, that you think of all of us as a family, and make the decisions as a loving father. And almost universally, they wish you the very best in a very tough job.

There is something in the group that I told you I was speaking to in a little while, the national business association. We are starting -- in addition to our economic program and the cuts that we feel have to be made, we believe that we have got to reduce the percentage that government is taking from the private sector, reduce the share of cost. When you stop to think that today, the biggest single cost item in the average American family budget is government, that it amounts to more than food, shelter, and clothing, all put together. Now government, I don't think, was ever intended to have that -- to be that proportionate. There is the intervention by government that has moved not only just from attempting to control business and industry but right into the lives of every one of us by way of regulations. We want to bring those things back in hand.

But, to this group that I am going to be speaking, the gist of my speech is -- and they have already taken up this matter, I might add, in their meetings before I get there -- and that is to appeal to the business and industrial community of America, and to the private sector in general, to go back to an America that we had where we didn't automatically say, ``Well, government should do something about that,'' but where we the people do something about that. And I have to tell you that I'm going to tell them that Bill Verity, chairman of Armco, has accepted the chairmanship of what will be a nationwide task force to go into communities, go into industrial and business groups, and find the areas where the private sector can pick up slack and do things that it once did.

How many of us have forgotten that when this country went in the all-out great rescue effort to Japan back in the early thirties [twenties] at the time of the great earthquake. That wasn't government; that wasn't a foreign aid program; the people did that. ``Bundles for Britain,'' the famine in India -- the people of this country used to come together. I remember when I was a sports announcer -- the floods in Ohio -- and we held an all-night radio program for people to volunteer help for the people in Ohio.

We think that that spirit of voluntarism is still out there among the American people. And we believe there's a place for government -- to help coalesce this and to help point out where need is and those functions that could properly belong to the private sector. And maybe that's what a loving father would do, also.

The President. Yes, social security has been in a state of actuarial imbalance for more -- well, back more than a couple of decades, and we knew it then. I remember making a speech in 1964, in the Presidential campaign, pointing out that at that time, actuarially, the program was some $300 billion out of balance. In this last campaign, I pointed out that it was $4 trillion out of actuarial balance. Nothing has been done.

Now, we introduced a plan that did not penalize in anything that was really measurable, anyone who's presently collecting the program. The only thing that changed for them was, once, making the cost of living adjustment go 15 months instead of 12. And yet, with what we had proposed -- and really clearing up some things on the periphery, such as people getting disability in social security that weren't entitled -- doesn't it sort of strike you strange that Son of Sam, serving that 75-year sentence up there for all his murders, is getting $350 a month from disability, social security, because they say he's incapable of holding a job? And this is going on all over the country. We have people in California that I know of, in mental institutions for the criminally insane, who are drawing regular payments because, due to their mental illness, they had been judged incapable of holding jobs. But now, we're paying their room, board, medical care, and laundry, housing, and yet they're getting that payment.

These are the things that need correcting. When we introduced our plan, we felt -- because it was the majority party that had asked us to get our plan up there because they wanted to start working on this problem. We introduced the plan, and all we got was an attack and never one offer of cooperation. And we resubmitted now, after the recess, and again were informed that there was going to be no bipartisan approach to this problem.

And this is why the other night in my speech, I have withdrawn the plan and said -- it doesn't mean that I don't believe in it, but all right, if this will bring a bipartisan approach, will they join us then in appointing a bipartisan task force? And we can get by 1982 if we borrow, inter-fund borrowing of the three basic funds of social security, because two of the funds, disability and the hospital benefits, Medicare, are not in the same trouble that the basic fund is, and to do that temporarily, simply while the task force comes back to us with something that we can, in a bipartisan way, get done, because there's no way we can do it without the bipartisan help.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- hearings, Defense Secretary Weinberger said the MX missile system clearly would not work unless it were in fact mobile. How do you square that position with your position, sir, that it can now be stationary?

The President. The first 36 that are produced are going to be put, as we've said, in the Minuteman and the Titan silos which are going to be hardened. Now, this does not render them invulnerable in perpetuity. But it does buy us some time in which the Soviet Union would have to increase its ability at targeting, and its power, in order to overcome this hardening. But by that time, we will have continued with our program. And during this time that we're installing the 36, we are studying the different modes, including airborne, seaborne.

There is one thing that we have to remember -- unless technology improves, and possibly it will in these few years, the time that we're buying -- and that is that you lose some accuracy when they are airborne or seaborne that you have when they're land-based.

Q. Mr. President, I've talked to several local and municipal officials before coming here, also, and I asked them what they would ask you. Most of them said that they would like to know how -- [inaudible] -- realistically meet their responsibilities with so little money coming from Washington?

The President. You mean local and State governments feel that way? Well, I don't think it's going to be easy. You could ask the same question about us, but I believe we can. And having been Governor of the largest State in the Union -- or the most populous State in the Union, I've had some experience with Federal grant programs. And basically, what we're trying to do is eliminate the administrative overhead that was occasioned by unnecessary redtape and regulations. This is what's back of the block grant concept. And as I showed the other day in the press conference, when we could take that thick packet of paper that were the regulations that surrounded some 57 categorical grant programs, and by putting them into the nine block grant programs, reduce it to six pages of regulations, we think that they will find that they've got more flexibility with assessing priorities and with their method of delivering the aid, and that this -- in other words, this will leave, we think, more of the money available for those that it is supposed to help.

The trouble with the Federal Government programs in recent years has been that, believe me, much more than half of this money, in many of the programs, goes simply to administer the program and not to the people it's intended to help.

Let me cite one job training program of a few years ago that graduated some 5,500 young people from the job training program at an average cost of $55,000 per graduate. I got a little trouble with the bureaucracy as Governor, when I vetoed a program that sounded on the face of it great. It was going to take some people from welfare, able-bodied people, and put them to work in the parks in this particular area of California. I vetoed it, which a Governor could do, and if his veto wasn't overridden in 60 days, it stuck. Mine wasn't overridden, because I was able to go before the people and tell the people the reason for the veto, and that is that it was going to put 11 people to work in the parks, with 17 people handling the administrative functions of this program to see that they all got to work on time.

I've just been told that my time's up. I've got to get to the national business alliance. I want to thank you very much. And I don't know which of you gentlemen here is scheduled first, but, Don Regan, Secretary of Treasury Don Regan, will take your questions and speak to you, and then Dave Stockman.

Prime Minister Prem, on behalf of the American people, it is a pleasure and an honor to welcome you and your colleagues to the White House today. I have enjoyed this opportunity to get to know you. Our conversations reinforced for me the importance of maintaining the security, stability, and national development of Thailand. Let me assure you that we value your counsel and views on trends and developments in your region.

Your country, Mr. Prime Minister, is truly named ``Land of the Free.'' Blessed by nature, the Thai people are peaceful, hardworking, and have never menaced their neighbors. Blessed equally by brilliant and dynamic leaders, their nation has remained independent for more than seven centuries.

Thailand's relations with our own country date back more than 100 years and have been characterized by warm friendship and close cooperation. Our sons and daughters have studied side by side in each other's schools and universities; our soldiers have fought and died together in two wars. We share a relationship that's truly rare between two countries, especially since we're separated by 12,000 miles of ocean.

Your open society and free enterprise system are a shining example for the rest of Asia. The other day I had the great privilege of addressing the 36th annual meeting of the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank that was held here in Washington. And one of the points I made to that distinguished audience was: the societies which have achieved the most spectacular, and broad-based economic progress, in the shortest period of time, are not the most tightly controlled, not necessarily the biggest in size or the wealthiest in natural resources -- what units them all is their willingness to believe in the magic of the marketplace.

I could have been speaking about your Thailand, Mr. Prime Minister. You can be very proud of what you and your government and your people have achieved. The American people are very proud to have contributed in a small way to your success. And let me just add that we intend, within our means, to maintain this contribution.

Now a menacing shadow threatens your country. We've talked about that this morning -- threatens the world, for that matter -- the aggressive actions of the Vietnamese Communists, backed by Soviet sponsors, and they pose a menace to your security, stability, and territorial integrity. Supported by your ASEAN [Association for South East Asian Nations] partners, you stand in the front lines of the great ideological struggle of our century -- one between free people who wish to live in peace in societies of law, and on the other side, the totalitarians who despise human freedom and seek to subvert or destroy it everywhere they can.

With Vietnamese occupation of Cambodia, you and your ASEAN partners buried your differences and joined together to face the common danger. The outcome of the International Conference on Cambodia, in the overwhelming vote to prevent the Vietnamese puppet regime in that country from gaining a U.N. seat, and the continuing efforts to rally the Khmer people against the illegal occupation of their country, all prove to be noble resources of the ASEAN endeavor.

The nations in your region are cooperating to defend their security, and the way is open for ultimate success. I can assure you that America is ready to help you and ASEAN to maintain your independence against Communist aggression. The Manila Pact in its clarification of our bilateral communique of 1962 is a living document. We will honor the obligations that it conveys.

Mr. Prime Minister, the American people join me, I'm sure, in conveying a warm greeting to the royal family and the people of Thailand. Nancy, my wife, would also like you to convey a message. She looks forward with great pleasure to the visit of Her Majesty, Queen Sirikit, to the White House on November 5th.

Now, I'm going to depart a little bit from normal custom here in proposing a toast. In view of the tragedy that has just happened, there is a -- normally, you know, we rise for a toast. In one city in our land, Philadelphia, they have had a tradition for years that you only stand to toast the dead. So therefore, I'm going to propose a toast today with all of us still seated. And it is to you, Mr. Prime Minister, to Their Royal Highnesses, Their Majesties, the King and Queen, and to the people, and to the continuation of close relations between our two countries.

President Sadat was a courageous man whose vision and wisdom brought nations and people together. In a world filled with hatred, he was a man of hope. In a world trapped in the animosities of the past, he was a man of foresight, a man who sought to improve a world tormented by malice and pettiness.

As an Egyptian patriot, he helped create the revolutionary movement that freed his nation. As a political leader, he sought to free his people from hatred and war. And as a soldier, he was unafraid to fight. But most important, he was a humanitarian unafraid to make peace. His courage and skill reaped a harvest of life for his nation and for the world.

America has lost a close friend; the world has lost a great statesman; and mankind has lost a champion of peace. Nancy and I feel that we have lost a close and dear friend; and we send our heartfelt sympathy to Mrs. Sadat, to his children, who were here such a short time ago.

I am transmitting herewith a copy of the report investigating the necessity of continued production of the reserves as required by section 7422(c)(2)(B) of the Naval Petroleum Reserves Production Act of 1976. In light of the findings contained in that report, I hereby certify that continued production from the naval petroleum reserves is in the national interest.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Three hundred and forty-five years ago, the first settlers organized militia units to defend their homes and lives in Massachusetts Bay Colony. With these first units the tradition of the citizen-soldier was born and took root in America, a tradition exemplified by the willingness of private citizens to leave their civilian occupations, don the uniform of their country, and serve their States and their Nation when the need arises.

These citizen-soldiers camped with Washington at Valley Forge and charged up San Juan Hill. They fought in the Meuse-Argonne and on Omaha Beach. Since World War II, the National Guard has played a role in every major American crisis or conflict including Korea, Berlin, and Vietnam. When called upon by their country, the men and women of the Guard have always responded.

When disaster has struck in times of peace, the Guard has been equally ready to serve, whether in the flood waters of Johnstown, or on the slopes of Mount St. Helens. The Guard has been responsible for saving countless lives and millions of dollars of property and equipment by its quick responses and efficiency.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 6th day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Nordic stories passed through the ages tell us of the Viking Leif Erikson and his explorations across the North Atlantic. One of the most daring of the great Norse adventurers, he may have been the first European to discover our continent. Scandinavian tales tell us of a cargo of timber and wild grapes he brought from North America to his home in Greenland more than four centuries before Columbus.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Geoffrey Swaebe, of California, to be the Representative of the United States of America to the European Office of the United Nations, with the rank of Ambassador. He would succeed Gerald Bernard Helman.

But some critics have expressed concern that we're not addressing women's issues. So, let's set the record straight right now: That charge is a bum rap. With respect to our economic program, the well-being of women, like all Americans, depends on a healthy economy. And certainly, women won't benefit from continued inflation and unemployment.

As for appointments, as you've learned already in the meetings that you've been having so far, we've appointed women to high-level positions throughout the administration, and I've directed that we continue the effort to place qualified women in positions of responsibility. The quality of leadership and the contributions made by these women are an irreplaceable part of our effort to chart a new course for our Nation. Many of them are here today, as you well know by this time. And I'm particularly proud of one who is not -- Sandra O'Connor, who now sits on the United States Supreme Court.

Then there's the question of the ERA and, while it's true that I do not believe that it is the best way to end discrimination against women, I do believe with all my heart that such discrimination must be eliminated.

There are numerous methods of rectifying the problem of sex discrimination. In California, we achieved a measure of success, perhaps more than some people give us credit for. As Governor of California, I signed 14 pieces of legislation eliminating regulations and statutes that discriminated against women. We passed legislation prohibiting sexual discrimination in employment and business matters, established the right of a married woman to obtain credit in her own name, and revised the property and probate laws to give the wife equal rights concerning community property.

And any number of these bread-and-butter issues, ones that were important to many individuals, and particularly women, when you read the list today -- I won't read all of them, but if you did in 1981, it's hard to believe that those laws could have been on the books in the first place. And it's possible that similar discriminatory statutes and regulations may exist today in other States.

So, in my acceptance speech at the Republican National Convention in 1980 I pledged that, as President, I would establish a liaison with the 50 Governors to encourage them to eliminate discrimination against women wherever it exists. And that's why you are here today. You are the result of that. The Governors responded as I knew they would. And Judy Peachee, who serves as my Special Assistant for Intergovernmental Affairs, will be my personal liaison with you and your Governors on this important undertaking.

It's my hope that through the Fifty States Project we can alter or eliminate those State laws that continue to deny equality to women. And we will be working on the same thing here at the Federal level where that is needed, as we have done on our tax program, eliminating the marriage tax penalty. And we yet have to get at the discrimination against working wives in social security and some other things. We plan to help you focus public attention on the project and assist in developing support for the initiatives taken by your Governors and your legislatures.

At the National Conference of State Legislatures meeting in Atlanta on July 1st, I talked about this initiative and, I must say, got my biggest applause. I thought at the time I should have quit speaking right there -- I couldn't top that. [Laughter] But we've received encouraging expressions of support since then, but the progress is going to depend on your efforts. When you go back to your States, I hope that you will think of yourselves not only as your Governor's representative, but also as representing the women in your States.

You'll be the key to making this project work. And the Fifty States Project is only a beginning. There's much to be done, but by inviting you here today, I want to reaffirm my commitment to the equality of all of our citizens and my commitment to this proj- ect. And I know it can be successful because it's already very apparent that the Governors made very good choices in their representatives.

In a world filled with hatred, he was a man of hope. In a world trapped in the animosities of the past, he was a man of foresight, a man who sought to improve a world tormented by malice and pettiness.

As a mark of respect for the memory of Anwar Sadat I hereby order that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal Government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions until his interment. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 7th day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

A more abundant, affordable, and secure energy future for all Americans is a critical element of this administration's economic recovery program. While homeowners and business firms have shown remarkable ingenuity and resourcefulness in meeting their energy needs at lower cost through conservation, it is evident that sustained economic growth over the decades ahead will require additional energy supplies. This is particularly true of electricity, which will supply an increasing share of our energy.

If we are to meet this need for new energy supplies, we must move rapidly to eliminate unnecessary government barriers to efficient utilization of our abundant, economical resources of coal and uranium. It is equally vital that the utilities -- investor-owned, public, and co-ops -- be able to develop new generating capacity that will permit them to supply their customers at the lowest cost, be it coal, nuclear, hydro, or new technologies such as fuel cells.

One of the best potential sources of new electrical energy supplies in the coming decades is nuclear power. The United States has developed a strong technological base in the production of electricity from nuclear energy. Unfortunately, the Federal Government has created a regulatory environment that is forcing many utilities to rule out nuclear power as a source of new generating capacity, even when their consumers may face unnecessarily high electric rates as a result. Nuclear power has become entangled in a morass of regulations that do not enhance safety but that do cause extensive licensing delays and economic uncertainty. Government has also failed in meeting its responsibility to work with industry to develop an acceptable system for commercial waste disposal, which has further hampered nuclear power development.

It is important that the private sector take the lead in developing commercial reprocessing services. Thus, I am also requesting the Director of the Office of Science and Technology Policy, working with the Secretary of Energy, to undertake a study of the feasibility of obtaining economical plutonium supplies for the Department of Energy by means of a competitive procurement. By encouraging private firms to supply fuel for the breeder program at a cost that does not exceed that of government-produced plutonium, we may be able to provide a stable market for private sector reprocessing and simultaneously reduce the funding needs of the U.S. breeder demonstration program.

Eliminating the regulatory problems that have burdened nuclear power will be of little use if the utility sector cannot raise the capital necessary to fund construction of new generating facilities. We have already taken significant steps to improve the climate for capital formation with the passage of my program for economic recovery. The tax bill contains substantial incentives designed to attract new capital into industry.

Safe commercial nuclear power can help meet America's future energy needs. The policies and actions that I am announcing today will permit a revitalization of the U.S. industry's efforts to develop nuclear power. In this way, native American genius, not arbitrary Federal policy, will be free to provide for our energy future.

On behalf of the country, I want to express a heartfelt thanks to Presidents Nixon, Ford, and Carter, and Mrs. Carter, for undertaking this sad mission. Their presence in Cairo will express to the Egyptian people the depth of America's grief and sorrow at the loss of a great leader and a beloved friend.

Today the American people stand beside the Egyptian people -- the people of a new nation with the people of an ancient land; people of the West with the people of the East. We stand together in mourning the loss of Anwar Sadat and rededicating ourselves to the cause for which he so willingly gave his life.

There are times, there are moments in history, when the martyrdom of a single life can symbolize all that's wrong with an age and all that is right about humanity. The noble remnants of such lives -- the spoken words of an Illinois lawyer who lived in this House, the dairy of a young Dutch schoolgirl, the final moments of a soldier-statesman from Mit Abu el-Qum -- can gain the force and power that endures and inspires and wins the ultimate triumph over the forces of violence, madness, and hatred.

Anwar Sadat, a man of peace in a time of violence, understood his age. In his final moments, as he had during all his days, he stood in defiance of the enemies of peace, the enemies of humanity. Today, those of us who follow him can do no less. And so to those who rejoice in the death of Anwar Sadat, to those who seek to set class against class, nation against nation, people against people, those who would choose violence over brotherhood and who prefer war over peace, let us stand in defiance and let our words of warning to them be clear: In life you feared Anwar Sadat, but in death you must fear him more. For the memory of this good and brave man will vanquish you. The meaning of his life and the cause for which he stood will endure and triumph.

Again, a heartfelt thank you to these men here, these three who are making this mission on behalf of our country. I thank you, and if I may, in the language of my own ancestry, say: Until we meet again, may God hold you in the hollow of His hand.

Now, that story has absolutely nothing to do with today's luncheon. [Laughter] Well, maybe if I reach a little it does, because we have some high fliers here with us today who have flown, in the line of achievement in their own lives and in their service to humanity, very high.

And today, we're adding the names of Charles (Tex) Thornton, a man whose energy and enterprise are symbolic of America herself; Morris Leibman, an honored American possessing a fine legal mind and a true humanitarian heart; Walter Judd, a doctor who ministered to the world's need for freedom and liberty; Bryce Harlow, an architect of public policy whose contributions have strengthened our democracy's political process; Ella Grasso, a genuine public servant who fought against death as she fought for political principle, with dignity; and Eubie Blake, an historical figure in American performing arts and one of the greatest ragtime composers and pianists.

Now, let me tell you how these six recipients have strengthened our freedom by reading to you something the historian Edward Gibbon wrote about ancient Athens, the first democracy and the fountainhead of Western culture. He wrote that when the Athenians finally wanted not to give to society but for society to give to them, when the freedom they wished for was freedom from responsibility, then Athens ceased to be free.

The recipients today have given greatly to our society in music, public service, and humanitarian activities. They've met their responsibilities to freedom. By giving of themselves and their energies, they've kept this society diverse, and in diversity there is liberty.

Perhaps this award is called the Medal of Freedom also because our Nation allowed these great Americans to pursue their interests unhindered. And when individuals are free to follow their hearts and talents, the common good benefits. America has given these honorees freedom, and they've discharged that responsibility with brilliant distinction.

Industrialist, warrior and humanitarian, Tex Thornton's life has embodied all that is best in the worlds of commerce, military service and civic duty. In all three realms, Tex Thornton has never failed to give generously of his boundless energy, his unfailing courage, and his deep love of country. In war and peace, in public service and the private sector, Tex Thornton has earned the esteem of all Americans who value patriotism, enterprise and compassion as cornerstones of our nation's greatness.

Mr. Thornton. Thank you, Mr. President. I'm privileged to accept this award on behalf of my father who, as you know, could not be here today. He wanted very much to come, however. He asked me to tell you though that he feels very fortunate to have had the opportunities afforded by this great country of ours and to have been able to serve it and to strive to contribute to its success.

Perhaps only those who matured in the last Depression, as he did, can best appreciate just how far we, as a Nation, have come in the last half century and the effort and the sacrifice it took to get here.

Even though his active role is drawing to a close, he is grateful to have played a part. He recognizes that the challenges before us remain enormous, yet is confident that this Nation's new leadership will guide us on the proper course -- a course which does not reject the past in which he has played a part, but which lets us build on our accomplishments and learn from our mistakes.

I can think of no one more respected by him than you, Mr. President. It is therefore deeply touching that you have honored him in this way. And that makes this award all the more meaningful to him, to our mother, and to the two younger generations of our family here today.

Attorney, teacher, scholar and philanthropist, Morris Leibman is living proof that a full career in the private sector can flourish hand in hand with civic and humanitarian duties. As a generous patron of the arts and charities, as a legal scholar as well as practitioner, as a founding member of the Georgetown University Center for Strategic and International Studies and as chairman of the American Bar Association's Standing Committee on Law and National Security, Morris Leibman has served selflessly to make America a just, healthy society within and a strong, secure nation without.

Mr. Leibman. Thank you, Mr. President. In the shadow of the assassination of recent hours, we thank the Lord that you, Mr. President, are here with us today. And we continue to be inspired by your courage and total commitment.

I and the other awardees, I feel certain, are humbled by the privilege of participating in this ceremony. We understand that on this occasion, we represent millions of citizens dedicated to our free society. This is an occasion of remembrance and rededication -- remembrance of America's uniqueness, the noble experiment of government by melting pot of free people; rededication to your leadership and guidance to meaningful patriotism, to national purpose, to national will and strength and credibility.

Our great American ideals and goals lose vitality without vibrant expression. You, Mr. President, have established yourself as the great communicator, a most important aspect of leadership in this world of competing and conflicting ideologies. A number of us present here today have struggled with the problem of improving the systems, forms, and structures for communicating American foreign policy, nationally and internationally. Under your leadership and under your Presidency, we eagerly renew our dedication to this effort and look forward to working with you in your great responsibility for continuing the dialog of Western civilization and the preservation of the free world.

Legislator, physician, missionary and orator, Walter Judd has served his nation and mankind with unfailing courage and distinction -- as a youthful medical missionary in China, as a highly respected Member of Congress for two decades, and as a lifelong foe of tyranny and friend of freedom both at home and abroad. The skills of a healer, the eloquence of a great communicator, and his firm grasp of domestic and international affairs have made Walter Judd an articulate spokesman for all those who cherish liberty and a model for all Americans who aspire to serve mankind as physicians, spiritual leaders and statesmen.

I'm glad that this medal is called the Medal of Freedom. Concern for that greatest of all our blessings in this beautiful land has been, I think a consistent and at least a major influence in my own life and motivation.

Freedom has been central to the efforts I made as a missionary in China, and as a political missionary in the House of Representatives and, in these last 19 years, as what might perhaps be called, ``missionary-at-large,'' expecially to the colleges and high schools of our country, working with the youth to help develop a deeper understanding of what freedom makes possible -- as has been demonstrated in these other awards -- and what freedom requires.

Whenever I find my battery is running down, I like to go over to the monument, not so far from here, erected to the memory of that great American patriot who wrote down in immortal words the fundamental faith and philosophy which gave our Nation its birth and its greatness, Thomas Jefferson.

Now, that, to the best of my ability, has been the basic standard by which I tried to judge which of the various solutions being offered for this, that, or the other difficult problem for our country was right or nearest right. And that's what we're trying to do in retirement.

If followed, those principles and policies, would they strengthen the oppressor or would they strengthen the oppressed? Where does the United States stand -- with wisdom and a recognition of timing and what's appropriate and what is possible at a given moment?

Now, I believe, Mr. President, that you and I and all of us in this blessed land were born to be free. And if we were born to be free, then so were the Czechs and the Poles and the Cubans and the Chinese and the Cambodians and the Afghans. And if they weren't born to be free, neither were we.

Now, this is not a note, I hope, a note of gloom or despair. On the contrary, it's the main basis for confidence and hope for our future. Surely the universe is on the side of human freedom, including the nature of the man and the nature of the woman. They can be arrested human beings. They can be in prison. They can be starved and brainwashed and beaten and sent to concentration camps and liquidated. But they cannot be separated in the end from that which is in them from their Creator -- the urge to be free.

Counsellor to Presidents and sage observer of nearly half a century of Washington history, Bryce Harlow's vision, integrity and persuasiveness have helped to shape his nation's destiny as leader of the Free World. Never a candidate for elected office himself, his experience and advice have helped bring out the best in countless public servants of both parties, in the White House, in the Congress and across the nation. Bryce Harlow is a sterling example of the positive side of politics -- a life spent reconciling divergent interests, serving high moral principles, and channeling the forces of public policy toward the public good.

I thank you Mr. President, very, very much. And that eloquent citation -- I wish I had said it. I love every word in it. Thank you. [Laughter] The Harlow contingent here very deeply appreciates the great honor paid us, both by this very special award and by your personal participation. I mean that particularly, your personal participation in these proceedings, because we all know the vast energy and time drain on the President of the United States.

The best I can figure it, Mr. President, the part of this award that is concerned with me, is my public service not my private service to the private sector. And that's the part that concerns me most -- the public service started when you were 27 years old. This is when I came to Washington from Oklahoma City. I came here to spend 1 year and to complete my education and then go back to Oklahoma and teach school. Well, that never did happen. Things happened to me instead. The war came -- that's for one. And then came Truman and Eisenhower and all the rest and a whole phantasmagoria of spectaculars. We all remember the gigantic events of our country and the world.

Somehow, and for reasons I don't to this day understand, I got entangled, embroiled, enmeshed in those activities, in those issues of those times. And in the course of that, I got involved and entangled with a great host of our national leaders, like the great Walter Judd and many others. And so, I spent nearly all of those years, Mr. President, working with the leaders of our country in the Congress and in the executive branch, including here at the White House, and the leadership of the Armed Forces during the war in the high command.

Now, the point that's relevant about that to this meeting is just simply this: It's not that I come -- [inaudible] -- but that I was never a leader in any of that. I was never the front man. I was never the boss or the chief. I was always the behind-the-scenes fellow. I was always the assistant, the counsellor, if you will.

Now, if that is true, if that's the reason that this comes to me, then I say it's absolutely marvelous -- not because of me, Mr. President, but because I am projected across the country in millions of people who are working their tails off, getting little attention at all, who are working, who are loyal, who have the integrity, who are doing for their bosses, and doing for their bosses causes, expecting no recognition whatever.

Long before the women's movement had gained prominence, Ella Grasso had already begun the long, hard ascent to distinction as an elected public servant. A fond wife and mother, she proved that it is possible to reconcile a full family life with a long and eventful political career. As a champion of moral as well as politcal principle, Mrs. Grasso won the respect of fellow citizens of both parties and served as the first woman governor to be elected to office in her own right. Tireless in the pursuit of duty and courageous in the face of illness, Ella Grasso has earned the admiration of all Americans as a legislator, a governor and a woman of outstanding character and achievement.

Today is a bittersweet day in my life. We have been here under five Presidents, President Kennedy, President Johnson, President Nixon, President Ford, President Carter, and now you, Mr. President. I know this is the last time that I'll be here, because it was through the good fortune of Ella, my dear wife, that we were invited here. Ah, bittersweet, I say. It's bitter because of the loss of Ella. However, it's a happy occasion because she has been selected, or was selected as a recipient of this medal. It's unfortunate that the other brand has to present it to us. [Laughter] Let me go over that again. [Laughter] Very good.

Ella was an adviser to Presidents, U.S. Senators, Congressmen, and women and people interested in politics. She was a strange mixture of many, many things. She had integrity, sympathy, understanding. She was straight as an arrow. She was a good wife, an excellent mother and, above all, brought to politics a certain integrity that our good President is attempting to bring.

I think that this country lacks that type of person. And I, personally, and I know Ella, admired President Reagan very much. You know, in politics you have to do many things. The first thing you must do is get elected. And many times in getting elected, you know, you have to get elected.

And I am indeed honored to receive this medal, and I shall take it home and, of all the credits she has received, my son and daughter will not get this medal -- I'm keeping it myself. [Laughter] Thank you.

Last of the great ragtime composers and pianists, the son of slaves, and a pioneer crusader for Black Americans in the world of arts and entertainment, Eubie Blake is a national treasure. As pianist, showman and, above all, as composer, he has added immeasurably to America's musical heritage and helped to clear the way for succeeding generations of talented artists who, but for his example, might have been denied access to the artistic mainstream.

Note: The President spoke at 1:12 p.m. at a luncheon honoring the medal recipients in the East Room at the White House. Prior to the luncheon and presentation ceremony, the President hosted a reception for the award winners in the Blue Room.

You know, just the other day, I learned that the Marine Band is known as the President's own, and it makes me very proud to be able to say that, because it is one of the great concert bands of the world. But it also has some Italian blood in its background. Apparently, Thomas Jefferson was not pleased with the Marine Band that he found at the White House when he arrived as President. Jefferson told the Marine Commandant that he should look for musicians in Italy, which was noted then, as now, for its musical talent. The Commandant, taking Mr. Jefferson's remarks as an order, sent a representative to Italy, where the fellow persuaded Italian musicians of all ages to join the Marines and return with him to America. [Laughter] And this Italian excellence has been the standard for the band ever since. And I can tell you that even after 183 years, the band hasn't lost its Italian love and heart for music.

But if I had thought of all of this sooner, I would have had that Marine Band come to play for us today, because we really should have music, because this is not just a solemn proclamation signing. It's a celebration of what the great mariner, Christopher Columbus, accomplished. And in recent years, Columbus Day has also become a day to celebrate what Italian Americans have accomplished.

Columbus is symbolic of the millions of Italians who have come to the New World since its discovery. They, too, possessed courage, and they, too, sought opportunity and endured hardship. For many, their journey was just as personally demanding as the one that Columbus undertook. I remember John Volpe telling me that it took his parents 6 weeks to cross the Atlantic in steerage, and all they had was a battered suitcase when they arrived.

Our immigrant ancestors worked long and hard. They adhered to solid, decent values, and they consequently prospered. Today, if it were not for a rightful pride of heritage, there would be no reason to identify Italian Americans as any kind of separate ethnic group, for Italian Americans are integrated into every aspect of American life -- business, labor, arts, the professions, as well as high posts in this administration. Indeed, time would not permit me to list those who are here as a part of this administration.

And I'm going to sign the proclamation now, but as I sign it, I am commemorating not only the great navigator and explorer, Christopher Columbus, but those who centuries later followed him to the New World and helped make this the great nation that it is today.

He is justly admired as a brilliant navigator, a fearless man of action, a visionary who opened the eyes of an older world to an entirely new one. Above all, he personifies a view of the world that many see as quintessentially American: not merely optimistic, but scornful of the very notion of despair.

Nearly five centuries have passed since the fateful day on which Columbus changed the course of history. But his adventurous spirit lives on among us, challenging us to emulation and abiding with us as we too press forward on our voyage of discovery.

In tribute to the achievement of Columbus and to the many sons and daughters of Italy who have helped to shape our life and destiny as a people, the Congress of the United States of America has requested the President to proclaim the second Monday in October of each year as Columbus Day.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

H.R. 4084 authorizes appropriations to carry out the act and amends it in several respects, principally by revising the procedures for returning to the States responsibility for management of marine mammals and by establishing a cooperative Federal-State procedure for managing marine mammals in ocean waters from 3 to 200 miles offshore. Specifically, H.R. 4084 provides for the Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary of the Interior to adopt State regulations applicable to the territorial waters and extend them by regulation to the federally controlled Fishery Conservation Zone. The bill, however, makes inapplicable to this process Executive Order 12291, the Regulatory Flexibility Act, the Paperwork Reduction Act, and the 30-day notice requirement under the Administrative Procedure Act, all of which are important to this administration's efforts to control the proliferation of Federal regulations.

I must express my concern over these exemptions. While I fully support the notion of encouraging and reinforcing State initiative in the management of marine mammals, I remain concerned that our important Federal regulatory review processes not be overlooked in this instance. The exemption of these regulatory actions from the regulatory review processes circumvents our regulatory relief efforts. I oppose that exemption, no matter how well intended.

Moreover, the Department of Justice has advised me that the exemption of these regulatory actions from Executive Order 12291 should not be read to infringe in any way on the President's constitutional responsibility to supervise the Secretary of Commerce and the Secretary of the Interior in their execution of the law. I have requested the Attorney General to advise the Secretaries and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget on the actions they should take to carry out this provision of the bill consistent with the President's constitutional responsibilities.

The agreement would extend, until May 21, 1982, the rights, duties, and obligations of the Treaty, which by its terms expired on September 21, 1981. During that time, negotiations will continue on a successor agreement to the Treaty; it is expected that, by the time these negotiations are concluded, Spain will have completed the process of accession to the North Atlantic Treaty of April 4, 1949 (63 Stat. 2241; T.I.A.S. 1964). The agreement would preserve in force on an interim basis United States rights regarding access to and use of important military facilities in Spain, and otherwise continue the significant cooperative relationship now existing between the two countries under the provisions of the Treaty. This action is necessary in order to regularize the legal relationship between the United States and Spain in the post-September 21 period, and thereby to facilitate the current negotiations. I recommend that the Senate give prompt and favorable consideration to this agreement.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The first settlers arriving in our land looked to the forests as their key to survival in an untamed and often forbidding land. The forests gave them wood for shelter, fuel for warmth, and meat for their table. Since those early times, our Nation's bountiful forests have provided for the welfare of generations of Americans. Yet, there are almost as many trees in our forests today as when the first tree was felled by our forefathers.

Although the daily lives of most Americans are now far removed from the forest environment, forests still supply lumber for homes, paper for disseminating information, fuel for stoves and fireplaces, and thousands of other uses that have become so commonplace they are often taken for granted.

Forests play a vital role in maintaining a healthy economy -- more than 3 million Americans are employed in wood-dependent occupations, and their combined production is valued at about $100 billion each year. Moreover, our forests provide us with a wealth of other treasures that can carry no price tags -- water, wildlife, outdoor recreation, and wilderness.

The contribution forests must make to our Nation's welfare will remain just as great in the years ahead as in the past. To meet the needs of the future, our forests must benefit from effective timber management and from continuing research to find better ways to utilize forest products. Improved wood growth and usage will make more wood products available at affordable prices while helping to stimulate our entire economy.

America has been greatly blessed with the resources of our forests. To allow them to waste away, when they could benefit so many, would be to ignore our responsibilities of stewardship. Our forests must be managed in ways that are environmentally safe and that ensure they will be available for the enjoyment and use of future generations.

If we act intelligently, our forests will continue to benefit the economy, even as they nourish the human spirit. The need and opportunity to commune with nature, to seek solitude, and to appreciate the beauty and grandeur of America's forests must be respected and preserved. With wise forest management, the demands of aesthetics and economics will remain compatible.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President today awarded the National Medal of Science to Dr. Philip Handler, an outstanding American biochemist and former president of the National Academy of Sciences, the Nation's most prestigious scientific organization.

In awarding the National Medal of Science to Dr. Handler, the President has cited his ``outstanding contribution to biochemical research, resulting in significant contributions to mankind, including research that led to a clearer understanding of pellagra.'' The award also cites Dr. Handler for his national leadership in furthering the state of American science.

Dr. Handler served as president of the National Academy of Sciences from 1969 to 1981, where he was a leading spokesman for excellence in American scientific endeavors. His strong and eloquent leadership of the Academy during turbulent times for science was praised widely by the scientific community on the occasion of his recent retirement.

In awarding this high honor to Dr. Handler, the President extended his best wishes to him as a scientist and individual who had devoted himself so completely to the advancement of American science, to intellectual freedom in international science, and to human progress and well-being everywhere.

The Board's decision had been submitted to the President for review under section 801(a) of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, under which the President has the authority to disapprove Board actions only upon the basis of foreign relations or national defense considerations. The President examined the Board's decision in light of these considerations, which are the only factors he is authorized by the statute to take into account, and determined not to disapprove the Board's decision within the 60 days the statute allows.

The President is aware that the proposed acquisition of Continental Airlines by Texas International Airlines has led many to express concern about future levels of air service to Pacific islands, including those within the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands. The President reaffirms the commitment of the United States to the economic development of the Trust Territory islands and recognizes the importance of commercial air service to that development.

In this regard, the Board's decision approving the acquisition includes safeguards designed to prevent unilateral reduction of air service to these islands. Consistent with the Board's action and sharing its concern, the President encourages efforts by the interested executive departments to develop, as appropriate, additional safeguards to assure that the islands of the Trust Territory will continue to receive adequate air service.

The President. Well, there would be a condition -- always has been. There's never been any refusal, only until they will recognize Israel's right to exist as a nation, which they still have never done.

The President. Well, I continue to be cautiously optimistic. I hope that some of the Senators who are opposed will recognize that even more than before it is essential that we show the Middle East that we are prepared to participate there in trying to bring peace and in aligning ourselves with the moderate Arab states, as well as we have with Israel.

The President. Egypt and the Sudan have a treaty with regard to that. And Egypt has made it plain that they're going to stand by that treaty. And I think if you compare Libya to Egypt, that should restrain -- to beat Qadhafi.

Yesterday, we celebrated Columbus Day. Some 489 years ago, three ships sailing under the Spanish flag and commissioned by King Ferdinand and Queen Isabella made a discovery that irreversibly altered the course of history and marked the emergence of Spain as a world power. It's fitting that one who traces his lineage to Ferdinand and Isabella now leads Spain into a new era of democracy and freedom. We applaud the sensible path toward political liberty that you've chosen and the skill, and if I may add, personal courage, that you've demonstrated in reaching your goal.

On July 1st, I met with your Foreign Minister, Jose Pedro Perez Llorca, and he emphasized that Spain is moving toward joining the major European institutions. This, too, we applaud. We look forward to Spain's complete integration into the Western community of nations. Already, the Spanish Government is playing a leading role in the struggle to combat terrorism on the European continent. Such initiative is well-appreciated here.

Spain's growing presence cannot help but strengthen the bond that exists between our two people. Americans will never forget the all important assistance Spain was during our struggle for independence and freedom.

So now, when we offer the Spanish people our hands and our hearts, we do so out of gratitude for all that Spain has done for us. Those of us from the Western United States understand perhaps more than other Americans the magnitude of Spain's contribution. Spaniards explored the length and breadth of the Southern and Western United States, settling or passing through 16 of the present States of the Union. My own California is a wonderful example of Spain's lasting cultural gift. Catholic missions still stand in testimony to this magnificent cultural and spiritual contribution to the world. Spanish architecture is everywhere, and California's constitution was written in two languages -- Spanish and English.

At my first inauguration as Governor of California, I took the oath of office with my hand on a Bible brought to California by Father Junipero Serra, a Spaniard whose unselfish devotion to God is an inspiration to all Americans. These things and our many citizens whose family trees are rooted in Spain have had a major impact on the American character.

Well, today we know that the traits Walt Whitman described a century ago well characterize the leadership of King Juan Carlos. We welcome you, Your Majesties, and are grateful for your dedication to your country and to your ideals. You have the admiration and respect of the American people, and you honor us with your visit.

The King. Mr. President, the Queen and I offer our sincere thanks for your very warm greetings. It has given us great pleasure to be able to accept your most kind invitation and to be here today in your great country.

We officially begin our visit at this ceremony with our hearts and spirits working towards the pleasant task of bringing our peoples and our two countries together in a felicitous and productive cooperation based on our common interests and goals.

From the vantage points afforded us by our respective national characteristics and destinies, we are witnessing an increasingly closer weave in the fabric of our relationship -- a relationship whose goal is the progress and well-being of our people within the global context of the noble principles of peace, understanding, freedom, and prosperity for all mankind.

We also wish at this time to express to the American people the Spanish people's message of sincere friendship. Mr. President, for the world and for my country, you embody the great American democracy which during its two centuries of existence, in times of peace as well as times of hardship, has succeeded in defending and upholding the timeless values of justice and the dignity of man.

In this task, you will always have the understanding and support of my country, which with its new democratic vitality, with faith and hope, has set out upon the path leading to full integration in the Western World to which it belongs.

Mr. President, here at the portico of the White House, whose architecture reflects the austere solemnity, the traditional virtue of the pioneers who founded the American nation, the Queen and I thank you and Mrs. Reagan for your cordial welcome.

We discussed the East-West situation, the importance of forging even closer Western unity and cohesion in the face of a determined Soviet challenge. We spent considerable time comparing notes on the Middle East and the interest which our two countries share in promoting peace and stability in that troubled region, so recently shaken by the tragic death of Egyptian President Sadat. We talked about Latin America and the Caribbean Basin, an area where, owing to the wealth of Hispanic culture and historical ties, Spanish insights are especially valuable.

Most important, my talks with His Majesty merely confirmed that -- well, what I and millions of my fellow Americans already knew, that Spain has a wise and courageous chief of state, whose leadership in developing his country's democratic institutions has earned the world's profound respect.

Your Majesty, I take this opportunity to reiterate in public what I have expressed to you in private. The U.S. enormously admires the strides which you and your countrymen have taken toward creating a vital and vibrant democracy in so short a time. In fully supporting that democracy, we consider Spain not only a major strategic partner but a close friend, and we look forward even more closely to working with your government as Spain continues to pursue full integration with Europe and the West.

I speak for all Americans when I say that I hope you and your gracious Queen will soon return to our shores. You'll be particularly welcome not only here in Washington but in those many parts of our country where Spanish culture and language have contributed so enduringly to our own history and heritage.

The King. First of all, Mr. President, I want to thank you for those kind words for which I am extremely grateful. But I want to tell you and publicly to tell you that without the help of the Spanish people, I would not have been able, in the beginning, to do what Spain achieved and what I achieved with them.

I want to express again to the President and Mrs. Reagan our gratitude for the invitation and for the hospitality we are receiving. Our visit to Washington couldn't have started better. I'm not referring to the weather, but to the most cordial and personal relationship that has developed in this, our first visit.

Mr. Garrick, a retired rear admiral in the U.S. Navy Reserve, has been on leave from his position as senior vice president of Doremus & Co., an international public relations firm. He served on the transition organization as deputy director for public affairs and was director of research and policy development for the Reagan-Bush campaign committee.

Tonight we honor a man who, like el Cid, was born in a favorable moment. Mankind is in desperate need of leaders with courage and wisdom. We watch the progress in Spain, the magnificent strides toward political freedom, with a sense of awe. In a world that seems to be drowning under a wave of authoritarianism, Spain shines as a beacon of hope.

This kind of progress requires of the people and of their leader a certain strength of character neither necessary nor natural in despotic regimes. Building a free society is every bit as perplexing and at times threatening as the struggle that faced el Cid. Such times as these and such challenges as those facing your country separate great leaders from lesser men, who by circumstances find themselves in positions of political power.

King Juan Carlos, Queen Sophia, and the Spanish people have risen to the task God has placed before them, and the world is being given a majestic gift -- a truly free and prosperous Spain. Over the centuries, Spain has contributed so much. Whether one talks of the great Cervantes and the development of modern literature, or refers to the painting of Goya or El Greco, certainly Spain has provided Western civilization with a multitude of priceless gifts. And now, King Juan Carlos, with the courage of el Cid and the skill of the great Spanish masters, is creating a masterpiece of democracy.

The King. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, I have followed the ideas expressed in your toast with keen interest and should like now, for my part, to tell you that it is a great pleasure for the Queen and for me to visit your great country once again and to listen to your warm and cordial words.

Five years ago, when I first visited your nation as King of Spain, it was my honor to tell your Congress that the restored Spanish monarchy had undertaken the commitment to be the institution under which all Spaniards would find ample scope for political participation, with no discrimination whatsoever. Today, 5 years later, I am proud to confirm that what was then a statement of intention is now a palpable and profound reality -- a constitution approved by the people and by the freely elected parliament.

My country, Mr. President, a pioneer in the forging of the fundamental values of what we call the West, supported by its historic credentials and its Western and European vocation, which it will not renounce, wishes to occupy once again the place to which it is entitled in the international community. At the same time, it would like to offer as in years past its collaboration and its effort in the defense of the principles which are the very shared essence of our two nations.

On no scale of values can there be a more important goal for our two peoples than that of the defense of the principles in which the West finds its roots. Through this defense, consisting in the permanent safeguarding of the sovereignty and freedom of all the peoples of the Earth, Spain wishes to contribute to maintaining international peace and security.

We are fully aware that the peoples and nations which place moral and spiritual values above ambition for power and things material do freely express their will to live in peace with dignity. And we know that their freely elected governments heed these aspirations and join their efforts in order to attain the same goal.

Like your country, Spain defends peace and the rule of law, opposes threats and the use of force, and rejects all outside interference in its own affairs. It is in these terms that we conceive our international relations, which we wish to maintain peacefully with all peoples.

Our friendship with the American nation is as old as its origins. Yesterday, the day of our arrival in your country, was the 489th anniversary of the arrival of the Spaniards to this continent. With that magnificent event a new era began in world history, and through that heroic exploit, which was followed up by explorers and colonizers, the lands of America, from Alaska to Tierra del Fuego, came to form part -- and still do form a fundamental part of our Western World.

You also know, Mr. President, better than I, what the Spanish presence has meant in the American West -- the tremendous work carried out by the Spanish explorers, missionaries, and colonizers in that region; the founding of dozens of towns and cities which even today form a rosary of names echoing with the sounds of Spain.

These are links, Mr. President, which nothing and nobody can break; very strong ties which transcend the vicissitudes of the moment and serve to reinforce the mutual understanding and friendship of our two peoples. This friendship now takes on a new dimension in view of our will to reinforce our progressive participation in the European and Western effort, aimed at achieving a world that is ever freer and more just and in which our sister nations may fully participate.

To the relations between Spain and the United States, that in the future they may produce abundant fruit and that the ties which unite our two countries may intensify and become ever closer, I raise my glass tonight. With my good wishes for the well-being of the great American people, and for your own personal happiness, Mr. President and Mrs. Reagan.

And I should like to express one other hope, that is that the invitation that the Queen and I have extended to you, on behalf of Spain and of the Spanish people, to visit us in Spain during your term of office at a mutually convenient time can be accepted by you. I think we can provide for you a welcome which you would like.

Mr. Hodsoll is a member of the New York Bar and was formerly associated with Sullivan and Cromwell. He has managed a British trading company in the Philippines and has acted (with his wife) as general contractor of two houses in McLean. Originally from California, Mr. Hodsoll has degrees from Yale, Cambridge, and Stanford Law School. As an undergraduate, he was active in college theater and radio.

The President. The ability of this or any administration to succeed depends in no small degree upon the energy, the dedication, and the spirit of our nation's civil servants. The granting of Presidential rank awards provides the opportunity to recognize a select group of these employees for extraordinary service.

America is passing into a new era, reversing a long trend of government expansion. Government must limit what it does, yet still perform its rightful task with utmost skill and professionalism. Meeting this difficult challenge will require the determination and imagination which this year's Rank Award recipients have amply demonstrated.

There are 6,500 Federal employees in the Senior Executive Service, and this year only 25 were selected to receive this distinguished executive award. These men are being honored for the contributions they've made during their careers as public servants. Over the years, they've maintained a level of accomplishment head and shoulders above many of their fellows. While their talents have long been recognized by those with whom they work, this award gives us the opportunity to thank them in the name of the people of the United States who are the beneficiaries of their diligence.

There is a small stipend that accompanies this award. Yet, it in no way represents the enormous sums that they have saved the taxpayers. In looking over their backgrounds, I was impressed beyond words at the services they've performed. Some excelled in science or engineering projects, saving tax dollars by designing equipment that works well. In the case of Henry Harris, he developed a new weapons system of joint logistics that will be of considerable savings. This is an extraordinary list. Clyde Jeffcoat, for example, designed an accounting and billing system that eliminates the need for thousands of employees and saves millions of dollars. Better than focusing on new construction, Peter Kimm led an effort to upgrade current housing units and promote a self-help program for the units' underprivileged occupants. And David Menotti has a remarkable record -- mediated difficult conflicts between the EPA, industry, and environmental groups.

Time won't permit me to detail all of their accomplishments, but let me just say that we're very proud to have all of you working with us. And for the people of this country, I offer you a hearty thank you and a well done. And now, I shall turn it over to you.

Mr. Devine. Thank you. Mr. President, I'm proud as your chief bureaucrat, the director of your civil service, to honor 25 outstanding government executives who express the true degree of patriotism by proving their commitment to the country every day as they've carried out their assignments for the public over their long periods of service.

As you mentioned, the decade of the eighties presents new challenges, and we very much need the support of all our civil servants. As you said in your acceptance speech -- and probably the only time a politician has done this in an acceptance speech -- you asked for the ideas and the efforts of Federal employees to help you make government work. Through the 98-year history of the civil service, you haven't been let down. And these 25 have responded in an extraordinary way to show that their support is with you and the country as we make these changes.

Well, I want to welcome all of you here today to the White House on behalf of the American people, and I want to thank you for the important work that you've undertaken in these past few months. You're here because of your love for art, culture, and learning. You care deeply about things of the mind and spirit. Indeed, many of you are cultural leaders and you have proven what I have just said already, in the activities that you have undertaken on your own.

When Nancy inaugurated the Young Artists in Performance at the White House program here in this room, she quoted a line from Henry James: ``It is art that makes life, makes interest, makes importance, . . . and I know of no substitute whatever for the force and beauty of its process.'' Well, those words can truly be applied to art, to the humanities, and their scholarly pursuit. As you know, our tradition of arts and scholarship in America is like most of our traditions -- a pluralistic one. There are many wellsprings of support here for works of creativity and culture. I like to believe that's why artists and scholars continue to flock to our shores from other countries. Today we're seen as a great center of Western culture, a place where the artist and the scholar can find enrichment and excitement.

It is with a very deep sense of appreciation that we are presenting to you, Mr. President, the report of your Task Force on the Arts and Humanities. We are, above all, grateful for the concern you have shown for the health and the vigor of our nation's cultural life.

You provided us with a stimulating occasion to consider the opportunities and the obligations which all of us share to sustain and to strengthen this country's commitment to the arts and to the humanities. The hallmark of that commitment lies in a devotion to the essential freedoms of thought and expression.

A society that recognizes the enduring significance of the arts and the humanities to the quality and to the future of our civilization will set high value also on diversity and on independence of initiative. This conviction asserts a confidence in the power and possibilities of scholarship and of education at their best, a dedication to the values and to the varieties of the creative and performing arts at their most vital. It rests on a regard for the cultivation of inherited tradition and also for encouraging the risk-taking that gives rise to new forms of learning and artistic accomplishment.

It is a difficult task, the task of leadership, to balance so many pressing needs and complex goals, to assess the claims of the future against those of the present, to stimulate the distinctive and cooperative roles of the public and the private sectors. In that context, we know that you will give consideration to those activities which over the generations will shape the capacities and the potential of an educated and creative people. We hope very much that the work of our task force will be of some use as you direct that process.

And in saying that, I know that I speak not only for the members of the Task Force, for the staff which has served the Task Force so ably, but also for the two Cochairmen who were not able to be present today -- for Ambassador Terra who had to be absent today, and for Chuck Heston who has, however, written a statement.

And perhaps I could close with that. His statement says, ``I regret that the film I'm shooting in British Columbia keeps me from joining you to second the convictions I know Hanna will express. I've been preaching the independence and perseverance of the artist all summer. Now I'm trying to practice it.'' [Laughter] ``My thoughts are very much with you. I am grateful for your trust in us.'' Signed, Chuck Heston.

The President. Well thank you, Dr. Gray, very much. And now I think I'd like to conclude by pointing out that we hope your work will be very much a part of that era of national renewal I spoke of last January, an era we hope to make a reality in the next few years.

The challenge before us is to find ways once again to unleash the independent spirit of the people in their communities. And that energy will accomplish far, far more than just government programs alone ever could. It was in this context that I asked William (Bill) Verity, the chairman of Armco Steel, to chair a new Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives. Bill, since you so graciously accepted -- I caught him in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean on a boat; I'd never done that before -- won't you stand please and -- [applause]. But then he told me he'd never been called on a boat before -- [laughter] -- so it was a first for both of us.

But the Task Force is going to be comprised of 35 leaders from corporations, foundations, and voluntary and religious organizations. And I'm delighted that he's here with us today, for the thrust of our new efforts in the arts and humanities is very much in the spirit of our overall private sector initiative. We hope in this area, as in others, to assure pump priming and seed money in partnership with private giving.

Fostering arts and scholarship, not stifling it, not filtering it, has been the goal of the National Endowments for the Arts and Humanities. It has also been the goal of your work on the Task Force to act as a catalyst, to encourage the arts and humanities, to find for them new outlets and more generous sources of support. Unlike many other countries, American support for the arts and humanities comes primarily from the private sector -- $3 billion in 1980. The Endowments, which began in 1965, account for only 10 percent of the donations to art and scholarship. Nonetheless, they have served an important role in catalyzing additional private support, assisting excellence in arts and letters, and helping to assure the availability of art and scholarship.

Our primary goal in the arts and humanities is to strengthen that public and private partnership. We hope to encourage a variety of private support and involvement and to ensure responsiveness of Federal programs to the real needs. To assure an effective dialog between government and the private sector, we will explore with the Congress the expansion of our Federal Council on the Arts and Humanities to include private membership.

I would like to announce now my nomination of Frank Hodsoll as our proposed Chairman of the National Endowment for the Arts. Frank, as many of you know, is now Deputy to Jim Baker on our White House staff. He's worked with you on the Task Force, and I've charged him to encourage additional private support for the arts in States and communities across the land, to assure that Federal programs are responsive to needs. Frank, why don't you stand up so they can see you?

The arts and humanities have always been something of great personal importance to Nancy and to me. Nations are more often than not remembered for their art and thought. As I stated at the time of establishing the Task Force, our cultural institutions are an essential national resource. They must be kept strong.

I've invited you here today for what I think is an historic occasion, to welcome the 193d and newest Republican Member of the House of Representatives -- the Honorable Eugene Atkinson of Pennsylvania.

Congressman Atkinson is changing his registration from Democrat to Republican. He's undertaken an act of outstanding political courage that symbolizes the beginning of a new coalition and a new era in American politics. As many of you know, Gene and I first became acquainted April 21st, when I telephoned him seeking support for the Gramm-Latta budget proposal. And I put on my best pitch on the telephone and then he said to me, ``I am fully supportive of your programs.'' And it was then that I discovered that they had put the call through to him where he was the guest on a talk show, on radio, and he was doing this before a live radio audience, and my call had caught him there. Since then, we've gotten to know each other much better.

I've profited immeasurably from Gene's knowledge of the steel industry, which is so vitally important to the working men and women of his 25th district in Pennsylvania. In another sense, Gene and I actually go back well before last April, as his odyssey from Democrat to Republican is so strikingly parallel to my own.

Both Gene and I have long shared the same concerns for the plight of the working man in America. I was president of a labor union, while Gene lived and worked his entire life in an area that embodies the blue collar wage earner as much as anywhere in the United States. As Democrats, both Gene and I did the hard volunteer chores for the candidates of our choice. But as the time went on, we both came to the realization that our party, the party we belonged to, had drawn away from the concerns that we shared -- the size of the Federal Government, the extent of its regulations, the nature of Federal income taxes and how they affect America's wage earners, and the decline of America's defenses. Those were the concerns uppermost in my mind in 1962, when I ended 30 years as a registered Democrat to join the Republican Party.

Those are the concerns that have led Gene Atkinson to do so today. In both cases, we followed the courage of action characterized so eloquently by Winston Churchill: ``Some men change principle for party and some men change party for principle.'' More than any other recent development, I believe that Gene Atkinson's decision will send a loud and clear message to America that our party, the Republican Party, stands for the working men and women of this country. And that's why Gene is here today.

Representative Atkinson. Thank you very much, Mr. President. I appreciate your kind words, and I also value the friendship that we've established and which you spoke of here today. I also appreciate the support of my good friends, Secretary Drew Lewis, and my colleague, the chairman of the Pennsylvania delegation, Joseph McDade.

You know, Mr. President, throughout my 20 years in public life, I've always been a Democrat. I have served as a Federal Government official, a county commissioner, and now as a United States Congressman from the 25th District of Pennsylvania. I've also served as Democratic county chairman and as a member of the Pennsylvania Democratic State Committee.

The modern Democratic Party bears no resemblance to the one I proudly joined many years ago, a party that stood for tax cuts and a national defense second to none. I'm not in tune with the modern Democratic Party which has, in my view, left behind the principles upon which it was founded -- Jefferson's concept of less government and Jackson's idea of a party by and for the working men.

I do not put party labels on the President nor on programs. I think that's meaningless. What counts is purpose, and what counts is performance. It's encouraging to me, Mr. President, that a true effort is being made to reduce Federal spending and curb runaway inflation.

Mr. President, Republicans and Democrats and Independents alike know of your commitment to the working men and women of America, who have been hit hardest by the tremendous impact of runaway spending and the high cost of living. That's why I voted down the line to support the budget programs and the tax cuts contained in your economic recovery program.

It's interesting to note that the House Democratic Caucus recently granted amnesty to those Congressmen who voted their convictions. It is painful that those of us who speak our minds and vote our conscience are now forgiven for these sins by the Democratic Caucus. I resent them granting me amnesty and the veiled threat that to continue to vote independently could cause a loss of seniority in committee assignments. How can Members of Congress across the Nation determine how I should vote?

Again, Mr. President, I am honored to join with you, for we share the same hopes and concerns for America. We have both lived the American dream and want a nation that is strong, that is prosperous, and that is free -- for our children and for future generations. I will work with you to do for our Nation what President Kennedy, who first appointed me to public office, started to do, and that's to get America moving again.

Representative McDade. Mr. President, and our newest Republican from Pennsylvania, I certainly want to express my thanks to Gene on behalf of the entire delegation and of the people of the United States.

I should say I have a personal reason for thanking him, because his switch of voting today makes me chairman of the Pennsylvania delegation rather than ranking member. [Laughter] So, we're especially delighted. I've known Gene. I'm delighted to see his act of courage toward making this Nation what we all want it to be -- more prosperous, stronger, better for the men and women of America, who work everyday in the factories to make this a great nation.

The President. I have to go back in and go to work, and this is my way of telling you that these gentlemen have graciously agreed to stay here for a few moments for any questions that you might have, and you can direct them to them.

The United States is blessed with abundant land, fertile soil, adequate water, and a favorable climate. Upon this natural base, Americans have erected a sound system of agriculture, founded on the right of private property ownership, the opportunity to earn rewards for honest toil and investment, the freedom to exchange in the marketplace, the availability of essential credit, the application of new scientific discoveries and technologies, and the primacy of the independent family farm. The result has been an unparalleled agricultural bounty, capable of feeding our own people and millions of people around the world.

Today, many nations lack either the natural endowments or the system of incentives to private enterprise that are critical to successful agriculture. Many millions of people, particularly in the Third World, and where government policies have denied land ownership and market incentives to their farmers, are suffering from hunger and malnutrition.

Americans have traditionally been generous in sharing our agricultural abundance and technology with those less fortunate than ourselves. Since the beginning of the Food for Peace program in 1954, more than 387 million tons of American food aid, valued at more than $30 billion, have been provided to the hungry peoples of the world. American agricultural development assistance programs have helped peoples all over the world to improve their food production.

Our efforts to alleviate hunger have complemented those of other members of the international community. We salute particularly the tireless efforts of the Food and Agriculture Organization which, on World Food Day, celebrates thirty-six years of service in the effort to alleviate hunger and malnutrition.

To focus worldwide public attention on the world's food problem, 147 member nations of the Food and Agriculture Organization have unanimously urged individual nations to commemorate October 16 as World Food Day. The Congress of the United States has responded by adopting a Joint Resolution in support of this objective.

On this occasion, let us rededicate ourselves to continuing and strengthening our efforts to assist the people of other lands to work toward the elimination of hunger, to develop strong agricultural bases built upon sound principles, and to engage in mutually beneficial commercial trade between our countries.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

I am pleased to be signing into law today S. 1181, the Uniformed Services Pay Act of 1981. The legislation will provide to all of our men and women in uniform a richly deserved average increase of 14.3 percent in basic pay, basic allowance for quarters, and basic allowance for subsistence. The bill also contains increases in a number of special and incentive pays which are designed to attract and retain those highly skilled personnel who are so vital to the efficient operation of our Armed Forces.

Attracting and retaining well-motivated, high quality military personnel is a critical element of my commitment to strengthen America's defenses. This bill will enable us to do that. For too long our dedicated military personnel have been undercompensated for the sacrifices and family disruptions they have had to endure in protecting the freedom of all of us.

I am particularly pleased that this legislation received such strong bipartisan support in the Congress. In that regard, I want to personally thank Senators Roger Jepsen and James Exon and Congressmen Bill Nichols and Donald Mitchell for their hard work and skill in guiding this bill through the Congress.

Well, maybe that's even more true today. We see free and expanded trade between people and nations because this form of human activity is beneficial to everyone. It solidifies bonds of friendship and increases the standard of living of those on both sides of the transaction. The America of the 1980's is far more dependent on exports than during Eisenhower's time. Since 1960, our export business has grown from $19.6 billion per year to $220.6 billion in 1980. More than five million jobs in the United States are now directly tied to our thriving export industry. Our exports have played a key role in offsetting this Nation's increased import of foreign oil.

As a group, you possess a wealth of experience and knowledge. Under the leadership of Paul Lyet and Anna Chennault, we plan to tap this resource by asking you to help direct your country's policies in this vital area. We're relying on you to help improve America's competitive position in international trade.

The previous council did an excellent job in identifying regulations that impede the export industry. We are counting on you to expand upon this and further reduce such disincentives. Competition is good. You may have heard that somewhere before. [Laughter] Seriously, whether it's domestic or international, competition provides better quality and lower-priced products.

Nevertheless, we must ensure that our businessmen are not unintentionally hobbled by government. You will be of invaluable service if you will help us identify and correct government-related problems that hamper our exporters. This is a great example of how the private sector and government can work together. And when they do, everyone is a winner.

Now, thanks to all of you in advance for the time and the effort that you will put into this. It's well appreciated, I can assure you of that. And you will find that the administration, policywise, is in favor of the things that I have suggested that you give your attention to.

Sec. 4. Effective Date. The adjustments in rates of monthly basic pay and allowances for subsistence and quarters for members of uniformed services shall be effective on October 1, 1981. All other adjustments of salary or pay shall be effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after October 1, 1981.

The Alaska Highway Pipeline route for the Alaska Natural Gas Transportation System was chosen by President Carter and approved by Congress in 1977. There was a strong Congressional endorsement that the pipeline should be built if it could be privately financed. That has been my consistent position since becoming President, as communicated on numerous occasions to our good neighbors in Canada and I am now submitting my formal findings and proposed waiver of law.

My Administration supports the completion of this project through private financing, and it is our hope that this action will clear the way to moving ahead with it. I believe that this project is important not only in terms of its contribution to the energy security of North America. It is also a symbol of U.S.-Canadian ability to work together cooperatively in the energy area for the benefit of both countries and peoples. This same spirit can be very important in resolving the other problems we face in the energy area.

This waiver of law, submitted to the Congress under Section 8(g) of the Alaska Natural Gas Transportation Act, is designed to clear away governmental obstacles to proceeding with private financing of this important project. It is critical to the energy security of this country that the Federal Government not obstruct development of energy resources on the North Slope of Alaska. For this reason, it is important that the Congress begin expeditiously to consider and adopt a waiver of those laws that impede private financing of the project.

I'm grateful for this opportunity to appear before your distinguished group and to share with you our administration's views on an important, upcoming event. I'll be traveling next week to Cancun, Mexico, to participate in a summit that will bring together leaders of two-thirds of the world's population. And the subject of our talks will be the relationships among the developed and the developing nations and, specifically, I hope we can work together to strengthen the world economy and to promote greater economic growth and prosperity for all our peoples.

U.S. foreign policy proceeds from two important premises: the need to revitalize the United States and world economy as a basis for the social and economic progress of our own and other nations, and the need to provide adequate defenses to remain strong, safe, in a precarious period of world history. In this context, U.S. relations with developing countries play a critical role. These countries are important partners in the world economy and in the quest for world peace.

We understand and are sensitive to the diversity of developing countries. Each is unique in its blend of cultural, historical, economic, and political characteristics, but all aspire to build a brighter future. And they can count on our strong support.

We will go to Cancun ready and willing to listen and to learn. We will also take with us sound and constructive ideas designed to help spark a cooperative strategy for global growth to benefit both the developed and developing countries.

We very much want a positive development dialog, but sometimes this dialog becomes oversimplified and unproductive. For example, some people equate development with commerce, which they unfairly characterize as simple lust for material wealth. Others mistake compassion for development and claim massive transfers of wealth somehow miraculously will produce new well-being. And still others confuse development with collectivism, seeing it as a plan to fulfill social, religious, or national goals, no matter what the cost to individuals or historical traditions.

All of these definitions miss the real essence of development. In its most fundamental sense, it has to do with the meaning, aspirations, and worth of every individual. In its ultimate form, development is human fulfillment, an ability by all men and women to realize freely their full potential to go as far as their God-given talents will take them.

We Americans can speak from experience on this subject. When the original settlers arrived here, they faced a wilderness where poverty was their daily lot, danger and starvation their close companions. But through all the dangers, disappointments, and setbacks, they kept their faith. They never stopped believing that with the freedom to try and try again, they could make tomorrow a better day.

Free people build free markets that ignite dynamic development for everyone. And that's the key, but that's not all. Something else helped us create these unparalleled opportunities for growth and personal fulfillment: a strong sense of cooperation, free association among individuals, rooted in institutions of family, church, school, press, and voluntary groups of every kind. Government, too, played an important role. It helped eradicate slavery and other forms of discrimination. It opened up the frontier through actions like the Homestead Act and rural electrification. And it helped provide a sense of security for those who, through no fault of their own, could not support themselves.

Government and private enterprise complement each other. They have, they can, and they must continue to coexist and cooperate. But we must always ask: Is government working to liberate and empower the individual? Is it creating incentives for people to produce, save, invest, and profit from legitimate risks and honest toil? Is it encouraging all of us to reach for the stars? Or does it seek to compel, command, and coerce people into submission and dependence?

Ask these questions, because no matter where you look today, you will see that development depends upon economic freedom. A mere handful of industrialized countries that have historically coupled personal initiative with economic reward now produce more than one-half the wealth of the world. The developing countries now growing the fastest in Asia, Africa, and Latin America are the very ones providing more economic freedom for their people -- freedom to choose, to own property, to work at a job of their choice, and to invest in a dream for the future.

Perhaps the best proof that development and economic freedom go hand-in-hand can be found in a country which denies freedom to its people -- the Soviet Union. For the record, the Soviets will not attend the conference at Cancun. They simply wash their hands of any responsibility, insisting all the economic problems of the world result from capitalism, and all the solutions lie with socialism.

Well, the real reason they're not coming is they have nothing to offer. In fact, we have just one question for them: Who's feeding whom? I can hardly remember a year when Soviet harvests have not been blamed on ``bad weather,'' and I've seen a lot of harvest seasons, as the press keeps reminding me. [Laughter] They've had quite a long losing streak for a government which still insists the tides of history are running in its favor.

The Soviets, of course, can rely on farmers from America and other nations to keep their people fed. But ironically, they have a reliable source of nourishment right in their own country -- the 3 percent of all cultivated land that farmers in the Soviet Union are allowed to farm on their own and market. Those who farm that 3 percent of land produce nearly 30 percent of the meat, milk, and vegetables in Russia, 33 percent of the eggs, and 61 percent of the potatoes.

Now, that's why this isn't a question of East versus West, of the U.S. versus the Soviet Union. It's a question of freedom versus compulsion, of what works versus what doesn't work, of sense versus nonsense. And that's why we say: Trust the people, trust their intelligence and trust their faith, because putting people first is the secret of economic success everywhere in the world.

Now I want to talk about the second part of our message at Cancun -- our record and that of the international economic system itself in helping developing countries generate new growth and prosperity. Here again, it's time to speak out with candor. To listen to some shrill voices, you'd think our policies were as stingy as your Philadelphia Eagles' defense. [Laughter] There is a propaganda campaign in wide circulation that would have the world believe that capitalist United States is the cause of world hunger and poverty.

And yet each year, the United States provides more food assistance to developing nations than all the other nations combined. Last year, we extended almost twice as much official development assistance as any other nation.

The spirit of voluntary giving is a wonderful tradition that flows like a deep, mighty river through the history of our Nation. When Americans see people in other lands suffering in poverty and starvation, they don't wait for government to tell them what to do. They sit down and give and get involved; they save lives. And that's one reason we know America is such a special country.

All that is just one side of the coin. The other, only rarely acknowledged, is the enormous contribution we make through the open, growing markets of our own country. The United States buys approximately one-half of all the manufactured goods that non-OPEC developing countries export to the industrialized world, even though our market is only one-third of the size of the total industrialized world's. Last year, these same developing countries earned twice as much from exports to the United States than they received in aid from all other countries combined. And in the last 2 years alone, they earned more from exports to the United States than the entire developing world has received from the World Bank in the last 36 years.

The barriers to trade in our markets are among the lowest in the world. The United States maintains few restrictions on our custom procedures, and they are very predictable. In 1980, 51 percent of our imports from developing countries entered this country duty free. American capital markets are also more accessible to the developing countries than capital markets anywhere else in the world.

From all this, two conclusions should be clear: Far from lagging behind and refusing to do our part, the United States is leading the way in helping to better the lives of citizens in developing countries. And a major way that we can do that job best, the way we can provide the most opportunity for even the poorest of nations, is to follow through with our own economic recovery program to ensure strong, sustained noninflationary growth. And that's just what we're determined to do.

Every 1 percent reduction in our interest rates, due to lower inflation, improves the balance of payments of developing countries by $1 billion. By getting our own economic house in order, we win, they win, we all win.

Now, just as there is need for a clearer focus on the real meaning of development and our own development record, there's a similar need to be clear about the international economic system. Some argue that the system has failed; others that it's unrepresentative and unfair. Still others say it is static and unchanging, and then a few insist that it's so sound it needs no improvement. Well, we need a better understanding than that.

As I recalled recently before the annual meeting of the World Bank and the IMF, the post-war international economic system was created on the belief that ``the key to national development and human progress is individual freedom -- both political and economic.'' This system provided only generalized rules in order to maintain maximum flexibility and opportunity for individual enterprise and an open international trading and financial system.

The GATT, the World Bank, the International Monetary Fund represent free associations of independent countries who accept both the freedom and discipline of a competitive economic system. Let's look at the record of international growth and development under their auspices.

From 1950 to 1980, gross national product, per capita, in 60 middle-income countries increased twice as fast as in the industrial countries when real purchasing power is taken into account. In 1951 to 1979, industry and manufacturing in developing countries also expanded at a faster rate than their counterparts in the industrial countries. Since 1960, export volume for the developing countries, excluding OPEC, grew between 6 and 7 percent a year. Growth was particularly strong in manufactured exports, and even some low-income oil importers participated in this trend. And, concessional assistance grew by 50 percent in real items during the 1970's.

By any standard, this is a remarkable record. It's not a basis for complacency, however. We recognize that despite the progress, many developing nations continue to struggle with poverty, minorities, and the lack of infra-structure, and are seriously affected by disruption in the international economy.

But while much progress remains to be made, we can take pride in what has been accomplished -- pride in the efforts of those countries that did most to utilize effectively the opportunities of the system and pride in the system itself for being sufficiently flexible to ensure that the benefits of international commerce flow increasingly to all countries.

Progress is also evident in the evolution of the international institutions themselves. Today approximately two-thirds of the members of GATT are developing countries, whereas only one-half were developing countries when it was created. Also, the resources of both the World Bank and the IMF have increased dramatically, as has the participation of developing country members.

Certainly, the record of the international system is not perfect, but people flirt with fantasy when they suggest that it's a failure and unfair. We know that much must still be done to help low-income countries develop domestic markets, strengthen their exports. But the way to do that is not to weaken the system that has served us so well, but to continue working together to make it better.

Now, this brings me to the third and final part of our message in Cancun -- a program for action. This summit offers the leadership of the world an opportunity to chart a domestic course for -- a strategic course, I should say, for a new era of international economic growth and development. And to do this, all countries, developed and developing alike, demonstrate the political will to address the real issues, confront the obstacles, and seize the opportunities for development wherever they exist.

Developing countries cannot be lumped together under the title as if their problems were identical. They're diverse, with distinct resource endowments, cultures, languages, and national traditions. The international system is comprised of independent, sovereign nations, whose separate existence testifies to their unique qualities and aspirations.

What we will seek to do at Cancun and elsewhere in subsequent meetings is examine cooperatively the roadblocks which developing countries' policies pose to development and how they can best be removed. For example: Is there an imbalance between public and private sector activities? Are high tax rates smothering incentives and precluding growth in personal savings and investment capital? And then we must examine the obstacles which developed countries put in the way of development and how they, in turn, can best be removed. For example: Are industrial countries maintaining open markets for the products of developing countries? Do they permit unrestricted access by developing countries to their own capital markets? And finally, we must decide how developed and developing countries together can realize their potential and improve the world economy to promote a higher level of growth and development.

First, stimulating international trade by opening up markets is absolutely essential. Last year, non-OPEC developing nations, by selling their products in American markets, earned $63 billion -- just last year. This is more than twice the amount of total development assistance provided to all developing countries in that same year. It's time for all of us to live up to our principles by concrete actions and open markets and liberalized trade.

The most meaningful action that we could take to promote trade with developing nations in the early 1980's is to strengthen the GATT. It is through a shared, reciprocal effort within GATT that further liberalization of industrial nations' trade regimes is most likely to be achieved. This will benefit developing countries more than any other single step.

The United States will work for a successful GATT ministerial meeting in 1982. We'll launch an extensive round of consultations with all countries, including developing countries, to prepare for that GATT meeting. We will join with developing countries in working for an effective safeguards code that reflects our mutual concerns and interests. In addition, we'll continue to support the generalized system of preferences, and we'll take the lead in urging other developing countries to match us in expanding developing nations' access to markets.

Trade's contribution to development can be magnified by aligning trade opportunities more closely with private investment, development assistance, technology sharing. At Cancun, we will make it clear that we're ready to cooperate with other nations in putting in place this kind of integrated, complementary effort.

Actually, we're already doing so, which brings me to the second part of our program -- tailoring particular development strategies to the specific needs and potential of individual countries and regions. In our own hemisphere, the United States has joined together with Mexico, Venezuela, and Canada to begin developing flexible, imaginative, and cooperative programs linking trade, investment, finance, foreign assistance, and private sector activities to help the nations in the Caribbean and to help them help themselves.

We met initially in Nassau in July. Consulting then took place with the Central American countries and Panama in Costa Rica, and with the Caribbean countries in Santo Domingo. By year end, we expect to complete consultation and move forward with efforts that are tailored to specific situations in individual countries.

Increasing food production in developing countries is critically important; for some, literally, it's a matter of life or death. It's also an indispensable basis for overall development. The U.S. has always made food and agriculture an important emphasis of its economic assistance programs. We have provided massive amounts of food to fight starvation, but we have also undertaken successful agricultural research, welcomed thousands of foreign students for instruction and training at our finest institutions, and helped make discoveries of the high-yielding varieties of the Green Revolution available throughout the world.

Looking to the future, our emphasis will be on the importance of market-oriented policies. We believe this approach will create rising agricultural productivity, self-sustaining capacity for research and innovation, and stimulation of job-creating entrepreneurship in rural areas.

Specifically, we've encouraged policies which reduce or eliminate subsidies to food consumers and provide adequate and stable price incentives to their agricultural sectors to increase production. We'll emphasize education and innovative joint research and development activities throughout the United States and developing countries' institutions. We will also encourage rural credit, improved storage and distribution facilities, and roads to facilitate marketing.

Now, that's a lot. But we need to do more. The focus will be on raising the productivity of the small farmer, building the capacity to pursue agricultural research, and stimulating productive enterprises that generate employment and purchasing power.

We will emphasize: new methods of plant improvement to develop crops that tolerate adverse soils and climatic conditions, insects, and diseases; research to increase the efficiency of using irrigation water; systems for the production of several crops per year in the humid tropics; and methods of human and animal disease control to remove such serious problems as the tsetse fly in Africa, which bars agricultural production on vast areas of potentially productive land.

Addressing the energy problems of developing countries is also vital to their sustained economic growth. Their net oil bill in 1980 was $46 billion, up from only $4 billion in 1973. This puts tremendous pressure on their balance of payments and threatens development.

The U.S. will emphasize funding for energy-related activities in the years ahead, especially for private efforts and the mobilization of developing countries' resources. Our energy bilateral aid program must stress technical assistance rather than resource transfers. We will support energy lending by multilateral institutions, provided the projects are economically viable and they expand developing country energy production through greater private investment.

We will also support selected elements of the programs of action of the U.N. conference on new and renewable resources of energy. They include intensified energy training programs for technicians from developing countries and efforts to help developing countries assess and more efficiently utilize their resources.

Fourth, improving the climate for private capital flows, particularly private investment. Investment is the lifeblood of development. Private capital flows -- commercial lending and private investment -- can account for almost 70 percent of total financial flows to developing countries. It's impractical, not to mention foolish, to attack these flows for ideological reasons.

We call upon all our partners in finance and development -- business, banks, and developing countries -- to accelerate their cooperative efforts. We seek to increase co-financing and other private financing with the multilateral development banks. We want to enhance the international activities which foster private sector debt and equity financing of investments in the developing countries. Its program is increasing in both size and diversity and the bulk of IFC [International Finance Corporation] projects are privately financed in the developing countries from domestic and external sources.

We will explore the development of further safeguards for multilateral investment and ways to build upon successful bilateral experiences with these countries. We believe it is important to identify impediments to investment and trade such as conditions of political instability and the threat of expropriation. Working in concert with our trading partners, we'll seek to remove these impediments.

We will attempt to promote a general agreement of investment allowing countries to harmonize investment policies and to negotiate mutually beneficial improvements in the investment climate. Finally, we'll make an effort to identify developed and developing country tax measures which might increase market-oriented investment from both external domestic sources and in the developing countries.

Fifth, and finally, let me turn to the question of how we work together. To a remarkable degree, many nations in the world have now entered into an economic dialog. The choice before us is how to organize and conduct it. Do we persist in contentious rhetoric, or do we undertake practical tasks in a spirit of cooperation and mutual political will? I think our country has signaled the answer to that question.

We go to Cancun with a record of success and contributions second to none -- determined to build on our past, ready to offer our hand in friendship as a partner in prosperity. At Cancun we will promote a revolutionary idea born more than 200 years ago, carried to our shores in the hearts of millions of immigrants and refugees, and defended by all who risked their lives so that you and I and our children could still believe in a brighter tomorrow. It's called freedom, and it works. It's still the most exciting, progressive, and successful idea the world has ever known.

I am dreaming. Really I am dreaming of a drive like the drive of your grandfathers, the drive to the West. Water we have, land we have, climate we have, farming we have. But we need technology, we need know-how, new ways of irrigation, new ways of agriculture. All this one can find here in America.

Those words were spoken at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce in March 1979, by Anwar Sadat. This courageous man of peace and hope and love has now been taken from us. But his mission, his dream remain. As we proceed to Cancun, can we not join together so that the good he wanted for all people of the world would finally become theirs and his to share? Thank you very much.

The President. Yes, that's what I was just going to speak to you about. Frankly, I'm gratified that it was that close. I, of course, would have wished that it would have been the other way. If one of them had a headache and had to go home early or something, it might have. But to be that close -- and I still am going to continue believing that we can get it in the Senate vote on the floor.

And Lesley, [Lesley Stahl, CBS News], in your earlier question here, I think I left the wrong impression. I was conscious that the press, the media had talked of the possibility of another way of doing this, and that's what I was really commenting on, that we hadn't had any meetings, conferences on it. And we haven't. So I don't know what any possibility there would be on anything of that kind or whether we would consider it or not.

We're going to continue believing that we can get the vote, that the Senate is going to see that this is not only essential -- as three former Presidents have been saying for the last few days -- to the United States, it's essential to the security of Israel.

We have totally protected the technology; there's no risk to that, and certainly no risk to Israel. And I just have to believe that there will be enough Senators that will recognize the importance to us of having the relationship that this can lead to, where we can continue the peace-making process.

The President. No, this is what I was trying to correct, because we hadn't even considered this. And it's a hypothetical question as it is. And I was commenting because when you asked, I thought, well, this was in connection with the stories that have appeared in the press.

New Jersey is known as the Garden State, and I'm happy to see the New Jersey Republican Party is about to blossom. Historians will note that in 1980, that was the year that America's working people finally realized that it is the Republican Party that advocates the things they believe in. Nowhere is this political realignment more apparent than right here in New Jersey. A man from New Jersey who was just up here is now my Secretary of Labor, and you can be proud of the job that he's doing. He's a major asset for our administration, and we're proud to have him with us.

During the campaign, you know, we were in here New Jersey, and Ray decided to offer me a chance to get direct feedback from some working people. So one night he took me over to Barrett's Tavern. And I'll have to admit it was one of the more memorable moments of the campaign. [Laughter] We not only couldn't get in on the floor of the barroom, they were standing on the bar. [Laughter] Finally, it was so jammed there that we had to go out on the steps and speak to the people outside. But it was a wonderful evening.

Tonight we're here to help the Republican Party, but we're also here to get behind another citizen of New Jersey that you can be proud of, and you know that, too -- Tom Kean. Tom exemplifies the common sense that's making the Republican Party the majority party.

He's willing to tell you what he stands for. He wants to cut taxes. He wants to trim excessive spending, create real jobs, and encourage growth. Now, you may think that sounds a little familiar, that you've heard it before. Well, it is. And it's not some complicated formula; it's common sense.

This year, New Jersey is being offered a clear-cut choice between those who think government spending and taxes are the solution to our problems and those, like Tom, who understand that government spending and over taxation are the problems.

Our tax cut will put $2 billion, or I should say leave $2 billion in the pockets of the people of New Jersey. But in the Congress, Tom's opponent voted no on the tax cut bill. And he voted no on the $35 billion of spending cuts, budget spending cuts. Voting for him would be voting for more of the same thing that got us in this mess that we've been in in the first place.

Now, no one knows better than those of us here in this Republican gathering that the people of New Jersey may be overwhelmingly registered in the other party. But I think they want to vote for candidates who offer positive programs and have faith that we can lick any problem.

The other party gave us inflation, unemployment, sky-high interest rates, and pessimism. We offer monetary and fiscal integrity, lower taxes, more jobs, and hope for a better future. The other party exploits the natural division between business and labor. Republicans are trying to bring all our citizens together in a campaign for economic progress.

We're working closely with a small group of courageous Democrats in the Congress who want to put America back on the right track. With their help, we've accomplished more than any of us thought possible only a year ago. But there's much more to do.

Our economic problems have been building for years, and it'll take time and hard work to set things straight. It'll also require us to enlist others to help us in the struggle at the national and the State levels. And that isn't impossible. Don't be afraid to reach out. You can't get elected in New Jersey without some Democrat help, and they're ready to help.

The day before -- well, yesterday -- I was going to say the day before yesterday, but yesterday, I had the supreme thrill and pleasure of escorting a gentleman out into the Rose Garden and there, with the press assembled, I presented the 193d Republican Congressman. He was the 193d without a single election. He was Democratic Congressman Atkinson from Pennsylvania, who came with me into the Rose Garden to announce publicly that he had just become a Republican.

And very frankly, I think we're going to see more of that in the days ahead. Having been a Democrat for most of my adult life, I can vouch for the pain that is involved in changing registrations. [Laughter] But they're going to do it. Some of them are very resentful for the fact that after they supported us for the budget cuts and the tax cuts, they were then taken into the leadership of their party and castigated and told, ``Don't do it again. Maybe we'll forgive you this time, but we'll watch how you behave yourselves.'' That isn't the way we run things in the United States, and there are a number of them that are ready to say so, and that will soon happen.

I firmly believe there are a host of Democrats out there ready to jump on board if we stand firm in our principles and offer them a chance to join us in putting America's house back in order. You've got a tremendous potential here in New Jersey to build this new coalition, and the whole country is watching. You know, you're one of only three States that has a gubernatorial election this year. And I know, of course, you have other elections, too, and your candidates are here for the assembly, those other candidates, and if you're going to send Tom Kean up there, don't send him alone. Send him with that help that he's going to need.

And why is this so important? Well, part of one thing I haven't mentioned here, in connection with our program of economic recovery -- I believe that part of our troubles are because back over the years, the leadership of the opposing party has step-by-step taken us away from the constitutional principle that we are a federation of sovereign States, and they have tried to reduce the States to administrative districts of an all-powerful Federal Government. And the Federal Government has tried to do things that the Federal Government is not able to do. We're going to give this country back the way the Constitution intended, that as many things as possible are going to be in the authority and the autonomy of the State and local governments, not in the power of the Federal Government.

And to do that, you're going to need a Governor that isn't a stooge for the Federal Government taking over more power. And he's going to need those other candidates to help him bring this about, and then to responsibly manage those programs that we're going to turn back -- and to the greatest extent possible, along with the sources of revenue, as we progress, to help pay for those programs.

We are deeply saddened to learn of the death of Moshe Dayan -- a courageous soldier and a great Israeli statesman. Dayan provided his nation with military leadership that was the envy of the world. His bold strategies brought him victory on the battlefield and respect from friend and foe alike.

Seldom does a foreign general and a statesman receive such admiration from Americans as did Moshe Dayan. His image became to many the symbol of Israeli resolve -- the resolve of a great people to be free and independent, and a resolve shared by the people of the United States.

Reflecting on his passing and other recent tragic events, we must note that the Middle East may be entering a new era. Let us pray this will be an era of peace, when all nations and people in that region will live together in harmony. This, after all, was the cause of Moshe Dayan.

And now that I've gotten -- [inaudible] -- to recognize someone who's familiar with the locale. They keep me busy reading a lot of other things, but I still manage to keep up with the papers. And the White House News Summary includes editorials from all of the papers that are represented here, as well as others.

Ms. Small. Something else, Mr. President. This afternoon, as soon as they leave here, they will be meeting with David Stockman and with Secretary Drew Lewis on transportation issues, and they will also be hearing from Secretary Schweiker from HHS. So, you know, if they ask you something really technical and -- you know, they will be hearing from those people on those issues later on this afternoon.

The President. Usually, I've found out they don't tell you whether you have or not when they go out. They wait, and you find out what they say to your people when they get outside whether they have or not. And some of them, very honestly, are really undecided and have heard this, and they want to take it back with everything else that they've heard on the other side and make their decision by themselves later.

I don't know; I'm confident. And I think we're going to get it, because there are a number of them that have expressed themselves that regardless of their own personal feelings, they are concerned about interfering with the foreign policy effort that we're putting forth. Because we see this as very definitely a part of our ability to help in the peacemaking process over there in the Middle East; that the Saudi Arabians are very key to this. And we've had their help already, and so on, in things that lead us to believe that going forward at this and establishing this kind of a relationship with them will bear fruit.

We have the Palestinian problem in the news again with the comments by Presidents Carter and Ford. The autonomy talks are starting up again soon. Just interested in your general view of the Palestinian question. Do you think that these are people with a legitimate grievance? Is it something that goes back to the late forties and the founding of Israel? How do you see that problem?

The President. Well, I think wherever it may come from, you've got a million and a half people who are living there as homeless and refugees. I don't mean homeless in the sense of no shelter; that's being taken care of. But I think that problem -- they have to be a part of the problem. And as those two gentlemen said, one of the keys is that you can't deal with someone or negotiate with someone as long as they maintain that position that they don't recognize Israel's right to exist as a nation.

Now, here again is one of the reasons we believe the Saudi Arabians can be a great help in changing that, changing that position, just as Egypt once changed their position. And, at the same time, I think that maybe they could be of help in broadening the representation of the Palestinians.

You know, the PLO is a self-announced voice for the Palestinians; no one elected them. And I think that it would be -- that if this other takes place, if they acknowledge Israel's right to exist, that it ought to be broadened and there ought to be people -- perhaps you could find leadership among some of the mayors of those communities on the West Bank and so forth. But that has to be a part of it.

They have seen those puppet governments installed around them with the proxy troops and so forth. They have seen the ability of -- now, with Iran in chaos and the Soviets in Afghanistan, they've seen the ease with which the Kuwait oil installations were bombed. They know that they're vulnerable, their oil fields are vulnerable to such an attack.

In the Lebanon situation, when we'd sent Phil Habib over there, there came a point in which it was close to blowing up. The triggers were ready to be pulled. And he called us, and he told us of a gentleman from part of the establishment in Saudi Arabia who was here in the United States. He wasn't here on any official mission. He wasn't here in Washington. And we contacted him, that man, and on a Saturday afternoon, late afternoon, he was here in the White House, or in the Oval Office. We told him what it was we wanted and what we believed might forestall this blowup. And by evening, he was on a plane headed for Saudi Arabia, and he delivered our message to Prince Fahd. And within 12 hours, Prince Fahd was dealing with the Syrians and with the PLO. And Habib says there would have been no cease-fire without their intervention.

And we think it's vital. This is why Sadat was so strong in support of this. And it's why the other day that group of 17 gentlemen that we had over in the White House for lunch, ranging from Henry Kissinger all the way back to people who'd been associated with administrations as far back as before Eisenhower, Democrat and Republican -- all of them willing to go forward and stand out on the Portico with me and announce that they were in support of the AWACS sale on the belief that it was essential to Israel's security and essential to our security. And so this is why we're putting up the fight.

Q. Mr. President, there have been some reports that you and/or Mr. Meese are giving away everything but Mrs. Reagan's new china to seal this bargain with the Senate. [Laughter] Would you comment on that generally and on, specifically, some charges that you either would run or would not run against Democrats who sided with you on this?

The President. I am delighted with that question and a chance to answer it. And incidentally, I'm going to preface it by taking Nancy off the spot. She didn't buy any china -- [laughter] -- and she didn't even get any contributions to buy china. The china itself was a gift from a foundation to the White House, as is most of the furniture in the White House -- all the antiques and the paintings and so forth. And the company, a New Jersey company agreed to, because this foundation was buying it, to sell it at cost to them. So, the china is being a gift to the White House and, incidentally, the first new set of full china since Harry Truman's time.

But now, to get back to the other. No, we don't make deals. And I've said pretty much to everyone that we have over, and to the last four which made me late here, I said pretty much just what I've said to you about the necessity of this, plus the fact that I feel we can guarantee the security of the technology and the security of Israel in this. As a matter of fact, when Mr. Begin left here after his visit, and I told him what we were going to do, he told me he was going to maintain his position but he was not upset at all. And he left saying to others, not to us, but to others, that he believed he had the best understanding with us that he has had with any administration in Washington.

The President. No, it's never been asked and I'm quite sure that -- there was a bond; those Boll Weevils kind of -- there was almost a total agreement on ideology, on policy, and everything else with them. I think the AWACS deal can find people who could vote yes on that, then be against us on the budget and the tax program and everything else. We're still representing two differing policies.

Q. Mr. President, let me bring up the MX issue if I might. Since your proposals were announced, General Jones and Senator Tower, among others, have questioned the survivability of missiles even in super-hardened sites. Since strategic weapons really get down to a question of perceptions in international affairs, is there a danger that this kind of reaction could undercut the credibility of your MX program with the rest of the world, particularly with Moscow?

The President. No, I don't believe so, because, first of all, the Air Force itself -- there's been, I know, a lot of reporting of General Jones' opposition to this, his favoring the multiple shelters -- but the Air Force is divided on that. Now, I agree that there is a vulnerability even in the hardened silos, but there is also the same vulnerability in the multiple shelters. It's as simple as this: What we're buying is some time while we try to narrow that window of vulnerability.

The Soviet Union -- it will take them a few years to improve the accuracy and the power of their missiles, enough to make them vulnerable in those hardened silos. By the same token, if we put them in the multiple shelters, all they'd have to do there is build enough warheads to cover the whole area of shelters. They wouldn't try to pick out which one's got the missiles in it. They'd just destroy them all.

So, in either way, there is an ultimate vulnerability to either system. We feel that the other was so costly and so destructive, you might say, of the countryside and all, that as long as it was also going to be vulnerable, that we would proceed with this one which will buy us the time to, as I say, narrow the gap.

The only real defense so far that either side has with regard to intercontinental ballistic missiles is the threat that we both represent. In other words, if we balance them enough that they know that our retaliation could be more than they want to afford, then they'll restrain from a first strike. And I suppose the same thing holds with us, although we've never taken a position that we'd ever make a first strike.

We will start in November the negotiation on theatre nuclear forces. Now, that doesn't mean the tactical weapons that will be used, soldiers against soldiers. Those are the theatre nuclear weapons like their SS - 20's, that are targeted in on every city in Europe. And there's no defense and nothing comparable on the NATO side to that.

So, we're hopeful that maybe some of the systems, the very systems we're talking about, won't ever have to be completed. But right now, all we've committed to is 36 -- those missiles going into the old Titan silos and some of the Minuteman 3 silos. And we're still studying what might be the way to use the other 64 or the way to base them. And we haven't ruled anything out or anything in on that.

Q. One other thing. You mentioned the theatre nuclear weapon negotiations in Europe. How great a danger do you perceive of the European peace movement that's growing up and that had a quarter of a million people gathered in Bonn last weekend? How can the United States capture the peace issue instead of having it used against our country?

The President. Well, I think that we're up against the result of a long-time propaganda campaign. I think that some of those -- while some are maybe very well meaning, I think a great many of those demonstrators represent the same kind of people we've seen in some demonstrations in our own country, whose philosophy is a little different than most of ours. And I think the propaganda that has led to this, the ability to turn it on, can be traced back to the Soviet Union. But still, we haven't had any result as far as the Europeans -- our allies, their governments, falling back or falling away from the installation of these weapons.

Q. Mr. President, the farmers back home are bringing in very big crops now, and they're facing also very low prices -- prices that are lower than the cost of production. And your administration is fighting the higher farm price supports. What do you say to farmers who are confronting this problem?

The President. Well, I know this in a non sequitur, but I grew up in an era in which the only thing the farmer ever worried about was not getting a good crop. And it seemed kind of strange to me that today they can get a bumper crop, and it destroys them instead of help[s] them.

One thing, I think that -- and I've said this before -- I believe that we need to cooperate in the creation of more world markets, so that a farmer can look forward to a bumper crop and know that there's a market out there for it. I think that you can't pull the rug out from under them in a program that's been instituted for about four decades or more. But what I would like to see us work toward is a free marketplace and let them be governed by the marketplace.

If we go back to the days when this started -- grew out of the Great Depression -- you'll find that only about 20 to 25 percent of agriculture was ever in the system of supports and limitations. And the other 75 to 80 percent of farming was showing, year after year, a per capita increase in the consumption of what it produced. The government-subsidized part was showing a reduction in the per capita consumption. And I think it's significant that prior to the Carter administration, under Earl Butz, the support program got down from several billion dollars to only about $600 million, and net farm increase in the country increased by 16 percent. And under the Carter administration when we went back -- and it went back up to about $6\1/2\ billion of price supports, net farm income decreased 14 percent.

So, I think the marketplace has proven itself if given a chance. But as I say, you can't just instantly say, ``Well, you're out there on your own,'' not when they've based everything they do and all their planning on this other system. So, what we're trying to do is work with them toward a program that will, if we can, get back to the free marketplace. But at the same time, as I say, I believe the government has a function it can perform in helping to bring about an expansion of markets worldwide.

What I had in mind was that I don't believe that the Shah's government would have fallen if the United States had made it plain that we would stand by that government and support them in whatever had to be done to curb the revolution and let it be seen that we still felt that we were allied with them. But I think that the United States made it very evident that we weren't going to. As a matter of fact, we gave him very bad advice at the time and restrained him for some time.

I have been told by someone very knowledgeable and involved at that time, that there was a point at which the revolution, so-called, could have been headed off with the arrest of 500 individuals -- just the arrest. They weren't executing people like they are now. And we advised against that.

And I suppose what I meant was that if we will make it plain that we recognize we have a stake in the Middle East and that we are going to stand by our friends and allies there, both Israel and those nations like Egypt and the Sudan and so forth, that I don't think that the same thing will happen, that kind of an overthrow would take place.

The President. My belief is that it won't happen if we're evident there. But again, as I should have said earlier, the fear that prompted that question was a fear of our technology falling into strange hands. Well, that is a groundless fear also, because the technology that will be involved in this sale is not the ultimate technology that we ourselves possess; that is equipment that is not part of the sale. It is an effective, sophisticated radar system, but it is nothing that can't be found in the British Nimrod, in the planes that Israel itself has put into that service, their own surveillance planes. And I think the Warsaw Pact with the Soviets is making progress with the same type of thing.

The President. Well, I think we're conscious of where we can -- without increasing the cost or lowering the quality -- where we can give contracts. The Northeast is going to get them up there -- particularly by way of the Navy buildup -- is going to get additional work out of the defense program. It is true that the missiles and the planes are basically built both in the South and the West. That's been true of the airplane industry for quite some time, and yet not exclusively -- there are subcontracts in the building of all of those planes and things that are spread around the country somewhat.

Actually, we can't pretend that this whole program -- that everyone isn't going to have to share a little bit in what happens. But at the same time, we think that continued inflation is a bigger threat than anything we're doing and could be the ultimate destruction for all of us.

And we believe that our program is going to be successful. It already is bringing inflation down. It's in single digits now, and I was interested to see that our Nobel economics prize winner, Milton Friedman, has just been quoted as saying that he believes it'll be down to 6 percent next year.

The President. Well, we know that we have to have a consistent monetary policy that doesn't do what we've done over the last few decades, of the roller coaster effect -- of when unemployment gets out of hand and it looks like hard times, they flood the market with paper money. And then when that brings on inflation, then all of a sudden you pull in and tighten it down and you go the other way. This is what's been happening.

I do have one little criticism, and yet I can see how it happened. You realize that we can visit with them, but we can't impose on them. They're totally autonomous. But it is true, recently, that they have two lines going up, a kind of a bracket, following productivity in the country, and they are trying to keep the money supply between those two lines. It may fluctuate a little bit, but staying between those two lines. And sometime back, they fell below their bottom line in this. And then they were faced with the prospect of trying to have a stable monetary policy to help in the fight against inflation. They didn't know how to just get back up where they should be without it looking like when on Wall Street they would look at the money supply and see this surge, they'd say, ``Oh, oh, here we go again,'' and start acting as if, well, it was the same old game being played.

But I think that gradually they have moved back up into that, and that's why you've seen two and a half points drop in the prime rate just in recent weeks -- the last one being just a few days ago. I think you're going to see some of that kind of nibbling away at the high rates for the next few months. But I believe as we go through next year, we are going to see a definite fall, because there will be that fall in inflation.

The other part, of course, I could say, also, that we're penalized a little bit, too, because those interest rates have thrown our figures off somewhat on what the budget cuts will do or what our deficits will be because of the price we have to pay to pay for the deficits that are already there.

And may I remind you that in 1981, the year we've just concluded, fiscal year, was the year that we were promised the budget was going to be balanced. And the deficit is somewhere in the neighborhood of 55 to 60 billion dollars. I don't know just what the figure is for the off-budget deficits. Now, that's money that you have to go into the capital market and borrow, and I don't claim any responsibility for it, because we weren't running the show.

You know, something that none of you have mentioned very much that I think you might be interested in is that not only did they say that it would be balanced, but we've operated -- and I believe this is probably the first time, maybe I'm wrong -- we've operated a whole fiscal year without a budget. And right now, the leadership in the House side is making it look as if they're going to start onto the second year. There has been no budget for 1981. They have simply passed continuing resolutions of spending, and in this way there was no way to get the handle on the spending in '81, and that's why we have that size deficit.

But right now, we're now into 1982, and we still don't have a budget. And the first continuing resolution that came down came down at a rate that was higher than the rate that they themselves passed when they passed the budget cuts, which means that they're ignoring their own action in passing those budget cuts. And -- [inaudible] -- now, that if we continue on with these spending resolutions. And at the same time, they've taken away from the President the right to impound or hold back any of that spending.

The President. I think that as long as -- I think the whole budget policy, let me answer it this way: The whole budget policy of the Federal Government is a kind of a Rube Goldberg thing that doesn't make as much sense as it does in any State in the Union, and that is, it's called the President's budget. But about 80 percent of it is mandated on the President by actions of Congress. And then the President sends over a suggested budget, and the Congress, with no regard for what the estimated revenues are going to be in the coming year, does whatever they want to do to it. And again, the President doesn't have line item. He has to accept the whole budget or none at all.

And let me just cite what seems to me to make sense. As Governor of California, it was called the Governor's budget. Every year a group of experts from the private sector and government met and estimated the revenues. And over 25 years of this custom in California, that group never missed by more than 1 percent their estimate of what the revenues would be in the coming year, and then that 1 percent was on estimating them too low. Never did they go overboard and say, ``Oh, we're going to have a lot more money'' than we ended up having.

Then the Governor -- with all the requests from the various departments coming in, programs from the Congress -- the Governor worked out the budget with his people and submitted it to the legislature. The legislature could take out anything they wanted to take out, and the Governor could not put it back in. But by the same token, the legislature could put in things and the Governor could veto those things out, line item. Then it went back, and the Congress, if they could get a two-thirds vote to override the veto, could put them back in, so that you had a double control working back and forth between Congress, or the legislature, and the Governor.

And the system, why something of that kind couldn't work -- I suggested it to Tip O'Neill when I first came here, and he acted as if I was threatening the very province of Congress and taking away all their rights. Well, all their rights have given us a $1 trillion deficit. Now, why couldn't such a system of that kind at the Federal level be just as effective as it is at the State level? After all, the State of California is 10 percent of the population of the Nation.

But when you say that, yes, I think there should be some method of checking. There is no restraint on Congress passing any spending program they want. I could veto that program, but how many of the spending items are hung on as amendments to a bill that you can't veto? And some of the things that have been performed in the past, of hanging an amendment on, let's say, the social security payments -- that's so farfetched an example, it didn't -- but I mean like a welfare program that's very essential. And you can't veto the amendment, and you can't say no, and suddenly shut off the welfare checks.

Ms. Small. Mr. President, I just want to make one comment. The President hasn't had an opportunity to eat his lunch yet, and I thought if anybody had a question, maybe to direct to Mr. Meese just for a moment, to give the President an opportunity to eat.

The President campaigned on a platform of getting the government off the backs of people, and yet we find the administration trying to make it more difficult to get information out of the government under the Freedom of Information Act. There are proposals advocated by the administration for preventive detention and for modifying the exclusionary rule to make it possible for government agents to break the law and to have their evidence admitted. There's talk about a change in the Executive order governing the CIA to enlarge the CIA's area of activity in domestic matters. Now, does this seem to you a contradiction to this pledge to get the government off the backs of people?

Mr. Meese. Let me just say, first of all, a lot of the premises that you state are incorrect. We have actually gotten the government off of the backs of people amazingly well in just the first 10 months. For example, on regulations, the regulatory reform package I guess can best be summed up by looking at the Federal Register, which is about a third less the number of pages just because there are less than half as many proposed regulations this year than there were at this time a year ago. So that in terms of the kinds of regulations that impose upon individuals, labor and management, business and industry, we think we've made major strides in that regard.

Now, on the specifics you're talking about. The Freedom of Information Act, I think most people who have examined it would agree, can use some reform. We have -- it has actually imposed a tax burden upon the public, and it's been misused by a lot of people. You take a person like Philip Agee, the renegade ex-CIA person. It's cost the government $500,000 to provide information to him under the Freedom of Information Act, which he then uses against our country. And I don't think this is what was intended by those of you -- and I suspect most of you supported the Freedom of Information Act -- and I don't think it's what was intended by Congress.

Let's talk about the CIA, because that's easy. There is absolutely nothing in the proposed intelligence order which will expand the ability of the CIA to engage in domestic spying. That is totally false, and it's propaganda being put out by some staffers on the Hill who were part of Frank Church's infamous intelligence committee that was so destructive of our intelligence authorities some years ago.

Take the preventive detention, which is a name put upon a bail provision. The Constitution provides that bail shall be reasonable. What we're suggesting, what the Attorney General's task force has brought up, is that there would be a reasonable standard of bail. And we think that to take a person who has proved, by committing another crime while out on bail for a first crime, that they should be let out on bail again and again, we don't think that's reasonable. So, we're looking for some modifications of bail, to look at the protection of society, along with the ability of people to get out prior to their trial.

And finally, on the exclusionary rule, I don't think anybody who's studied the exclusionary rule would believe that that's been beneficial to society. It does not allow illegal acts by police. What it does is, it provides a good faith rule. Many times a police officer has to make a decision in 30 seconds, or at least in 5 minutes at the most, on whether he will make a search or a stop or something like that. And he does it under all the applicable law at that time. Two years later, by a 4 - 3 decision in a State court or a 5 - 4 decision of the United States Supreme Court, they decide that he was wrong, and they change the law. And it applies retroactively to what that officer did. So, what we're suggesting is that a rule of reason be established to say that if the officer was acting in good faith under the applicable laws of that time, then he should not be penalized and the evidence should not be excluded against an obviously guilty person.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to take you back to strategic weapons in Europe again, a couple of things you said. I guess I think that some of the people in Europe who are opposed to some of our policies are afraid that they may wind up as kind of proxy victims in a war between us and the Soviet Union, which -- a fear that may be a little more, seem a little more plausible because of all the conversation about integrated battlefields and limited use of nuclear weapons. And I wonder -- you must think about this -- do you believe that there could be a limited exchange of nuclear weapons between us and the Soviet Union, or that it would simply escalate inevitably?

The President. I don't honestly know. I think, again, until someplace -- and I know that all over the world there's research going on to try and find the defensive weapon against strategic nuclear weapons. There never has been a weapon that someone hasn't come up with a defense. But except in this one, the only defense is, ``Well, if you shoot yours, we'll shoot ours.'' And if you still had that kind of a stalemate, I could see where you could have the exchange of tactical weapons against troops in the field without it bringing either one of the major powers to pushing the button.

The intermediate thing -- and this is to call your attention to where SALT was so much at fault -- is that we have our allies there who don't have an ocean between them, so it doesn't take intercontinental ballistic missiles, it just takes ballistic missiles of the SS - 20 type. Well, the SS - 20's will have, with what they're adding, 750 warheads -- one of them capable of pretty much leveling a city. And they can sit right there and that's got all of Europe, including England and all, targeted. And the only comparable thing that has come along is now our proposal. And this is what's at argument there, is to provide and put on European soil the Pershings and the cruise missiles, so that, again, you've got this same kind of a stalemate, although, even so, ours do not have the range to really reach the depths of Russia. Russia's too far expanded, and the rest of Europe is too concentrated, so they can destroy where we can't.

And the SS - 20's were not even considered a strategic weapon, because they didn't cross an ocean. In that SALT treaty there was no restriction on them, just as there was no restriction where they called our old B - 52's strategic bombers, they didn't call their Backfire bombers, and we agreed to that in that treaty.

But these are the weapons, these -- now what I call strategic, these theatre weapons, that are in the theatre of war, potential war, but would be used strategically, that we want to limit, and that's what we're going to start talking about on November 20th. This does not touch upon the actual tactical weapon, the thing that's fired out of one of our 8-inch guns, a shell that would be fired. And there we would kind of be on the other side of the fence, because the conventional supremacy of the Soviet Union is so great at this point that if -- and I wouldn't be surprised if they would throw this at us in the negotiations -- that if they should say, ``Well, let's do away with the tactical weapons, too,'' then what's to stop them? You know they outnumber us in every conventional weapon, thousands of tanks, more than the NATO defense can have. At the moment, the only stalemate to them is the tactical nuclear weapon that would be aimed at those tanks, if they ever started to roll forward.

The President. Well, I would -- if they realized that we -- if we went back to that stalemate, only because our retaliatory power, our seconds, or our strike at them after their first strike would be so destructive that they couldn't afford it, that would hold them off.

I do have to point out that everything that has been said and everything in their manuals indicates that, unlike us, the Soviet Union believes that a nuclear war is possible. And they believe it's winnable, which means that they believe that you could achieve enough superiority, then your opponent wouldn't have retaliatory strike capacity.

Now, there is a danger to all of us in the world as long as they think that. And this, again, is one of the things that we just want to disabuse them of. I feel very strongly about the negotiations for reduction. But I also feel that one of the things that's been lacking in the last several years in any negotiations was they sat on their side of the table and had nothing to lose. And we had nothing to threaten them with. Now, I think that we can sit down and maybe have some more realistic negotiations because of what we can threaten them with.

There's one thing sure. They cannot vastly increase their military productivity because they've already got their people on a starvation diet as far as consumer products are concerned. But they know our potential capacity industrially, and they can't match it. So, we've got the chip this time, that if we show them the will and determination to go forward with a military buildup in our own defense and the defense of our allies, they then have to weigh, do they want to meet us realistically on a program of disarmament or do they want to face a legitimate arms race in which we're racing.

But up until now, we've been making unilateral concessions on our side, allowing ours to deteriorate, and they've been building the greatest military machine the world has ever seen. But now they're going to be faced with that we could go forward with an arms race and they can't keep up.

Q. You were discussing earlier restrictions, legislative restrictions on the powers of the Presidency. Do you think it's a good idea that the present legislation gives Congress a veto power over major foreign arms sales by the President, or do you think this is an encroachment, intrusion on the President's flexibility to conduct these affairs?

The President. Well, I think out of what happened in the aftermath of Vietnam, I think the Congress has gone too far. It's always been recognized in this country that the executive branch is more or less entrusted with foreign policy, because you can't run foreign policy through legislation. And while there may be some safeguards that should remain -- I wouldn't be averse to that; we do have a multiple kind of government -- I do think that the President has got to have some leeway with regard to negotiating and some ability to say, across a table, this is what we will do or what we won't do. And those that he's dealing with know that he has the authority to say that.

Q. Mr. President, speaking of separation of powers, a lot of lawyers and judges have worried about bills in Congress to limit the jurisdiction of the Federal courts in areas like busing and school prayer, affirmative action. How do you feel about that, because they might come to your desk? And what sort of advice will you seek from people in deciding whether to sign or veto that sort of legislation if it does pass?

The President. Well, I could quote Thomas Jefferson, who even back in his time warned that the courts were getting out of hand and that the courts, if they did take powers that properly belonged to the legislature, could upset the whole balance. And I think there's evidence that that's happened.

Let me give you an example and throw one at you right now, without getting into the specifics of those particular issues. We have an election -- fair elections commission now, and we have rules and regulations with regard to contributions and the declaration of the same. And a Federal judge has just ruled that one political party in the United States does not have to obey those rules, the Communist Party.

The Communist Party does not have to reveal its list of contributors because those contributors might be politically harassed by our own government. This was his reasoning. And therefore, any Democrats and Republicans, they've got to sign up and their names go in to the [Federal] Election Commission, but the Communist Party can get its money any way it can get it, and no one knows where or how.

Well now, how can we recognize that? If their support is such that it would be so embarrassing, then maybe they shouldn't be a political party. And yet, we've never said that. We've always recognized the right of anyone to be [in] a political party. But then, if they're going to be, then don't they have to live by the same rules the other parties do?

And these are the type of things apropos of the things we were talking about in the exclusionary rule. How many people really stop to think that that's no law, that that is nothing but a case law? That was a decision handed down by a judge, and then other judges felt bound by precedent, and so it has become a matter of case law. But no legislature and no Congress ever passed that law. For example, I happen to believe that the court ruled wrongly with regard to prayer in schools, for example. The first amendment doesn't say anything about that. The first amendment says the Congress shall do nothing to abridge the practice of religion or to create a religion. And yet, we're still a country where it says ``In God We Trust'' on our coins and over the doors of the Supreme Court. Wasn't this a case, maybe, of the court going beyond what the Constitution actually says?

Busing. Again, I think this whole thing maybe has grown out of the extent to which the Federal Government has injected itself into something that traditionally was believed to belong at the lowest local level, the school district, that there, where the parents and those hired to teach their children could get together and work out how they wanted their children educated. To say nothing of the fact that I think busing has proven a failure. Now, I support fully the theory behind busing or what prompted it, the idea of equality of opportunity, no segregation. And yet, we've got a reverse segregation.

Ms. Small. I know you do. I just thought by way of summary, it would be kind of nice to make this a two-way street. Maybe one of you could tell the President some of the concerns in your area. Jerry, we haven't heard from you. Could you just tell us -- some of your readers down there in the San Diego area, what they're maybe saying about some of the administration programs? We could hear from your side.

The President. Well, I had always believed and somehow I thought the Voting Rights Act should have been nationwide, rather than picking out certain areas and so forth. But then, I must say it was brought to my attention recently after I'd made a statement about this again, that some said that they were opposed to this because it would make it so cumbersome -- and I hadn't thought about this -- that it might be impossible to enforce. So, we dropped that position. But I know that the House is working on one and, I think, has maybe been pretty extreme in what it's done. I'm hopeful that the Senate is going to be more reasonable in what's done.

It has become a great symbol, I must say, to the minority communities, and I think this should be taken into consideration. But I agree with you that the perpetuating of punishment for sins that are no longer being committed is pretty extreme.

The President. Well, I am most grateful to all of you for the opportunity and sorry to rush away, but just between us, Mr. Kohl, the leader of the opposition party in Germany is waiting in the lobby out there.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Ronald P. Wertheim to be an Associate Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for a term of 15 years. Mr. Wertheim will fill the vacancy created by the elevation of James A. Belson to the D.C. Court of Appeals.

In 1962 Mr. Wertheim received a diploma from The Hague Academy of International Law. He was graduated from the University of Pennsylvania Law School in 1957, where he was editor in chief of its Law Review and received prizes for the highest grades in constitutional law and labor law. He also is a 1954 graduate of the Wharton School of Finance and Commerce at the University of Pennsylvania, where he was in the top 5 percent of his class.

At a time when we are striving to restore the economic stability that is essential to the overall strength of this Nation, we cannot lose sight of the nation's debt to those brave veterans who have sacrificed their life and limb for the defense of their country. In my budget last March, I proposed an 11.2 percent increase in compensation benefits. I am gratified that an increase now has become a reality.

S. 917 will benefit veterans in many other ways. For example, it contains increases in the amount of life insurance our service members can buy and strengthens the Veterans Administration's home loan and automobile assistance programs.

Although this bill is laudable in most respects, it contains two provisions that represent unwarranted intrusions on executive branch management. The first of these would require lengthy delays in reorganizations of VA activities designed to achieve more economical and effective operation. I am pleased that the final provision, unlike some earlier versions of it considered by the Congress, respects the constitutional principle of the separation of powers. It will, however, unwisely restrict executive flexibility in achieving managerial improvements.

The second provision that I find troublesome would effectively preclude the VA from conducting cost comparisons under OMB Circular A - 76 to determine the most economical means of performing selected functions within its medical facilties -- by contract or by the use of Federal employees in VA. Over the next few months, my administration will work with the Congress to allay its concerns and to find a mutually agreeable approach to the application of the Circular's provisions to the VA.

But seriously, we are very proud to be here tonight, and I'm very proud to be the Honorary Chairman of the USO. The USO is the very epitome of the voluntary spirit, and it came into being 40 years ago, to meet a real need in the first few months of World War II. It continues because 40,000 volunteers give their time and effort to helping our men and women in uniform, and people like you give your help to them in what they're doing.

Now, this 40th anniversary is also the anniversary of Leslie Townes Hope with the USO. That's Bob. In fact, the USO had to catch up with him. Many of us have forgotten that he'd been entertaining the GI's for quite some time before there was a USO. And it was practically a solo act, wherever they were in the world. But now the USO goes on helping not only men and women in uniform but their families as well. And it does all this without government funding, depending on the great heart of a great people.

Let me tell you just one story -- and this is not a joke. There were two sailors, undoubtedly with our fleet there in the Mediterranean, who had a leave, and they were going to try and see Italy. And they were hiking their way around, and they were camped one night sleeping in sleeping bags, south of Rome. And they were mugged, set upon and robbed of everthing including their identification papers and the clothing of one of them. And the next day, being resourceful Yankee sailors, they hitchhiked their way to Rome, one of them zipped up in his sleeping bag, as he was the one who'd lost his clothes. Now, you can imagine what it would have been like if they'd had to tell their story to a chief petty officer, but instead, they landed on the doorstep of the USO in Rome. And the USO got clothing for them, got identity papers for them, and then, because they were trying to see Italy, took them on a tour of Rome.

Just about anywhere in the world that the American military men and women find themselves, they also find the USO. Noah Webster said, ``Wherever public spirit prevails, liberty is secure.'' Well, the public spirit of the USO and the public spirit of Bob Hope have been pretty evident for four decades now, and like everyone else up here, on behalf of all Americans, we thank the USO and Bob Hope for our liberty and for the men and women in the service.

For more than half a century, under eleven Presidents, you have raised the spirits of the American people. Your unmatched patriotism, integrity, stamina, and sense of humor have contributed to the well-being of your country in countless ways. As an entertainer, you have brought new meaning to the art of comedy and laughter to our hearts. During hard times, your comedy has uplifted the spirits of millions at home and reassured those in our armed forces overseas. Your years of selfless service and dedication have made you an American legend. For all that you have done, I do hereby appoint you Ambassador of Good Will to the entire World, and authorize you to do and perform all such matters and things as to the said Office do appertain or as may be duly given you in charge hereafter.

Done at the City of Washington this seventeenth day of October in the year of our Lord one thousand nine hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President. No, I heard a statement about -- that would have to be a worldwide boycott, because there are plenty of customers for oil, and you've got to make sure that none of them would take the place.

The President. Well, all I've heard is that we are waiting for more details and that Kania is out. We have to find out what that means and we'll probably know more when we know who's going to replace him.

Q. Mr. President, if Congress is unwilling to give you your rescission and impoundment authority, what makes you think you can gain the support of Tip O'Neill and his cult of followers on your new line legislation, who at this moment are probably turning over in bed unable to wait to get to work on Monday morning to do everything in the realm of their power to provide you with more?

The President. That's the result of the meeting with the editors from all over the country, and in answer to their question, I was telling them how most States ran and balanced their budgets on authority that was given to Governors of States, as was given to me when I was Governor of California. And I was pointing out the great weaknesses in the budgetary systems at the Federal level. And there are weaknesses, or we wouldn't have a trillion dollar deficit.

The age-old traditions of the navy, when they receive illustrious guests, the vocal welcome and the bosun's whistle, which remind us of the glorious times of sail and all the soldiers of the sea that were lined in order to welcome you with the greatest possible dignity, Mr. President, on a few square meters of French territory -- all this has brought us into this dining room of the commanding officer of the De Grasse, where we have just had our lunch with some of the best officers of the French Navy.

Now today, I would like, with your permission, to remain in the sort of intimate note that has already been struck in order to say that this has enabled me, Mr. President, to get to know you even better and to appreciate the humor of your conversation and the way you can tell a story, and also the very cheerful vigor with which you carry the burden, one of the heaviest burdens that exists on Earth, that is, being the leader of the great American people.

Now, I think our mutual knowledge of each other and a more profound knowledge will, I'm quite sure, help us and enable us to get over the inevitably difficult times that do sometimes inevitably exist in political discussions between two men who've come from different horizons and who've reached the same supreme responsibilities.

Now, we may not always be able to convince the other of what we're trying to do and achieve, but we're absolutely sure that in any case we will on all occasions enlighten our discussions in the, shall we say, the powerful sun of real frankness. And I'm quite sure, also, that we will also find that the areas of agreement would, in fact, always prove far broader, far wider than any possible differences.

And you can, at any rate, be assured, Mr. President, that we in France, we feel very close to the United States and the American people on the main issues that concern the world, and this we will always be able to talk about in a spirit of great friendship.

May I also, Mr. President, say on behalf of my wife and myself and all those who are present here today that we are very much struck to see the way you, in fact, demonstrated one of, perhaps the rarest virtues, and yet one of the most necessary for a statesman -- the courage of someone who has just paid, paid dearly, paid with his own blood -- his total commitment to the service of his country. And it is therefore, with deep emotion and very great joy, that we have seen you again here today, Mr. President, in, if I may say so, in such very good shape.

President Reagan. Well, Mr. President, Madam Mitterrand, thank you for your hospitality and again let me welcome you to the United States -- but since we're currently on French territory, maybe I should welcome you to our waters. [Laughter] And I'm particularly pleased that I can introduce today our new Ambassador to France, Evan Galbraith, distinguished and learned businessman who has spent many years in your country developing a great appreciation and affection for it.

I think you would agree it's slightly unusual for France as the visiting nation to host the first meal between our two countries. Actually, this is symbolic and fitting. During our revolution, when we were destitute of resources, France gave us the monetary and military sustenance to continue and eventually win our struggle for independence. So, at this lunch we remember and thank the French people for the nourishment they gave to our cause 200 years ago as well as thanking you, Mr. President, for the sustenance that you have provided today.

It is also appropriate that we're on the French frigate, the De Grasse, as a reminder of the contribution of the great admiral, the same name, made to American freedom. The United States has honored the Count De Grasse for his essential service to our Republic. And our own Count De Grasse is anchored only a short distance away. These two ships lie anchored in peace and friendship, yet each is vigilant and ready to defend the other if threatened, for France and the United States are old, firm allies. You came to America when we needed you, and we went to France when you had need of us.

President Mitterrand. Mr. Governor, dear friends, the warmth and the courtesy of your welcome here goes straight to my heart. And my wife and myself, we would like to thank you for the simplicity that one finds among old friends in exchanging sincere compliments at the end of the good and warm day.

Now, I know that you employ an expression which is a popular one in France and that you would recognize. I would say that here we feel entirely at home, here in Virginia, where we find the best of America and we find everything that we dreamed about in our youth and which still fills our imagination with so many beautiful images.

Now, you have not had time to grow old. We were already an old nation in 1781 when Lafayette and Rochambeau came to help you in the first war of liberation of modern times. But in order to quote something that was said by one of my predecessors, General De Gaulle, about the French Revolution, the flame of which was going to be lit by the flame of yours. Those were times when France was still young although she had already lived a lot. So, let us recover today this mutual youth which led to victory here when arm in arm, as we say, we went together, the youngest republic and the oldest monarchy of the world.

There are so many suffering, there is so much distress and anguish and violence on this unfortunate planet that we must recover the spirit of youth -- well, the spirit of our youth, I would say -- the guilelessness, the courage, the generosity which inspired here and very near here, yes, some of the most noble accents of the minds and conscience of men.

I have come here to ask you to give me the secrets that lie in the heart of Patrick Henry and Jefferson. And you have never kept those secrets to yourselves, and I'm sure that they will help me to find the words and to take the action that is required in order to respond to the new will of a France which is moving.

President Mitterrand, Madam Mitterrand, I know that I speak for everyone here when I say how much we appreciate your remarks, not to mention your timely visit coinciding with this historic occasion. This day has already been wonderful, and there's still more to come tonight and tomorrow.

I couldn't leave here this evening without giving a special word of praise and thanks to Governor Dalton and Lewis McMurran, the chairman of the Virginia Independence Bicentennial Commission. The planning and the work that both of you and all of your associates put into these festivities is more than we'll ever know, but sometimes the spirit, the significance of an event is of such importance that it demands a celebration no one will ever forget, and that's what this bicentennial is all about. And believe me, you have acquitted yourselves with highest honors.

I wish I could take the time to salute all the rest of you individually, but where would I begin? If I may paraphrase a former President, this is the most extraordinary collection of human talent ever to gather in Williamsburg since Thomas Jefferson walked these streets alone.

We want to thank you again, Mr. President, for that lovely luncheon on board the De Grasse this afternoon. We want to thank you again, as I say you learned more about the triumph of the American Revolution, and I learned more about the triumph of French cuisine. [Laughter] This evening, Nancy and I wanted to return the favor by preparing something truly special for you. Formidable is the word I believe you use in France -- [laughter] -- and I think our friends have done their job well.

Tomorrow morning, you and I have a rendezvous on the battlefield. Fortunately, we will not meet as enemies. [Laughter] France and America never have been and, I pray, never will. We're friends and allies and we must always remain that way, because just like 200 years ago, we need each other to protect something much bigger than ourselves: first the creation and now the preservation of those magnificent institutions of Western civilization, constitutional government, the rule of law, economic liberty, and the right to worship God. They are the foundation of human freedom and social progress, and they bind our countries in a common heritage.

Yorktown, too, represents something bigger than a Virginia town, delightful though it may be. It's a page turned in history like the Place de la Bastille and the landing beaches of Normandy. For here, France and America solidified their friendship with a military victory that would bring peace and independence to our tiny nation, an enduring vision of freedom and hope to the entire world.

Mr. President, I can think of no more appropriate occasion than here and now for your first visit to the United States as leader of the French Republic. Your nation faces many serious challenges and so does mine. But just as our ancestors did before and their descendents have done since, we can stand tall and stand firm by standing together. The durability of Franco-American friendship proves there is constancy in change. The world's oldest alliance has survived, and we can join together to strengthen the Atlantic Alliance for the future.

Mr. President, we worked together in Ottawa, and in a few days we'll have another opportunity to do so in Cancun. I look forward to cooperating with you in a constructive spirit of friendship, trust, and good will.

I am very pleased and proud to be present here on this historic occasion. I am able, I think, to take a somewhat philosophical view of the matter. [Laughter] I had a direct ancestor who fought at this battle. He fought on the American side.

Now, in the words that we've just been listening to, even beyond the point of humor, I have felt the powerful wind of America, the wind of the modern times that was 8 years after Yorktown, was going to in fact give rise to the wind of change and make France also a sort of new world.

We, the French -- we, perhaps, were most attentive in listening to the bells of freedom that were ringing in response to Patrick Henry. First, we responded by coming to take our place by your sides in the first battlefields of freedom. And secondly, by putting almost immediately into effect in our own country and in our own way the great lesson that you had just given us.

Stirring news spread the world over as soon as Jefferson included the right to happiness as one of the main requirements of your Declaration of Independence. And at that time men of all continents and men of all countries gradually began to understand that this concerned them, each one of them, and all of them.

Now, a number of them, and indeed some of us, still have to appreciate that there can be no possible happiness where there is neither justice nor liberty. Like many others, I devoted part of my life, the best part of my life, to freedom, true freedom -- the freedom for which Washington's volunteers and also the French soldiers of year two of the French Revolution fought. And I felt in my own flesh and in my mind the inestimable price of such liberty for having lived in the French Resistance, those terrible years when our country was deprived of such freedom.

I learned in those dark days in France, a country that was hurt and humiliated and that owes you so much, that our main duty towards the others and towards ourselves is to struggle with all our might, always and ever, for freedom.

Now, how would I not feel, so to speak, in fact, as if I were one of your cousins in a way when I hear others, such as yourselves, use the plain and sound language of freedom? It is a language that we have in common. It is a code of expression for the mind and the heart, which allows a simple exchange to take place among us, even though some of them, and I'm afraid I am one of them, some of us, in fact, will speak the American language in such an imperfect fashion that it would not be safe to try to use it, and I wish to ask you to forgive me for this.

May I say that I have this very much in mind when I'm raising my glass, Mr. President, to your excellent and powerful health, to Mrs. Reagan, and to the good health of Franco-American friendship, which I have certainly not found in any way endangered by our divergencies or differences of opinion during our talks, where the frankness among us was the kind of thing that old friends can demonstrate in order to be able to talk to each other without having to take too many precautions.

I would like to associate here in our gathering a thought for the millions of men and women who are in danger of famine and who are in fact listening, listening to what will come out of Cancun, where you and I, Mr. President, we will, with the other participants in the North-South conference, have an opportunity to pursue and to continue in greater depth our conversations of today.

I will raise my glass to your health, Mr. President, and to thank you for the very warm welcome that we have received in this city and in this country. And I know that all the French who have been guests of your country have always been received with the same warm welcome.

And to you, Madam, I would like to say how much I enjoyed our conversations in London and here in Williamsburg, and thanks to them I have learned to know more who you are. I have learned better to appreciate your charm and the presence of the First Lady of the United States.

I would also like to raise my glass to my good friend Lord Hailsham and through him to his country, because though between our two countries there have over the centuries been a lot of quarreling, since then another friendship and a very strong friendship was born, has been born, and I will say more about this tomorrow.

And I would like our American hosts to know that France is a country that wishes to achieve more justice and that will choose the parts in order to achieve that, according to its tastes. And France is a country who wishes by her experience to prolong the civilization, the civilization that was born two centuries ago, and that if it is to prolong itself and continue to act and act with power, it must learn to adapt and to change itself and to evolve while always remaining faithful to the original message.

It was an extraordinary moment in history. The Continental Army, as you've been told, had marched more than 400 miles from the Hudson River in New York to the tidewaters of Virginia. They surprised and stranded Lord Cornwallis on the tip of this peninsula. When Admiral de Grasse and his French fleet blockaded the Chesapeake, the trap was sprung. There could be no rescue by land or by sea.

Nearly 8,000 British soldiers had swept from Charleston to Richmond to this spot between the York and the James Rivers, with far more victories than defeats. But as they were encircled and besieged by the Continentals, as they withstood day after day of grueling bombardment, they must have known in their hearts they were fighting for a cause they could not win.

Their enemies were a band of colonists with bandaged feet and muskets that couldn't be counted on to fire, but the British were thousands of miles from home and the Americans were fighting where they lived. Those rebels may not have had fancy uniforms or even adequate resources, but they had a passion for liberty burning in their hearts.

The morning of the surrender must have been very much like this one today. The first real chill of autumn was in the air. The trees were turning brilliant with the hues of red and gold and brown. The sky was bright and clear. Quiet had finally returned to this lovely countryside. How strange the silence must have seemed after the thundering violence of war.

And then the silence was broken by a muffled beat of British drums, covered with black handkerchiefs, as the Redcoats marched to surrender. The pageantry was spectacular. The French in their spotless white uniforms lined one side of the road. The ragged Continentals were brown and dreary on the other side. But the journals of those who were present mention that the Americans stood every bit as straight and equally as proud as any army could. They had, on that day, a military bearing that was not to be outdone by their comrades in white and blue nor by King George's men in their brilliant red.

As the British marched between the allied armies to the field of surrender, tears streamed down many of their faces. Their musicians played a tune popular in England at the time, yes, ``The World Turned Upside Down.'' And that's just what the colonists had done.

But those Americans were not professional soldiers at all. They had fought for freedom from Quebec to Saratoga, from Camden and Cowpens to Germantown, Valley Forge, and Monmouth -- towns and countrysides once so anonymous that King George complained he could neither pronounce them nor find them on the map.

By Yorktown, they were veterans, but they were still not soldiers. They were farmers, backwoodsmen, tradesmen, clerks, and laborers -- common men from all walks of life, anxious to return to their families and the building of a nation. On that day in 1781 a philosophy found a people, and the world would never be the same.

We who have traveled here today -- and I'm told we number more than 60,000 -- did not come just to admire the strategies, battlements, and trenches of a siege. We did not come to idealize human suffering.

The wounds of this battle have long since healed. Our nations have matured, and bonds of friendship now exist between one-time enemies. The same has been true of other wars since, which makes you wonder if after all the hatred, all the pain, and all the sacrifice, we find ourselves able to be friends and allies, why couldn't we find ourselves able to be friends without first going to war?

We have come to this field to celebrate the triumph of an idea -- that freedom will eventually triumph over tyranny. It is and always will be a warning to those who would usurp the rights of others: Time will find them beaten. The beacon of freedom shines here for all who will see, inspiring free men and captives alike, and no wall, no curtain, nor totalitarian state can shut it out.

The commemoration of this battle marks the end of the revolution and the beginning of a new world era. The promise made on July 4th was kept on October 19th. The dream described in that Pennsylvania hall was fulfilled on this Virginia field. Through courage, the support of our allies, and by the gracious hand of God, a revolution was won, a people were set free, and the world witnessed the most exciting adventure in the history of nations: the beginning of the United States of America.

But we didn't win this battle or this war by ourselves. From your country, Mr. President, came men and ships and goods. Generals Rochambeau and Lafayette and Admirals de Grasse and de Barras were among those without whose help this battle and this war could never have been won. France was first to our side, first to recognize our independence, and steadfast in friendship ever since. We are bonded in spirit and, in fact, by freedom. ``Entre vous, entre nous, a la vie, a la mort,'' Rochambeau said -- Between you, between us, through life, or death.

From the Mediterranean had come the philosophies of Greece and the laws of Rome. England contributed representative government, and the French and the Poles shared their dreams of equality and liberty. On our own frontier, we learned dependence on family and neighbors, and in our Revolution free men were taught reliance on other free men.

We of the West have lived the central truths, the values around which we now must rally -- human dignity, individual rights, and representative democracy. Our nations share the foundation of common law, separation of powers, and limited government. We must unite behind our own common cause of freedom.

There are those in the world today, as there always have been, who recognize human rights as only selective favors to be doled out by the state. They preach revolution against tyranny, but they intend to replace it with the tyranny of totalitarianism.

Once again, today, thousands of free men and women have gathered on this battlefield in testimony to their beliefs. Let the struggle that took place here remind us all: The freedom we enjoy today has not always existed and carries no guarantees. In our search for an everlasting peace, let all of us resolve to remain so sure of our strength that the victory for mankind we won here is never threatened.

Today in our country those concepts are threatened by government's bloated size and the distortion of its true functions. Our people are struggling under a punishing tax burden many times heavier than that which ignited our first rebellion. Regulations that inhibit our growth and prosperity would be incomprehensible to the colonists who revolted because of the Stamp Act.

Our Founding Fathers devised a system of government unique in all the world -- a federation of sovereign States, with as much law and decisionmaking authority as possible kept at the local level. This concept of federalism has been the secret of America's success and will be a priority again as we restore the balance between the Federal, State, and local levels that was intended in the Constitution.

But of equal concern to me is the uncertainty some seem to have about the need for a strong American defense. Now, that is a proper task for the national government. Military inferiority does not avoid a conflict, it only invites one and then ensures defeat. We have been trusted with freedom. We have been trusted with freedom and must ensure it for our children and for their children. We're rebuilding our defenses so that our sons and daughters never need to be sent to war.

Where are the voices of courage and vision that inspired us in the past? Are we ever to hear those voices again? Yes. Thomas Paine, a voice of patriotism, said, ``Those who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must, . . . , undergo the fatigue of supporting it.'' We always have, and we always will. That's just part of being an American.

Here in this land, for the first time, it was decided that man is born with certain God-given rights. We the people declared that government is created by the people for their own convenience. Government has no power except those voluntarily granted to it by we the people.

John Adams wrote home from Philadelphia shortly before signing the Declaration of Independence, and he said, ``I am well aware of the Toil and Blood and Treasure, that it will cost Us to maintain this Declaration, and support and defend these States. Yet through all the Gloom, I can see the Rays of ravishing Light and Glory. I can see that the End is more than worth all the Means -- and that Posterity will triumph -- ''.

It is that vision we recall today. We have economic problems at home, and we live in a troubled and violent world. But there is a moral fiber running through our people that makes us more than strong enough to face the tests ahead. We can look at our past with pride, and our future can be whatever we make it. We can remember that saying Thomas Paine said, ``We have it within our power to begin the world over again.'' We only have to act worthy of ourselves.

The Sinai Support Mission and its overseas arm, the Sinai Field Mission, have since 1976 made unique contributions to the peace process in that part of the Middle East, first by establishing and operating the tactical early warning system that made possible the second disengagement agreement between Egypt and Israel, and when that mission was successfully completed in January 1980, by undertaking during the interim withdrawal period the verification of Egyptian and Israeli adherence to the military limitations called for in their 1979 Peace Treaty.

This second peacekeeping role will end on April 25, 1982, the date established under the Treaty for the completion of Israeli withdrawal from the Sinai. At that time, the Sinai Field Mission will relinquish its verification responsibilities to the new Multinational Force and Observers being established to supervise implementation of the Treaty's security arrangements after Israel's withdrawal.

The role of the Sinai Support and Field Missions has been a concrete example of the United States' commitment to the achievement of a just and lasting peace in the Middle East. Our participation in the Multinational Force and Observers will be the next crucial step in the further promotion of that peace. I am counting on the continuing support of the Congress for our role in the peace process.

Sec. 2. The Board shall assess the quality, quantity, and adequacy of intelligence collection, of analysis and estimates, of counterintelligence, and other intelligence activities. The Board shall have the authority to continually review the performance of all agencies of the Government that are engaged in the collection, evaluation, or production of intelligence or the execution of intelligence policy. The Board shall further be authorized to assess the adequacy of management, personnel, and organization in the intelligence agencies.

Sec. 3. The Board shall report directly to the President and advise him concerning the objectives, conduct, management, and coordination of the various activities of the agencies of the intelligence community. The Board shall report periodically, but at least semi-annually, concerning findings and appraisals and shall make appropriate recommendations for actions to improve and enhance the performance of the intelligence efforts of the United States.

Sec. 4. The Board shall receive, consider, and take appropriate action with respect to matters, identified to the Board by the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency, or other Government agencies engaged in intelligence or related activities, in which the support of the Board will further the effectiveness of the national intelligence effort. With respect to matters deemed appropriate by the President, the Board shall advise and make recommendations to the Director of Central Intelligence, the Central Intelligence Agency, and other Government agencies engaged in intelligence and related activities, concerning ways to achieve increased effectiveness in meeting national intelligence needs.

Sec. 5. The Board shall have access to the full extent permitted by applicable law to all information necessary to carry out its duties in the possession of any agency of the Government. Information made available to the Board shall be given all necessary security protection in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Each member of the Board, each member of the Board's staff, and each of the Board's consultants shall execute an agreement never to reveal any classified information obtained by virtue of his or her service with the Board except to the President or to such persons as the President may designate.

Sec. 6. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but may receive transportation, expense, and per diem allowances as authorized by law. Staff and consultants to the Board shall receive pay and allowances as authorized by the President.

Paul Seabury is professor of political science at the University of California at Berkeley and specializes in international relations and U.S. foreign policy. He is married, has two children, and resides in Berkeley, Calif. He was born May 6, 1923.

Accordingly, where the Continuing Resolution provides amounts in excess of my requests for the period of the resolution, deferrals are being proposed to restrain spending to levels in my requests until action on regular appropriations is complete. However, exceptions have been made in this general policy to avoid major administrative or personnel problems or to avoid serious disruption of an agency's missions.

Deferrals under the Continuing Resolution are included in this special message for the Executive Office of the President and twenty-two departments and agencies. Additional deferrals under the Continuing Resolution will be transmitted during the next week.

Three other deferrals, totaling $51.9 million, included in this special message report on amounts routinely carried forward from fiscal year 1981 in the Department of Health and Human Services that cannot be used immediately or are withheld pending completion of a review.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

This summer, I had the privilege of representing the United States in Ottawa, at an economic summit attended by nations representing more than two-thirds of the world's wealth. Well, this morning I leave for Cancun, Mexico, to attend another economic summit, this one attended by 22 industrial and developing nations that comprise more than two-thirds of the world's population.

Together, these summits reflect a commitment by the peoples in nearly every part of the globe, and the United States is a part of this commitment. We believe a stronger domestic and world economy are vital to peace and stability. This objective is a top priority of American foreign policy, but we go to Cancun with no illusions. The problems of hunger and poverty are severe and deeply rooted. They cannot be solved overnight, nor can massive transfers of wealth somehow miraculously produce new well-being.

Our message at Cancun will be clear. The road to prosperity and human fulfillment is lighted by economic freedom and individual incentive. As always, the United States will be a friend and an active partner in the search for a better life.

We take with us a solid record of support for development and a positive program for the 1980's. Free people build free markets that ignite dynamic development for everyone. We will renew our commitment to strengthen and improve international trading, investment, and financial relations, and we will work for more effective cooperation to help developing countries achieve greater self-sustaining growth.

Cancun is a unique undertaking in world affairs. Never have so many nations gathered from so many parts of the globe for a summit conference on economic growth. With cooperation and good will, this summit can be more than just another shattered dream. It can be the beginning of new hope and a better life for all.

The President. No, not really, and maybe that was a harsh word for it. I think that there's been -- there's kind of a wave of propaganda about the United States. But when you really analyze the facts, the United States has provided food for the developing world -- more than all the rest of the world has provided put together.

We have more than half the trade. We import the products from the non-OPEC developing countries. More than half is imported by this country. And we have duty laws and so forth that encourage that trade. And I think that we have something to offer and have quite a record.

The President. Well, we're certainly not going to go backward. We hope that we will be able to suggest going forward with more of what we have done so well. What is needed is development of those countries to the point of being self-sustaining.

In the past few days, the Soviet Union has issued several propaganda statements that seek to drive a wedge between the United States and some of our closest friends in Europe. I do not intend to let these gross distortions of our policies go unchallenged.

American policy toward deterring conflict in Europe has not changed for over 20 years. Our strategy remains, as it has been, one of flexible response: maintaining an assured military capability to deter the use of force -- conventional or nuclear -- by the Warsaw pact at the lowest possible level.

As all Presidents have acknowledged, any use of nuclear weapons would have the most profound consequences. In a nuclear war, all mankind would lose. Indeed, the awful and incalculable risks associated with any use of nuclear weapons themselves serve to deter their use.

The suggestion that the United States could even consider fighting a nuclear war at Europe's expense is an outright deception. The essence of U.S. nuclear strategy is that no aggressor should believe that the use of nuclear weapons in Europe could reasonably be limited to Europe. Indeed it is the joint European-American commitment to share the burden of our common defense which assures the peace. Thus, we regard any military threat to Europe as a threat to the United States itself. Three hundred seventy-five thousand U.S. servicemen provide the living guarantees of this unshakable U.S. commitment to the peace and security of Europe.

In many ways, this summit is not ours alone. It belongs to the millions who look to us for help and for hope. If they could speak to us today, I believe they might tell us that words are cheap, that cooperative action is needed -- and needed now. In their name, let us join together and move forward. Let us meet the challenge of charting a strategic course for global economic growth and development for all nations.

Each of us comes to Cancun from a different domestic setting, where our major responsibilities are found. My own government has devoted much of the past year to developing a plan of action to strengthen our economy. For years, our government has overspent, overtaxed, and overregulated, causing our growth rates to decline and our inflation and interest rates to rise. We have taken bold measures to correct these problems, and we are confident they will succeed -- not tomorrow, nor next week, but over the months and years ahead.

We believe restoring sound economic policies at home represents one of the most important contributions the U.S. can cake to greater growth and development abroad. The actions we are taking will renew confidence in the dollar, strengthen our demand for imports, hold down inflation, reduce interest rates and the cost of borrowing, and increase resurces for foreign investment.

I have also had a chance to study and discuss with various leaders the domestic problems you face. I know how diverse and serious they are. For the poorest countries, more food and energy are urgently needed, while raising productivity through education, better health and nutrition, and the acquisition of basic facilities such as roads and ports represent longer-term goals.

Middle-income countries need foreign capital, technical assistance, and the development of basic skills to improve their economic climate and credit worthiness in international capital markets. The more advanced developing nations, which already benefit from the internation economy, need increasing access to markets to sustain their development.

And across the spectrum, many among you who are oil importers face acute financial difficulties from the large debt burdens resulting from the oil price shocks of the 1970's. High interest rates are exacerbating these problems, such that debt servicing and energy costs are making excessive claims on your foreign exchange earnings.

We recognize that each nation's approach to development should reflect its own cultural, political, and economic heritage. That is the way it should be. The great thing about our international system is that it respects diversity and promotes creativity. Certain economic factors, or course, apply across cultural and political lines. We are mutually interdependent, but, above all, we are individually responsible.

We must respect both diversity and economic realities when discussing grand ideas. As I said last week in Philadelphia, we do not seek an ideological debate; we seek to build upon what we already know will work.

Government has an important role in helping to develop a country's economic foundation. But the critical test is whether government is genuinely working to liberate individuals by creating incentives to work, save, invest, and succeed.

Individual farmers, laborers, owners, traders, and managers -- they are the heart and soul of development. Trust them. Because whenever they are allowed to create and build, whereever they are given a personal stake in deciding economic policies and benefiting from their success, then societies become more dynamic, prosperous, progressive, and free.

With sound understanding of our domestic freedom and responsibilities, we can construct effective international cooperation. Without it, no amount of international good will and action can produce prosperity.

In examining our collective experience with development, let us remember that international economic institutions have also done much to improve the world economy. Under their auspices, the benefits of international commerce have flowed increasingly to all countries. From 1950 to 1980, GNP per capita in 60 middle-income countries increased twice as fast as in the industrial countries when real purchasing power is taken into account.

Despite the mid-seventies recession, we were able to liberalize the international trading system under the leadership of the GATT. This created new trading opportunities for a number of developed and developing countries.

The IMF remains the centerpiece of the international financial system. It has adjusted its programs and increased its resources to deal with the major pressures and problems of our era. The World Bank and other multilateral development banks have dramatically increased their resources and their overall support for development.

Much remains to be done to help low-income countries develop domestic markets and strength their exports. We recognize that. But we are just as convinced that the way to do this is not to weaken the very system that has served us so well, but to continue working together to make it better.

We have provided $57 billion to the developing countries in the last decade -- $43 billion in development assistance and $14 billion in contributions to the multilateral development banks. Each year, the U.S. provides more food assistance to developing nations than all other nations combined. Last year, we extended almost twice as much official development assistance as any other nation.

The U.S. absorbs about one-half of all manufactured goods that non-OPEC developing countries export to the industrialized world, even though our market is only one-third the total industrialized world market. Last year alone, we imported $60 billion worth of goods from non-OPEC developing countries. That is more than twice the official development assistance from all OECD countries. Our trade and capital markets are among the most open in the world.

As the world's largest single market, we can be a powerful conductor for economic progress and well-being. We come to Cancun offering our hand in friendship as your partner in prosperity. Together, we can identify the roadblocks to development and decide the best ways to stimulate greater growth everywhere we can. We have yet to unleash the full potential for growth in a world of open markets.

In our conversations, we will be elaborating on the specifics of this program. The program deals not in flashy new gimmicks, but in substantive fundamentals with a track record of success. It rests on a coherent view of what's essential to development -- namely political freedom and economic opportunity.

I want to thank our hosts for arranging this historic opportunity. Let us join together and proceed together. Economic development is an exercise in mutual cooperation for the common good. We can and must grasp this opportunity for our people and together take a step for mankind.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Twenty-five years ago the Hungarian people rose to challenge foreign domination of their country and to assert their right to freedom and democratic self-determination.

Today, many of those same people are citizens of the United States. Their experiences, and their continuing devotion to the ideals for which they fought, have brought new strength and meaning to this Nation's commitment to freedom and justice for all people.

The Congress of the United States by joint resolution has authorized and requested the President to honor the memory of the brave Hungarian men and women who fought so courageously to achieve the realization of their aspirations in the face of overwhelming military force.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President. Well, I think more about the specific problems of some of the nations that we're here to find a way to help -- more specifics as to their particular problems. All in all, I think they've been fine meetings, and I think great progress has been made.@131Q. Have any of the delegates, Mr. President, said anything to cause you to change your thinking about foreign aid or how you could help the poor people of the world?

The President. No, but you have to remember that there's no one at that table that has done more in the line of foreign aid than has the United States. And we're concerned, have been for some time, that our foreign aid would be as effective as it can be. And many times for a program that gigantic, and over the years, you know that it can fall into ruts. And the aid is being delivered, but you want to make sure that it's getting to the people that it's intended to help.

So, we had a very good discussion yesterday on food and agriculture for the countries that have that problem. And I think we've made a contribution to them, in proposals as to how we could go in -- you might say that's a task force route -- and find out exactly how their own agricultural output could be improved.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], I think that it's a term and what the term means to various people. If there are those there, and possibly there are, who by global negotiations interpret that to mean some gigantic new international bureaucracy to be in charge, that we would be opposed to that.

The President. Well, we think in some of the organizations that are already existing in the United Nations, that we direct our efforts and their efforts more specifically to doing things that need doing -- for example, such things as the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund, other U.N. organizations that are being directed toward being helpful -- and from out of this to learn the specifics, that we can go and work with them to make them more effective.

Mr. Paisley is currently vice president of Boeing International and manager of International operations. During the past 27 years at Boeing, Mr. Paisley has filled numerous management and engineering positions. In 1954 he was responsible for the design and test on the BOMARC missle. In 1959 he became manager of the electronics staff for the Minuteman missle system where he directed early development of a radio launch control system.

In 1961 Mr. Paisley was appointed engineering manager of the Minuteman system at Wing I in Great Falls, Mont., where he was responsible for the engineering aspects of deploying the first Minuteman Wing.

Following that assignment, he was manager of the Safeguard anti-ballistic missle implementation project and was then assigned as the B-1 electronics proposal manager. In 1971 he became the 747 Tankers program manager. His last assignment before taking his present position was director of planning for Boeing Aerospace Co.

These actions are being taken in accord with the stated intent of the Congress to provide minimal and temporary funding for the duration of the Continuing Resolution which expires November 20, 1981. As indicated in my last special message of October 20, I plan to restrain spending to insure that the Congress has the opportunity to enact regular appropriations for the entire fiscal year at levels that are consistent with my revised budget request.

I am also reporting in this message a deferral of $91.3 million for Veterans Administration construction pending completion of a project review and two rescission proposals for programs in the Department of Defense that are consistent with amendments to the Defense budget sent to the Congress on October 15.

The President. Throughout these 3 days in Cancun, I have participated in a unique and highly productive exchange of views with leaders of developed and developing nations. I hope I speak for the many other world leaders there in saying that Cancun was a substantial success.

The spirit of this conference, as the Cochairman described it, was extremely constructive and positive. The exchange was direct, frank, wide-ranging, and free of recrimination. We dealt with hard issues, and yet succeeded in finding many areas of shared priorities and of common ground.

The fact that we could suceed demonstrates the possibility for a more fruitful dialog conducted with candor and mutual respect. I believe that all those who attended found our expectations fulfilled and even exceeded. Together we succeeded in creating a spirit of new hope, which we want to translate into progress to revitalize the world economy and accelerate the growth of developing countries.

Last week in Philadelphia, I spoke of the goal that motivates our effort: the enhancement of human freedom and economic opportunity. We evaluated the record of succeeds and proposed a program to address the fundamental problems facing the developing countries and the world economy.

At Cancun, we stressed many of those same important themes and the commitment of the United States to work with those countries in their development efforts. There was broad agreement on steps which had to be taken by the developing countries themselves, and by developed and developing countries together, to stimulate the process of growth. There was broad acceptance of many of the approaches proposed in Philadelphia and a strong desire to work with the United States in these areas.

All participants recognized the fact that economic prosperity in any country or group of countries depends both on individual countries own efforts and on close international cooperation. We didn't waste time on unrealistic rhetoric or unattainable objectives. We dealt with pragmatic solutions to the problems of growth -- efforts to improve food security and agricultural development.

There was agreement with our proposal that task forces should be sent to developing countries to assist them in finding new agricultural techniques and transmitting to farmers techniques now in existence. I have directed the Agency for International Development to coordinate these U.S. efforts and to report to us on the progress made.

We also discussed ways to increase trade and industrialization, and there was strong support for working together at the GATT Ministerial. In addition, ways were discussed in which the developing nations can increase their energy production, and monetary and financial issues were reviewed.

I return home reminded again of the importance of American leadership in the world. At Cancun, we made a good beginning toward more constructive and mutually beneficial relations among developed and developing nations and toward a more prosperous world. We have an enormous opportunity now to advance mutually beneficial economic relations with our developing country partners.

I look foward to continuing our efforts in the constructive spirit that characterized the Cancun discussions. By sustaining that spirit, the American people, the people of the developing nations, and the entire world will be better.

Q. Mr. President, do you foresee any problems -- when you were gone, a number of Senators have expressed the way they will vote on AWACS. And do you see any further problems for you in that area? Are you still expected to win?

The President. Well, I repeat my cautious, but optimistic, statement, but say that's what I am back to get busy with again, and see if we can't continue to get some of those who are undecided to realize that the greatest security for the United States and the greatest security for Israel rests with the sale of the AWACS to Saudi Arabia. And those Senators who refuse to see this, I'm afraid are not doing their country a service.

The President. Because I don't think they're being realistic about the dangerous situation in the Middle East, the threat of the Soviet Union there, and the need for the United States and our allies to make their presence felt in that area.

Q. Do you think that Saudi Arabia has gone as far as it can go in terms of assurances and guarantees, and do you think they are sufficient enough to convince the 18 Senators you are going to meet next week?

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], they certainly should be, because I can say that with all my heart, we have guaranteed the security of the technology and the security of Israel.

The President. Well, that's something that I refuse to even think about or discuss while we are still talking to Senators who are honestly uncommitted and undecided and waiting to make up their minds.

Mr. Scarboro has managed and supervised farms during most of his lifetime. He has 30 years experience working on the Wilson, N.C., tobacco market and since 1972, has worked as sales manager of Smith Warehouse in Wilson.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Bobby Jack Thompson to be Administrator of the United States Fire Administration at the Federal Emergency Management Agency. He would succeed Gordon Vickery.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation The willingness of our citizens to give freely and unselfishly of themselves, even their lives, in defense of our democratic principles, gives this great Nation continued strength and vitality. From Valley Forge to Vietnam, through war and peace, valiant Americans have answered the call to duty with honor and dignity.

Americans throughout this great land set aside Veterans Day for special remembrance of the men and women who have served to protect our freedom. The sound of bugles playing taps will pierce the air at countless ceremonies around the country and at our bases overseas in tribute to those who gave their lives in order to safeguard human liberty.

On this special day, our hearts and thoughts also turn to those who were disabled while serving their country. Their sacrifices and hardships endure, and daily earn anew the honor and compassion of a grateful nation.

With a spirit of pride and gratitude, we honor all our veterans, and especially those who have fought on the battlefields of Europe and the beaches of the Pacific, in the jungles and mountains of Asia, in hostile waters and skies around the globe.

I ask that we devote special attention to those veterans who are sick and disabled. Let us show them through our actions that we remember and honor them. There could be no better nor more tangible expression of our gratitude.

I also call upon Federal, state, and local government officials to display the flag of the United States and to encourage and participate in patriotic activities throughout the country. I invite the business community, churches, schools, unions, civic and fraternal organizations, and the media to support this national observance with suitable commemorative expressions and programs.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 26th day of Oct. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

But seriously, there's much more about Virginia. It stands, as you have been told already tonight, as a hallmark of sound, responsible government. And this was demonstrated by your support during the recent budget and the tax battles. In keeping with Virginia's fine tradition of fiscal integrity, our program received the unanimous backing of your congressional delegation and of both of your fine Senators.

With the urging of Governor Dalton and Marshall Coleman, Virginia put itself on the line to get Federal spending and taxes under control, and your Commonwealth has been, as Governor Godwin told you, a shining example of the meaning of federalism -- a testament to the principles of conservatism that provide opportunities, jobs, and hope for all citizens.

When I'm talking to Virginians, I say again, I know I'm talking to friends. We have much to be thankful for in America. The most precious gift we have is our political freedom -- the legacy left us by Virginians like Jefferson, Madison, and Patrick Henry. But all of Virginia's great leaders are not found in past history. In the last two decades, you've been blessed with dynamic leadership that well represented the conservative convictions of the men and women of this Commonwealth.

Virginia's leaders, proud and independent, provided you with progress while maintaining your traditions and heritage. Seven days from now, you and your fellow Virginians will chart the future of this State. You will determine more than just who will be Virginia's next Governor, lieutenant governor, and attorney general, you'll reflect Virginia's commitment to preserving the tried and true concepts of shared power between the Federal and State governments.

Now, I believe that's one of the most important things that we're attempting in our economic program and all the other things in Washington. You will choose between time-honored beliefs, and an uncharted course of conduct which has led us far from the concept of sovereign states assembled together in a federation without losing their sovereignty.

Now, it would be inappropriate for me to tell the people of this State for whom they should vote, so I won't. [Laughter] However, since I just happen to be passing through town -- [laughter] -- I thought I might say a few words about a man who's been a strong supporter of our economic program, a man whom I tremendously respect -- a fellow by the name of Marshall Coleman. He certainly is qualified to be the Governor of Virginia. His roots run deep. He has the depth and background necessary to do what needs to be done to keep this State on an even keel. And as the election draws near, people should carefully examine the records of the two candidates, examine them as they were pointed out to you just a few moments ago. And I hope they would do so free of the glare of advertising, in quiet reflection, ignoring the image-building that has characterized this campaign. And if they do, then Marshall Coleman will be the next Governor of the Commonwealth of Virginia.

You know, as an ex-Democrat myself, I never cease to be amazed at how conservative liberals can sound during election years. Well, Marshall Coleman not only sounds conservative, he is conservative in the finest meaning of that word. He understands how to deal with crime and how to keep budgets under control. He's got the experience and the qualifications to do the job. I'm looking forward to working closely with him once he's elected Governor of the State of Virginia, just as I have with Governor John Dalton.

It isn't going to do us any good to clean up the mess in Washington unless the right kind of public officials are elected at the State level, and not just our gubernatorial candidates. We need the right kind of people in the legislature. And don't send Marshall Coleman to the Capitol alone, he's going to need Nathan Miller and Wyatt Durette. He's going to need them to ensure that Virginia keeps moving in the right direction.

These men are committed to the principles in which we believe; they're conservative, independent, qualified for the jobs they seek, and willing to work hard once they're elected. They're the kind of public officials I'm counting on to make our economic program work. It'll only work if we have people in State government who believe in federalism, who believe as the Constitution says that certain powers are reserved to the States and the people, and not to an all-powerful central government.

I appreciate this chance to talk with you because nothing would make me happier than to know when I call the Governor of Virginia, I'm going to get someone on the line who believes that we should restore the tenth amendment of the Constitution.

I'm sure many of you are aware that there's a vote tomorrow in the United States Senate concerning the sale of radar planes to Saudi Arabia. I'm deeply concerned about this -- not about whether or not the Saudis will actually get radar planes; they'll get such aircraft, whether we provide them or not -- what concerns me is how a rejection by the Senate will affect peace in the Middle East and what it will do to our ability to provide the leadership so necessary for the security of our Nation and the free world.

We need the good will of the Saudis. They provide us with a significant amount of our oil, yes, but more than that they represent a moderate force in the Middle East. A rejection tomorrow, I'm afraid, will be a step toward closing them out of any peace initiative, and that's why I've suggested that tomorrow's vote is as important to the ultimate security of Israel as it is to our own interest.

I would never risk the security of Israel. And that security depends on a stable peace in that troubled part of the world. And peace can only come by drawing the moderate Arab nations into the peacemaking process, along with Egypt and Israel, who are already hard at work at that.

Now, this is a vote that's vital -- vital to the West, vital to America, vital to Israel and the cause of peace in the Middle East. But tonight -- I just had to talk a little shop for a minute -- tonight let's get concerned about the vote Virginians are going to cast on November 3d.

You have 7 more days. Don't let down. Buttonhole your friends and neighbors, yes, and a few strangers. I agree with everything that's been said here about postcard registration. That isn't our problem with people not turning out to vote. The reason that we've declined year after year in the number of people going to the polls is because the Federal Government year after year has usurped so much power and authority that government seemed farther and farther away from the people.

When you buttonhole those people to make sure they get to the polls, remind them of the new course that's being charted for this Nation and how important it is to have Virginia involved in this crusade to restore fiscal responsibility to government, freedom to the individual, and autonomy to the Commonwealth of Virginia -- the autonomy authorized by the Constitution, which for too many decades has been usurped by Washington.

You know, it's been a wonderful experience, this battle that's been going on in Washington the last few months. First of all, there was putting up with the shock of those who found out that you were going to try to do what you said you were going to try to do. [Laughter] Sometimes you felt like you had to wave your hand in front of their glazed eyes to get their attention. But the biggest miracle has been hearing from the people. Oh, yes, the people like yourselves -- the floods of telephone calls when we mentioned it on television, the mail, the wires, the things that told our elected representatives what you, the people, wanted them to do.

She says it beats daytime television -- [laughter] -- which gets me to the final thing that I just want to mention here that's part of all of this and part of why we need these gentlemen who are on the platform and need them in your State Capitol; and that is, I have believed for a long time that the history of America is based on voluntarism, that we have done good works.

I remember when I was a young man and the great earthquake virtually destroyed the cities of Japan -- and America came to the rescue. It wasn't a government program or foreign aid. The people of America mobilized, and a national chairman was appointed by the President, and the people raised the money and went to the rescue. And it was true with the famines in India, it was true with the floods and the storms here in our own country. The first act wasn't to declare something a state of emergency. The first act was people in the rest of the area or around got together and created funds to send help to their neighbors, even though they didn't know those neighbors that lived in some other part of the country.

Well, the biggest thrill I'm getting today is, as we have set out and appointed a national committee to encourage voluntarism, the letters I am getting from communities, from organizations, from people all over this country that are already engaged in such programs. Do you know that in five States, there is a program where with private enterprise, they go in with volunteers to the high schools and they seek out the high school students who are about to graduate who are the least likely to succeed. They don't look for the prizes; they look for the ones who will have the least chance of getting a job. And in those five States they have had a tremendous success in putting those young people into jobs. The young people stay in the jobs and progress in the jobs, and before that, their high school graduates averaged 2 years out of high school before they went on welfare.

The President. I want to express my gratitude to the Members of the United States Senate for their approval of the sale of the AWACS defense system to Saudi Arabia. Today, I think, we've seen the upper Chamber at its best. The United States Senate has acted with statesmanship, with foresight, and with courage.

Today's action by the Senate will not only strengthen Saudi-American relations but will also protect our economic lifeline to the Middle East, win favor among moderate Arab nations, and most important, continue the difficult but steady progress toward peace and stability in the Middle East.

We've acted in concert to demonstrate that the United States is indeed a reliable security partner. Our friends should realize that steadfastness to purpose is a hallmark of American foreign policy, while those who would create instability in this region should note that the forces of moderation have our unequivocal support in deterring aggression.

This vote alone doesn't mean that our security problems in that part of the world have been completely solved. This package is but a part of our overall regional security strategy. Our strategy seeks to enhance the capacity of friendly states to defend themselves and to improve our own ability to project our own forces into the region should deterrence fail. We'll continue to pursue efforts in both areas.

Our support for the security of Israel is, of course, undiminished by today's vote. The United States will maintain its unshakeable commitment to the security and welfare of the State of Israel, recognizing that a strong Israel is essential to our basic goals in that area.

Much work still remains ahead. I trust that all of us who disagreed openly and vigorously in recent days can now put aside our honest differences and work together for common goals -- friendship, security, and peace at last, in the cradle of our civilization. Because of actions like today's by the Senate, the cause of peace is again on the march in the Middle East. For this, all of us can be grateful.

The President. A little while ago, this afternoon, I felt that the count was -- that at least we were going to be assured of a tie. And that would have been a victory, because it required a majority vote to stop this.

The President. Yes, they submitted a plan. We couldn't agree with all the points, nor could the Israelis, but it was the first time that they had recognized Israel as a nation, and it's a beginning point for negotiations.

The President. I think that it's going to have a very good effect. We had heard from many leaders who had expressed their concern about what this could mean in the whole world scene, if it had not turned out the way it did.

The President. Well, contrary to some of the things that have been said, there have been no deals made. None were offered. I talked strictly on the merits of the proposal. And basically I tried to point out, in every instance, the progress that has been made so far in the Middle East towards stability and peace and the part that was played in that by Saudi Arabia and Prince Fahd, beginning with the cease-fire that we were able to secure in Lebanon, in which they played a major role. And I simply played on that; that this, I felt, was essential for the security of Israel, for the entire Middle East, and for ourselves on the world scene.

The President. Well, I would think that the only thing that could happen to make us not fulfill that would be if by some chance, the radical elements that we know are there and that have made themselves tragically evident in the last few weeks, that if they should gain control in the Middle East and gain control of all of those governments we're talking about, I think the very fact of what we've done and the knowledge now that the United States and our allies are not walking away from the Middle East is going to contribute to the stability and make it very unlikely that the other can happen.

Senator Baker. I don't know if there was any one thing. I think that the weight of logic and time for people to think about it and to weigh the arguments pro and con -- I think we had the better arguments, and I think in the final analysis, that's what one would make of it.

The President. No. And I must say it was very impressive, also, because many of the Senators that I talked to, in fact most of them, were honestly trying to find what they thought was the right answer for the country.

Since February, Mr. Douglas has been senior member of the Policy Planning Staff at the Department of State. Previously, he was corporate director, international trade and government affairs, Memorex Corp., in Santa Clara, Calif. In this position he was responsible for the conduct of the corporation's relations with the United States Government, U.S. State governments, and foreign governments, the corporation's international trade policy positions, overseas negotiations, and special projects.

Now more than 94 percent completed, with over 40,000 miles in use, the Interstate System has profoundly affected the lifestyles of all Americans. Crisscrossing the Nation from ocean to ocean and from border to border, it links more than 90 percent of our cities that have populations of 50,000 or more, as well as many smaller cities and towns. The system comprises little more than one percent of the Nation's total road and street mileage, yet carries 20 percent of the traffic.

The Interstate System is modern America's paramount asset. By drastically cutting travel time it has drawn diverse sections of the country together. It expedites the movement of goods and produce, reducing costs and promoting competition. These and other economic benefits of the Interstate System have had a lasting impact on the standard of living of every American. At the same time, it provides us the means for the movement of military forces and supplies in the event of a national emergency.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 29th day of Oct. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Among the most precious gifts a child can receive is a good education. Historically, the primary responsibility for educating our youth has rested with parents. State and local educators stand to assist parents in achieving educational goals. The cooperative effort between parents and educators is the irreplaceable ingredient for American education.

In a free society, we are fortunate to have the right to oversee our children's education. The success of our educational system depends upon the exercise of this right by parents. It is thus fitting that mothers and fathers throughout the Nation should be encouraged to be involved with their local schools and to participate in supportive activities.

It is appropriate that the theme of this year's American Education Week is ``American Education and You: Partners in Our Children's Future.'' Increased teamwork between school, home, church or synagogue, and the community cannot help but add to the quality of our children's education.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 29th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation American agriculture is a modern-day miracle. In the last 30 years, United States farmers have increased productivity by 50 percent. Now, fewer than 4 percent of our population provides our Nation's agricultural products -- and enough more to feed millions of people overseas.

The trust, reliance, and interdependence of farms and cities is a basic strength of this great Nation. Farm and city people have long been partners in economic and social progress. Without farms to provide food and fiber, cities would be barren; without the products and services of cities, farms would be primitive.

A close partnership between farm and city people in the productive use of land, labor, and capital is paramount if our Nation is to continue to have an abundance of safe, wholesome food as well as an abundance of goods and services at reasonable prices.

To achieve a deeper appreciation of the contributions and cooperation of farms and cities, the Nation has set aside a week in November as National Farm-City Week. The theme is: Partners in Progress -- Key to the Future.

The 49 deferrals of funds made available by P.L. 97 - 51 are being taken in accord with the stated intent of the Congress to provide minimal and temporary funding for the duration of the Continuing Resolution which expires November 20, 1981. As indicated in my special message of October 20, I plan to restrain spending to insure that the Congress has the opportunity to enact regular appropriations for the entire fiscal year at levels that are consistent with my revised budget request.

The President. All I can tell you is whoever wrote that report not only was blowing smoke, they were also doing a disservice to this country. I am very happy with the team we have, and the country should be. And Al Haig is Secretary of State and, I think, one of the finest we've had in a very long time.

Federal Regional Councils are comprised of nine Federal domestic agencies located in 10 standard Federal regions. Each Council is composed of the principal regional officials representing the following departments and agencies: Department of Agriculture, Department of the Interior, Department of Labor, Department of Health and Human Services, Department of Housing and Urban Development, Department of Transportation, Department of Energy, Department of Education, and the Environmental Protection Agency.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Elliott Abrams to be Assistant Secretary of State for Human Rights and Humanitarian Affairs. He would succeed Patricia M. Derian. Mr. Abrams will resign his current position as Assistant Secretary of State for International Organizations effective upon his assumption of this new position.

In making today's announcement, the President said ``the promotion of liberty has always been a central element of our Nation's foreign policy. In my administration, human rights considerations are important in all aspects of our foreign policy. We will speak up against the enemies of freedom, and we will try to help its friends. We will encourage those who seek freedom, not least by telling the simple truth about their efforts and the efforts of those who seek to oppress them.

Mr. Bish is president of Mid-Continent Enterprises, a company engaged in land development, property management, and residential construction. Prior to founding this company, Mr. Bish was associated with and served as president of the Bish Machinery Co., a distributor of material-handling equipment and farm machinery. Since 1979 he has been a partner in the Bish and Son Cattle Co., and highway commissioner for the State of Nebraska. He was a member of the Presidential transition team at the Department of the Interior in November 1980 to January 1981.

A U.S. Presidential Task Force to Honduras is scheduled to leave on October 2. Members of the task force will spend 2 weeks in Honduras reviewing its agricultural sector and advising the Government of Honduras on ways to improve its agricultural production and marketing system.

This is the third Presidential agricultural task force to be sent to a developing country. Similar task forces went to Peru and Thailand earlier. The teams were established by the U.S. Agency for International Development (AID) at the direction of President Reagan, following the North-South summit talks at Cancun, Mexico.

Mr. Chief Justice and Associate Justices, we're grateful to you for joining us here at this luncheon marking the start of the October term of 1982 of the Supreme Court. This house is honored by your presence, and I'm honored to be your host.

White House to advise the President that they had survived the rigors of stagecoaches and horseback, and so forth, and had actually made it back to Washington so the October term could start. Now, later this became a kind of a traditional visit in memory of those more rigorous times.

But in recent years we understand it's only been sporadically observed. So, I'm pleased that we can renew this special tradition, and, hopefully, we can establish it firmly enough that it will continue.

Certainly, I know that the Supreme Court of the United States is the only group of men -- and now men and women -- in history that has exercised significant authority over such a long period of time without having need for battalions of fighting men to enforce their decisions. I think it's a healthy reflection of the fact that the vast majority of our citizens respect and abide by the decisions of the judiciary as a matter of course.

Now, this isn't to say, of course, that we'll always agree on the important issues that are presented to you for decision. But we take a little comfort in the fact that the Court, itself, is frequently of more than one mind about such matters. And it's neither surprising nor disturbing that our citizens may at times side with the dissenters. It's even rumored that Presidents sometimes disagree with particular Supreme Court decisions. It's inevitable that the Court's decisions become the focus of popular attention and debate, and, certainly, our Founding Fathers expected nothing different.

But about one point, at least, there can be no disagreement whatsoever: The Supreme Court must continue to demonstrate the independence and integrity that have always been its hallmarks. You, as members of the Court, are the principal guardians of those traditions under the rights and freedoms of all Americans.

H.J. Res. 350 is the result of years of work and attention to detail. It is carefully drafted to achieve both the objectives I have always considered essential for such a Constitutional amendment -- balanced budgets and a limitation on the share of the nation's product the government can take in taxes. Only by this combination of provisions can we control both deficits and spending.

I understand that a substitute for H.J. Res. 350 will be offered in the House of Representatives -- a substitute requiring only that the executive and the Congress plan for a balanced budget on paper. H.J. Res. 350 provides strong enforcement provisions to ensure actual spending does not exceed planned levels and that a balanced budget is achieved -- not merely projected. By contrast, the proposed substitute contains no enforcement requirement whatsoever and fails to limit future growth of tax burdens on the American people.

Among the choices before the House of Representatives, only H.J. Res. 350 will place enforceable restraints on Federal spending and Federal taxation. There is no more significant step we can take for the nation's long-term economic health and prosperity than to approve this historic measure.

I have long supported, at both the state and Federal levels of government, a Constitutional approach to fiscal responsibility that would not only provide balanced budgets but would also limit the share of the nation's product the government could take in taxes. We must control not only the deficit, but also the overall levels of spending and taxes.

H.J. Res. 350 is designed to accomplish these two objectives -- balancing the budget and limiting taxes. It is the result of years of work and careful attention to detail. It provides enough flexibility to enable the Congress to deal with unexpected events, but at the same time its provisions are enforceable.

I know that you will do everything in your power to impress upon your colleagues that now is not the time to be sidetracked by the eleventh hour gimmick invented by the House leadership. As you well know, the so-called Alexander substitute is not a credible, enforceable amendment. It does not require the Congress or the President to take any action to achieve a balanced budget. This transparent device is designed to mislead the American people and sabotage the long, difficult struggle to impose permanent constitutional discipline on the spending and tax decisions of government.

The President. Today I share the deep, burning anger, I think, of millions of Americans. Despite stonewalling by the Democratic leadership of the House of Representatives, a majority of Members finally forced a vote on the balanced budget-tax limitation amendment. Tragically and for purely partisan reasons, these same House Democrats who didn't want the vote have again played politics with the will of the people.

This should not be a partisan issue. Indeed, almost a third of the Democratic Members, I must say, recognized the desires of the people and were willing to support them. But House Joint Resolution 350 was developed over several years by prominent constitutional scholars. It was passed overwhelmingly by the Senate. The leadership in the House pasted together a phony, last-minute political sham with no teeth in it which failed to pass. Their only concern was to defeat a real balanced budget-tax limitation amendment, and this they finally managed to do.

American people are overwhelmingly with us, and our numbers are growing. We can take heart from the fact that 236 Republicans and Democrats, a clear majority of the House, joined together in the bipartisan support of a balanced budget. A constitutional amendment, however, requires a two-thirds majority, which would have been 290 votes, and therefore the measure failed.

It was year after year of government living beyond its means that plunged our nation into a deep, painful mess, one that culminated in 1980 with double-digit inflation, climbing unemployment, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, and the highest peacetime tax burden that we've ever known. Yet today, incredibly, we heard the House leadership still claiming that a balanced budget would wreck the economy.

To the overburdened taxpayers who are paying so dearly for the mistakes of the past, I pledge to you, we will redouble our efforts. We'll submit our amendment again, and with the support of the people we'll keep up the pressure until Congress makes an iron-clad commitment to bring spending in line with revenues. When the Congress busts the budget, it's the American people who are short-changed.

The President. No one believes, Sam [Sam Donaldson, ABC News] -- I shouldn't take any questions, and I'm not going to, but I'm going to answer that one -- because no one believes that the passing of such an amendment means that instantly we could achieve this. There is a time lapse in between which gives us plenty of time to begin to bring this budget back under control without devastating a number of worthwhile programs that people are dependent on, and it's going to take some work to achieve that. And it can be accomplished.

So, it isn't a case that if this were passed that instantly after the vote we have to start. We have reduced the rate of increase in the budget from 17 percent when we started down to 4\1/2\ percent in the next year's budget that has been proposed.

The President. I'm answering the question because the question you asked -- the answer is so obvious that obviously after these years of out-of-control and buildup to the level they have, there's no one that pretended that you could -- this would then have to go to the States for ratification. There would be a period of time before it was actually put in place. And in that period of time you have an opportunity to work out a budget which would not have to penalize people who are dependent now on the Government for help.

The President. No. What's wrong with all the years that we've been advocating this? For 8 years I served as Governor of a State where we had it, and it was never violated except once by a Democratic administration and legislature in the State of California that used some bookkeeping tactics to repeal that.

The President. Yes, and I think that that was intentional. I think if we'd had more time for the people to know what was going on and make their wishes definitely known, I think the Congress might have acted differently.

Emergency Boards (Nos. 196, 197, and 198) to investigate disputes between rail labor unions and local commuter authorities operating in the Northeastern United States, and to recommend settlements for new collective bargaining agreements.

Collective bargaining between the unions and the commuter authorities has been underway since midsummer on a variety of issues, including wages and work rules. Although the 1981 act required appointment of the Emergency Boards by early October, the parties have indicated that they will continue to negotiate as the Boards begin their fact-finding proceedings. Each Board is required to hold public hearings on the disputes in its service area and issue a report within 30 days. If the parties are still unable to reach agreement, they will then submit final offers to the Board, which will recommend the ``most reasonable'' offer as the settlement.

The President. My fellow Americans, those of you who tuned in a few weeks ago may remember that the topic of my broadcast was crime. Well, this week I'd like to narrow that subject down to drugs, an especially vicious virus of crime.

In the last few days, I've had two reports on drugs in America. First, Nancy returned from a trip to Alabama, Mississippi, and Arkansas -- one of the many trips she's made, talking to young people and their parents about the drug epidemic. Well, I thought it might be fitting if she told you herself of what she's learned about the drug problem.

To everyone at home, I have to tell you that few things in my life have frightened me as much as the drug epidemic among our children. I wish I could tell you all the accounts I've heard -- stories of families where lying replaces trust, hate replaces love; stories of children stealing from their mothers' purses; stories of parents not knowing about drugs, and then not believing that the children were on them, and finally not understanding that help was available. I've heard time and again of children with excellent grades, athletic promise, outgoing personalities, but who, because of drugs, became shells of their former selves.

But there are also some very positive signs on the prevention and treatment fronts, especially with the parents movement. People finally are facing up to drug abuse. They're banding together, and they're making real progress. And I just want to say a heartfelt ``thank you'' to all those people out there who are working so hard to get drug abuse under control.

Now, regarding the other report I mentioned. In the next few days we'll announce the administration's new strategy for the prevention of drug abuse and drug trafficking. This is a bold, confident plan, and I'm elated. For too long the people in Washington took the attitude that the drug problem was so large nothing could be done about it. Well, we don't accept this sit-on-your-hands kind of thinking. We've decided to do more than pay lip service to the problem, and we started where narcotics crime was the worst: south Florida.

Florida's citizens. I established a task force under Vice President Bush's leadership to help the citizens of south Florida fight back. As part of a coordinated plan, we beefed up the number of judges, prosecutors, and law enforcement people. We used military radar and intelligence to detect drug traffickers, which, until we changed the law, could not be done. We increased efforts overseas to cut drugs off before they left other countries' borders.

Well, the results of our task force have been dramatic. The Vice President tells me drug-related arrests are up over 40 percent, the amount of marijuana seized is up about 80 percent, and the amount of cocaine seized has more than doubled. The important thing is we're hurting the traffickers. It's true that when we close off one place they can move somewhere else. But one thing is different now: We're going to be waiting for them. To paraphrase Joe Louis, they can run but they can't hide.

There are 9 departments and 33 agencies of Government that have some responsibility in the drug area, but until now, the activities of these agencies were not being coordinated. Each was fighting its own separate battle against drugs. Now, for the very first time, the Federal Government is waging a planned, concerted campaign.

In addition to the enforcement element, our strategy will also focus on international cooperation, education, and prevention -- which Nancy's very interested in -- detoxification and treatment and research.

The mood toward drugs is changing in this country, and the momentum is with us. We're making no excuses for drugs -- hard, soft, or otherwise. Drugs are bad, and we're going after them. As I've said before, we've taken down the surrender flag and run up the battle flag. And we're going to win the war on drugs.

You know, we hear so much from defeatists in Washington who've given up on America. They say we can no longer compete, we've lost our leadership and productivity, and our best days are behind us. Well, let them come to Columbus and watch the power of this high-tech revolution unfold and see you leading America into her 21st century, proving our best days are still to come.

Being here, even in this short time, is like peeking into a part of America's future, and it looks mighty good. Here we see proof that knowledge is power. And we see something else that a favorite son of yours always talked about. He said that you win with people, and that every person is greater than he or she thinks they are. And that was from a winner. There's never been a bigger winner than Woody Hayes [Head coach of the Ohio State University football team] and Ohio State.

But I believe with all my heart that the United States is determined to be a winner again. We need only to believe in ourselves and to remember that the true strength of this country lies in the minds, the motivation, and the faith of people like yourselves, not the bureaucracy in Washington, D.C. Now, there are a lot of well-intentioned people working in Washington and many fine people that are sincere and patriotic and all that, but there are just some areas where the Government has been trying to do things that the Government was never set up to do, and those things belong back here in your States and in your communities.

Less than 2 years ago we had inherited an economy that was on the brink of disaster. I don't think anyone can remember any other time in this country when we faced double-digit inflation, 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate, and an unprecedented tax burden, all at the same time.

The grim results of high taxing and spending between 1976 and 1980 were a decline in the real wages and weekly earnings of all the working people of this country. And yet there were those who called the policies that led to that policies of fairness and compassion. Well, today progress against inflation and the first real tax cut for everyone in nearly 20 years have produced higher savings, higher real earnings for the first time in quite a long period of time, and more purchasing power. The average family today and the average level of income is about $1,500 better off than would have been if inflation had stayed where it was in the end of 1980.

Rebuilding prosperity, I think, is the true meaning of fairness and compassion. We would be doing better if the House leadership hadn't left to campaign without passing appropriations bills, holding the line on the '83 budget. October 1st was the first day in the new fiscal year. It was the third straight year that we have gone into the fiscal year without a budget. And they didn't pass the constitutional amendment to balance the budget. And I think it's about time we realize when there's only been one balanced budget in the last 22 years, that Congress needs some help, and that help is, put it in the Constitution where no one can violate it, and it has to be balanced.

The most important thing we can do is to bring inflation and interest rates down more, which, in turn, are the keys to creating more jobs. I believe the House leadership let the Nation down badly when it recessed for this campaign.

American exports and stopped exporting American jobs. And last Friday the Congress did finally pass a bill that we have supported to create jobs and increase exports -- the Export Trading Company Act. This legislation will encourage the formation of trading companies to spur exports, a practice that's already being used with skill against us by our principal trading competitors.

And the best thing about the legislation is that it can create several hundred thousand permanent jobs in the private sector, and it won't cost the taxpayers a penny. We think that's a far better approach than the temporary make-work public jobs program that was stampeded through the House by the House leadership and which, if it ever gets to my desk, I'll veto.

Public works jobs programs have proven to be expensive failures. They were the things that for seven previous recessions the Government has turned to, and it was like a quick fix -- stimulated the economy briefly but about 2 years later you fell into another recession. And every one of them was deeper and worse than the one before. Now they'd drag us right back with that kind of program into the swamp that we've been trying so hard to lift ourselves out of. So, I'm looking forward to signing this Export Trading Company legislation as soon as possible.

The choice before us is clear: Do we go back to the failed course of raising taxes on working families and giving government a blank check to spend and borrow, which is what our critics so clearly intend to do, or do we keep our trust where it belongs -- with you, the people, who are proving in this very plant the great things that a proud people can do if we'd just set you free? I know the way I feel. I just hope you do, too.

And sitting over here is a man who is of the greatest help to us in getting our economic recovery program into motion. I have valued his insight and his advice and his support and help. And he was on a committee in Congress, '78 and '79, when they tried to get pretty much of what we now have been able to accomplish by getting this bill through. But at that time against an administration and a majority, they couldn't get it done. But he was a leader in that, and he's still a leader -- Bud Brown, who I hope is going to be the next Governor of the State of Ohio.

I realize I shouldn't be talking politics here now, but -- [laughter] -- having been a Governor for 8 years, you know we are trying with a thing called federalism. We're trying to get a plan in Washington that will turn back to the States the authority and the autonomy, and to the local communities, that has been seized by the Federal Government and let a lot of things be run closer to home, as I said earlier in my remarks. And if you're going to do that, then you need someone in the statehouse who's a good manager and who is attuned to that same thing and is going to see that those responsibilities are accepted. And we'll all be better off.

But now, let's have that dialog I mentioned, instead of continuing dialog -- I understand there are seven microphones scattered out there with monitors that have them. So, find a microphone if you have a question, and that's how we can have a dialog. And I see a hand back there -- there it is.

Q. My name is Jeff Tremaine, from the finance area of our company, and I'm very interested in your Export Trading Company Act. We export about 53 percent of our products. My question is this. We recently have received word that the Export-Import Bank has discontinued their discount loan program which has helped us finance quite a number of our projects overseas. And I was curious as to whether or not there are any other programs in the works that might provide some type of financing for our customers on an export basis.

The President. I can't give you all the details on this bill that we're supporting, but I think that it might meet some of the problems. I know that the Export-Import Bank budget was reduced, as a number of others were. And yet we do want to encourage it, because that's the answer to the problems of this great productive country that we have -- is export. And I think that you might find an answer in that new piece of legislation that's been passed. Now -- and then I'll look this way.

Business Administration -- with encouraging small business, because I think -- call it small or call it independent -- that is the business force that creates about 80 percent of the new jobs that have to be created to keep up with our growth.

In fact, we have legislation before the Congress that will finance the training of about a million young people a year for jobs. And the difference between this and some of the programs that were canceled, some of the CETA programs, was that those programs -- only 20 percent of the budget in those programs went to actual training. In the program that we're trying to push through the Congress and that will -- 70 percent of every dollar will go to actual training of the -- and mainly young people that we think will probably take advantage of this. But the main thing that we're doing isn't -- it doesn't show as spectacular as passing some program to artificially stimulate the economy or something.

What lost us the jobs to begin with, and they did -- we have been losing or increasing unemployment steadily back for probably a decade and a half. But it became very pronounced in the years between -- well, from '77 on through 1980 and then on into the depths of this recession.

What happened was -- well, in the last 6 months of 1980 there was a great, volatile upswing in the money supply. It went up to such a peak that it was the highest or fastest increase in money supply in the history of our country. And with it the interest rates went right on up too, to 21\1/2\, because out in the money market they knew that you could not sustain this and that the next thing would be, based on experience, that they'd pull the string on the money supply and bring it way down to where we had tight money. And there wouldn't be enough money available to borrow, so the supply and demand -- the interest rates would have to be high.

Now, they did pull it way down -- they pulled the string on it -- and in the first half of 1981 it was way down below even the Fed's own target line. And it hung on long enough that the unemployment -- and this had started -- I campaigned here in your own State when it was beginning back in '79 and '80. Those businesses that were dependent on lending -- the automobile industry. They began to fall off, because people couldn't pay the interest rate. So, the layoffs began. And as the automobile companies ground down -- they by themselves can start a recession -- your steelplants began to close; glass companies, the rubber industry, and of course your dealers and salesmen -- unemployment spread from there on out. But at the same time people couldn't buy homes. They couldn't afford the mortgage rates which had skyrocketed with those high interest rates.

You must remember that someone that's going to lend money has to get back not only a return on their money -- an interest -- but they also have to be sure that when that money comes back to them after -- no matter how long it has been loaned -- they must get back dollars of the same value, that have the same purchasing power as when they loaned them. So, interest rates are based on inflation plus a return on the money. And as inflation was up at double digit, they had to have an interest rate that covered the fact that every year the dollar was losing 12 or 13 cents more each year.

And so, this gives us as our target, how do we create jobs to get interest rates down. To get interest rates down we have to get inflation down, and this we have been doing. And this is what has been our number one target, is inflation. And as people have -- as I gave the figures here -- have more money to spend and begin to go into the marketplace and begin to buy again -- and the housing industry has had an upturn; it's not up to where it should be, but it's been increasing for several months now -- the start of new houses. As that begins, and more money in the market, then the companies out there -- the production companies -- are going to have to call back their laid-off employees and improve productivity to meet the new market demand.

And this is the program that we're following, and we think it'll work. And we think it won't be a temporary stimulant like the quick fixes of the past. We think that it'll be a solid economic recovery with increased productivity and plenty of jobs.

One last point on that. It is true that the unemployment is not totally due to the recession. There has been, in the last decade or so, a vast increase in the percentage of adults in America who've gone into the job market. And so, we're going to find maybe that normal unemployment rate -- which is based on, in normal times, about the people who are between jobs or have quit a job to try for another one, this sort of thing -- may, instead of being the 4 percent that we used to talk about, it may be 6 or 6\1/2\ percent. But that would not be a reflection of a bad economy. That's just that we have the highest percentage -- except for one year we were 2 percentage points higher than we are now -- in the percentage of adults that are in the job market.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Howard Cothern, and I work in the inspection department. And I'd like to know if it's possible to get the busing issue on the State level to let the people decide whether they actually want busing or not?

The President. On busing. Well, as you know, there's wide feeling in the Congress about this, and there's been great controversy about it. I think that busing has failed of its purpose, and it hasn't been legislated; it's been taken over by the courts. And I believe today that what we're doing in the Justice Department is, where communities themselves are seeking to get a change or modification of the court order, the Justice Department, based on the merits, will aline itself with those communities to help them in that case.

And why I say ``based on the merits'' is, we're not going to hold still for some community just doing it because they don't like the policy of integration. What we want is those places where it's failed and where even the minority communities that it was supposed to benefit have turned against it because -- well, as Mrs. Brown said -- the woman who got the original decision in the Court -- Mrs. Brown took this all the way to the Supreme Court because of her own memories of her childhood when she had to go miles past a school near her home simply because of segregation. And then she had a daughter of her own, and Mrs. Brown is opposed to busing in her own community, because she said now her daughter is bused miles past the school near their home -- [laughter] -- and she said that wasn't what she had in mind.

So, we're going to stick with protecting the constitutional rights and the gains that we've made in human rights and civil rights in this country. But we do think that, here again, more authority is needed at the local level with the constitutional protections that only the Federal Government can ensure.

The President. Well, I think you can understand why I have to say I can't -- [laughter] -- specifically answer that question. [Laughter] I can tell you this: We are very much aware of the Russian development in that field, the experiments they've been conducting, and what they're trying to accomplish. And we aren't going to sit still and let them get away with it.

Q. I was going to ask you about the CETA program, but you already kind of answered that in a way. So, I wanted to know: How do you expect to go about educating the public to the benefits of the government-funded manpower programs and how they do keep people off of the welfare rolls? For example, I received my education under a government-funded program, and I'm now a taxpayer and not a welfare recipient.

The President. And that's what the program is intended to do. Actually, in this thing -- and we still have loan programs and grant programs to help students go through college, university, and so forth. And much of the talk that we somehow have withdrawn from that program is just not true.

What we did find out was that a lot of people whose family income was such that they couldn't really justify the need of this help -- we have aimed the programs at people of lower income families who must have that help if they're to get an education. And we have put some restraints and restrictions on people whose income level or family income level was higher.

We found -- in the beginning we found, when the interest rates were so high, that there were families that took out the college loan and didn't need to. But because the interest rates were so high they then invested the college loan in Treasury notes that were paying high interest rates and were making a profit off the same government that loaned them the money to begin with by lending it back to the government at a higher interest rate. And at the same time they were sending their son or daughter to school. And we decided that that isn't what the taxpayers should be paying for.

Depression -- only those here who are old enough to remember that know what a traumatic experience that was. I saw my father lose his job on a Christmas Eve in that depression. So, my sympathy goes out -- I say that there's too much unemployment if there's even one person who wants a job and can't find it. But these newspaper ads convinced us that there are jobs waiting and people not trained for those jobs. And that's why we are supporting this job-training program.

The CETA program had too much of it going through government. And local governments were employing people in government jobs, which was kind of padding the payroll. And they were jobs without any future and weren't really training them for jobs out in the private sector -- jobs such as you have here in this wonderful institution.

You know that exports mean jobs. And they are an important weapon in our battle against this nation's economic problems. Export expansion and a healthier economy will come from firms like yours -- accepting the challenge to seek export markets.

I've asked Patricia Tremaine, one of our export specialists, to join me in accepting this award. I would like to briefly note that we continue to feel that more than half of the equipment produced at our factory complex here in Columbus will continue to go outside the United States. The reason, of course, in our belief is that we build a superior quality process control system for the worldwide marketplace. Half of our people are located here in Columbus. The other half represent another very important aspect, and that is a 900-man worldwide sales and service organization to market and service our products throughout the world.

It's now my pleasure to extend an invitation for a brief tour of our factory. And I would like to ask all associates to join with me in expressing our pleasure and sincere honor and appreciation for you personally coming and being with us today.

There are two classic confrontations between the past and the future, between candidates who reject the policies of tax and tax and spend and spend and candidates who endorse them, and between candidates who stand for growth and opportunity and candidates who want more government and more spending. But this is a bipartisan meeting, so I'm not going to tell you how proud I am of Congressman Bud Brown and what an invaluable ally he's been in the fight against big government in Washington. And I'm certainly not going to tell you how he's won the respect of virtually everyone he's dealt with there, or of my confidence that he'll do a great job in any position the people of Ohio elect him to.

Two years ago I made a good many campaign stops in this State. The reasons for that aren't hard to figure out: Ohio isn't just one of the most important States in the Union; it's also a measure of America, a barometer of our people. As I traveled through Ohio -- States like Ohio -- one thing became very clear. Something was stirring in America, a new political consensus was emerging -- a consensus that rejected government intrusion and expansion into areas where it was neither competent nor needed; but a consensus that was also critical of government's failure to perform its legitimate and traditional duties -- like maintaining our national security and keeping our streets safe.

Despite the hysterical cries of the opposition, the people of Ohio understand the economic mess this administration inherited when we took office. I hate to dredge up unpleasant memories, but we'd had inflation in double digits for 2 years in a row -- the first time in 60 years that had happened. Interest rates had shot as high as 21\1/2\ percent. The rate of growth in the gross national product had gone down for the third year in a row. And the money supply had increased at a 13-percent annual rate in the last half of 1980. That was the fastest increase in our history.

That recession worsened in 1981, a recession that was a legacy from all the years of boom and bust, of wild spending and erratic fiscal policy, of tax and tax and spend and spend, and, lest we forget, of deliberate, planned inflation. They called it -- years ago when they started it -- the new economics, and they said it was necessary to maintain prosperity. Well, what a job we had before us 20 months ago -- to try and control the spending juggernaut.

In the previous 10 years Federal spending had tripled; in the last 5 years, Federal taxes had doubled. The budget for the Department of Health and Human Services, roughly $250 billion, became the third largest budget in the world. It came just after the entire national budget of the United States and of the Soviet Union. The Federal debt reached a trillion dollars, and the interest payments on that debt alone were in the range of a hundred billion dollars, which was just about as much as the entire Federal budget 20 years ago.

Now, that's why the American people supported us when we moved to cut the growth in spending, when we reduced taxes for individual Americans and indexed them to the rate of inflation, when we cut through the thicket of Federal regulations, when we mobilized our Inspectors General in a war on waste and fraud in the Government. They found in just one 6-month period thousands of people still receiving checks from the Federal Government, and they'd been dead for an average of 7 years.

In 20 months we've managed to slow three decades of momentum toward bigger and bigger government. Even in Washington, it's beginning to sink in: You can't drink yourself sober or spend yourself rich -- you can't prime the pump without pumping the prime. Our economic recovery program has been in effect for less than a year, but it's already beginning to work.

Americans, is now down from 12.4 percent in 1980 to 5.1 percent so far this year, the 8 months since last January. And just last month it had dropped down to a rate, that if it keeps at that particular rate, it would be around 3 percent. And, oh, yes, we've brought individual Americans the first real tax cut they've had in nearly 20 years.

American politics for a very long time. We said we would cut spending, and we cut spending. We said we would ease the tax burden, and with the help of these gentlemen who are with me today, we eased the tax burden. We said we would rebuild our national defenses, and we're rebuilding them. We said we would be firm with totalitarian powers, and we've been firm. We said these things, and we meant them. We made our promises, and we kept them.

Now let me speak for a minute about one of the things I just mentioned. I think all of you here today -- and especially those of you who served in our Armed Forces -- will agree: A President's first duty is protecting the peace by guarding us from foreign attack and ensuring the safety of our country and the future of our children.

In the last 20 years, as Government got into areas where it didn't belong, it failed to meet one of its most important and legitimate responsibilities. An almost complete reversal took place in fiscal priorities. In 1960 we were devoting 49 percent of the budget to national defense, while 28 percent went to social spending. By 1980 that proportion had completely reversed itself, with 52 percent going to social spending and less than 24 percent going to defense spending. I think you all realize the consequences.

Remember those stories in 1980 about our military, about the airplanes that couldn't fly for lack of spare parts, about ships that couldn't leave port, about a rapid deployment force that was neither rapid, deployable, nor much of a force? Well, we've begun to change all that. We've improved our strategic forces, toughened our conventional forces, and -- one thing that's made me particularly happy -- more and more young Americans are proud again to wear their country's uniform. The organized reserves, which had almost disappeared, are getting back to strength, and ROTC in our schools and colleges is again flourishing.

There's something else, too. As we've rebuilt America's military and strategic strength, we've also adopted a foreign policy that speaks openly and candidly about the failures of totalitarianism, that advocates the moral superiority of Western ideals like personal freedom and representative government -- a foreign policy that calls for a global crusade for personal freedom and representative government. It's this combination of strategic strength and rhetorical candor that for the first time in years has taken American foreign policy off the defensive. Most important, it has strengthened the chances for lasting peace by providing a credible basis for important new peace initiatives, especially in the arms control area and in regions like the Middle East. These vital initiatives for peace now have a far better chance of success than they did in that climate of doubt about American leadership that existed only a few years ago.

But our initatives in other areas as well -- our attempts to return prayer to our schools, to get tuition tax credits for the parents of independent school children, to protect the unborn, to help make our streets and homes safe again by tightening up on bail and parole -- these are not just separate initiatives. They're all part of the same consensus -- that see change in American politics, that historical tide that is sweeping America.

For the truth is that Americans must choose between two drastically different points of view. One puts its faith in the pipedreamers and margin-scribblers in Washington; the other believes in the collective wisdom of the people and their commitment to the American dream. One says tax and tax, spend and spend, and the other says have faith in the common sense of the people.

The other side believes the solutions to our nation's problems lie in the psychiatrist's notes or in the social worker's file or in the bureaucrat's budget. We believe in the workingman's toil, the businessman's enterprise, and the clergyman's counsel. The other side speaks of limitations and redistribution. We want growth and opportunity. The other side wants us to lower our expectations. Well, we have a vision of making America great again. The other side speaks of national malaise, a sickness. We offer hope.

That's what the political choices boil down to this election year -- a choice between basic values, between two differing political and social philosophies; between government as master or government as servant; between a vision of America strong and secure and able to stand forthrightly for human freedom, or an America that is weak and confused and reluctant to speak for the downtrodden.

But to get back to the confusion that I mentioned, there are various reasons given by a variety of people as to what's the cause for the present unemployment. Well, in my own view, that cause is one and one only: inflation. And that's why inflation must be the main target, so that we can reduce unemployment.

Auto sales fell off as the interest rate on car payments went up. Layoffs in the auto plants began, and the sickness spread to associate industries such as steel, rubber, glass, et cetera. In housing, there was the same story. We brought inflation down, and interest rates are following. We intend to stay on this course.

Well, this country was born of an ancient dream and then was nourished by a new wisdom. The dream envisioned a place on this Earth where people of all classes and kinds could live together in peace and freedom. The wisdom held that the final resting place of power was in the hands not of the government but of the people.

In the last 20 months in Washington, we've tried to return to these honored ways and reassert the basic values of the American people. Because of that sea change and because we're part of a tide, we can look again to a future filled with hope.

America is on her feet again. The days of national malaise are over, and an era of national renewal is upon us. There's optimism and energy again in this land. And, as your State motto puts it, ``With God's help, all is possible.'' Yes, with His help, and yours -- for all of us, for our children and for this much loved country of ours -- there are great days ahead.

Coming in here, I passed a lot of your fellow Ohioans out there on the street. And some were generously applauding and waving, but there were some who were demonstrating. They were demonstrating in behalf of a movement that has swept across our country that I think is inspired by, not the sincere, honest people who want peace, but by some who want the weakening of America, and so are manipulating many honest and sincere people.

It is the nuclear freeze movement and the peace movement. Well, I, too, want a nuclear freeze after we have been able to negotiate the Soviet Union into a reduction on both sides of all kinds of weapons -- and then have a freeze when we're equal and not freeze them now in a superiority that would bring closer the chance of nuclear war. [Applause] Thank you very much. Thank you.

You know, when I see them I wonder why they haven't realized this, how they haven't realized, for example, that a nuclear freeze would cancel the development of the B - 1 bomber. Why is that important? It's important because that would leave us with a bomber that is older than the men who are flying it, that is obsolete, and that could not possibly offer the deterrent that we need to maintain peace in the world.

So, why are we rebuilding our defenses? Not because we want a war. All of you who wore the uniform, all of us who've been in wars, all of us know the horror of it, and we want to see no more. But we also know that we never got in a war because we were too strong. We got in wars because someone on the other side didn't think we had the will or the strength to defend our freedoms and our country and our rights. They had to learn the hard way.

Nancy that it looked like the only young people there couldn't join anything else. [Laughter] Not any more. All over the country -- and I said in 1980 in the campaign, that was what that campaign was about. It's what this election is about: the America that we're going to turn over to those young people.

Congressman Brown -- Bud -- when he was talking here about returning authority and autonomy to the States, to the local communities and so forth, I wonder how many of us realize that one of the most unique things about America that I believe is more responsible for our freedom than anything else is the fact that in this country we were established to be a federation of sovereign States. We were not set up to have 50 administrative districts of the Federal Government. And that's what we've been in danger of losing.

General Sherman could have imagined, so I think you can understand why I have some mixed feelings about letting go -- Bud Brown, not Sherman. [Laughter] But I'm willing to make the sacrifice. You can have Bud Brown as your Governor as long as you promise me solid Republican congressional delegations from Ohio.

American politics, how everyone these days seems concerned about too many deficits and too much taxation and spending. We've made real progress, but it's a fragile progress because of those left in Congress who still believe in the tax and tax and spend and spend policies that got us into this present situation.

That's why I challenged Tip O'Neill the day I asked he and the liberal leadership of the other party to promise the American people they wouldn't try to repeal the reforms that we've passed in the last 2 years -- those in regulations, in spending, and the tax program -- the tax cuts. And, you know, they've never answered the question yet. They just finessed that and went on to something else.

The question you should ask of those who solicit your vote is where they stand on the issues of taxing and spending. Will they promise not to try and repeal the income tax cuts that we won for the American people and the historic reform and income tax indexing?

Many people don't quite understand at first what that indexing provision means. It might be the biggest part of all the tax cuts -- unless we win the battle on inflation, and then it won't matter that much. But for years the Federal Government has been making a profit on inflation, because in our graduated income tax, people who got a cost-of-living raise didn't improve them one bit -- just let them -- kept even with inflation. But it moved them into a higher tax bracket, and that's why for years real personal income in America has been going down. And for the last several months, it's been going up.

Will they support further reductions in government spending -- more authority and autonomy, as we've mentioned, for States and local governments? In Ohio this year, you can make a real difference in government, because there are two classic confrontations between the past and the future; between candidates who reject the policies of tax and tax, spend and spend -- as these candidates here do -- and the candidates who endorse them; between candidates who stand for growth and opportunity and candidates who want more government and more spending.

Right now, Paul Pfeifer is waging a strong challenge against one of the Senate's most blatant big spenders. The incumbent represents a political point of view that is out of step with the people of Ohio. Mistaking the incumbent Senator's voting record for the views of the people of Ohio is like mistaking Woody Hayes for Woody Allen. [Laughter] It's time you had a Senator who represented the commonsense, conservative voters of Ohio and not the liberal big spenders in Washington.

I need Paul Pfeifer in the Senate as well as John Kasich in the House of Representatives. And I can give you a single, good reason why he should be Congressman Kasich, because I just learned that his opponent is on record already as wanting to cancel the B - 1 bomber. This is a part of the whole movement that has seen some demonstrators out on the streets wherever we go today. It doesn't mean that they're for peace and we're for war. It means that they've been manipulated by some people who know what they're doing exactly. They're sincere, I think -- millions of them -- very sincere and honest in their desire for peace as we all are.

But today we have three delegations in Europe negotiating with three Soviet delegations -- one with regard to the medium-range nuclear missiles in Europe, one with regard to the strategic nuclear missiles that threaten us particularly in the world, and one that is trying to reduce the armaments, the conventional arms and weapons. And why are we so intent on this military or this defense buildup which had been allowed to -- our defenses to deteriorate so? It's because they need back of them on their side of the table -- they need the fellows on the other side of the table to have the knowledge that unless they join us in reducing those terrible weapons and the threat of war, they're going to have to face a United States that will do whatever is necessary to ensure our safety and the peace of the world. They need a deterrence.

You know, Bud is a bright and a hard worker. He's a man of tested judgment and experience and character. The country needs him, and you in Ohio can help the country out. But I want to say, also, that he's been an invaluable ally in the fight against big government in Washington. As a matter of fact, he started in committee in '78 and '79, working within the committee in which he served, to bring about the kind of economic reform that we now have started to install, beginning last year in 1981 -- that time up against a total Democratic majority in both Houses and a Democratic administration, they couldn't get it passed. But now the people have spoken, and it's in effect. He's won the respect, as I say, of virtually everyone who's dealt with him there.

In this campaign, he and his runningmate, Jim Betts, have one agenda -- bringing jobs and economic opportunity back to Ohio. And I know that from my own conversations with him. He'll make a great Governor. They'll make a great Governor and a great lieutenant governor, and I thank you for supporting them. And I know they'll go all the way, and I know the importance because of that federalism that he spoke about -- that trying to get more authority back here, how much we need someone at this end ready to receive the resources and the programs that should properly be administered here at the State level.

When he spoke of regulations -- I used to use a city in your State as an example of what regulations were doing long before I ever got the job, and that was a hospital that was built in part with Federal funds. And because it was built in part with Federal funds, the Federal Government reserved the right to regulate. So, one day in came an inspector from OSHA [Occupational Safety and Health Administration] and said that the plastic bags that were put -- or that they must put plastic bags in the wastebaskets so that employees would not be endangered in handling the waste or contaminated in handling the waste. So, they put them in and no sooner had them in than another Washington inspector arrived.

I'm grateful to be here with these wonderful candidates and with all of you. All across the country wherever I've gone, I've seen -- we have presented this country this time around the finest candidates I think any party has ever fielded in this country. They deserve the people's support. I know all of you'll do your darndest in the crucial days between now and November.

And I realize this is taking a great chance. We are in a deep recession. I believe that the course that we're on, which is aimed at reducing inflation -- and which, as he said, we have it down. As a matter of fact, for the first 8 months of this year it has averaged 5.1 percent. And last month it was down at a rate that if that continues it'll be down to around 3 percent.

Now, that inflation rate, which was double digit, 12.4 when we started, is what has kept the interest rates high. Lenders have to get back the lost value of their money while it is out on loan in addition to a return. And it is the high interest rates in what they did to the automobile industry and what they did to the housing industry that has caused the great increase in unemployment.

I had to laugh the other day when Jim Wright, the majority leader in the House, went on television and said, well, after they had voted down the balanced budget amendment -- and don't ever let them forget that they voted against a constitutional amendment to keep the Federal Government balanced. Forty States have it. This is a necessity if we're going to get control of spending. But he had the chutzpah to go on television and say, well, I'm a fine one to ask for such an amendment when I'm presiding over the biggest deficit in history. Yes. But how'd those deficits come about?

I didn't invent them. Every time you add one percentage point to inflation you add $25 billion to the deficit in lost revenue and outgoing benefits to the unemployed. And so it's gone up 2 or 3 percent since we've been there -- no, a couple of percent since we've been there. Well, that's another $50 billion added to the deficit.

The President. And, yes, you asked about small business. That, in particular -- our tax program -- we knew definitely in aiming the tax cuts at individuals that the bulk of small business does not pay corporate tax; they pay personal income tax. We also were thinking of small business with regard to the inheritance tax. So many family businesses and family farms have to go out of business to pay the inheritance tax if death comes. Well, in the first place now, a spouse doesn't have to pay an inheritance tax -- a widow or a widower -- and we have reduced the tax by increasing sizably the exemption from that. And there are further reductions coming in the near future; it's in installments.

There are so many things -- and it's so easy for someone my age to start pontificating to young people when they open themselves up with a question like that. But, of course, you get all the training that you can. And then, I think, make up your mind, if it's in regard to a career, where you think that you would be happiest and be able to contribute the most and receive the most personal reward, I mean, in fulfillment in that job. And then I'll give you the best advice that I was ever given.

When a man back in the depression days of 1932 -- and I was a college graduate then and back at my old college job of lifeguarding for the summer, knowing I'd have to face the fall and get out into the world. And in 1932, there weren't any jobs anyplace. And there was a man who had fared well in the depression and was able to tell me that if I could tell him what I wanted to do, what line of work, if he had any connections there, he would speak for me and see if I couldn't get an opportunity in there.

And the only thing I really remember about that broadcast was -- I naturally picked a game from the previous season that I'd played in, and I was the running guard who had to come out and led the interference on a certain off-tackle play. And with 2 minutes to go, trailing by 1 point, we went 65 yards off-tackle for the touchdown, and I missed the key man in the secondary that I was supposed to block. And I've never known how we made the touchdown with me missing the block. But on the rebroadcast -- first instant replay -- I threw a block like you've never seen.

The President. I have said that that's something that the people tell you, whether you should or not. And I appreciate your reaction just now. If it's the same in '84, well, I'll certainly take that into consideration.

Dr. Bledsoe previously served as a manager and executive with the System Development Corp., a faculty member and program director with the University of Southern California School of Public Administration, a professor of Federal management at the Federal Executive Institute, and a member of the Federal Government's Senior Executive Service. Dr. Bledsoe also served in the United States Air Force.

The Cabinet Council on Management and Administration will formulate governmentwide policies pertaining to executive branch management, administrative, and personnel issues, and will exercise control and supervision over the Reform 88 task force, a long-term program to improve the management and administrative systems of the Federal Government and monitor implementation of the recommendations of the President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control.

When we consider the millions of young people who are transported and the millions of trips schoolbuses make each year, we can take great pride in our safety record. Nevertheless, we must reaffirm our commitment to providing the safest possible transportation for our children. They are our most important resource, and their safe transport is and deserves to be one of our highest priorities.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Robert H. Goddard, born one hundred years ago, is the father of the Space Age. Due to his pioneering vision of space travel and his tireless research efforts in developing the world's first liquid-fuel rocket, the United States has achieved a preeminent position in space. Dr. Goddard was a trailblazer to the stars.

Dr. Goddard was born on October 5, 1882, in Worcester, Massachusetts. He was a student and later a member of the faculty at Clark University for 29 years. The Smithsonian Institution first gave him a small grant to assist his research, and the Guggenheim family and Foundation subsequently became his strong financial backers. Dr. Goddard was the first to explore the practicality of using rocket power to reach high altitudes.

During his lifetime, Dr. Goddard was often ignored or ridiculed for his imagination, including the concept of a rocket going to the moon. Yet he was not deterred. And today, he is universally recognized as the world's foremost pioneer in space rocketry and in predicting man's role in space.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th. day of Oct, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

From the first, the United States has supported the principle that a strong nation requires a strong agricultural foundation. Out of our westward pioneer movement emerged a sound system of agriculture firmly based on the concepts of private enterprise and the primacy of the independent family farm. The result has been a food production system well able to feed our own population while meeting the needs of others throughout the world.

Not all nations are blessed with America's agricultural endowments, nor have many nations adopted the incentives that are critical to fueling such a successful agriculture. The Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations estimates that as many as 400 to 500 million people suffer from poverty-induced malnutrition, particularly in the Third World.

The people of the United States have long been committed to sharing this country's agricultural bounty and technology with other nations in times of need. We have provided more than $30 billion in food aid, plus an additional $10 billion for shipping costs, since the ``Food-for-Peace'' program was initiated 28 years ago. We have also made available thousands of agricultural experts, a diversity of training programs, and benefits of our intensive agricultural research. The United States is also doing its part to improve world food security by maintaining high levels of production and reserve stocks and by making agricultural products available in the world market so that other countries can meet their food requirements.

Let us continue our mutual efforts to define the causes of world food problems and vigorously pursue their solutions. Toward that end, the Congress of the United States has again responded with a Joint Resolution designating October 16, 1982, as World Food Day.

But, as we know, there are other nations where the free flow of news is thwarted by governments fearful of letting people know the truth. In those countries, where censorship is a means of containing thought and action, newspapers are controlled by the government, and it follows that all human freedoms are limited.

During National Newspaper Week, I join with my fellow Americans in celebrating our free press and in paying tribute to the responsible men and women of the newspaper industry whose dedication and commitment to independent and truthful news reporting and analysis are the foundation of our continued progress as a nation.

It's great to see all of you here. Before I forget, I want to remind you to keep a spot open on your calendars right after the November election. I'd like to have the pleasure of welcoming back the new superstars of 1982.

But I want to thank you, too, for everything you're doing to support our party and those values so crucial to a strong and a successful country. Hard work, personal initiative, opportunity, love of family, neighborhood, patriotism, and belief in God -- those were the values that we pledged to defend and restore in 1980, and they're every bit as important today.

Now, I know that there are some whom I've referred to as ``Rip Van Winkles,'' who seem to have forgotten that America even existed before 1981. They subscribe to the Big Bang theory -- a whole universe suddenly came into being through a great explosion. The only difference is, in their version the Big Bang was on January 20th, 1981. And according to them, our economic crisis emerged full-blown by spontaneous generation just a few seconds after I took the oath of office. [Laughter] Up until then, we didn't have any troubles at all.

With all due respect, you and I have three very important truths to tell this election year. The first one is, the problems of overspending, big taxing, and runaway bureaucracy that have sapped our economic strength did not begin 20 months ago. They'd been building for 20 years, leading us to higher and higher levels of inflation and unemployment. And it was in the 4 years before we took office that those problems became so acute, they nearly brought America down.

When I speak out, I'm not attacking any one party or administration. As a matter of fact, for a good share of my life I was a Democrat. I was elected this time as a Republican, but with Republican and Democratic votes. And our programs couldn't pass in the Congress without support from responsible Democrats. But I do make one key distinction that's not always picked up. I'll say it very clearly now, again; some place maybe, they'll get it right.

It seems that a gulf has developed between the leaders of the Democratic Party and millions of the rank-and-file Democrats who do not share the big-government-is-best philosophy of that leadership. And I just wish everyone in Washington could understand what millions of Republicans and Democrats at the grassroots learned a long time ago: You can't drink yourself sober; you can't spend yourself rich; and you can't prime the pump without pumping the prime.

Then we took a giant step backward. Spending like there was no tomorrow, opening the floodgates of printing-press money, government pushed inflation all the way back up to 18 percent in January of 1980. 1979 and 1980 witnessed back-to-back years of double-digit price increases, the first time that had happened in over 60 years. We saw the national debt climbing to $1 trillion. Interest rates soared to an unbelievable level -- 21\1/2\ percent was the prime. That was the highest peak in more than a century. And for the first time in our history, productivity dropped -- 2 years in a row. The savings rate plunged, the rate of increase in industrial production dropped every year, and the rate of increase in the gross national product dropped 3 years in a row.

Taxes on the people actually doubled in the 5 years before we came to Washington. People were hit with the single highest peacetime tax increase in the history of the Republic. That was passed in 1977. The government sat back while inflation kicked taxpayers relentlessly into higher tax brackets.

The bottom line was an unacceptable decline in the real wages, earnings, and buying power of the working families and senior citizens of America -- the very people that our critics profess to care so much about. With government growing like toadstools after a rainstorm, spinning out of control like a washing machine out of cycle, it was Washington that grew fat and prosperous by making everyone else poorer. Federal spending increased by 17 percent in 1980 alone.

And maybe I'm glad that you brought this up -- [laughter] -- because another large chunk of that tax increase had to do with Christmas tree ornaments that were hung on our tax program by opponents in Congress, who then saw a chance to get a little gravy for their own district or whatever faction they wanted to support. And in order to get the tax cut that we wanted, we had to take those Christmas tree ornaments, and a lot of those are what we cut.

Relations and Trilateral Commission. You now have 83 of those. Don Regan has Merrill Lynch setting up real estate offices throughout the country. You have Citibank merging with savings and loans. You have Armand Hammer taking over Citicorp. You have a small, elite, rich -- the Council on Foreign Relations and the Trilateral Commission that totally runs your organizations and your -- [inaudible].

The President. Look, in spite of the tax increase that we had to accept, we still have the largest tax cut in history -- $335 billion over the next 3 years, at the same time of the tax increase that was put into effect.

Now, you've touched a nerve with the crack on Taiwan, and I know where you get that kind of stuff. There has been no reversal on our Taiwan policy. And our Taiwan friends are going to continue to get everything they need for their own self-defense at the same time that we're going to sincerely and honestly do our best to improve the relations with the People's Republic of China on the mainland. But they know, and, as a matter of fact, they know that they made concessions, because we told them the law of this land is the Taiwan Relations Act, and we're going to carry out that law.

And if the People's Republic keeps their word that they, for the first time, said that they would try to resolve their differences peacefully and arrive at a peaceful reunification, yes, then there would be no longer any need for us to provide defense weapons, and there would be a decline and an end at that time, but only linked to that promise of a peaceful reunification. Without that, and until that, we are going to continue to meet our responsibilities to our friends and allies on Taiwan.

That has been badly distorted I regret to say, in even a publication that professes to be on our side. But that is the truth of the matter about Taiwan. [Applause] Thank you. [Applause] Thank you. [Applause] Thank you very much.

But let me make one thing plain in this election year: There's no morality in the misery caused by the failed policies that I've been talking about, of our opponents. Inflation is the greatest enemy of all the people and of our hopes for economic growth. It is at the bottom of the problems that we're trying to solve. Those who helped tax and spend this nation to the brink of bankruptcy should be the last ones delivering lectures on the most fair, effective way to end the crisis.

Who can remember any other time in this country when we faced double-digit inflation, a trillion-dollar debt, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, and the highest peacetime tax burden in our history, all at the same time? Yet, that's exactly the situation that we inherited 20 months ago.

And just think of it, because of that trillion-dollar debt, as some of you who have been dealing with the problem know, the government must now spend $110 billion this year just to cover the interest. There's great talk about $100-billion deficits. Well, there wouldn't be any deficits if there wasn't a trillion-dollar debt.

Today, nearly 11 million people are out of work, and I share their frustration. Every American should be shocked at the economic chaos which created today's needless results. It's agonizing to me that there isn't a quicker, easier cure for this terrible economic illness that was so long in the making.

The same neglected problems that were dragging us down into the recession in 1980 are being confronted today and paving the way for recovery. You know, the great Western leader, Winston Churchill, once said that ``When a train is running on the wrong track downhill, you can't try to stop it by building a brick wall across the track. You have to slow it down, then go in reverse back to the junction so you can switch it over to the right track.'' And that's what we're doing.

Our first urgent priority was to beat down double-digit inflation. Until people are convinced inflation is coming down and will stay down, they'll demand higher and higher rates of interest to keep the dollars that they lend from losing value while they're out on loan.

It was the expectation that double-digit inflation was here to stay that caused the interest rates to zoom up to 21\1/2\ percent. And that's what made it impossible for families to get home mortgages, for consumers to carry auto loans, for firms to modernize machines to keep product prices competitive. It was double-digit inflation and high interest rates that crippled the economy's ability to provide jobs, even as they squeezed the earnings and buying power of more and more families, forcing them to seek a second income in the job market.

But we seem to be the only ones that are really on track in government today. When I say ``we,'' I mean the Republicans in the Congress, in both Houses, and ourselves, plus some responsible Democrats who are not following the leadership of their party. We seem to be the only ones that are trying to solve not just the 2.4 percent that's come along in the last 20 months but the whole 9.8 percent, until we get everyone who wants a job back working.

Our program's been on the books now for just a year, and already that inflation rate which averaged 12.4 percent in '80, 1980 -- which the experts said would double -- remain, I should say, in double digits for the next decade -- has been beaten down to where for the first 8 months of this year, it's averaged 5.1 percent, and for the ninth month of this year it was down to what on an annual basis would be a 3.3 percent rate. And I've got news for those experts. We're going to do better. We've reduced inflation by 59 percent since 1980. Interest rates are down 40 percent from their highs. That's still not enough, but we're headed in the right direction, and we'll make progress.

This progress against inflation and the first real tax cut for everyone in nearly 20 years has led to more savings, higher real earnings, and more purchasing power for families. Their paychecks buy more. We hear so much breast-beating about fairness and compassion, particularly from the other side of the aisle. But let me give you a statistic that shows we're providing the kind of compassion that never existed under the policies of the past. A family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 is about $1,500 better off today than if inflation and taxes had continued at the 1980 rates. Let me repeat that, because it's an important number. A family of four, $20,000, has had the equivalent of a $1,500-raise because of what we've done about taxes and inflation. The family at a poverty level, where they don't pay taxes, their income is more than $500 better off simply because of the decrease in inflation.

Now, I'm proud that we've made the decisions to curb runaway spending, and I'm proud that we went to bat for taxpayers when others before us refused. Incidentally, I was astonished to see a poll the other day that found the American people -- we haven't done a good enough job in talking -- the American people believe that the Democrats are better at cutting taxes than we are.

We believe the money people earn belongs to them, not to government, and it's about time they were allowed to keep a bigger share, and they will. A 25-percent tax-cut rate; indexing of tax brackets to end bracket creep; a reduction of the marriage penalty; an increase in the child care credit -- the working mothers; our new incentives for retirement savings; and raising the estate tax exemption to $600,000 for farmers and family businesses who very often were put out of business -- the surviving family, in the event of death, put out of business by the estate tax; and of even greater help, no estate tax for a surviving spouse -- all of this have we brought about.

We have a comprehensive plan and it's working. It's bringing inflation and interest rates down. It's increasing purchasing power, and it's promoting new savings. It's beginning to do all the things needed to move the economy from recession to recovery and, yes, it does require patience. Just saying you've got a lower tax rate -- and it's just beginning -- does not bring the effect instantly that you're going to have. But as that continues, the added money then going into savings to add to the investment capital pool and going into improved spending -- those are the things that are going to aid our economic recovery.

Tragically, unemployment is always one of the last to turn around. That money has to be felt; that increased spending that has to result then in more orders, increased productivity, resulting in the call-back of the people that had been laid off. And until all of that happens, we're going to provide assistance for extended unemployment benefits. And soon, I'll sign legislation for a program that's intended to train up to a million unemployed people or more, per year, for permanent, real, private sector jobs.

We still have a long way to go. The House leadership left without taking action on tuition tax credits, enterprise zones, or legislation designed to crack down on crime and make our streets safe. The House leadership left to campaign without passing appropriations bills that hold the line on spending. They stonewalled for months and then voted down a constitutional amendment to balance the Federal budget. Those who voted against that balanced budget amendment voted to weaken the financial security of every American family. What people want and certainly deserve is less political delay and demagoguery and more action to reduce the burden of that terrible trillion-dollar debt on their children and grandchildren.

And that's why you have a third truth to tell in the months ahead. The choice of American voters this year is just as important as the one they had 2 years ago. It's a clear choice about the kind of nation we'll be -- whether we'll stick to our sure and steady course to put America back on track, or whether we'll slide backward into another economic binge.

Let our message be clear: We are asking the American people to stand with us, steady and unwavering. We can turn the hopes of our people into the renewal of all the dreams and opportunities that our nation was placed on this Earth to provide.

You know, I've seen a good deal of speculation lately about our prospects this November. Some people seem too optimistic, and some seen too discouraged. Well frankly, I've never put much faith in all this pre-election quarterbacking. At this point in the 1980 campaign a number of Republican challenges were written off by the experts. I was, as a matter of fact, pretty close to that myself. [Laughter] And eight of those same challengers are now voting week in, week out, in the United States Senate.

And let me tell you one other thing I know for sure. We go into this final stretch of the campaign season with four great assets: good candidates, good organization, good funds and, unlike our opponents, we keep even with an historic tradition that is typical of the Republican Party -- those funds come from a broad base of small givers across the Nation, contrary to the misconception that is so widely voiced about us. We're not the party of the fat cats. For more than 25 years, we have topped the other party in the number and the amount that we get from small contributors.

I believe with all my heart that today America is stronger than it was 2 years ago -- stronger economically, militarily and, yes, even morally. We can stand tall and proud on our record and on the hopes that we offer for the future.

So, let's go out there in this last few weeks of this campaign with optimism and determination. We know that tradition runs against us. For half a century, the party that holds the White House has lost ground in the Congress in off-year elections. I had a bad moment here today when I thought I was losing ground -- [laughter]. But we also know that our party, as a party, our numbers are smaller than those of the opposition. But as Dwight Eisenhower once told us some years ago, what counts is not necessarily the size of the dog in the fight; it's the size of the fight in the dog.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Douglas A. Fenderson to be Director of the National Institute of Handicapped Research, Department of Education. He would succeed Margaret Joan Giannini.

Herbert Northrup, who will serve as Chairman. He is serving as professor of industry and director of industrial research, and chairman of the Labor Relations Council at the University of Pennsylvania (Wharton School), Philadelphia. He resides in Haverford, Pa.

While I am pleased to join Congress in support of the worthy endeavors of these agencies, I am concerned to note that S. 2271 stipulates minimum funding levels for four of the National Bureau of Standards' seven activities. These minimums constitute $17.2 million or approximately 15 percent of the total $117.9 million authorized for appropriation for them. Of the $17.2 million, $7.9 million is earmarked in excess of that requested for metals processing, computer science and technology, and robotics research and development. The minimum funding levels specified in these cases divert funds from what the administration considers high priority programs to programs that should more appropriately be conducted by the private sector.

Specification of minimum funding levels in authorization and appropriation legislation diminishes and restricts the Executive's ability to respond to new developments, particularly in the area of science where discoveries cannot be predicted and may require changes in the direction of research and development.

Therefore, while I am signing S. 2271, I urge Congress to abandon the practice of specifying minimum funding levels in the future. They can be harmful to the Nation as the administration strives to reduce Federal spending and to react effectively to new situations and conditions.

Well, you know, there are times when I think some of our critics and our opponents must have been hit by something -- meteors or something else. They've developed a very interesting case of amnesia. They can't remember a thing that was bad about the economy prior to my taking the oath of office. [Laughter] They make you think that everything economically that's bad started on January 21st, 1981. They don't remember that in the 4 years before we got to Washington, the entire Government of the United States was in their hands.

They controlled the Presidency, the United States Senate, the House of Representatives, and all the committees of Congress, the executive branch, the hundreds of departments and agencies responsible for running the Federal establishment. They had the whole enchilada. They controlled everything except inflation, interest rates, taxes, and an economy that was on a toboggan slide.

But now let me point out that I spent most of my life as a Democrat. And I know others at this rally have been or still are Democrats, and they have every reason to be proud of their party's many fine traditions. The problems we face today are bigger than any single political party, and solving them will require the best efforts of all our people.

But in saying that, let me point out something else. I think it's important to note that there is a great gulf today between millions of patriotic Democrats and the leadership of their party. I don't fault the intentions of that leadership these past years. I know they meant well. They claim compassion and deny that we feel any. But their compassion stopped short of the average American, the men and women who hold our country together and who were being taxed into poverty to support an ever-growing bureaucracy that wasn't helping solve anything. Indeed, it was not government that should solve the problems; it was government that was the problem.

Families, both Democrat and Republican were driven in the evening to sit around the kitchen table in too many American homes to try and figure out how to cope with inflation and what they were going to do next. And while the average family was being pinched, it was fat city for the Federal Government. In the year before I took office, that single year, Federal spending increased by 17 percent. How many of our fellow citizens were able to say that their incomes or their pensions or their savings had gone up by 14 [17 - White House correction] percent. They hadn't. As a matter of fact, for those few years, the standard of living in this country was actually going down even though people were getting cost-of-living pay raises because those cost-of-living pay raises were moving them up into higher income tax brackets.

Right now we're all paying the penalty of those tragic excesses of the past. Unfortunately, many are paying with their jobs. Nearly 11 million people are out of work. And, you know, the worst of it is, it didn't have to be this way. If only the big spenders in Congress had shown some restraint.

That's why the balanced budget is so important. The United States Congress breathes on a respirator that's pumping money, money, money. And the best way to pull the plug on its big spending ways is a balanced budget amendment to our Constitution.

Congress voted for the amendment, the House Democratic leadership still prefers the failures of the past to the steps that we must take to build a better future. And that's what this election is all about.

Tomorrow the new unemployment rate comes out. And a great many people are anticipating -- and very possibly it will show -- another increase. But I have some questions for those who'll be all over our television screens lambasting this administration if it does. Where were they when the economy started going haywire? What are they offering now, except their failed policies of the past -- spend and spend, tax and tax, and, if that isn't enough, borrow and borrow. Let me ask one final question of them: When will they open their eyes to the onrushing surge of confidence now occurring in this country's financial markets?

United States this morning lowered their prime lending rate to 13 percent. Now, that's a far cry from the 16\1/2\-percent rate that prevailed just this last summer and the 21\1/2\ percent that was in effect just before we took office. And as interest rates have tumbled, investment has been flowing into our equity and our bond markets. In the past 2 months alone, the Dow Jones Industrial Average has jumped more than 20 percent. And yesterday, it had the second biggest increase in the market in history.

Those investors who have the responsibility of investing billions of dollars, including the pension funds of American workers, don't make their decisions lightly. Are they sending us a signal? Do they believe that the American economy is turning a corner, maybe? Do they believe we mean business in our battle against inflation? Are they ready to give this economy a strong vote of confidence?

It's an unfortunate fact of life, however, that one of the last symptoms of recession to yield to a recovery is unemployment. But in the meantime, there are important steps we've taken to reduce that hardship. We've extended unemployment benefits in those hard-hit areas to those who have exhausted their time. And I will soon be signing -- that's recently been passed -- a job training bill, a measure that will provide training for over a million Americans a year.

Now, this is important. If you take on a Sunday and open to the help-wanted ads in a metropolitan paper, and discover that even with 11 million people, almost, unemployed in this country, you will find 65 or 70 pages of help-wanted ads asking for workers to come. Why aren't they filled? Because that the people who don't have the skills that those jobs require. And we're going to try to give them to them.

In past training bills -- there's a difference between the one that I'm going to sign and those past ones. In the past bills, only 20 cents out of the dollar went to actual training. The rest could be considered administrative overhead. Well, in our bill 70 cents out of every dollar is going to the actual training.

And tomorrow I will sign the Export Trading Company Act, which will encourage the formation of trading companies to spur exports. And the best thing about this measure is that it assists U.S. businesses in developing exports and thus creates hundreds of thousands of jobs at virtually no cost to the taxpayer.

You don't know how much I wish there were some quick, easy cure for this terrible economic mess that was so long in the making. But it does seem to me that the people who created the mess are hardly justified now in claiming that having created it, they're the best qualified to try and clean it up.

From our very first day, we've been working to undo the economic wreckage they left behind. As a matter of fact, when I finished taking the oath of office on that inaugural day, the first thing I did was go back into the Capitol, and before I'd even taken my topcoat off, I signed an Executive order [memorandum] freezing the size of the Federal Government, that it could not grow from that day forward. To get control of the spending, to encourage incentives by lowering taxes, to root out waste and fraud, to stop unwise regulations, and start America on the road to expansion and growth once again -- that's what we've been trying to do since that January day.

General who have been making thousands -- tens of thousands of audits. There have been thousands of indictments. There have been hundreds of convictions already for such things as a government agency spending some $300 for an item that they could get for about $30 in their local stores. Other things of -- thousands of people that were still receiving checks from the Government; they'd been dead for an average of 7 years.

January it's averaged 6.1 percent, and last month it went down at an annualized rate of 3.3 percent. An average family of four with an income of $15,000 is about $1,000 better off in purchasing power than it would have been if inflation had stayed where it was 20 months ago.

Unnecessary regulations have been reduced. The American people have been sending about 10 billion pieces of paper to Washington a year. We so far have reduced the amount of paper by about 200 million man-hours of work in filling out that paper. Your tax rates when the final installment goes in next July will have been cut for the first time in 20 years. Step by step, our program is working.

I believe deeply that we can put our current economic difficulties behind us if we have the strength to stick to our course. But until there's a job for every American who wants to work, and as long as plants and machinery lay idle, we can't let up in our efforts.

We Americans have been tested by these past few years of discouragement. But we've never been quitters, and we're not going to quit now. I hear all those voices every day saying that we can't succeed. Well, if we only put our heart and courage to the test, I say we can't fail.

To those who are faint hearted and unsure, I have but one message: If you're afraid of the future, then get out of the way; stand aside. The people of this country are going to move forward with people like Governor List, Barbara Vucanovich and Chic Hecht and Peggy Cavnar down south.

Nevada represents the true spirit of America. And I'm honored to be with you today and to share in that spirit. And I have to tell you your hospitality has lifted my own spirits as high as those beautiful soaring Sierras that we can see out here every day.

I just have one last remark to make. You know, there've been great charges about who has compassion, as I mentioned earlier, and who doesn't. And, of course, we're supposed to be hard-hearted, and we're supposed to be balancing inflation by doing all sorts of cruel things.

Now, I know that, as I said earlier, that the party before us was well-intentioned with all of their social reforms and their attempts to help people. But when you're going to help people, you really should know what you're doing. And their efforts at helping people, that brought us a trillion-dollar debt and brought us the inflation and made people poorer, not better off, reminded me of the young fellow one day that was riding a motorcycle.

So, we're going to try to keep everybody warm. And we're not going to try to turn their heads around straight. We're going to try to help them in the regular and old-fashioned American way, which is: direct the help in such a way as to make people self-sufficient and independent and no longer dependent on bureaucrats for a handout.

Rancho San Raphael in Reno. He then traveled to Las Vegas, Nev., where he attended a fundraising reception for senatorial candidate Chic Hecht and congressional candidate Peggy Cavnar at the residence of entertainer Wayne Newton.

These ships and the goods they deliver have traveled great journeys, often, as we know, through stormy seas, to bring commerce, jobs, and well-being to our country and our people. Today in America all of us are participating in a similar journey that began 21 months ago. When we took charge of our Ship of State it was in dangerous disrepair, struggling through quite a raging economic storm. We faced double-digit inflation, high unemployment, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, a trillion-dollar debt, and the highest peacetime tax burden in our history, all at the same time. We knew we couldn't solve in 20 months economic problems that had been building up over the decades, but we remain a hundred percent committed to a healthy, expanding economy for all.

And let me tell you something. No matter what the doomcriers say, we're much closer to that goal today than we were. One by one, we have faced up to the problems created by mistakes of the past -- problems which threatened all our hopes and dreams for the future. Runaway spending has been brought under control; double-digit inflation, the single greatest enemy of jobs, growth, and stability, has been defeated -- for the first 8 months of this year, down from 12.4 [percent] to 5.1 and last month, on an annualized basis, it was running at 3.3. The cruel, punishing tax burden has been reduced for every American taxpayer, and interest rates have dropped sharply. And yesterday morning, a long list of major banks in the country announced that they'd dropped it another half point down to 13 percent, from that original 21\1/2\ that we'd known.

Now, these fundamental reforms had to be made, and they must and will be continued. But we still have one major hurdle ahead. The toughest, most urgent priority that we now face is to create more jobs. We must not be satisfied until every single American who wants a job has a job.

This morning we received the bad news, of course, that the 9.8-percent unemployment rate in our country had gone to 10.1 percent. What we must guard against are those who will make, or try to make, a political football out of this cruel fate for so many of our people and this bad news. It is an election year. Already some would -- in this political footballing -- would try to load the entire blame for the 11 -- for the 10.1, I should say, let's not make it worse than it is -- 10.1 on the backs of our administration.

But to make it really fair, I'll tell you this. I guarantee you we're going to accept responsibility in this administration for finding jobs for all of the 10.1. Our progress in reducing inflation is a major step toward achieving that goal, and another is to start increasing American exports and stop exporting American jobs. And that's what we're here to do today.

One out of eight jobs in manufacturing, one out of every three jobs in agriculture relate directly to exports. So, I've come to ask your support in a new challenge for American exports. I believe that what we've done is good. I know what we can do is even better.

The legislation that we're signing today, the Export Trading Company Act, will provide thousands of small- and medium-sized businesses new opportunities in foreign trade. It can create several hundred thousand jobs at a minimum expense.

With aggressive steps to open up the overseas markets to American goods, with determination to ensure our business community a fair shake with their competitors, and with an all-out commitment by American business and business leaders to seize the new opportunities in this legislation, we can improve the well-being of all Americans.

This bill removes impediments to trade and permits companies to sell American products overseas more efficiently and effectively. It simplifies access to financing for small- and medium-sized export companies, and it encourages new involvement in exports by the American banking community.

We believe the bill could increase our exports by up to $11 billion in the next 1 to 3 years. This bill has been a high priority for our administration. The previous administration had tried to get the bill passed but failed to make it through the Legislature. We're deeply indebted to Senators John Heinz and Jack Danforth and many other Members of the House and Senate for their help and leadership in this legislation.

Let me just add that by increasing exports and trade, those of you working at the ports and on the ships will see more jobs created. Jesse Calhoon, this is just one more way we hope to continue being of help to you and your membership. And I thank you for your kind words.

In the last century, Yankee clippers carried American products abroad, returned with exports from distant lands. Americans still have the know-how and the vitality to sail the oceans in pursuit of trade. We're encouraging them to do just that.

Along with the job training act that I'll sign next week, this bill marks a departure from previous, expensive, make-work job programs. Those were programs that were a kind of quick fix in all the seven recessions that we've had since World War II, up to this one. They benefited politicians, but they didn't provide the real, lasting, private sector jobs that unemployed Americans need. We're not going to start down that inflationary, dead-end route; we must go forward with new, efficient, and lasting efforts to expand employment and create genuine opportunities.

We're witnessing a solid vote of confidence in America's economy and her future. The strength of our currrency -- now the strongest in the world. I can remember when you kind of had to think twice about spending dollars abroad, because they didn't buy as much. But the surge of investment in our bond and equity markets are telling us something very important. America's economy is ready to lead the world out of recession and into recovery. And we must remember that this recession is not ours alone; it is worldwide. And we are in and have been in the longest period of sustained worldwide inflation in the history of mankind. And I think our country is taking the lead in reducing that, and we can export that also -- that reduction in inflation.

Our job isn't over, and it won't be easy. But with patience, resolve, and faith, we can and we will make this great land all that we've ever dreamed she can be. And now, I'm going to stop talking and start writing and sign this bill.

The President. Buenos tardes and welcome. I'm aware, Mr. President, that today instead of welcoming you, I should be saying welcome back. My country is most honored that the Mexican people have selected as their new President a man who studied for a time at one of our universities. And this should be no surprise to any of us. The citizens of our two countries are inextricably linked. In commerce and in culture, we're both proud and independent; yet, at the same time, each of our societies is enriched and strengthened by its relationship with the other.

Here in the Southwest, and especially California, we're keenly aware of our debt to Mexico -- the fountainhead of so much of our heritage. It's fitting that we began our day by placing a wreath at the statue of Benito Juarez -- a man who also visited the United States before emerging as a great Mexican leader. Juarez, a contemporary of Lincoln, a man acclaimed in the highest levels of our diplomatic community, once said that respect for the rights of others, between individuals as between nations, is the basis of peace.

Juarez led your country in a period of great uncertainty. Both Mexico and the United States were engulfed in civil strife. And today, again, both of our people suffer -- this time from serious economic problems, a malady which is worldwide in scope.

You and your country, Mr. President-elect, as we in the United States, are dedicated to restoring health to a troubled economy. Each nation must confront the crisis in its own way. But as your friend we stand ready to work with you, recognizing that in times such as these friendships are put to the test.

Let there be no doubt that our affection will not only withstand these difficulties but triumph over them. Indeed, out of economic adversity may spring new incentives to expand the vast economic potential that exists on this proud continent.

Our meetings today continue a tradition which began in the first decade of this century. My meetings as President-elect with the incumbent President of Mexico opened lines of communication and established a personal relationship that proved indispensable. And after getting acquainted today, I am certain that the same cordiality and trust that have played such a significant role in Mexican-American cooperation during these last 21 months will continue and, hopefully, expand.

Mr. President-elect, I know of your admiration for Jose Maria Morales, a leader in your country's fight for independence and a man who championed constitutional government. We must never forget that the United States and Mexico represent more than friendly neighbors -- something to be proud of in itself -- but also two peoples who are dedicated to certain ideals of freedom, found in only a few countries.

Western Hemisphere nations. Your generous contributions to the Caribbean Basin have been much appreciated. And while we've not always agreed on everything, we've developed a firm respect for your opinions and for the vital role that Mexico plays in international affairs.

It's my sincere hope that we can build upon the current spirit of cooperation, and that with respect for the rights and dignity of each other, with recognition of our affection and common interests, the friendship of our two countries will serve as a model for free nations everywhere and that our personal relationship will be marked with trust and admiration. I'm confident that will be the case, Mr. President-elect, because even after our short meetings today, I know you're a man in whom I can confide as a friend.

The President-elect. Mr. President, I do appreciate the kind and cordial hospitality that you have shown me throughout this meeting. I particularly thank you for your willingness to begin our meeting with a ceremony in honor of President Benito Juarez, a gesture that represents a symbol providing a good auspice for our personal relations. Benito Juarez represents for the Mexican people a precious piece of our history and everlasting values. He consolidated our national independence in the face of foreign intervention, and he led a generation of brilliant Mexicans who laid the foundations for our modern democratic and liberal state.

I consider our meeting highly beneficial. It is a good prolog to the relations we are to have once I become President of Mexico next December 1st. This personal and friendly contact has allowed a free and spontaneous exchange of opinions, without formalities or stiffness, in an atmosphere of cordiality and dignity -- elements that should be the cornerstones in the relations between countries that are neighbors and friends.

Mexico and the United States have been building throughout different periods of time -- some of them not always easy or pleasant -- a relation based on the reciprocal recognition of our respective sovereignty and interests.

Our long border unites us, and the divergence of our cultures and of the stages of our economic and social development compel us to get to know and understand each other better each day. We have differences and similarities. If we recognize them and understand them, we can continue developing our relations for the benefit of our peoples.

Each nation works in its own way to obtain those objectives, just as every man should have the right to guide his own destiny. In the dignity of our conduct lies the strength and favorable outlook for our relations.

But I have also pointed out, Mr. President, that in the interdependent world in which we live, international cooperation is necessary so as to ensure that nations may effectively solve their own problems. A negative international environment, such as the one we live in today, makes the internal efforts of each country more difficult.

It is in the interest of Mexico that the United States have a healthy and prosperous economy and that it becomes a stable and vigorous market for Mexican goods and services. I know that you're working hard to achieve these aims.

It is in the interest of the United States, as you know, that Mexico overcome its current difficulties and that it regain its strength for economic growth and for the creation of jobs. It is only natural that the United States should watch with a constructive interest a country which is its third most important client. The Mexican recovery is also an important element in world economic development and in international trade.

I am absolutely confident, Mr. President, with respect to the future of my country. We have ample and varied natural resources and a significant progress in our social development. That is not to say we do not have inequality. But we have the most precious wealth of any nation -- a strong and nationalistic people, each day better prepared for the tasks of development. I am sure that with effort, with equality, and discipline we will overcome the crisis in which we find ourselves, which is not a crisis of stagnation or decline but a crisis of growth and dynamism.

We Mexicans have, moreover, a solid asset -- a stable and dynamic political system, the product of our historical tradition. It binds together the strongest political forces of the nation and unites Mexicans around a vigorous and deeply rooted nationalism. Our nationalism does not imply hostility or exclusivism; it attends to the understanding of our problems, to the optimum use of our resources, to the defense of our political independence, to the assurance of our economic independence, and the continuity and advance of our culture.

We Mexicans want peace for all nations, the peaceful solution of conflicts, respect for the principle of nonintervention and the strengthening of international economic cooperation. We also want to live in peace and friendship with our neighbors, enjoying friendly, respectful, and fruitful relations with dignity.

Mr. President, I am sure that the friendship and personal relationship we have built during this meeting will contribute to those goals and shall benefit both our great peoples. I leave testimony of the good will and sympathy from the people of Mexico that you have expressed to me on this opportunity. I believe that this is the prolog and the preamble to a relationship of friendship.

Hotel del Coronado. They met in the Presidential Suite for approximately an hour and were then joined by members of the U.S. and Mexican delegations for an expanded meeting. The luncheon followed the expanded meeting.

The President. I was pleased to meet with President-elect de la Madrid today, continuing a longstanding tradition in which the President-elect of each of our respective nations meets with the incumbent President of the other. Our conversations encompassed a broad range of issues of importance to both our countries. The talks were carried out in a spirit of warmth and mutual respect, as befits close friends and neighbors.

Our meetings today establish the framework for a close and durable relationship, and I look forward to working with President-elect de la Madrid when he assumes office. And we've been delighted to have you here.

Ronald Reagan has been most fruitful. I feel that this type of gathering is useful, for it establishes a framework of dignity and cordial friendship between the heads of state of two neighboring countries -- a relationship of cordiality and of close dialog.

We have held a personal and friendly conversation, characterized by a free and spontaneous exchange of ideas without formalities or restrictions of any sort. Dialog and communication have been established between us. I have expressed to President Reagan my intent to give a positive accent to relations between Mexico and the United States. Our countries are linked not only geographically but by multiple relations and interests.

Both our countries can derive great benefit from this relationship if a mutual knowledge of our problems exists as well as the political will to solve them. Our friendship is based on respect and dignity. Good friends do not always think alike, but when understanding prevails, differences are overcome.

Diego, California. This is a region of the United States which is particularly close to the history and the hearts of us Mexicans. This is a region of the United States where many Americans of Mexican descent have toiled to generate the prosperity of a great nation.

Yesterday the Polish Government, a military dictatorship, took another far-reaching step in their persecution of their own people. They declared Solidarity, the organization of the working men and women of Poland, their free union, illegal.

Ever since martial law was brutally imposed last December, Polish authorities have been assuring the world that they're interested in a genuine reconciliation with the Polish people. But the Polish regime's action yesterday reveals the hollowness of its promises. By outlawing Solidarity, a free trade organization to which an overwhelming majority of Polish workers and farmers belong, they have made it clear that they never had any intention of restoring one of the most elemental human rights -- the right to belong to a free trade union.

The so-called new trade union legislation under which this contrary and backward step has been taken claims to substitute a structure and framework for the establishment of free trade unions in Poland. But the free world can see this is only a sham. It is clear that such unions, if formed, will be mere extensions of the Polish Communist Party.

The Polish military leaders and their Soviet backers have shown that they will continue to trample upon the hopes and aspirations of the majority of the Polish people. America cannot stand idly by in the face of these latest threats of repression and acts of repression by the Polish Government.

I am, therefore, today directing steps to bring about the suspension of Poland's most-favored-nation-tariff status as quickly as possible. This will increase the tariffs on Polish manufactured goods exported to the United States and thus reduce the quantities of these goods which have been imported in the past.

The Polish regime should understand that we're prepared to take further steps as a result of this further repression in Poland. We are also consulting urgently with our allies on steps we might take jointly in response to this latest outrage. While taking these steps, I want to make clear, as I have in the past, that they are not directed against the Polish people. We will continue to provide humanitarian assistance to the people of Poland, through organizations such as Catholic Relief Service and CARE, as we have since the beginning of martial law.

I don't believe this for a moment. Those who know Poland well understand that as long as the flame of freedom burns as brightly and intensely in the hearts of Polish men and women as it does today, the spirit of Solidarity will remain a vital force in Poland.

Surely, it must be clear to all that until Warsaw's military authorities move to restore Solidarity to its rightful and hard-won place in Polish society, Poland will continue to be plagued by bitterness, alienation, instability, and stagnation.

The struggle in the world today for the hearts and minds of mankind is based on one simple question: Is man born to be free, or slave? In country after country, people have long known the answer to that question. We are free by divine right. We are the masters of our fate, and we create governments for our convenience. Those who would have it otherwise commit a crime and a sin against God and man.

There can only be one path out of the current morass in Poland, and that is for the military regime to stand up to its own statements of principle, even in the face of severe outside pressure from the Soviet Union; to lift martial law; release Lech Walesa and his colleagues now languishing in prison; and begin again the search for social peace through the arduous but real process of dialog and reconciliation with the Church and Solidarity.

The President. Thank you very much, Jim. Reverend clergy, the officials of our party, our national committeewoman, the others who are here on the platform, and I want to say my thank you to the Apache Belles for that wonderful performance. I'm just sorry that with the geography, more of you couldn't have a clearer view of them.

But it's great to be back in these parts, where the Texas spirit is every bit as big as your wide open sky. Now, if you think I'm just a visitor saying that for possible political profit, let me point out I could have said ``our wide open sky,'' because it was just about 25 years ago that I was commissioned an honorary citizen of the Lone Star State. So, you have to believe me when I say Texas is number one in hospitality, and a lot of other things, also.

But I want to say a few words about your Texas stars that we need to help us finish the job that we began less than 2 years ago. In 1980, we pledged to work for policies that would strengthen the values crucial to a strong, successful country. You know what they are, because here in Texas words like self-reliance, personal initiative, opportunity and, yes, as Jim said, love of family and neighborhood, and patriotism, and belief in God, describe everyday facts of life.

There's a man here whose philosophy and voting record reflect a life-long commitment to those bedrock values that made America great. He loves this State. He has put together a strong campaign. He has closed a big gap in a hurry. I believe in him, and with your all-out support, Jim Collins can and will be the next elected Senator from the State of Texas.

And I have to say this: Jim's opponent talks like a Texan, but when he's back in Washington, he doesn't vote like one. Wouldn't it be great if John Tower, who does such a fine job for Texas, could work with a colleague, his fellow Senator, who reinforces his vote, instead of with someone who cancels it out?

Now, and this goes not only for these congressional candidates who are here and your incumbents, and sending them back, also your State constitutional officers -- Allen Clarke is here running for treasurer.

These rank-and-file Democrats I'm talking about -- and that we must count on for help and support because we have so much in common with them -- they know you can't drink yourself sober, you can't spend yourself rich, and you can't pump the prime without priming the pump.

The problems of overspending, big taxing, and runaway bureaucracy that drained America's strength didn't just begin 20 months ago. You and I know these problems have been building for at least 20 years. In the 4 years before we took office, those who are now our biggest critics had total power -- the White House and both Houses of Congress. They had the whole enchilada.

When Gerald Ford left office in January 1977, inflation was 4.8 percent. The prime interest rate was under 7 percent. You could get a home mortgage for 9 percent, and consumers could afford auto loans.

But then America took a giant step backward, spending and taxing like there was no tomorrow, opening the floodgates of printing press money -- it increased in the last 6 months of 1980 faster than it has ever increased in our history. Those in power managed to create a crisis unlike America had ever seen before. When we took office in 1981, we faced double-digit inflation, high unemployment, 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate, nearly a trillion-dollar debt, and the highest peacetime tax burden we had ever known.

Jimmy Carter America was sliding into the worst recession since the Great Depression. Of course, he was a candidate himself then when he said that, and he didn't add that for years he has continued to be one of the biggest spenders in the United States Senate.

Government was growing like toadstools after a rainstorm, spinning out of control like a washing machine that's out of cycle. Washington grew fat by making everyone else poorer. Washington has a habit of doing that. Federal spending increased by 17 percent in 1980 alone. Not many Texas blue-collar workers, working mothers, or pensioners saw their earnings, pensions, or savings grow by 17 percent in 1980.

It's up to us to make one thing plain in this election: There is no morality in those big taxing, big spending policies which brought so much misery to so many people. Inflation is the greatest enemy of all the people and of our hopes for jobs and growth. It's at the root of the problems that we're trying to solve today.

Government assumed a role that was entirely new to it. Government launched programs which were, frankly, experimental. And many of them did serve a purpose, because they eased the misery of people for whom there was no other answer to their problem. But it was actually not those programs but World War II that ended the Depression. When the war was over, the Government went right back to its old habits and continued to administer the medicine it had applied before the war, but the patient then was no longer in need of that medicine. Many of us had believed in those prewar remedies and, indeed, as I say, some had served us well. But in more normal times, we came to see that many of these programs were distorting the balance between the different levels of government and working against the economy.

But the leadership of the Democratic Party remained addicted to a policy of government intervention, and we're paying dearly for those past mistakes. For one thing, as I said, there is the trillion-dollar debt. The Government this year must spend $110 billion just to cover the interest on that debt. We wouldn't be worrying about a deficit if we hadn't wallowed in red ink for 21 of the last 22 years. And we wonder why it's been so hard to bring interest rates down.

Now, far too many people are out of work, and I share their ache and frustration. Every American should be aware of the economic chaos which created today's needless results, so we won't repeat our past mistakes. It's excruciating to me that there is not a quicker, easier cure for this terrible economic illness. But it was a long time coming, and it is worldwide. Indeed, we have been in the longest sustained period of worldwide inflation in the history of man. Many other countries went down the same garden path of spend, tax, and borrow. The further they went, the worse off they are today. Our administration is determined to cure the disease, not just treat the symptoms with make-work, quick fixes. And I pledge to you today that I will not be satisfied until every American who wants a job can find a job.

From our first moment in office, we've been working around the clock to make America well again. And we're opposed by those who have never given up their belief that government's economic fine tuning and tinkering is superior to the free marketplace and the abilities of a free people to run their own lives.

Our first emergency priority was to beat down double-digit inflation. Until people are convinced that inflation will come down and stay down, they'll demand higher rates of interest so the dollars they lend won't lose value. Expectation of double-digit inflation caused interest rates to zoom, as I said, to 21\1/2\ percent. High interest rates made it impossible for families to get home mortgages, for consumers to carry auto loans, for firms to modernize machines to keep product prices competitive. Double-digit inflation and high interest rates crippled the economy's ability to provide the jobs our people must have, even as they squeezed the earnings and buying power, forcing more families to seek a second income in the job market.

We hear so much in Washington about fairness and compassion. Well, we're providing compassion that never existed under the policies of the past. A family of four today on a fixed income of about $20,000 is about $1,500 better off than if inflation and taxes had stayed at the 1980 rate. But take it below that, to the family with a poverty-level income. They are $500 better off than they were at the previous rate of inflation alone, because they don't pay taxes.

Some decisions were not easy. It was going against the wind of the times to curb runaway spending. Likewise, when we went to bat for taxpayers when others before us had refused, we revived an old idea that the earnings of the people of Texas belong to them, not to government handymen in Washington, D.C. And here's what that tax commitment means to you and your family. As of when the third installment comes in July next year, it will have been a 25-percent tax rate cut. We are then indexing the tax brackets to end the bracket creep when you get a cost-of-living pay raise -- doesn't improve you any, except it pushes you into a higher tax bracket; a reduction in the marriage penalty; an increase in the child care credit for working mothers; new incentives for retirement savings; raising the estate tax exemption to $600,000 for farmers and family businesses -- and, of even greater help, there will no longer be any estate tax for a surviving spouse. It's not right that widows and orphans must lose a business or a farm that generations of love and toil had created, just in order to pay the government a tax because of death. And now they won't. Of course, according to our opponents, there's no compassion in this.

Our program, I think, is beginning to work. It's bringing down inflation. It's bringing down interest rates. It's increasing purchasing power, and it's promoting new savings. It's doing the things that must be done to clear away wreckage dumped in our laps by today's Monday morning quarterbacks. Yes, we will have recovery from recession, but we will not have another counterfeit recovery like before that sent inflation and interest rates right back through the roof. Unlike those before us, we're going to get the job done, and for once, we're going to get it done right.

Now, you heard the charge that our program has failed and that we must change course. Well, I have one question: Has anyone heard a single proposal by our critics who say that, as to what they would do instead?

The President. Not one. They constantly criticize what we're doing, but they've offered no real alternative. If what we're doing is wrong, how do they explain the tremendous surge of investment in our equity and bond markets in the last few weeks -- from small investors to those who manage billions of dollars, including workers' pension funds?

The world knows that America is on her way back. And I'm pleased to announce a little news item right here. It's just happened. At the closing bell of the stock market on Wall Street a few minutes ago, the stock market was over the magic 1,000.

Investors have watched inflation fall and interest rates drop for months. Their commitment to put cold, hard cash on the line signals a strong vote of confidence in America's future. People are beginning to understand that we mean business in this battle against inflation, and they're absolutely right.

Markets will go up and they'll go down, but the recent trend has been dramatically higher. That's important, because the stock market has traditionally been a leading indicator of what's coming down the road.

Unfortunately, unemployment is not. It's one of the last indicators to turn around. Until it does, we'll provide assistance with extended unemployment benefits. Last week, I signed an export bill that can create several hundred thousand jobs. And this week, I will sign legislation for a program to train up to a million unemployed people or more per year, for permanent, real, private sector jobs.

I think it's tragic that the House leadership recessed to campaign, leaving so much unfinished business behind, as Jim Collins told you. Enterprise zones, we've been trying to get for almost 2 years, to create jobs in the inner cities; tuition tax credits; regulatory reform; programs to crack down on crime and make our streets safe again. Let me ask you, don't you think that rather than simply campaign and complain about deficits, it's about time they proved they were willing to make the decisions that would bring down deficits?

Well, as Jim told you, they voted down the constitutional amendment to balance the Federal budget. They voted against the will of you, the people, and the financial security of every family in America.

People don't want delay and demogoguery. They want action, to reduce the burden of that terrible trillion-dollar debt on their children and grandchildren, and it's up to us to provide it. And I'm so happy that today, just like every day where I've been in this campaign, to see so many young people on hand, because they're what this campaign is all about, and the kind of country they're going to live in.

But I want to make a request. If you believe, as I do, that too many people in Washington are out of step, if you believe that we need reforms like the balanced budget amendment, then please send us a Congress that will pass these programs so we can make this great country of ours number one once again. If the liberals do have an alternative, it's the same one they've always had, and maybe that's why they're not mentioning it. They mean to raise your taxes and give government a blank check to spend more money, and we've been down that road now for more than 20 years.

We're on a new road now. Unless we have the courage to stay on course and lick inflation for good, we'll never have lasting recovery. Our problems will grow worse than before. And that's the sad, sorry history of past decades -- lost nerve and squandered opportunities.

Well, I intend to stay the course. I need your support. I want you to promise me that you will mobilize an army across this State to get out the vote for a great Republican victory on November 2d. And let us remember that we Republicans have a rendezvous in this city in 1984. Let us remember that we have a mission to renew all the dreams and opportunities that our nation was placed on this Earth to provide. And let us remember the best way to make those dreams come true is to elect Jim Collins to the Senate, your fine candidates to the House, George Strake as Lieutenant Governor, Allen Clarke as treasurer, and to send Bill Clements back to your capital as Governor of this great State.

You're no stranger to these shores, Mr. President, having visited the United States twice before as leader of your great nation. As one of the world's longest serving chief executives, indeed, as a senior statesman of Asia, your views on world affairs carry special authority and add special meaning to our discussions today. Your viewpoints and wise counsel will be greatly appreciated.

I'm sure that our talks during your state visit will further strengthen the bonds of friendship and mutual respect between our two countries. The United States applauds Indonesia's quest for what you call ``national resilience.'' No nation in our era has shown itself more firmly committed to preserving its own independence than Indonesia; and yet, no nation has pursued that goal in a more responsible manner.

The United States, too, fought for its independence and over the years has jealously guarded certain fundamental principles. We, consequently, understand the striving of Indonesia for national resilience. We wholeheartedly respect it. It is this respect which lies at the heart of our excellent bilateral relationship.

President Soeharto, the challenges confronting our nations are great indeed. Both strive for world peace, whether in important areas of Asia such as Kampuchea, or in the Middle East, where particularly vexing problems await lasting solutions. The United States regards Indonesia as an important force for peace, stability, and progress. We value our bilateral relationship with your country most highly, and we hope to broaden and deepen that relationship.

On the economic front, I believe it is in the clear interest of both our countries to maintain and improve our economic and trade relations. Mutually beneficial economic cooperation, equitable two-way trade, and investment in enterprises which involve the transfer of technology to meet your country's pressing development needs are part of the fabric of healthy U.S.-Indonesian economic relations.

The United States will also continue to provide appropriate development and food assistance in the framework of the Intergovernmental Group of Indonesia. I am proud to say this consortium has had wholehearted American backing since its founding. Let me also assure you that the United States wishes to pursue actively joint collaboration in science and technology for the economic development of your country.

Nations, ASEAN, and of Indonesia's important role in it. The success which ASEAN has enjoyed during the 15 years -- or 16 years of its existence would have been impossible without Indonesia's farsighted and enthusiastic participation. As one of ASEAN's founding fathers, Mr. President, you deserve a great measure of credit for the accomplishments of that organization in the economic and social areas. These accomplishments have far surpassed the expectations of most observers a decade and a half ago when ASEAN was established.

Bali, which demonstrated your personal commitment. Indeed, ASEAN now stands as a model for regional cooperation and, if I may use your term, Mr. President, of regional resilience. Let me assure you that support for ASEAN has been and will continue to be the keystone of American policy in Southeast Asia.

As we pursue our overall policy in Asia and the Pacific, we will never lose sight of ASEAN's concerns or neglect our commitments to the ASEAN countries. Let me also stress our full support for the important initiatives which ASEAN has undertaken to resolve the tragic situation in Kampuchea.

I also extend a special warm welcome to Madam Soeharto. Her good works on behalf of charitable organizations for handicapped, needy, and disadvantaged people are recognized at home and abroad. These activities are in line with the spirit of voluntarism which Mrs. Reagan and I have encouraged in our own country.

I'm deeply moved and would like to extend my heartfelt appreciation for the warm hospitality accorded me at this moment, and also by the kind words of Your Excellency, Mr. President. All of this reflects the profound sense of friendship existing between our two countries and, indeed, it is to promote the close, friendly relations and to reinforce the mutual understanding between our two countries that truly become the principal objective of my visit to this great country.

My present visit to the United States is actually for the third time. I have deep impressions about my previous visits, particularly from the exchange of views with prominent leaders of this country and leaders of various circles. These have all added to my understanding about the United States, namely its views, its attitude, and its steps.

Today, 7 years have passed since my last visit to this country. The world has changed considerably. The political and economic map of the world has undergone great changes. This is the reason, Your Excellency, that on my current visit to the United States, I will use it to have an exchange of views with Your Excellency and leaders of this country based on identical, fundamental attitudes of aspiring for a world which is more peaceful and prosperous for the whole of mankind. I attach great importance to this visit, because the world is presently undergoing various, successive upheavals that are long drawn out. Our two countries and all countries in the world have the common responsibility to exert all their will and ability to overcome those upheavals for the sake of the tranquility and the safety of all.

With a different weight, because our respective capabilities are also different, our two countries should nevertheless have the common duty and hold the responsibility of contributing to the efforts of preserving world stability and peace in order that we can bequeath a better world -- a world filled with peace, prosperity, and justice -- to generations which hold together the future of the world.

It is my sincere hope that my visit to the United States this time will further reinforce the bonds of friendship and enhance the mutual understanding between our two countries, as well as expand the cooperation in various fields which are mutually beneficial to both our peoples.

President Soeharto was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. President Soeharto spoke in Indonesian, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter. Following the ceremony, the two Presidents met in the Oval Office.

In 1973 he moved to Beijing as Deputy Chief of Mission of the U.S. Liaison Office. During this tenure he received the Department's Christian Herter award for his reporting and analysis of events in China. In July 1975 he became Ambassador to Singapore, a post he held for 3 years prior to his return to Washington and his duties as the national intelligence officer for East Asia in the National Intelligence Council.

Ladies and gentlemen, I am signing two bills that will provide peace of mind, I think, to many of our citizens. This first bill will begin to address the tragedy of America's missing children. Every year in this country thousands of children disappear from their homes. The Missing Children Act will reassure parents that every effort is being made to find, or in more tragic circumstances, to identify their children.

Finding missing children has become a national problem. Because of overlapping jurisdictions and the lack of centralized information, parents of missing children have faced frustration and anger in their attempts to locate their children. Furthermore, State and local officials are often unable to identify bodies simply because of restrictions on missing person reports from other jurisdictions.

The Missing Children Act attempts to lessen these problems by mandating a system to allow parents access to a central computer file designed to help trace missing children. The act also will aid in identifying deceased children and adults and at least ease the parents' pain of not knowing. I want to thank the Congress, and particularly Senator Paula Hawkins, Congressman Clay Shaw, for making it possible to sign this compassionate measure. And with me here today are some individuals who've committed their lives to the cause of missing children. John and Reve Walsh of Hollywood, Florida, came to the cause of all exploited children because of their own family tragedy. And their courage, in the face of what surely must be the most difficult grief imaginable, has rallied thousands of others to this noble effort.

I'm also pleased to sign this law in the presence of Sergeant Richard Ruffino, who is recognized as an expert in missing persons with the Bergen County, New Jersey, sheriff's office. Sergeant Ruffino has contributed countless hours of his own time in the effort to assist searching parents.

The second bill I will sign also deals with compassion -- our compassion toward those Americans who are the victims of or witnesses to crime. It is high time the legal system showed the honest citizen as much concern as it does the criminal. Today it is not the wrongdoer who falls through the cracks of our criminal justice system; too often, it is the innocent victim and the dutiful witness.

As the bill states, without the cooperation of victims and witnesses, the criminal justice system would cease to function. Yet, with very few exceptions, these individuals are either ignored or simply used as tools to identify and punish offenders. All too often the victim of a serious crime is forced to suffer physical, psychological, or financial hardship, while the criminal justice system remains unresponsive to the victim's real needs. And while the defendant is provided with counsel who can guide him through the criminal process, the victim or witness is usually not even told when the defendant is released on bail, the case is dismissed, or the court date is changed. Neither is there accurate [adequate] protection from law enforcement agencies when a victim or witness is threatened or intimidated as a result of cooperating with authorities.

Common sense tells us something is not right there. Common sense tells us we should do something about it. And this legislation, the Victim and Witness Protection Act, seeks to return some balance to our criminal justice system without infringing upon the rights of the defendant.

The provisions of this act would require that a ``victim impact statement'' be filed to aid the judge in sentencing the criminal. The act makes it a Federal offense to intimidate or retaliate against victims or witnesses of Federal crime. It requires a Federal judge to order restitution when passing sentence for crimes involving bodily injury or property loss, or else to state for the record his reasons for not doing so.

These measures will go a long way toward treating victims and witnesses with the fairness and respect they deserve. And again, the Congress, and particularly Senators Heinz, Mathias, and Specter, and Congressmen Fish, McClory, and Rodino, deserve a vote of thanks from the American people for getting this bill to my desk.

And by the way, forgive me for continuing on another subject to spot hopeful news. I was mighty pleased to see another burst of sunshine this morning. Morgan Guaranty Trust has lowered their prime interest rate all the way down to 12 percent. I think that's one more confirmation that we're on course here.

But now, I'm going to sit down and get those bills signed so that they will become law. And hopefully, because this applies to Federal cases, let us hope that many States now will follow this pattern in regard to the second bill, particularly.

Ocean, Great Lakes, and inland river ports and terminals are among our most important national assets. They have contributed substantially to the shaping of our early history as a Nation and fostered the industry and trade which helped build many of America's great cities.

Today our ports are vital links in the total transportation system which serves this Nation's domestic and international trade. Their continued development is indispensable to our economic and military security. In 1981 port industry handled over two billion short tons of waterborne commerce in foreign and domestic trade; added $6.5 billion to the United States Treasury from U.S. Customs Service collections; and contributed over $35 billion to the gross national product and over $1.5 billion to the balance of payments accounts.

To meet the needs of expanding waterborne commerce, billions of dollars have been invested in new and expanded facilities by non-Federal entities representing State and local authorities and private industry.

Every day nearly 100 million Americans read a newspaper that has been delivered to their homes by a newspaper carrier. The estimated one million newspaper carriers in our Nation, the great majority of whom are 18 years of age or younger, perform an essential service in the dissemination of information that is so vital to the functioning of a free society.

In all kinds of weather, and often in hours of darkness, these young people make their appointed rounds. Most of them are engaged in their first venture in American enterprise, their initiative and devoted efforts enhancing the quality of life in our Nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of Oct. in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Each year our hardworking farmers produce enough food and fiber to feed and clothe the people of America as well as those of many other countries. This nation is indeed fortunate to be blessed with such a productive farming system.

Many of our fellow countrymen, however, have had little exposure to the miracle of American agriculture -- fewer than three percent of the nation's people feed and clothe the other ninety-seven percent. Caught up in the fast pace of urban life, city dwellers often take for granted the quiet and efficient regularity with which their rural counterparts sustain an entire population with such a plentiful supply of food and fiber.

Our future as a prosperous nation depends on our ability to keep a large number of interrelated parts working in harmony. Our farms and cities are inextricably connected by a great marketing chain of producers, transporters, processors, warehousemen, wholesalers, retailers, and consumers. This free market process will remain viable as long as its various links are strong enough to make their contributions to moving goods and services where they are needed. As the anchor points of this chain, farmers and city dwellers are absolutely crucial to each other.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 12th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

In the years since your last visit, President Soeharto, much has transpired in your country and in ours, and in Asia and the Pacific, where we both share so many interests. Yet, during these dynamic and often turbulent years, there have been elements of stability, important elements.

Foremost among these has been the wise and steadfast leadership which you have given Indonesia since 1966. Out of a period of uncertainty and disorder, you have guided your country into the forefront of the Asian community of nations and made its influence felt throughout the world.

You will pardon me I hope, Mr. President, if I recognize here tonight what is already apparent to the nations of the world -- that Indonesia, under your leadership, has assumed its rightful position as a great nation of Asia and of the world.

The second factor of stability since the 1960's, Mr. President, has been the excellent bilateral relations which have existed between Indonesia and the United States. Our relationship has stood the test of time in a changing world. It's firmly rooted in mutual respect and a clear-sighted recognition of where the interests of both our nations lie.

Mr. President, I fully share the importance that you attach to the further strengthening and expansion of the relationship between our two countries. To that end, it is my pleasure to announce tonight my decision to nominate as my personal representative to your government someone well known to you, and in whom I have the utmost confidence, Assistant Secretary John H. Holdridge.

Asian affairs. In commending him to the Senate for its advice and consent, I shall do so assured that no one is better qualified to continue, on my behalf, the frank and mutually beneficial dialog which has marked your visit here, and which is so essential to the advancement of mutual understanding between our two countries and the achievement of our common purposes.

Asian Nations, and the other nations of Asia which seek to live in peace. I come away from our talks more convinced than ever that we share this common view: that the greatest need for the countries of Southeast Asia is for rapid, equitable development free from outside interference and in an atmosphere of peaceful change.

I also appreciated your views on the situation in the Middle East. The special interests of both our nations in that troubled region make it imperative that peace be pursued vigorously. Lasting solutions will not come easily, however, and I earnestly ask that all nations support efforts in this pursuit of peace.

In our talks, we devoted much attention to global economic recovery. I'm convinced the world economic conditions will improve with national self-restraint and sound financial management for continued growth. These qualities have characterized Indonesia's economic policies since 1966 and serve as a persuasive example for other nations of the developing world.

President Soeharto. Your Excellency, Mr. President, and Mrs. Reagan, distinguished ladies and gentlemen, once again, I would like to express my heartfelt appreciation for the warm welcome and hospitality accorded me during my present visit to the United States in accepting the invitation of Your Excellency, Mr. President.

Your kind words, Your Excellency, have impressed me as indication of the close friendly relation and mutual understanding between our two countries. As I have said this morning, Your Excellency, the main purpose of my current visit is to reiterate the friendship between our two countries.

Your Excellency, Mr. President, the friendship between our two countries has a solid foundation because of the similarity of our two nations with regard to the noble values which we hold dearly -- such as freedom and independence, democracy and humanitarianism. We perceive the manifestation of such friendship from the deep understanding and support of the American nation when we struggled for and defended our national independence 37 years ago. We acknowledge such deep understanding again are, among other things, the willingness of the United States, together with other IGGI [Inter-Governmental Group on Indonesia] countries a dozen of years ago, to assist our economic and social development.

For all this, I would like to avail myself of this opportunity to extend once again the highest appreciation of the Government and people of Indonesia to the Government and people of the United States of America.

We consider that the problem of development that we face is also actually a part of the problem of the human race. If until now, two-thirds of the human race are still striving in the struggle against poverty, backwardness, ignorance, and disease, this clearly indicates the real situation of what I have said earlier. It is, therefore, necessary to create an international climate that enables the unhindered development of all nations. But today such a climate is still far from expectation.

Indeed, there have been many efforts made to overcome these various disturbances. But the outcome has not ensured its total solution. In the framework of trying to find a fundamental solution and to achieve an overall improvement of the inequalities in the world, the one and only answer is that all nations, big or small, strong or weak, strive together, motivated by the firm determination to build a new world order which guarantees political justice, economic justice, and social justice.

Unavoidably, it must be the common stand and concerted efforts of all nations on our unitary planet, because with the growingly closer relation amongst nations, due to the progress brought about by the human civilization at present and in the future, whether we like it or not, we must consider the world as the common homeland of all nations.

I'm aware that it is not easy to build a new world order. There must be, therefore, concrete steps which will at least prevent the deterioration of world developments, which may cause our solitary world to fall into the abyss of greater disaster, which may probably terminate the history of man and mankind. In such a world situation, filled with anxiety, obviously the world's attention, particularly of the developing countries, is focused for its umpteenth time on the United States.

States will try unceasingly to create world stability and peace and to prevent catastrophe to the human race. The strengths of this great nation, its glorious past history, its commitments to mankind, provide ample chance to the United States to play an important role in the endeavors of the whole of mankind to create a stable, peaceful, and prosperous world.

It is primarily to carry the common responsibility of creating such a world that I consider as highly significant the exchange of views that I have had with Your Excellency, Mr. President, and other American leaders during my current visit. I am convinced that my present visit will further reinforce the friendship, enhance the mutual understanding, and expand the cooperation between our two countries, particularly in the economic field.

In conclusion, permit me to kindly invite the distinguished guests to raise your glass and join me in a toast to the health and happiness of His Excellency, Mr. President, and Mrs. Reagan, to the prosperity of the people of the United States of America, and to the everlasting friendship between our two countries.

Twenty-one months ago this country was in the grip of not one, but five severe problems: runaway government spending, double-digit inflation, record high interest rates -- they'd just hit 21\1/2\ percent -- the worst tax burden in peacetime history, and high unemployment. With support from the American people we put in place a program that was designed to cure this raging economic disease which had been ignored for too many years. Little more than a year's passed since our program went on the books, but already we've made solid progress against four of the five problems that we inherited.

We have cut the growth of spending somewhere around in half, and we've reduced high inflation, high interest rates, and taxation. But let me just say something here about interest rates, which I'll expand on in my speech to the Nation tonight.

The very sharp and heartening decline that we've seen in interest rates brings us one step closer to the dream every American shares, which is lasting recovery. But let's understand that what brought, for example, Government-backed home mortgages down to 12\1/2\ percent, the lowest level in 25 months, was not a quick fix, but our progress against inflation. The decline in inflation led directly to the fall in interest rates during the last several months. The Federal Reserve Bank announced last week that it was lowering its discount level to 9\1/2\ percent. That's the first time this key interest rate has been a single digit since 1979 and the fifth reduction in the rate in 4 months.

The Fed's lower rate shows its confidence that inflation and market interest rates are continuing to fall. The Federal Reserve has been pursuing a steady policy of trying to reduce inflation, and we've been supporting the Fed in that policy. And the Fed will continue to aim its policy at bringing inflation down further in the future. And that will continue to mean lower and lower interest rates as well.

As I said, we're solving four of the five worst problems that we inherited. But unemployment, always the lagging indicator, remains too high, and clearly, our most urgent priority today is to create lasting, private sector jobs. I'm not going to rest until every American who wants a job can find a job.

All of us are moved by the plight of millions of our people who can't find jobs or provide for their families. Perhaps the cruelest trap of all has caught the legions of our youth. As they stand on the threshold of the American dream, far too many find the door of opportunity slammed in their face.

We continue to push for enterprise zones in our inner cities, a program to attract new businesses and jobs to areas of highest unemployment. It's tragic that this enterprise zone proposal has been bottled up in committee by the leadership of the House.

I remember what it was like to be 21 years old and looking for a job in 1932. And I know how it feels when your future has been mortgaged by the generation before you. And that's a tragic mistake we must never allow our leaders to make again. Today's young people must never be held hostage to the mistakes of the past.

The only way to avoid making these mistakes again is to learn from them. It's estimated, for example, that at least 20 million American workers now rely on skills that won't be needed within 20 years. The government has trained thousands more in skills that already aren't needed in their communities. Still others have been steered into make-work government for our young people.

This is not another make-work, deadend, bureaucratic boondoggle. This program will train more than one million Americans every year in skills they can market where they live. It'll make a difference on Main Street. It'll provide help, bring hope, and encourage self-reliance and personal initiative. And here's how it'll work.

State and local government officials, business and labor leaders, and other members of the private sector will plan area programs in private industry councils. Local people will decide at the grassroots level what opportunities are available in their communities, and then match real jobs with needed skills.

And here's something else that makes this program different from many past failures. At least 70 percent of the program funds will go to actual job training. We're eliminating the bureaucratic and administrative waste that has marked so many so-called job bills in the past.

Americans. Long-time workers who've lost their jobs because of new technology, women who can't find work because their home-making skills aren't marketable, young people who aren't hired because they have no experience -- all will be helped by this program.

The President. No, I can't do that. But I want you to know though, as I say, all these young people are an example of what these kind of programs can do, and out there government has a legitimate function. But that legitimate function, I think, in this area means cooperating and working with the private sector, where the jobs with a future really are.

Present at the ceremony was a group of people who were recipients of job training or had received job training similar to that proposed in the Job Training Partnership Act. Earlier, the President had met with the group in the Cabinet Room at the White House.

On this sad anniversary of 10 months of martial law in Poland, the apparently spontaneous actions of the workers in Gdansk and elsewhere speak eloquently of their support of democracy and free trade unions. At the same time, the Government's actions speak just as clearly of their position on those issues and underline the validity of the President's views on the situation in Poland as he addressed them Saturday. Clearly the workers are expressing their will and determination to have a say in their own future, particularly in the wake of the Government's de-legalization of an organization which had represented the vast majority of all Polish workers.

I have signed S. 2852, the student financial assistance technical amendments act of 1982. This bill makes a number of changes in the student aid grant and loan programs generally intended to improve the way these programs function.

I am pleased that before final passage of this legislation, a complex and potentially very costly provision opposed by the administration was deleted. I would, however, like to comment on an objectionable provision which remains in the final version.

Attorney General has advised me, and I agree, that one House of Congress cannot bind the executive branch by passing a simple resolution that is not adopted by both Houses of Congress and presented to me for approval or veto. Such a provision unconstitutionally encroaches on the principle of the separation of powers that is at the foundation of our government. Accordingly, the Secretary of Education will implement this law in a manner consistent with the Constitution.

This bill would direct the Secretary of Agriculture to release the reverter clause on 80 acres of the land conveyed to the Arkansas Forestry Commission in 1980, so that the Commission may sell this tract to a private party. The bill would also require proceeds from such a sale to be used for a public purpose. When the land was sold in 1980, the purchase price represented a 30 percent discount from fair market value. I am directing the Secretaries of Agriculture and the Interior to ensure that the fair market value stipulated to be paid to the United States for the mineral interests adequately reflects the 30 percent discount that was granted in the original sale of the tract because of the retention of mineral interests and the public use requirement.

While the United States is quite pleased to enter into transactions with the States and localities for the sale of Federal lands, the principle of full and fair compensation to the taxpayers of the United States must be maintained.

I'm delighted to be here, but I want to say at the outset that I didn't come today just to give a peptalk or exchange niceties. Those of you engaged in law enforcement have struggled long and hard in what must often have seemed like a losing war against the menace of crime. I'm grateful to you for that, and so are the American people. But besides being grateful, I have some good news for you -- a major initiative that I believe can mark a turning point in the battle against crime.

Americans a year, touches nearly a third of America's homes, and results in about $8.8 billion a year in financial losses. I've resisted figuring out and doing what is sometimes typical in remarks of this kind, and that is to tell you how many people are going to be murdered while I'm talking to you.

But these statistics suggest that our criminal justice system has broken down, that it just isn't working, and many Americans are losing faith in it. Nine out of ten Americans believe that the courts in their home areas aren't tough enough on criminals, and the cold statistics do demonstrate the failure of our criminal justice system to adequately pursue, prosecute, and punish criminals. In New York City, for example, less than 1 percent of reported felonies end in a prison term for the offender.

The perception is growing that the crime problem stems from the emergence of a new privileged class in America, a class of repeat offenders and career criminals who think they have a right to victimize their fellow citizens with virtual impunity. They're openly contemptuous of our way of justice. They don't believe they'll be caught, and if they are caught, they're confident that once their cases enter our legal system, the charges will be dropped, postponed, plea-bargained away, or lost in a maze of legal technicalities that make a mockery of our legitimate and honorable concern with civil liberties.

Once again the research shows that this common perception has a strong basis in fact. Just take one limited part of the crime picture. Transit police in New York estimate that only 500 habitual offenders were responsible for nearly half of the crimes committed in their subways last year. This rise in crime, this growth of a hardened criminal class, has partly been the result of misplaced government priorities and a misguided social philosophy.

At the root of this philosophy lies utopian presumptions about human nature that see man as primarily a creature of his material environment. By changing this environment through expensive social programs, this philosophy holds that government can permanently change man and usher in an era of prosperity and virtue. In much the same way, individual wrongdoing is seen as the result of poor socioeconomic conditions or an underprivileged background. This philosophy suggests in short that there is crime or wrongdoing, and that society, not the individual, is to blame.

But what has also become abundantly clear in the last few years is that a new political consensus among the American people utterly rejects this point of view. The increase in citizen involvement of the crime problem and the tough new State statutes directed at repeat offenders make it clear that the American people are reasserting certain enduring truths -- the belief that right and wrong do matter, that individuals are responsible for their actions, that evil is frequently a conscious choice, and that retribution must be swift and sure for those who decide to make a career of preying on the innocent.

As you know, one of the most critical duties that we faced upon taking office was controlling the influx of illegal drugs into this country. The South Florida Task Force, which we established under the leadership of Vice President George Bush, has, in the opinion of virtually all knowledgeable observers, been highly successful in slowing the illegal flow of drugs into the United States. I'll return to the subject of illegal drug trade in a moment, but let me say now that what was happening in south Florida is an example of the increasing sophistication and power of organized criminal enterprises and the grave danger that they pose to our nation.

When I spoke in New Orleans last year to the International Association of Chiefs of Police, I made the point then, as Bill has told you -- and I don't think that I should repeat it now -- but we do draw distinctions between violent crime, sophisticated crime, or between crimes like drugpushing and crimes like bribery. The truth is, crime doesn't come in categories. It's part of a pattern. If one sector prospers in the community of crime, so ultimately do all the others.

As I said then, the street criminal, the drugpusher, the mobster, the corrupt policeman, public official, they form their own criminal subculture. They contribute to and they prosper in a climate of lawlessness. They need each other. They use each other. They protect each other. And that brings us to the major and sweeping effort that I'm announcing this morning.

For many years, we have tolerated in America, not just in the illegal and highly dangerous drug traffic but in many other areas, a syndicate of organized criminals whose power is now reaching unparalleled heights. The personal suffering they cause to our society in human and fiscal terms, the climate of lawlessness that its very existence fosters, has made this network of professional criminals a costly and tragic part of our history.

Today, the power of organized crime reaches into every segment of our society. It is estimated that the syndicate has millions of dollars of assets in legitimate businesses. It controls corrupt union locals. It runs burglary rings. It fences for stolen goods, holds a virtual monopoly on the heroin trade. It thrives on illegal gambling, pornography, gun-running, car theft, arson, and a host of other illegal activities.

Organization and discipline, vows of secrecy and loyalty, insulation of its leaders from direct criminal involvement, bribery and corruption of law enforcement and public officials, violence and threats against those who would testify or resist this criminal conspiracy -- all have contributed to the protective curtain of silence that surrounds its activities.

Through the years a few dedicated Americans have broken the curtain surrounding this menace and successfully rooted it out. Their names are familiar -- Prosecutor Thomas Dewey and Judge William Seabury, Federal Agent Eliot Ness, and Senators Kefauver and McClellan, Attorneys General Brownell and Kennedy, investigative reporter Don Bolles. Important and increasingly effective investigations and prosecutions have also been achieved by the FBI and the Justice Department strike forces. But too often the efforts against the mob made by a few dedicated policemen, prosecutors, reporters, or public officials have resulted in only temporary gains. The time has come to make these gains permanent. The time has come to cripple the power of the mob in America.

Treasury Department, put together final plans for a national strategy to expose, prosecute, and ultimately cripple organized crime in America. And I want to announce this program today. It is one that outlines a national strategy that I believe will bring us very close to removing a stain from American history that has lasted nearly a hundred years.

Second, no weapon against organized crime has proved more effective or more important to law enforcement than the investigations carried on by the Kefauver committee and the McClellan committee in the 1950's or the Senate Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations, which, as many of you may remember, heard testimony from Federal informant Joseph Vallachi in the 1960's. Although several other commissions on crime have been appointed since then, none has had the time and the resources to fully investigate the syndicate and lay out a national strategy for its elimination. Accordingly, I am announcing the creation of a panel of 15 distinguished Americans from diverse backgrounds and professions with practical experience in criminal justice and combating organized crime.

The purpose of this commission, which will last for 3 years, will be to undertake a region-by-region analysis of organized crime's influence, to analyze and debate the data it gathers, and to hold public hearings on the findings. Not only will the work of this commission lead to important legislative recommendations, it will also heighten public awareness and knowledge about the threat of organized crime and mobilize citizen support for its eradication.

Third, this administration will launch a project similar to the Fifty States Project now underway in the area of women's rights. It will enlist the Nation's Governors in bringing about needed criminal justice reforms. For example, without effective enforcement of local and State statutes against various kinds of racketeering, like illegal gambling, this vital source of revenue for organized crime will never be fully dried up.

Fourth, all the diverse agencies and law enforcement bureaus of the Federal Government will be brought together in a comprehensive attack on drug trafficking and organized crime under a Cabinet-level committee chaired by the Attorney General and a working group chaired by the Associate Attorney General. Their job will be to review interagency and intergovernmental cooperation in the struggle against organized crime and, when necessary, bring problems in these areas to my attention.

State and local law enforcement training at the Federal facility in Glynco, Georgia. This center, which will complement the already excellent training programs run by the FBI and DEA, will assist and train local law enforcement agents and officials in combating new kinds of syndicated crime, such as arson, bombing, bribery, computer theft, contract fraud, and bid-rigging, as well as drug smuggling.

Sixth, this administration will open a new legislative offensive that is aimed to win approval of reforms in criminal statutes dealing with bail, sentencing, criminal forfeiture, the exclusionary rule, and labor racketeering, that are essential in the fight against organized crime.

Seventh, I will ask that the Attorney General be required to submit a yearly report to the people, through the President and the Congress, on the status of the fight against organized crime and organized criminal groups dealing in drugs. This requirement, although simple and inexpensive, will establish a formal mechanism through which the Justice Department will take a yearly inventory of its efforts in this area and report to the American people on its progress.

I believe this program will prove to be a highly effective attack on drug trafficking and the even larger problem of organized crime. In fact, its first year will probably cost less than what is spent in one day on illegal drugs in this country or what is spent in one week by many Federal programs. But let this much be clear: Our commitment to this program is unshakable. We intend to do what is necessary to end the drug menace and cripple organized crime.

We live at a turning point -- one of those critical eras in history when time and circumstances unite with the sound instincts of good and decent people to make a crucial difference in the lives of future generations. We can and will make a difference.

It comes down in the end to a simple question we must ask ourselves: What kind of people are we if we continue to tolerate in our midst an invisible, lawless empire? Can we honestly say that America is a land with justice for all if we do not now exert every effort to eliminate this confederation of professional criminals, this dark, evil enemy within?

You know the answer to that question. The American people want the mob and its associates brought to justice and their power broken -- not out of a sense of vengeance, but out of a sense of justice; not just from an obligation to punish the guilty but from an even stronger obligation to protect the innocent; not simply for the sake of legalities but for the sake of the law that is the protection of liberty.

This is the great Pele, and I don't think there's ever been a soccer player in the history of the game that has the record that he has worldwide as a great player -- playing in the World Cup many times, and started when he was 16 years old. And this is Steve Moyers, who is with the New York Cosmos, and is the greatest American-born scorer in American soccer.

And Pele is working very hard to bring something about that I think all of you would look forward to with great joy, and that is, in the spreading of soccer as a sport throughout the world -- and he's been instrumental in doing that -- to bring the United States into World Cup competition, so that we join in the -- it's every 4 years, isn't it? The World Cup?

I have signed into law H.R. 5930, a bill to extend for 5 years the program that provides insurance to air carriers in cases where U.S. military or foreign policy interests require aviation operations that do not qualify for commercial insurance.

This legislation also leaves jurisdiction over domestic airline mergers, acquisitions, consolidations, and interlocking relationships relating to domestic air transportation at the Civil Aeronautics Board (CAB) until January 1, 1985. Under the Airline Deregulation Act, this authority was scheduled to transfer to the Department of Justice on January 1, 1983, as part of the sunset of CAB functions. H.R. 5930 delays for 2 years the transfer to Justice of domestic airline merger authority so that domestic and international airline mergers are handled by the same agency. With the signing of this legislation, I reaffirm that this administration is committed to full deregulation of the airline industry, to the sunset of the CAB no later than January 1, 1985 (the date scheduled in the Airline Deregulation Act), and to having airline mergers, acquisitions, consolidations, and interlocking relationships reviewed by the Department of Justice under normal antitrust standards and procedures, as is the case for other nonregulated industries.

Employment Amendments of 1982.'' This bill will provide a 7.4 percent cost-of-living increase to some 2.3 million veterans with service-connected disabilities. It will also provide the same percentage increase to approximately 319,000 widows and children of veterans whose deaths were service-connected. These increases will be retroactive to October 1 of this year.

I am also happy to say that this legislation does not stop there. H.R. 6782 will benefit our veterans in other ways as well. The bill provides a higher compensation rate for certain blind veterans. It extends the period during which certain Vietnam-era veterans can continue vocational training. It makes a number of improvements in the Veterans Administration's insurance and burial benefits programs. And finally, it is aimed at strengthening the Department of Labor's programs to help veterans gain employment.

I am always gratified when administration proposals are passed by the Congress. But I am especially gratified that the 7.4-percent increase in benefits and the other provisions of this legislation have now become law.

This country owes a very special debt to those veterans who have sacrificed their lives for the defense of this nation and to all veterans who unselfishly served their country. This legislation demonstrates the Nation's continuing commitment and support for the men and women who have served in our military forces.

I want to commend Chairman Alan Simpson and Chairman Sonny Montgomery and the other members of the Senate and House Veterans' Affairs Committees for their skillful and dedicated stewardship of this bill.

Since I couldn't personally get to each district, the Republican National Committee came up with this means of beaming me out to gatherings all over the country. So, I'm being bounced off a satellite and then down to your individual gathering. We've come a long way since my days in radio at WHO in Des Moines. But I'll admit I'm a little worried -- the way I'm beaming all over the place, I'm afraid someone might mistake me for Jerry Brown, California's Mr. Medfly.

But no matter what the electronic election techniques, politics still depends on people, people at the grassroots like all of you out there tonight. You make the difference in every election, and you're going to make the difference in this one as well. I'm upbeat about November 2d because our candidates are good, like the ones we're supporting tonight. And in spite of what you sometimes hear on the news, I believe the issues are on our side.

For example, the economy. Rather than running away from the economic issue, I think the real economic record is in our favor if we can just get the truth out. We Republicans are doing a good job cleaning up a mess that built up for decades, and I'm genuinely convinced the American people understand that and will show it on election day. The economic issue that the opposition is trying to bully us with is like the bully himself -- once you stand up to him, he slinks away. Five economic problems, as I said last night, were beating this country over the head when we came to Washington 20 months ago: runaway spending; double-digit inflation, 2 years of it, back to back, for the first time in 60 years; the worst interest rates in 100 years; the highest peacetime tax burden in our history as a nation; and high unemployment.

Well, we've made dramatic gains on four of those five problems. The good news Republicans can run on is an inflation rate that reached a peak of 18 percent in January of 1980 but that has now been cut to 5.1 percent for the first 8 months of this year. The prime interest rate reached 21\1/2\ percent before we came to office and has now been knocked down to 12 percent, and we're not by any means finished with it yet.

More good news Republicans can run on is the cut in growth of government spending by nearly two-thirds -- 17 percent a year down to 6 percent. And we will have cut tax rates 25 percent by next July. And last month, auto sales went up by 8\1/2\ percent. If you want more good news, look at what the stock and bond markets are doing as confidence returns to Wall Street and Main Street investors from coast to coast.

Yes, there are still tough problems, especially that tragic unemployment rate. Sadly, unemployment is always just about the last to feel a recovery. But we're going to beat unemployment, just as we're beating the rest of our economic problems. And when we get it licked this time it's going to stay licked, because the recovery will be a real one, not an artificial quick fix trumped up by Washington's big spenders.

Incidentally, I heard that diatribe that followed my broadcast last night. The dictionary says a demagogue is ``one who arouses people's emotions for his own benefit or purpose.'' Well, the demagogue from Michigan held me personally responsible for causing 10.1 percent of our work force to be unemployed. But 7.4 percent of them were unemployed when we got here. By my figures, we're only responsible for 2.7 percent. But we're trying to help all 10.1 percent get jobs, which is more than our opponents can say. And we can do it with the new Republicans we'll elect this fall, and that's what we're all gathering for tonight.

The President. Well, Jack, I think the prospects are good. I'm optimistic about the Middle East and what's going on there. As you know, we've had our good man, Ambassador Habib, over there negotiating again, the man who brought about the cease-fire. And he is assisted by another one, his companion, Ambassador Draper. But what we're trying to do is, first, help the newly elected President over there, with our multinational force, establish stability in Lebanon. They've been, for several years, divided up into factions, each faction with its own militia. But I think progress is being made there. We've heard statements recently that both Israel and Syria have expressed their willingness to leave. They, I think, would like to do it simultaneously.

And so I think progress is being made. And then we've been in contact with the Arab nations, as well as with our friends and allies in Israel. And it will take negotiations under the Camp David pattern to bring about a just solution for the Palestinian refugees and at the same time have the other Arab States do what Egypt did first, and that is recognize the right of Israel to exist as a nation and have peace treaties with them. And I think that we have a very good chance of succeeding.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, we'll move on now to our second fundraiser in Denver, Colorado, where many of your friends and supporters, including Holly and Joe Coors and Congressman Guy Vander Jagt and Senator Bill Armstrong are there to honor three outstanding candidates -- one of whom is an incumbent, Ken Kramer, our good friend and supporter; former Apollo astronaut, Jack Swigert, who's running in the district out there, and John Buechner, who's challenging Tim Wirth in the tough race in the new second district out there.

The President. Courtland, I believe that we're on the way, if that's possible at all, that we're going to do it now with the policy that we've been following. As you know, we have negotiating teams negotiating -- well, three of them in Geneva, Switzerland, one in Vienna -- and we're negotiating for a reduction of conventional arms and weapons. But in Switzerland, we're also negotiating -- two teams -- negotiating a reduction, a legitimate reduction in the strategic nuclear weapons. And the other one is negotiating, and we have proposed, down to zero, the intermediate-range nuclear weapons in Europe.

And we have no deterrent whatsoever, but have promised our allies, at their request, that we're going to provide the Pershing II missiles as a deterrent force aimed at Russian targets. We have proposed that if they will eliminate their SS - 20 weapons, we will refrain from installing those Pershing II missiles of ours in Europe.

Now, the reason that I am optimistic is because in years past, we have tried to negotiate arms limitation treaties with the Soviet Union at the same time -- that is, in the previous few years, we were unilaterally disarming. We were canceling the B - 1 bomber, we were reducing our forces in strength, and so forth. We have embarked on a course of a legitimate buildup to ensure our own national security, and this is what has brought the Soviets to the bargaining table, ready to negotiate.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, we move next to Michigan, the home of that demagogue that you mentioned earlier in your speech, who the good citizens there are going to retire. Tonight they're there honoring Congressman Jim Dunn and our outstanding candidate Dick Milliman. As you know, Congressman Jim Dunn is in a rematch with Bob Carr, who we defeated and retired and will keep retired. And Dick Milliman is one of our outstanding candidates who's challenging Howard Wolpe there. Dick is going to ask the question, Mr. President.

Now, as I said last night, inflation caused the high interest rates, and between the two of them, they have caused the slowdown that has created that unemployment. Since that time -- I gave those figures earlier in how far we have come down in interest rates and inflation. The next to follow must be unemployment. But in all the recessions in the past, when they've had the quick fixes, unemployment never came down in a recovery as far as it had been before the recession.

I wish that I could say there was something that we could do instantly. What they did in the past, in those other seven recessions was, of course, artificial stimulants, pump up the money supply, and then up went the inflation and up went the interest rates. And yes, there would be, because of make-work programs, government-funded programs of many billions of dollars that were temporary, that didn't lead to any set job, and this would seemingly give an end to the recession.

Now we're trying to make it permanent. And I know that it will take some time for the unemployment to feel the effect of the reduced inflation and the reduced interest rates, but I believe it is the only way to ensure permanency. And I think if we remind the voters out there and remind those people who are unemployed -- and no one can feel worse about that than a person like myself, who was in the job market in the Great Depression of the thirties -- but remind them that the unemployment started long before our economic recovery program, and nothing was being done about it that was permanent or lasting. And now these other figures are coming down, and I think unemployment is going to, also.

In the meantime, we have and are funding extensions of unemployment in the hard-hit States for those who have run out their time period for unemployment insurance. We have just recently passed a job training bill in which we're going to be training a million people a year for legitimate jobs, the kind of jobs that are available in your various communities.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, we move next to Mansfield, Ohio, which is the home of our good friend, Congressman Mike Oxley. Mike has the best of all worlds. Because of his tremendous support for you and the outstanding individual, he has no opponent November 2d. So, we're sure of having one good vote for us next year. Asking the question in Mansfield is Dr. Bob Jones, who is a doctor of internal medicine. He's married and has four children; good supporter of yours.

The President. Well, Doctor, my prognosis is optimistic. I think that we've got good candidates out there. We have got good funds. And we have kept with a tradition that's been true for over a quarter of a century in the Republican Party; and that is that even though the Democrats continue to call us the party of the fat cats and the rich, the Republican Party, as it has for a quarter of a century, has raised the most of its money from small contributors, and far more from small contributors than our opponents have raised. And between these two things, the kind of candidates we have and people like yourself out there who have turned out at these affairs to be of help.

House, there is a great loss in the Congress. Well, I don't think there's going to be as great a loss as is traditional. I think we're going to do better than the tradition would have it. And we're going to get some of those fine new candidates, and we're going to get our incumbents back.

Tennessee, to the home of the Tullahoma High School auditorium, where many of our friends and supporters are there to honor Cissy Baker, who is a good friend of a good friend of yours -- is a daughter of a good friend of yours, as you know, Senate Majority Leader Howard Baker.

Asking the question tonight from Tennessee is Mr. Jess Heldt, who's president of Worthsports, who is a longtime Republican, a good supporter of Senator Baker, yourself, and been very helpful with Cissy.

Now, why is it so vital? We have a Republican Senate, a majority. And when you get a majority, even by one vote, you name the chairmen of the committees and you have the majority of the committees. But the other House, the House of Representatives, the majority is of the opposition party.

And the leadership of that party -- to give you an example: the amendment, proposed amendment for, I believe it was, for the constitutional amendment of balancing the budget had been buried in committee over in that side of the house, in the House side for, well, just about a year. It was in the committee, and it had been buried all this time, and then it took 218 names in the House -- some Democrats, I will say, joined us -- to, by petition, get it out of the committee on the floor, after it had been passed by more than a two-thirds majority in the Senate. Then, when it was voted on, a majority of the House voted for that amendment, but it wasn't a two-thirds majority, so it's failed, and we have to start over again.

What I'm getting at is that for almost solidly back over, through the Eisenhower years, we have had both houses of the legislature, the Congress, dominated by the Democratic Party, even when we had Republican Presidents. The only Republican President who had a Republican Congress was one 2-year period, Dwight Eisenhower. And in that 2-year period, inflation was zero, practically, unemployment was down at 2\1/2\ percent, and all of the figures were that way.

Now, when I stop to think of our own economic recovery program and the compromises that we had to make to get it through the House -- we had called for a 30-percent tax cut to be retroactive to January 1st, 1981. We only got 5 percent, and it started in July 1st, not retroactive to January, and then, 10 percent the next October, and we're getting 10 percent -- I maybe have these dates wrong. No, I think it was a 5 percent, October, and the 10 percent in July, and the next 10 percent will be in this next July. But what I'm getting at is that we have a Republican executive branch now. We have a Republican Senate. We haven't really been given a fair chance at showing what we can do with that division there in the Congress.

Congress, even when there was a Republican President, they are the ones, the Congress, they are the ones who passed the programs. They're the ones who decide on the spending bills and so forth, and they are the ones who have built up a trillion-dollar debt that we're paying $110 billion a year interest on.

Republican majority, if we have Republican majorities in the committees so that the things that are proposed and are passed in committee come out to the floor so that the Representatives and the Senators can vote on them, that's what we have to have.

Mr. Hughes. Good evening, Mr. President. It would appear that many economic indicators are showing improvement. Can you provide any specifics for additional reduction in government spending and taxation, and what do you foresee as the role of the 98th Congress?

The President. The role of the 98th Congress, George, is to continue giving us support for our economic recovery program, which means making the additional reductions in spending. Now, in these 2 years, '81 and '82, we have made about -- well, no, I'm off on my figures again -- '82 and the coming budget resolution that's been passed for '83 will amount to about $50 billion reduction in the increases that have been scheduled. We've never reached a point in which we could actually cut a budget back to smaller than it was before. And that would be a dream come true.

But, as you know, when you submit a budget you have to make proposals on out for about 3 to 5 years ahead. And, so, when we came here and inherited in the 1981 fiscal year the budget already passed, we also inherited the projected budgets for '82 and '83. We have reduced those projections by $50 billion.

Now, the Congress has promised us -- with the combination tax and spending program that was passed this summer -- they promised us $3 in cuts, spending cuts, for every dollar of increased revenue in that tax program over the next 3 years. That's about $380 billion of spending cuts. And we must hold them to that promise that, over the next 3 years, we're going to reduce the scheduled increases in government spending by those $380 billion, to get those deficits down, and come to the day when we will have a balanced budget.

Now, I don't foresee any tax increases, as far as we're concerned, that we would introduce. I must remind you, however, the biggest tax increase that was ever passed in our history was passed in 1977, and it was a payroll increase in social security. And there are two more installments of that yet to come, in 1985 and, I believe, in 1990. And those are scheduled and are in the law that was passed in '77, under the previous administration.

The President. What we need are more Republicans like Gerald Caywood in Washington to help us against the leadership of the House which has never agreed with our progam of cutting, which is still dedicated to the big spending by the Federal Government and the belief that the Federal Government and government programs are the answer to all our problems. And they can't see that over these past decades, government is not the answer to the problems; government is the problem.

So, this election is all-important from that standpoint. I have to be honest and say that we have had the support of some Democrats that I think represent the feeling of the rank-and-file Democrats, millions of them, who are out of step with this party leadership and who have collaborated with us in getting the cuts that we've gotten so far and getting the tax cuts that we've gotten so far.

As the economy improves and as we begin to improve on the unemployment situation, you are going to see that we're going to do better at reducing those deficits, also, because every added 1 percentage point of unemployment adds about $25 billion to the deficit -- that is in lost revenue by the individual not working, and in the benefits that must be paid out. So, again, the economic recovery program is the best answer that we can have.

I wish it were possible all at once to simply make a slash in the spending. As I said in my opening remarks, we reduced the increase from year to year in spending from 17 percent down to 6 percent. But to go beyond that, you can't do it all at once, because you would be pulling the rug out from under people without any warning or any provision for them -- people who through no fault of their own have become dependent on some of the government programs. And I have pledged that while we're going to bring down the spending, we are going to preserve that safety net for those people who must depend on the rest of us for their livelihood.

Mr. Brown. Mr. President, we've all heard about your new federalism program. When do you expect this program to take place, and what benefits can we in Bellingham, Washington, expect once these programs are turned back to State and local government?

Now, what we need from the Congress, we need legislation on, is the part of the program that will allow us to transfer programs -- the part of the programs now being run by the Federal Government -- that we believe can be better run at local and State levels; to transfer those programs back and, at the same time, transfer back the sources of revenue. In other words, we're not going to dump them on you out there at the local and the State level. We're going to make it possible -- the dream is that eventually we give you back the programs that the Constitution always indicated should be run by the States, by the local communities. The Federal Government is supposed to do only those things specifically called for in the Constitution. That's article [amendment] 10, and that's been abused quite considerably.

Now, where we believe that will benefit you is that you, closer to the scene, know more about those local problems and how they can best be resolved than a bureaucracy here in Washington can know, and the administrative overhead is much higher in Washington than it is at local, county, and State government. Therefore, a lot of the money that is now not going, let's say, to the problem that you're trying to solve, but is going to an expensive bureaucracy for administration, that money will be freed up, and it will mean that the programs will actually cost less for both.

We expect to suggest that program if not -- well, I don't think that it would be wise for us to put it up in the special session that will come in November, but immediately after the first of the year, with the 98th Congress, we are going to present this program. We've been working on it in company with Governors, with mayors, with city councilmen, with State legislators, county officials, ironing out the wrinkles in it, and we'll be ready in January to present it.

Ms. Beaulieu. Well, Mr. President, I understand there are about a dozen Congressmen who are actually cosponsors of the balanced budget constitutional amendment, but who deceived the public and voted against it anyway. I'm sorry to say my Congressman, Norman D'Amours, was one of those flip-floppers. What can we do about this group of Congressmen, and do you think there's a chance of passing a balanced budget amendment next year?

The President. We're going to be back asking for that balanced budget next year. Over 40 States have that in their State constitutions. My own State of California, when I was Governor, it has that. It works, and it's the only way we're really going to get control of spending, is to have that.

The people -- in the polls, it showed that 80 percent of them want it. And what we have to do, you say, about those Congressmen like your opponent who flip-flopped on things of that kind -- forgive me, but may I say to all of you out there, I don't think that we pay enough attention to what goes on in Washington while it's going on. And therefore, candidates can say one thing and then do another and vote another way and very often get away with it, just simply because the people aren't aware. Don't let them get away with it. Keep track of how they're voting. And when they vote right, go out of your way to drop them a note and let them know they voted right.

Senate out there in the State government and was the architect of a very good reapportionment plan. Unfortunately, there weren't enough votes in the legislature, and Phil Burton got his plan through. But hopefully, the district that Roger is running in is not so badly drawn that he can't win in November. Roger will ask you the question himself, Mr. President.

Mr. Canfield. Yes, Mr. President. This is Roger Canfield, suburban Sacramento. And we're concerned out here with what government can do about crime, considering that's the purpose of government, to protect our life and property. I'm running against a guy out here who's against the death penalty and voted for reduced penalties for rape.

Now, I recognize that the Federal Government can only do so much in that because most of our criminal statutes are State statutes and, therefore, it is local law enforcement and local and State government that has to do with that. But our eight-point crime program is aimed at organized crime. We have had a tremendous success with a brand new kind of task force in south Florida, where about 80 percent of the drugs that were coming in from the other countries were coming in through south Florida. And our task force lined up local and State government and our Federal forces, even up to and including military, giving us tracking of boats and planes that were bringing in drugs. And we literally have stopped it cold there.

Now, of course, the drug runners are seeking out other entry points in the country. So, part of our program this morning called for 12 such task forces, nationwide, to go after this, as well as the program against organized crime.

Government doing more in this whole field of crime, including the fact that we're making a training institution here that has been for Federal officers and FBI and Secret Service and so forth -- this is going to now be made available to local law enforcement officers, so that we can have better cooperation. And I think we're going to make a difference.

The President. Yes, we do. We are proceeding on that course. It isn't easy. I know that it sounds to the average person as if -- well, why can't you just say it's out of business and it's out of business? You have to remember that when a department like that, a Cabinet department was formed, it didn't start from scratch. There were a number of programs already in place in other agencies of the Government that are essential programs, and that the Federal Government should be maintaining, and they were lumped together in this new department.

So, part of the engineering is the redistribution of these programs back to the other agencies where they were. And, of course, part of it again is hostility on the part of our opponents in the House against eliminating this department. But we think that it's the right thing to do.

We think that we've made some good progress there in things like the decontrol. I remember our opponents said that gasoline was going to cost $2 a gallon if we did it. Today we're about 91 percent self-sufficient in this. And it isn't costing $2 a gallon. It's costing less than it did under controls and all. So, we're going to keep on going until we get that department eliminated.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, that concludes our quick visit around the country. Many of these outstanding candidates and incumbents and their tremendous supporters, I know, have been supporters of yours over the years. And we look forward to having them all back here to work with in January 1982.

In closing, I just want to say how essential all of you are to our cause. It's an old truth, but every vote does count. And the results of this election will hinge, perhaps more than anything else, on voter turnout.

The basic job of identifying supporters and getting them to the polls is still one of the most important in politics. Technology like we're enjoying tonight can't replace the hard work of getting out the vote. As I've said, I believe we're going to do well. We've got fine candidates, a wide base of contributors, an efficient party organization, and we've got good issues -- issues the people of this nation truly care about.

It's up to you Republicans at the grassroots to make sure that the voters understand how important the choice is this year -- the choice between going back to old policies that didn't work, or going ahead in the new direction we've set. We're on a new road now, a road that's leading America to better times. Unless we have the courage to stay on course and defeat our economic problems now, we'll never have lasting recovery, and our problems will grow worse than before.

Well, I intend to stay the course, and we're going to succeed. But we need your support. So, please promise me that you will mobilize and get out the vote for a great Republican victory on November 2d.

American dream. But we can do it. Throughout our history, we Americans have proven again and again that no challenge is too big for a free, united people. Together, we can do it again. And we can start making those dreams come true by electing Republican candidates to office.

I'd like to discuss with you for a few moments the plans our administration has to meet important agricultural challenges we face together. I'm talking about increasing American farm exports, restoring our reputation as reliable suppliers, and regaining our world market share.

Before I do, may I just take a moment to congratulate you? Once again, you're making something look easy that would be considered a miracle almost anywhere else in the world. Farmers all over America are harvesting record crops. You know, I've always thought that when we Americans get up in the morning, when we see bacon, eggs, toast, and milk on our breakfast table, we should give thanks that our farmers are survivors. You are the real miracle workers of the modern world -- keepers of an incredible system based on faith, freedom, hard work, productivity, and profit -- a system that feeds us and sustains millions of the world's hungry.

Too often, people forget a basic fact of life: All those good things we enjoy come from the ache in your backs and your willingness to shoulder great personal risks. Right now, another fact of life in America's heartland is that things haven't been very good down on the farm. You who produce the food and fiber essential to life itself are carrying tremendous burdens -- sometimes impossible burdens. U.S. agriculture is in the grip of a prolonged economic recession that began in 1980. The record inflation and interest rates of the late seventies and that mistaken Soviet grain embargo laid the seeds for a very different, bitter kind of harvest -- a vicious cost-price squeeze and lost markets. Together, they eroded confidence and destroyed too many dreams for prosperity.

From the moment we arrived in Washington, we've been working to solve those long-neglected problems that were dragging America down. Like any small businessman, a farmer lives or dies on his ability to sustain an adequate cash flow, and when that cash flow is reduced to a trickle by high inflation and high interest rates, a farmer sometimes has no option but to shut down his operation.

It's been tough, slow work, and as I told the Nation Wednesday night, we still have a long way to go. But we're beginning to make real progress on four of the five most serious problems we inherited. We are bringing down spending, bringing down inflation, bringing down interest rates, and reducing your taxes.

You know, one of the parts of our tax program that I'm most proud of addresses a special problem for farmers. We don't think widows and children should lose what generations of love and toil created just to pay Uncle Sam a tax, so we took action to correct that. We increased the estate tax exemption to $600,000 by 1987, and we eliminated altogether the estate tax for a surviving spouse. I hope all these steps are beginning to bring some relief on your cost side of the equation.

As for prices, well, there are really only two ways to increase farmers' income -- sell more or produce less. Now, I'm not one who believes you should be cursed by your own success. The philosophy of this administration is to help farmers to succeed in the marketplace, not depend on the U.S. Treasury. Deciding how much to produce and how much to sell is best left to you. We, in turn, will make every effort to remove the barriers to the exporting of your products.

As you know, our administration moved early on to end that grain embargo which had hurt farmers so badly. Before the Soviet embargo, American farmers were supplying about 70 percent of Soviet needs. After the embargo, our market share dropped to less than 25 percent. Other nations had quickly moved in to fill the gap left by the embargo, so that our farmers, and our farmers almost alone, bore the brunt of the embargo. This year, we've fought our way back to 35 percent of the Soviet market. We're on our way back up. We can and we will do better there and around the world.

Nothing is more crucial to the long-term health of agriculture than restoring this nation's reputation as a reliable supplier of agricultural products around the world. During the past 20 months, we've pursued an agricultural export policy making three things plain: No restrictions will be imposed on farm exports because of rising domestic prices; no farm exports will be singled out as an instrument of foreign policy, except in extreme situations, and then only as part of a broad embargo supported by our trading partners; and world markets must be freed of trade barriers and unfair trade practices.

Treasury, Commerce, and the U.S. Trade Representative, to speak out and act against the unfair trade practices of our competitors abroad. We're committed to more open agricultural markets in all countries, and we're challenging others in negotiations, particularly our friends in Europe and Japan, to fully match this commitment.

Now, in spite of my strong commitment, I know there is still concern in the farm community that we've not given sufficient assurance of delivery of our farm exports. I can understand farmers' skepticism. You've been burned so often in the past. But our new agricultural export policy means exactly what it says: We will honor our word.

Second, the Secretary of Agriculture will extend to the additional purchases the same assurances of reliable delivery that the 8 million metric tons are afforded under article 2 of the agreement, if the U.S.S.R. will contract for the additional tonnage during the month of November, and provided that it is shipped within 180 days from the date of the contract.

These same assurances, of course, also apply to soybean and other agricultural exports. We have a large crop. We need commitments to move that crop and strengthen markets. Now, of course, we can't guarantee the Soviets will make these purchases, but we know they're shopping, and they still have large needs.

We want to demonstrate that actions speak louder than words, and we're taking tangible actions to restore this market. Year-in, year-out, there is no better, more reliable producer of food anywhere than the United States of America.

It's always seemed ironic to me that many people who are so quick to sacrifice the interest of farmers in an effort to seem tough are unwilling to do the real things we need to send a signal of national will and strength.

During the last decade, we had two grain embargoes. But during those same years we were also reducing our commitment to a strong national defense, while the Soviets were undertaking the most massive military buildup in history. We're not making that mistake in 1982; we have our priorities straight.

Thank you for keeping up the struggle. Thank you for your strength, your vision, and your faith. I know we can return prosperity to our heartland and to America. God has blessed us with a strong spirit and rich soil. With His help and yours we can make America once again the source of all the dreams and opportunities she was placed on this good Earth to provide.

Thank you all very much, and thank you for joining us to sign this historic reform. This bill is the most important legislation for financial institutions in the last 50 years. It provides a long-term solution for troubled thrift institutions. It's proconsumer, granting small savers greater access to loans, a higher return on their savings. And when combined with recent sharp declines in interest rates, it means help for housing, more jobs, and new growth for the economy. All in all, I think we hit the jackpot.

Let me just divert here for a moment to underline the importance of something that we've been saying since our administration took over. Bringing down inflation brings down interest rates which brings backs the economy. And what a better way to cap off a big week of momentum toward recovery than this morning's Producer Price Index report -- down another one-tenth of 1 percent last month, and up only 3.1 percent so far this year. If that rate holds steady, it'll be the best performance in 10 years.

Now, this bill also represents the first step in our administration's comprehensive program of financial deregulation. I particularly want to commend the leadership of the chairman, Senator Garn, and Chairman St Germain, along with Secretary Regan and his fine team at Treasury. They did a remarkable job forging a consensus within the Congress and among affected industries in favor of the bill's deregulatory provisions. I'd like to also thank Congressmen Stanton, Wylie, and LaFalce for their assistance.

What this legislation does is expand the powers of thrift institutions by permitting the industry to make commercial loans and increase their consumer lending. It reduces their exposure to changes in the housing market and in interest rate levels. This in turn will make the thrift industry a stronger, more effective force in financing housing for millions of Americans in the years to come.

Unfortunately, this legislation does not deal with the important question of delivery of other financial services, including securities activities by banks and other depository institutions. But I'm advised that many in the Congress want to put this question at the top of the banking deregulatory agenda next year, and I would strongly endorse such an initiative and hope that at the same time, the Congress will consider other proposals for more comprehensive deregulation which the administration advanced during the 97th Congress.

The designation of the Council House, the last official residence of Mary McLeod Bethune, will preserve this symbol of the rich legacy provided this nation as a result of the life and work of this great American -- a black woman who inspired countless others of her generation and beyond.

Council House was the first national headquarters of the National Council of Negro Women and was a significant center for the development of strategies and programs which advanced the interests of the black community.

This is a very important piece of legislation because it provides the authority for $7 billion of vitally needed facilities in 49 States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and 19 foreign countries to support the military services, their Guard and Reserve components, the defense agencies, and our military family housing program. These facilities will contribute significantly to the achievement of a higher degree of readiness and mobilization capability and improve the quality of life for many of our military personnel and their families.

Another is the enhancement of our overall readiness in Europe. Another is the enhancement of our military posture in Indian Ocean and Persian Gulf areas, where critical United States interests are threatened. The third is consideration for high-priority national programs, such as energy conservation and pollution abatement.

While the primary purpose of the Military Construction Authorization Act is to meet urgent military requirements, a side benefit to the economy of our country and to the American construction industry is the jobs created.

H.R. 1371 would require the Federal Government to pay interest to contractors on claims in excess of $50,000 without regard to the date the claims are certified, as now required by section 6(c) of the Contract Disputes Act. The bill would also require the Secretary of the Treasury to determine interest rates to be paid contractors, taking into account the rates of interest on current commercial loans maturing in approximately five years.

Traditionally, the Government's sovereign immunity has barred interest payments unless the terms of a specific statute or contract required it. Among other reforms suggested by the Commission on Government Procurement in 1972 was a recommendation that the Federal Government pay interest on contractual claims. As a result of this recommendation, Congress passed the Contract Disputes Act of 1978.

I have no objection to the language in H.R. 1371 concerning the way in which interest rates on contractual claims against the Government are determined. I strongly object, however, to other language in the bill that would amend the Contract Disputes Act to require that interest on a claim run from the time a claim is submitted without regard to the date of certification of the contractor's claim. This provision is inconsistent with the purpose of the certification requirement of the Contract Disputes Act. That requirement is intended to discourage the submission of inflated claims against the Government by requiring contractors to certify that their claims are made in good faith and are accurate and complete to the best of their knowledge.

By permitting interest to run from the date a claim is submitted, instead of from the date of certification, as current law provides, H.R. 1371 could result in a large increase in Governmental obligations without any corresponding benefits to the claims resolution process so carefully established in the Contract Disputes Act. For this reason, and considering that there have been no hearings or studies conducted addressing the need for such a substantial departure from existing law, I find the bill unacceptable.

As I pointed out, from day one of this administration, we've been working hard to solve five big economic problems. Problem number one, government was taking too much of your money in high taxes. Number two, government was spending and borrowing too much money, including service on a trillion-dollar debt. This led to number three, backbreaking inflation, which added so much to the burden of millions of Americans trying to make ends meet. And, of course, inflation and government borrowing led to a fourth problem, the high interest rates that made it hard or impossible for people to afford the homes, the cars, the other purchases that keep our economy moving and provide jobs -- the final problem.

Well, step by step, we're licking those problems. We fought for and won a tax break that will bring down your income tax rates a total of 25 percent when the final installment goes into effect next July 1st. We've reduced the rate of increases in Federal spending by nearly two-thirds. What we're aiming for is to get the annual increase in spending below the annual increase in revenues which takes place as our economy grows.

And just yesterday, we had another piece of good news. The Producer Price Index went down one-tenth of a percent last month, for an average of only 3.1 percent so far this year. If we can hold that rate steady through December, it will be the best performance in 10 years, and another important step toward the inflation-proof recovery we're all working so hard for.

We're winning the battle on four out of the five problems causing this recession. We've already floored inflation and sent those high interest rates reeling. And as surely as single-digit inflation started the interest rates tumbling, getting those interest rates back down to single digits will drive unemployment back down to single digits, too.

Once we've done that, we'll have delivered a knockout blow to this bitter recession, the latest in a long series of recessions brought about because, until now, our leaders resorted to quick fixes and politics as usual, to treating the symptoms instead of the disease.

Well, as I said last Wednesday, at my age I didn't come to Washington to play politics as usual or sweep problems under the rug where they would only get worse for those who came after. I came here to solve problems, not to add to them. And with your patience, faith, and, yes, courage, we've been able to lay the groundwork for a lasting recovery that will leave America stronger than ever and spare our children and grandchildren some of the things that we've had to endure because of the mistakes of the past.

I don't use that word ``courage'' lightly. To me, one of the most inspiring things about this job is the chance it's given me to see how bravely Americans from all walks of life have responded to the problems we face. Your courage is one of the most precious gifts as a people, and it's seen us through many a storm. This is not the time to lose that courage -- just when it's beginning to pay off.

One man summed it up best nearly 50 years ago, when America faced a far deeper economic crisis than the one we're working our way out of today -- the Great Depression of the thirties. ``The only thing we have to fear,'' said Franklin Roosevelt, ``is fear itself.'' He spoke that line in his Inaugural Address in March of 1933. We've been told that line was not intended to be a major point in his address. Still, those were the words more than any others on that March morning that gave back to the American people their courage, their faith in themselves and in this blessed country. It is the best remembered line of his speech.

In times of trouble, fear is a disease of the spirit that can slow recovery and be exploited by those who are more interested in taking advantage of our problems than in helping to solve them. And there are such people. Some are seeking political profit, and others are just naturally given to doomcrying.

Now, I'm not just whistling past the graveyard; nor am I trying to belittle the grief and pain of you, who through no fault of your own, are out of work. I'm saying the downbeat chorus we're being subjected to by so many these days can rob us of our courage. We must not let that happen.

Unemployment such as we have now is a terrible thing, but it may not be our number one problem. Our number one problem may be fear -- fear that we're adrift, that there is no plan, that no one is doing anything to make things better.

Well, that's not true. The improvement in inflation, interest rates, the increase in real wages, in savings and in retail auto sales, up 8\1/2\ percent in September, the surging stock market -- all these are the result of a plan, a plan that is working and that offers hope to you who are unemployed. Hang in there. I know from personal experience how tough it can be, but don't give up. And don't listen to those crepe hangers who are howling like a dog sitting on a sharp rock.

The time for confidence, the time for courage, is now. Thanks to you, we are nearing the end of a long and painful ordeal. With your prayers and support, with your confidence and courage, we can make the difference -- not just for ourselves, but for generations of Americans to come.

She was a devoted wife, a loving mother, and a gracious, unassuming First Lady. Bess Truman embodied the basic decency of America. Nancy and I convey our deepest sympathy to her family and to all who will miss this fine lady's goodness.

I am proud to sign into law today S. 1018, the Coastal Barrier Resources Act. This legislation will enhance both wise natural resource conservation and fiscal responsibility. It will save American taxpayers millions of dollars while, at the same time, taking a major step forward in the conservation of our magnificent coastal resources. S. 1018 is precisely the sort of imaginative environmental legislation this administration encourages -- legislation that solves real problems in the stewardship of our natural resources.

S. 1018 will prohibit new Federal expenditures and financial assistance on approximately 700 miles of undeveloped coastal barriers on the Atlantic and gulf coasts of the United States. It will not prohibit a property owner from building on his property, and it will not impose federally mandated duties on State or local governments. Instead, it simply adopts the sensible approach that risk associated with new private development in these sensitive areas should be borne by the private sector, not underwritten by the American taxpayer.

In the last 6 years alone, the Federal Government has spent more than $800 million to aid development and redevelopment of coastal barriers. A recent study estimates that the cost of Federal subsidies assisting initial construction in these areas averages more than $25,000 per acre.

These are also recurring costs: When the next storm or hurricane strikes, the Federal Government will again be expected to help replace the bridges and roads, utilities and buildings. In terms of replacement costs, the estimated Federal subsidies are more than $53,000 for each developed acre. By signing S. 1018 into law today, this administration is acting to halt this subsidy spiral.

In addition, we will stop the flow of Federal dollars that have helped to encourage development that otherwise would not be economical. The difficult task of balancing competing uses of resources is best performed by the market, free of Federal subsidies.

American Red Cross, the National Taxpayers Union, the coastal states organization, all of the major environmental and conservation organizations, and was enacted by the Congress with only four dissenting votes. This is a tribute to the commonsense philosophy of the legislation and the great leadership of its sponsors, Senator John Chafee and Congressman Tom Evans. I also want to thank the many others, such as Senators Strom Thurmond and Bob Stafford, who have made this law possible. My special thanks to Congressman John Breaux, who worked into the early morning hours on the day of recess to ensure final passage.

I want also to commend Secretary of the Interior Jim Watt for his efforts with regard to coastal barriers. An intensive, year-long study conducted at the Department of the Interior to identify undeveloped coastal barriers provided a firm foundation for this bill.

This administration is committed to applying the imagination and common sense demonstrated by this legislation to the resolution of other important national environmental concerns. With enactment of this landmark legislation, the Nation takes a major step foward on the road to restoring a sound fiscal and environmental balance to the programs of the Federal Government.

Even though we've made tremendous electronic advances, engineers still haven't been able to design a satellite that can knock on doors, lick envelopes, and turn out the troops. Politics still depends on people -- people at the grassroots like all of you out there tonight. You make the difference in every election. And you're going to make the difference in this one as well.

I'm upbeat about November 2d, because our candidates are good, like the ones we're supporting tonight. And, in spite of what you sometimes hear on the news, I believe the issues are on our side -- for example, the economy. Rather than running away from the economic issue, I think the real economic record is in our favor if we can just get the truth out. The economy is a banner we can wave, not something to hide behind. We Republicans are doing a good job cleaning up a mess that built up for decades. And I'm genuinely convinced the American people understand that and will show it on election day.

As I said in a broadcast like this to Republicans in other States last week, the economic issue that the opposition is trying to bully us is like the bully himself -- once you stand up to him, he slinks away. Five economic problems were beating this country over the head when we came to Washington 20 months ago: runaway spending; double-digit inflation -- 2 years of it, back to back, for the first time in 60 years; the highest, worst interest rates in a hundred years; the highest peacetime tax burden in our history as a nation; and high unemployment. Well, we made dramatic gains on four of those five problems.

The good news Republicans can run on is that an inflation rate that reached a peak of 18 percent in January of 1980 has been cut to 5.1 percent for the first 8 months of this year. The prime interest rate that reached 21\1/2\ percent before we came to office has now been knocked down to 12 percent. And we're not finished with it yet.

More good news -- Republicans can run on this -- the cut in growth of government spending by nearly two-thirds, 17 percent a year, down to 6 percent. And we will have cut income tax rates a total of 25 percent by next July. And last month, auto sales went up by 8\1/2\ percent. If you want more good news, look at what the stock and bond markets are doing as confidence returns to Wall Street and Main Street investors from coast to coast.

They told me that we set a record last year -- $1.4 billion for venture capital investments in small business. In 1977 there was less than 50 million for such purposes. That 1.4 billion means jobs -- jobs in new industries that will provide long-term employment. And the data, so far, indicates that we're going to top last year's figures this year.

The momentum for recovery is building. For too long, the economy was a locomotive that had been rolling backward down the hill. Well, we've stopped that slide, and we're once again heading upward toward better times. You can feel America's economic engines begin to rev up again. The economy is on the move. And, if I may say so, politically we're on the move, too.

Unfortunately, unemployment is always just about the last to feel a recovery. But we're going to beat unemployment, just as we're beating the rest of our economic problems. And when we get it licked this time, it's going to stay licked, because the recovery will be a real one, not an artificial quick fix trumped up by Washington's big spenders.

So, before I turn this over to questions, I just want to say thank you for all you're doing at the local level and the precinct level. And thanks again for working for these fine Republican candidates. They're the kind of conscientious and principled public leaders America needs. And I look forward to working with them in the next Congress.

Mr. Rollins. Thank you. Thank you very much, Mr. President. It's true; it's a privilege for me to be here and to be with all of our dear friends and supporters out there -- and their grassroots supporters.

Congressman George O'Brien, in the heartland of America -- your old home base, Joliet, Illinois, which isn't too far from Eureka. As you know, George was first elected to Congress in 1972 after a very distinguished career in the State legislature out there. He graduated with a law degree from Yale University. And, most important to us in this coming year, he sits on that very key House Appropriations Committee for us.

Mr. Feehand. Good evening. My question, sir, for you is a tough one. Illinois' biggest employer is the Caterpillar Tractor Company. Caterpillar has been badly hurt by your trade sanctions against Russia. And thousands of workers in Joliet have been laid off. Yet, the sanctions haven't helped Poland a bit and haven't hurt the Soviet Union. Isn't it time to lift those sanctions?

They've hurt in that that gas pipeline, when completed, is going to earn billions of dollars in hard, cold cash every year for the Soviet Union. And the Soviet Union, right now, is very hard pressed economically. This is going to make it possible for them to continue their great military buildup.

Now, I know Caterpillar very well -- I went to school 20 miles away from Caterpillar -- and I'm sorry about what has happened. But I do want to point out that these sanctions are not the sole reason for Caterpillar's trouble. A lot of their trouble -- and probably more than resulting from the sanctions -- is some unfair competition coming from some of our friends and allies and other countries abroad. And our Secretary of the Treasury and Secretary of Commerce, our foreign trade representative, Bill Brock, and others here are planning to meet with Caterpillar's executives about what we can do to equal things out, because I believe in free trade, but I believe in fair trade. And I don't think that Caterpillar or any other American company should be penalized by unfairness in the rules that are laid down and the obstacles to international trade. So, we can help in that way.

Now, let me just say one thing, also, about the sanctions. We didn't set out to have that as our principle thing that we could do to the Soviet Union to show our anger about what they're promoting in Poland. We sent representatives to Europe to talk to our allies about some other things that we believe could be more punishing to the Soviet Union than these sanctions. And we couldn't get agreement on those.

Mr. Rollins. Well, Mr. President, I know, as difficult as it is there, the real, key issue in this campaign, I think, is jobs. And I think it's very important for our candidates and good incumbents like George to go out and debate with the Democrats, and just ask them what they've offered as alternatives. There really aren't any alternatives. And I think someone like George O'Brien out leading the charge will do a very effective job for us.

Mr. Rollins. As difficult as it is to leave Illinois, our next stop is Honolulu, Hawaii, where the friends and supporters of State Senator Andy Anderson, who's our Republican nominee for Governor out there, are having a little hoedown or whatever they call it out there in the Big Island.

Andy, as you know, is a State senator who forged a coalition of Republicans and Democrats to take control of the State senate. And he has an old friend of yours, Stu Spencer, running his campaign, who tells me it's one of the best shots we have in the country of picking up a seat.

Tommy, as you know, is a former State senator in the State legislature in South Carolina who's president of the freshman class -- the 54 freshmen Republicans who gave you such tremendous support. And I don't know if we could do the job as effectively without Tommy's support. So, I know he's in a tough race, and we want him back here. And like someone else I know, he was a former Democrat who saw the light.

Republicans in the Congress have called our party ``cold-hearted.'' They have accused you of being an unfeeling social program cutter whose economic policies are causing needless sufferings on Americans. Sir, what is the real story?

When many of these great social reforms and programs were passed, aiming at helping the truly needy, then the bureaucracy begins to expand and wants to grow and empire build. Having taken care of the people that are really in need, there's only one way they can expand the program. They begin to raise the standards for eligibility so that people who don't have that real need are getting benefits. All of the cuts that we have made in such programs are aimed at taking people off those programs that really are not morally justified or materially justified in being there. They don't have real need of the program. We have not cut the programs down at the bottom.

But on fairness, let me point something out. In the decade of the seventies, the biggest welfare programs -- the Aid for Dependent Children program, in the decade of the seventies, our opponents were successful in raising the grants a full one-third, supposedly to keep pace with inflation. But in that same decade, they didn't keep pace, and the people on Aid for Dependent Children program, in spite of a one-third raise, actually their purchasing power with those benefit dollars dropped a full one-third.

Now, let me point something out. Today a family that is at the poverty level of income, not on welfare, they are getting almost $600 more in purchasing power because of what we've done to reduce inflation. If the Federal Government had a program to deliver 600 additional dollars to them, the Federal Government would spend about $1,800 to do it. That's how much administrative overhead there is in many of those programs.

So, we think that it was far more fair for us to give them that additional purchasing power to restore additional purchasing power that was going down and make it increase to the people on welfare, because their welfare dollars will now buy several hundred dollars more than they would before. We think that this is fair and that what they were doing might have -- they might have talked a fair game, but the people that were being hurt worst were the people that they claimed to be helping with all of their good intentions.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, you're so right, and it's so very, very necessary for Tommy and all of his freshmen colleagues to get reelected and come back here and help us in order so we can continue to carry on this program.

Mr. Rollins. We now move on to Grand Junction, Colorado, where we have an outstanding candidate who's running for the Colorado Third District, Mr. Tom Weins. Tom is an owner and operator of a radio station, is an old radio man. You understand some of the problems that he may have. But he also owns a construction company and a chain of ski rentals and just is an outstanding candidate, one of the best we have in the country.

Mr. Foster. We in western Colorado share your views on keeping the Government out of the private sector. But after studying the key role that energy plays in the national financial and defense security, it is apparent that the national interest must be considered on a longer term basis than the private sector can economically, feasibly consider.

Therefore, I am asking that with regard to the development of oil from shale and the temporary market dislocations in uranium, which threaten to destroy the domestic uranium mining industry, if the Government should not be interested in helping to close the gap for the initial development of technology in the shale and some measures, such as quotas, to prevent the complete destruction of the domestic uranium mining industry.

The President. Bill, we have helped, do mean to help, but we want it to be practical and necessary. We helped in three major synfuel projects, one of them there in Colorado. One of the three failed in spite of our help. But now we know that in that regard and with regard to shale, that there are companies proceeding on their own and able to do that. In fact, one is evidently having some great breakthroughs and great success, maybe others -- but this one I happen to know of, won't name it right now.

With regard to uranium, I believe in nuclear power. And I think it's been unnecessarily obstructed by a few antinuclear power activists. We think that by changing some cumbersome and useless regulations -- and I don't mean making it more dangerous or cutting down on safety factors, but some of the things that have enabled these activists to interfere with the development of more nuclear power -- in removing those obstacles that we can encourage continued development and more development of nuclear power. And that will take care of the uranium situation there.

Hatch, who I know the citizens there are going to send back. And they have two Congressmen, we presently have, Jim Hansen and Dan Marriott, who have been good strong supporters of ours -- and because of that, I think that they were rewarded with a new district this time. And our outstanding candidate in that new district and reapportionment is Howard Nielson.

Young University, former speaker of the Utah Legislature, and most important, he was chairman of the budget audit committee. And we need somebody back here who understands how to keep budgets balanced.

States. Today there are less than 2,400 and declining weekly. Does it not appear that it is in the best interests of some of the larger major oil companies, such as the Aramco group, to try and increase their domestic reserves while their foreign production continues to decline? We all know that their foreign oil production and sales gives them greater profitability and return on investment.

Do you have any plans in the immediate future to limit foreign imports or require special foreign oil import licenses on imported oil to encourage continued domestic exploration and production to make the United States less dependent on foreign oil?

The President. Earl, I don't believe that that is the answer to this problem. As a matter of fact, there are more rigs, still, with the great reduction this year, working than there were in any year before 1980. And our decontrol, getting government out of interfering with the energy industry, is what led to that great upsurge in domestic production. In 1980 we were importing 37 percent of our oil. We're now only importing 28 percent. It was 47 percent import as close as 1977.

What we think has happened and -- well, in fact, we know -- and has closed down a number of those rigs, happens to be the same thing that's causing all of our problems with regard to unemployment in the economy: high interest rates. This has made it uneconomic for a number of these newer drillings and rigs to continue producing. So, we're looking for ways to increase this by bringing down inflation and, thus, bringing down those interest rates. And we think that this will result in more.

But I just want to remind you that by getting the Government out of the business, that is what led to the development. And I remember when all of our critics over on the other side of the aisle told us that gasoline prices will go up to $2 a gallon if we decontrolled oil. Well, it didn't happen. We decontrolled oil, and prices went down for gasoline.

Dick is president of an independent insurance company, a former Marine Corps officer, president of the American Cancer Society in the State of Georgia. But, unfortunately, Mr. President, we'll have to wait a little longer than November 2d. In Georgia, because of reapportionment in the courts, we have to wait till November 30th to get Dick elected to the Congress. But we're willing to wait.

Mr. Winder.  It's a pleasure to talk to you tonight, and we are most anxious to know how you feel about the November 2d election. We hear a lot about what George Gallup says and also Dick Wirthlin, and we're very interested in how you feel that we will do on November 2d, with just 15 days left to go.

We all know that tradition has it that the party that gets the White House, 2 years later then in this bielection, is supposed to lose a great many seats. I think we're going to do better than tradition calls for. We've got good candidates all over the country, and we've got the funding. And I think the issues are with us, the issues on the economy. Just as I said earlier, because four out of five, we're scoring. And the one that we are still waiting on, unemployment, has always been the last to come back.

Incidentally, with all of those people that are jumping on us about the unemployment and wanting to lay it on our backs, you might be interested to know that the rate of increase in this recession of unemployment was just about the same as the rate of increase in unemployment in all the seven recessions that have taken place since World War II, previous to this one. So, we know that now that interest rates are coming down -- and inflation is bringing them down, the cut in inflation -- we know that we can look forward to an improvement in that particular thing.

Mr. President, we now move on to Suffolk County, New York. We have an outstanding candidate, Paul Costello. And Paul has a very unique background, and we certainly can use him here to help us. Paul is the inspector general of the Suffolk County Welfare Association, former vice president of the State Welfare Fraud Investigators Association, and Paul himself will ask you the question.

Margaret, who is a widow on a fixed income living in rental housing. The cost of housing has increased year after year with future generations being confronted with a lack of decent, affordable housing. My question, Mr. President: Do you have a program dealing with affordable housing? And, if so, what aspects of this program deal specifically with senior citizens?

As a matter of fact, Housing and Urban Development under Secretary Pierce has been working with builders and with local and State officials having to do with regulations and so forth on the building of housing. And they have been working at some experiments that, so far, have shown they can reduce the cost of the kind of housing we're talking about by about 20 percent. And that is quite a considerable accomplishment.

Also, now, they are working and working through the title 8 program with regard to building of rental properties, particularly for senior citizens, that will be smaller than something that has been built in the past. And for many senior citizens, that is desirable. They don't want needless space, and they do want an easy-to-care-for and affordable rental space. And so, that will further reduce the cost of producing housing of the kind that you're talking about.

To have them fighting against that program, when they have no alternative except to go back to the programs which they themselves put into effect for the last two or three decades, and which caused the problems and the trillion-dollar debt and so forth -- here's what happened.

Let's take our economic program. We called for three 10-percent installments in cuts in the income tax to be retroactive to January 1st of 1981. We got on the first one, 5 percent, but not going into effect until October 1st, all those -- about 8 months later.

Then we had some further setbacks in not getting all of the spending cuts we wanted. And this was because in the House the majority is Democrat and under Democrat leadership, and they name all the chairmen of the committees and the majority to the committees.

We see such things as the balanced budget amendment and Tip O'Neill's leadership, they had that amendment bottled up in a committee in the House for over a year. The Senate passed it by a two-thirds majority, and finally on the last day of this session, before they recessed for the campaign, it was brought to the floor by 218 signatures on a recall petition. They never would have let it out. But then, having it brought to the floor that way, they brought up a phony amendment that would never work so that their Members could go home and say that they had voted for a balanced budget amendment, even though it failed. And then when that one was roundly defeated and the regular amendment came up on the floor, before we had time to marshal people like yourselves to let their Congressmen know what they wanted, it failed. It got a majority. But it takes a two-thirds majority for an amendment. So, it didn't pass.

Congressmen there who will provide the votes that we need to give the people what 80 percent of you have said you wanted in the polls. And that is a constitutional amendment that requires the Congress to balance the budget.

Mr. Rollins. For our last visit, Mr. President, tonight, we're going to go to St. Louis, Missouri, and we're going to be there with Mayor Harold Dielmann, who's our candidate in the Missouri Second District. Harold is the mayor of Creve Coeur, and while there he's cut taxes three times, while he was the mayor there. He's a former president of the St. Louis County Municipal League, and that's the kind of local official we need to have here in Washington. Harold's going to ask you the question himself.

I'm holding in my hand here, Mr. President, a letter that was sent to all our constituents in our district by my opponent, stating how much he likes the balanced budget and how he actually sponsored the House bill number 350. And this letter is dated September 27th. And 4 days later, October 1st, he voted against the balanced budget. So, those kind of people we really don't need in Washington.

The President. We're going to try when they come back. I don't know whether we can get it in the special session that we're calling after the election. There's going to be a pretty full plate right then, but we're going to try. And I know that Barber Conable is ready with such a bill. But if not then, when they come back, in the regular session in January we'll go at it again. Only this time, what you can do to help is -- and you all know that out there -- and that is, when you tell the Congress that you want something -- by mail, by wire, by phone call, by meeting them on the street if they're home for a weekend or something, but turn the pressure on. I have sometimes said it isn't necessary to make them see the light; it's only necessary to make them feel the heat.

Now, that's what we did to get our economic reform program. We never would have gotten it if you, the people, had not stormed Congress and let them know that you were watching and counting the vote. And this is what we need to get the congressional amendment.

We'd appreciate it if you would clear up something for us once and for all. Mr. Fuqua, the incumbent Congressman in north Florida, tries to talk like a conservative when he's campaigning and like he's supporting your programs for economic recovery. Yet his voting record just doesn't support those claims. It must be frustrating, Mr. President, to have Congressmen who work against your programs and then come back to their districts and mislead the voters, saying they support you. What advice can you give us to help overcome these deceptive practices?

The President. You know, Ron, this is something that, down through the years, has bothered me very much, and that is the cynical individuals in government who recognize that people out there -- all of you there who are listening, you're busy with your own occupations and activities and you don't have the time to follow up. So, they come home and they make a speech to the local Chamber or something or in a campaign they do as this Congressman Fuqua is doing. They state what they believe and so forth, and people go out and say, ``Well, I agree with that,'' and vote for them. And they don't -- they know cynically that they can get away with that when it doesn't match their voting record.

The only answer is, all of us have got to pay more attention. We've got to look up, as you have done, obviously, what that voting record is and make sure that they are the same in Washington as they are when they're back home in the district. And if we'll all do that, we can pin 'em down and make 'em a little more honest on that.

You know, there wasn't a question that let me answer this tonight, but let me just point something out. The closest they've come to saying something they'd do is talking about the expensive social programs, job programs, make-work programs that they always have passed in previous recessions as a quick fix to get us out of the recession. Only, when the recession was over, unemployment ended up higher than it was before the recession, and it's kept on going uphill all that way. Over just a few-year period on that kind of program, they spent in one of those efforts $66 billion, and unemployment went up. Now, we're trying to get unemployment to go up [down] (White House correction) and I think we're going to succeed by getting inflation and interest rates and government spending to come down.

Mr. Rollins. I know there's only one more, and as an old athlete, I know you'll never let me cut off a guy who was a former athletic director. That's our great candidate Bill Cobey in North Carolina, the North Carolina Fourth Congressional District. Bill, as you knew, used to be the athletic director at the University of North Carolina. He's now a consultant there for intercollegiate athletics. He's going to be a Congressman next January. And I know I'm not supposed to say this, but we may even come visit him the next couple of weeks in Raleigh, North Carolina.

Asking the question there is K. D. Kennedy, who is president of the Electric Supply Company, who is a Democrat for the first time supporting and working for a Republican congressional candidate, because he thinks you're doing such a great job.

Our candidate, Bill Cobey, is a strong supporter of a balanced Federal budget. What do we have to do to get a balanced budget amendment passed in the House of Representatives, and how will that affect your plan for economic recovery, which is already underway?

The President. Well, it definitely will help that program, because I can tell you the leadership in the House has made it very plain that if they can muster enough of a majority, they're going to try to cancel out the third installment of the tax cut, which is a very real and definite part. Next July 1st we're supposed to have another 10-percent cut in the income tax. And they want to cancel that.

House finally has suggested as an alternative to what we're doing, actually has come out with a demand that they pass bills to spend money on make-work programs and so forth -- the same thing they've done in all these past seven recessions, none of which ever had any permanent effect.

So, the thing we need is, you send Bill Cobey up here to Washington. And all over, all you other groups there, make sure that we get more Republican Congressmen in the House. We could not have had the economic recovery program and the cuts that we've now had in spending and taxes and the cuts in taxes and the reduction of inflation and all if we did not have a Republican majority in the Senate.

Now, I don't know whether we can get a majority all at once in the House, but we can work toward it. And we can get more votes and more people there who will continue to support these programs that are working. So, all of you, be missionaries. Get out there, tell the fellow next door, tell the people in the locker room, tell everyone you can, what is needed if we're to bring this country back.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, unfortunately we don't have any more time. But there are 10 additional campaigns out there, and I'd like to just quickly run through them for you, that have been tuned in all night.

But, in closing, I just want to say how essential all of you are to our cause. It's an old truth, but every vote does count. And the results of this election will hinge perhaps more than anything else on voter turnout. The basic job of identifying supporters and getting them to the polls is still one of the most important in politics. Technology like we're enjoying tonight can't replace the hard work of getting out the vote.

As I've said, I believe we're going to do well. We've got fine candidates, a wide base of contributors, and efficient party organization. And we've got good issues -- issues the people of this nation truly care about. It's up to you Republicans at the grassroots to make sure that the voters understand how important the choice is this year. The choice is between going back to old policies that didn't work or going ahead in the new direction that we've set.

We're on a new road now, a road that is leading America to better times. Unless we have the courage to stay on course and defeat our economic problems now, we'll never have lasting recovery, and our problems will grow worse than before.

As I said last week on television, it isn't an easy job, this challenge to rebuild America and renew the American dream. But we can do it. Throughout our history we Americans have proven again and again that no challenge is too big for a free, united people. Together we can do it again, and we can start making those dreams come true by electing Republican candidates to office. We couldn't have done what we have, as I said, without out majority in the Senate. Think what we can do with more Republicans in the House.

Medicine has advanced to the point that a 15-year-old suffering a severe spinal cord injury has a nearly normal life expectancy, but during the remaining years, these people may experience injury-related health difficulties and incur heavy medical expenses. The enormity of the problem can be seen by the number of people involved -- 200,000 in the United States alone.

Paraplegia are to improve outcome and restore lost function. Today's promising experiments suggest that the riddle of regeneration may one day be solved. Devices to restore movement and control bladder function are also being explored. Both Federal and private organizations have joined forces in these common goals.

This step symbolizes our firm commitment both to preventing the spread of nuclear explosives and to fighting the scourge of terrorism. Nuclear proliferation threatens global security, and preventing it is critically important to the United States. Terrorism threatens the fabric of society by indiscriminately aiming violence at the innocent. The commitment of this administration against these global problems has been, and will continue to be, firm and unshakable.

Congress. The Convention on the Physical Protection of Nuclear Material and the implementing law drew strong, bipartisan support. Such a bipartisan approach is essential for effective action in this area.

The act implements an international convention negotiated at the initiative of the United States and signed in March 1980. This convention calls for adequate physical protection of nuclear material during international transport and for international cooperation in recovering stolen nuclear material and in dealing with serious offenses involving such material. The Senate approved the Convention by 98 - 0 in July 1981, but deposit of the U.S. instrument of ratification has awaited enactment of this implementing legislation.

Code to make theft of nuclear material, nuclear extortion, and similar serious offenses involving nuclear material Federal crimes. This fills a gap in U.S. Federal criminal law and establishes jurisdiction over most of these offenses wherever committed, and the offenders are subject to a system of extradition or submission for prosecution. In emergencies, the Attorney General can obtain assistance from the Department of Defense in enforcing the act.

We also discussed Lebanon's goals in restoring authority and control of central government in all parts of the country. In this regard I reaffirmed the United States support for the sovereignty, unity, territorial integrity, and freedom of Lebanon. And I'm pleased to have had the opportunity to establish a close working dialog with President Gemayel, who deserves all of our support as he and the people of Lebanon work to rebuild their nation.

President Gemayel can rely upon the help of the United States. It is my hope that our mutual efforts will lead to restored peace and prosperity for all the people of Lebanon and indeed in all of the Middle East.

The Lebanese people deeply appreciate and will never forget your gracious and decisive efforts to help bring an end to the suffering of my country. American commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of a free, democratic Lebanon has been fundamental to our survival. We see the U.S. role as the indispensable ingredient to being peace not only to Lebanon but also to the whole region as well. We firmly believe that President Reagan's initiative has created unprecedented opportunities for peace.

We in Lebanon intend to be active in the search for peace with all nations of the region. The relation between the United States and Lebanon is not only between our two governments; it is between our two peoples, who share the same heritage and adhere to the same values and principles of democracy and liberty. The 2\1/2\ million Lebanese have almost equal number of close relatives in the United States. We value enormously the unique tie provided by these American Lebanese, among the most loyal of all Americans, and we believe they have a leading role in keeping our two countries together.

Lebanon has been the most recent and, for us, the most painful example of the assault upon free men by the forces of darkness and occupation. We have fought to retain our freedom, and the strength of our resistance has earned for us not only a restated pride in ourselves but also a reentry into the ranks of the free world. With equal resolve, I, together with my people, am committed to the immediate removal of all foreign forces from our soil and to work hand in hand with all sectors of Lebanese society to build a nation in which all citizens have equal privileges, rights, and responsibilities.

The historic U.S.-Lebanon relationship is the cornerstone of building this new Lebanon. America's friendship and assistance not only in peacekeeping and peacemaking but also in reconstruction and rebuilding our armed forces are vital. We, on our part, intend to carry our share of the responsibility of this partnership by a full and reciprocal contribution to all U.S. goals in its many noble endeavors as the leader of the free world.

Dr. Dombrowski is an orthopaedic surgeon in Redlands, Calif. He also serves as attending assistant clinical professor of orthopaedic surgery at Loma Linda University. He is a member of the 12th District Medical Quality Review Committee (State of California). He is a member of the American Academy of Orthopaedic Surgeons and diplomate for the American Board of Orthopaedic Surgery.

The conference is designed to provide a forum for the exchange of ideas on the strengthening of the electoral processes and basic democratic institutions in many countries of the world. The discussions are expected to explore practical options for encouraging free elections and constitutional governments.

These are days of new hope for housing -- hope for millions of families that dream of owning homes, and hope for millions who make their livelihoods from building them. As today's housing starts report shows, the solid progress against the record inflation and interest rates we inherited is sparking a rebound in this bedrock industry, a rebound that will benefit the entire economy. We still have a long way to go and housing is still hurting, but confidence is returning and America is on the move again.

Americans by a wide margin feel that homeownership is a cherished tradition that binds families, builds financial security, and strengthens communities and economic growth. The long years of government borrowing and spending beyond its means had overwhelmed us by the late seventies, and that dream of homeownership became a cruel hoax as the housing industry plunged into the worst depression since the thirties, provoking widespread suffering amongst quite a few of our citizens.

From the moment that we arrived in office, less than 2 years ago, our administration was working to cure this terrible economic disease. We insisted on attacking the root causes, not just legislating by quick fix, and this is the only way to end the deeply embedded, high-inflation philosophy which inflicted so much harm on housing.

We are beginning to succeed. The interest rates are dropping sharply, housing starts are rebounding, and our economic recovery program that began in October of 1981, I think is taking hold. It's no coincidence that the conventional long-term home mortgage rates peaked at 18\3/4\ percent the month before that program began. Long-term mortgage rates had fallen by a nationwide average to 13.38 by the week ending October 15th, last Saturday. Recent mortgage rate declines have made homeownership possible again for over a million families. And we saw today that the housing starts were 1,146,000 in September, and that's up 14.6 percent from August and up almost 22 percent from a year ago when the program began.

And the best news in today's report is that of the permits, which increased sharply -- September, up 17 percent. A good share of the increase is single-family housing starts. And this increase in permits, combined with the substantial decline in mortgage rates over the past several weeks, makes the resurgence of housing activity in coming months more and more likely.

As we continue to make progress in bringing the long-term inflation and interest rates down, let's learn [from] our mistakes of the past and strengthen our determination not to repeat them. And we reaffirm today one of the most treasured rights that was won by the Founding Fathers -- the right to own and hold property. For most Americans, that right embodied homeownership.

American home. The homes we live in today are testimony to the labor of men and women across this country. Housing is an industry in transition, regaining strength and the ability to produce a product the average working family wants and will be able to afford once again. This is welcome news, for homeownership is not just a symbol, it represents the American way of life. It's the key to advancement and to a better future for all of us. And as I said last night, a resurging housing industry can help to lead us out of the recession.

Reporter. Mr. President, the analysts have attributed this upsurge in housing starts to federally subsidized housing. Is your administration claiming credit for the new housing starts after you vetoed the Federal housing subsidy bill?

We had the support of many in the housing industry in vetoing that, because it was not going to be something of a real increase, the increase that we needed. And it was just going to further set us back with regard to increased government spending, without doing the job that we see now is being done by sticking to the course of our economic recovery program.

Yet, in the last decade, no segment of our economy has suffered more from the twin afflictions of inflation and high interest rates. Young couples, low income families, lending institutions, builders, construction workers, realtors, and materials suppliers have all shared in the frustrations and failures brought on by the misdirected programs of the past and the changing economic environment. Our Administration's economic policies have produced dramatic declines in the rate of inflation and in interest rates. These achievements will serve as a catalyst for solid and widespread housing industry growth benefiting all Americans.

President's Commission on Housing was established on June 16, 1981. Given the urgency of the situation, this distinguished group of housing experts completed their massive study in a remarkably short time frame. An impressive report, containing a detailed series of recommendations, was issued on April 30, 1982.

The Commission's findings reflect a fundamental confidence in the free market system, a recognition that a genuine housing recovery, essential for us all, can only be accomplished through principal reliance on the strength and initiative of the private sector. The Commission stressed the need for free, unhampered housing markets and urged the removal of unnecessary, burdensome regulatory restraints. It recommended a comprehensive strategy of housing initiatives directed at people, rather than at structures. At the same time, the Commission reaffirmed our national commitment to equal housing choice and recognized a continuing role for government in providing housing for the poor.

Guided by this framework, this Administration has already undertaken a number of actions aimed at bringing about the resurgence of the housing industry. These include: the Joint Venture in Affordable Housing; the acceptance of new, flexible mortgage instruments; the proposal for a new rental housing certificate program; the encouragement of private pension fund investments in mortgages; and the elimination of a number of counterproductive Federal regulations.

Unquestionably, a housing recovery remains an essential national priority and all Americans deserve the opportunity to live in decent, affordable housing. Through Senate Joint Resolution 261, the Congress has recognized the past contributions of the housing industry to America, reaffirmed our national commitment to a housing recovery, and requested the President to designate the week of October 24 through October 31, 1982, as National Housing Week.

Organizations and International Security and Scientific Affairs. He is ranking minority member of the House Post Office and Civil Service Committee, on which he has served since 1961, where he is also senior Republican member on the special Subcommittee on Investigations, as well as ex officio member of all other subcommittees. He is cochairman of the Commission on Congressional Mailing Standards. He served as a delegate with the rank of Ambassador to the United Nations for the 1971 General Assembly session.

Interparliamentary Union, an international body comprised of legislators from over 100 countries which have parliaments or their equivalent. He is the regional whip for Republican Members of Congress who represent midwestern States. He was the first chairman and founder of the Republican Study Committee, a group of conservative House Members who work to promote responsible principles of government. He represents his Illinois colleagues on the National Republican Congressional Committee.

Governor Thompson, my friend Jim -- incidentally, I have to tell you something I did this morning. I knew they weren't going to give me enough time to get to a telephone while I was here to make any telephone calls or anything. But I'd read something in the paper -- that I did make a call -- two calls here to this area before I left the Oval Office this morning.

Woodrow Wilson used to say about Washington that so many people who go there know so many things that aren't true, and so few people there have any idea of what the people of the United States are thinking about. Well, that's why I enjoy getting out of town. When I can't, it sure helps to tap the homegrown prairie wisdom of a couple of natives like Bob and Jack. It's also good to know that Jim Thompson is Governor of this great State. His leadership and judgment are key for the strong, secure future of Illinois.

Year after year, here in the Midwest you produce from your rich, black earth a bountiful harvest called the American equivalent of the oil riches in the Persian Gulf. The farmers of Illinois are among the most hard-working people anywhere. And to produce this abundance you carry an extraordinary burden for the Nation and the world. On behalf of the 231 million Americans whose cupboards you fill and for the millions more worldwide that you save from hunger, I bring you thanks.

But with so much on the line in these difficult economic times, I know you need more than just a pat on the back. Things haven't been so good down on the farm in recent years. You've been hurting, and all of America has been hurting with you. If things are to go well for America, they must get better for the American farmer. To make America well again, to untangle the wreckage past big spending and big taxing made of our economy, we've got to make it profitable to be a farmer again.

The soaring cost of energy was one of the thumbscrews tightening the cost-price squeeze on the farm. We moved immediately to accelerate oil decontrol and dramatically increased our Strategic Petroleum Reserve to guard against sudden interruption again of our energy supplies. And I'm happy to tell you our reserve is now one of the largest in the world. And you may have noticed recently that in spite of what some of the screaming critics said at the time, who wanted the controls left on, gasoline didn't go to $2 a gallon. And the prices no longer lead inflation, but are actually helping to hold it down. This administration will ensure that our people and our economy are never again held hostage by the whim of any country or any cartel.

One reform I'm particularly proud of addresses a special problem for farmers: estate taxes. As I promised in the campaign of 1980, we're increasing the exemption so that by 1987, 99 percent of all family farms and estates will be exempt. And we eliminated it altogether for a surviving spouse.

And let me say that there's one other major promise of 1980 that we've also kept. We've lifted the weight of America's foreign policy from your already overburdened shoulders. We ended the Soviet grain embargo, as Jack just told you.

When the embargo was imposed, the Soviets still got their grain, but they bought it from our eager competitors. Today, we've worked our way back to a 35-percent share, but we have a long way to go to regain lost ground. We still are suffering the loss of about 80,000 potential jobs; farm prices are lower; and our economy is weaker.

You have to fight the weather. You have to fight insects. You fight all kinds of natural disasters that can happen in farming. You shouldn't have to fight your own government. And you're not going to have to.

That embargo was bad foreign policy. It was bad domestic policy. And I'm proud that we were able to take it off. For every $1 billion in additional farm exports, our economy gains an additional billion dollars and 35,000 jobs in farm-related activities.

During the 1980 campaign, in a speech I made near here, I promised my personal support for expanding our agricultural exports. And that pledge remains a priority today. We're doing what must be done to increase our exports, restore our reputation as a reliable supplier, and regain our market share.

Next week, U.S. representatives will meet with the Soviets in Vienna to discuss additional grain purchases beyond the 8 million metric tons called for in our current agreement. And I've instructed Secretary Block to make available a total of 23 million tons in the coming year. The same assurances of reliable delivery that apply to the 8 million will go with the additional purchase of grain -- up to 15 million tons -- if the U.S.S.R. will buy the grain this November and provided the grain is shipped within 180 days of contract date. These assurances, of course, also apply to soybean and other agricultural exports.

Nothing means more to the health of American agriculture than restoring our reputation as a reliable supplier. To do this, we've committed your government to an export policy with three key points. First, there will be no restriction on farm products because of rising domestic prices.

Second, farm exports will not be singled out as an instrument of foreign policy except in extreme situations, which I think you would all understand -- such as a war or something of that kind -- and then that would only be as part of a broad trade embargo supported by our trading partners.

Free trade is in all our interests, but because of foreign subsidies and protections, our farmers are being pitted against the economic strength of the national treasuries of other countries. All nations, particularly our friends in Europe and Japan, must be made to understand that trade is a two-way proposition. And Secretary Block has already announced our new blended credit program to encourage long-term growth for our farm exports.

I know you face a real uphill battle here on the farm. Sometimes you may wonder if anyone is listening to your problems. Well, I'm listening, and you have the ear of a very able advocate in the House of Representatives -- my friend Bob Michel. Bob is constantly fighting your battles and bringing them to my attention. Bob has also made me very aware of the high unemployment and the hardships here in the counties of rural Illinois.

And I know that this recession only adds to the challenge of soil conservation -- a challenge you confront very well in this exhibit today. Well, you're not alone. This administration is committed to working toward an effective soil and water conservation program to strengthen American agriculture. We've begun targeting Federal funds to areas with the most severe problems, which should make a real difference in our battle against erosion.

But I have an idea that if you were making more money from your crops, then more of you could afford some of this great new machinery that's on display. And if you bought more machines, companies like those represented here today could employ more people to make them. And a healthy chain reaction would ripple through our economy -- more food, more money, and more jobs. That's why I believe so strongly that the best farm program is one that returns prosperity to all sectors of the economy.

Now, I heard it said recently by someone on the other side that the economy was in a state of boom when I took office. Well, if they mean that was the sound the economy made when it fell off the edge and hit bottom, okay. [Laughter] But those of you in the real world, those of you who are not suffering from selective amnesia, might have another idea.

I don't have to tell a group of farmers what that means. You know that your costs went up only 2 percent this year, a marked improvement over the 8- to 10-percent jump the year before. I don't want to go back. Do you? Well, for every 1 percent that we drop those interest rates down on farm debt, net farm income goes up an estimated $2 billion.

Can anyone really believe that going back to double-digit inflation is a program for agricultural prosperity? Do you think those crippling interest rates were a program of compassion? Do you want to return to the spend and tax and borrow big-brother government that some of the hand-wringers are proposing? I don't think you do.

Yes, we're on a difficult road, but it's the one to a lasting recovery. And I can promise you today that with your help we're going to stay the course. Fresh evidence that our program is working will soon be felt in the farm community as interest rates continue to come down as the result of our economic recovery program. We're also able to bring down interest rates that farmers pay for their loans.

Today I'm happy to be the first to tell you that at 3:30 eastern time -- and that's right about now -- the Farmers Home Administration, which has already lowered its interest rates last month, will announce that effective November 1st they're coming down again. These reductions are possible because of a general move toward lower interest rates across all sectors of the economy.

Farmers who qualify for natural disaster loans will also benefit. The rate for production loans to farmers who need financing above the actual loss they suffered and who can't get credit elsewhere will be eligible for loans at 14 percent, down from the current 15\1/2\ percent. Borrowers who can get credit elsewhere but prefer to use Farmers Home disaster loans will receive a 14\1/4\-percent rate. The rate for actual losses remains at 8 percent.

All of these changes will help to breathe new life into America's farm economy, and they couldn't have happened if our recovery program hadn't brought down those skyrocketing interest rates of the past years.

That's just as true today. I'm not interested in playing the political blame game. It's not who to blame that's important; it's what to blame, and the American people realize that. We must keep our sights clearly focused on our goal, with a clear understanding of what got us into this mess and with a firm will to do what it takes to get us out. We've been sorely tested, but this great nation of ours has a deep reservoir of courage and strength to draw on. We Americans have never been quitters, and we aren't about to quit now. And together, we're going to make America great again.

Now, before I leave there's one more thing I want to do. It gives me great pleasure to honor the division of marketing of the Illinois Department of Agriculture for its contributions to our country's export expansion program.

Exports means jobs and profits for America's agricultural industry. But they also are an important ingredient in the battle against our nation's economic problems. Export expansion will come from efforts like yours that assist in promoting America's agricultural export. We appreciate the initiative that you've shown in developing a wide range of activities to promote Illinois exports.

And now it is my honor to present the President's ``E'' Award for excellence in export service to the division of marketing, Illinois Department of Agriculture. Thank you very much, and God bless you.

The President. Senator Percy, the representatives, the Members of Congress who are here, the candidates who are here, Corrine Michel, who is here, and I too am very proud of my two good friends from another life that are here with us tonight -- Mr. Mayor and, of course, the man whose campaign has brought us here, Bob Michel.

You know, I've been here before. I don't mean during the campaign. I was here then of course; and I don't mean in this fine, new facility. That's a first for me. But I remember coming here to play football against Bradley. And Bradley won that night, or I wouldn't have brought the subject up. But as enthusiastic as you are, I'm sure that you were -- I thought maybe you were expecting the Bradley Braves. Bradley University has given us not only last year's NIT champions -- and I just met them outside here -- but it's given us that outstanding Republican leader of the House of Representatives, Bob Michel.

Let me tell you something about Bob. He's been your Congressman for 13 terms, not because he likes the prestige -- that gets old fast. He's not a Congressman because he likes being away from his family. He is not in it for the money. He could do a lot better out in the private sector. Bob Michel is a Congressman because he believes in something. He believes in the values of Illinois and the values that built this country. For 26 years he's been working for those beliefs and for you, the people who share them. I don't know what this country would do without the sacrifices of people like Bob Michel.

You know, there were times this year when he could have taken the easy way out on certain votes; yet he did what he believed was best for America. He put country before politics. Now he doesn't always agree with me, like on the pipeline sanction, but he makes his arguments genuinely and honestly, and they cannot be ignored. And that kind of integrity is hard to find.

I know how you feel, so I'm just going to say something. I think a man of Bob Michel's character and principle deserves a standing ovation from all of us, an ovation born of appreciation for what he has done. [Applause] Now, if I were still in show business, I'd have quit right there.

And there's another excellent Illinois Republican I'd like to mention -- Ed Derwinski, one of the highest ranking Republicans on the House Foreign Affairs Committee. We don't want to lose Ed's experience when he leaves the Congress at the end of this session, so we've taken care of that.

But I also wanted to come tonight so I could speak directly to the people of this area, to the people who've lost their jobs at Caterpillar and Pabst and Hiram Walker. Bob has told me personally -- and, I might say, eloquently -- of the hardships of the people in his district. He understands what's going on out there. So, perhaps this might be a good time to say something about those pipeline sanctions.

I know they're not popular with Peoria or Bob Michel. But a President sometimes has to make decisions that are painful to even his best friends, and it's one of the toughest parts of the job. We must remember the sanctions were imposed as tangible evidence of our opposition to the Soviet inspired repression of the Polish people. But there were additional reasons, even had that not happened.

It seemed to us that our European friends and allies were putting themselves in a dangerous position of dependency on an undependable provider, the Soviet Union, for the energy that would run their industry. And it also seemed to us that, inasmuch as that dependency would turn over about $10 billion a year in hard, cold cash to the Soviet Union, it would enable them to further build up their military might which is the greatest buildup of military might the world has ever seen. And so, we felt that something had to be done. The sanctions have substantially hurt the Soviet Union already, but, of course, they've hurt some of our own companies such as Caterpillar as well.

The Siberian pipeline will be a major source, as I said, of hard cash income for the Soviet Union for decades, and I won't go into all the geopolitical reasons why that could be dangerous. I know it's the loss of jobs that's of more immediate concern to Peorians right now.

We're receptive to alternative measures that would be equally or more effective than the current sanctions. Certainly, if we can establish restrictions that put greater pressure on the Soviets and less on our own companies, we will enthusiastically consider them. And we've been in constant consultations with our NATO allies trying to bring that about.

Tonight in homes across the country, including a home at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue, unemployment is the problem uppermost in everyone's mind. Getting Americans back to work is an urgent priority for all of us, and, other than keeping the peace, I have no higher priority.

You know, there's a story about a fellow who said to a friend of his, ``I was sorry to hear that your wife ran off with the gardener.'' And the fellow said, ``Well, that's all right. I was going to fire him anyway.'' [Laughter] When it comes to the economy, that's about how scrambled the logic has been in recent years. And scrambled thinking led us to a scrambled economic mess.

Americans are asking themselves, how do we straighten out this mess? Well, you can't solve unemployment without solving the things that caused it -- the out-of-control government spending, skyrocketing inflation, and the interest rates that led to unemployment in the first place.

I realize there is hardship in Peoria. And if I thought what we were seeking to accomplish would be only temporary, I wouldn't ask for your patience. But for the first time in our postwar history, we're trying to build a recovery that will last and not just a quick fix to see us through the election.

You know, before we went to Washington, those in charge of the economy ran it with the accelerator to the floor; then they'd slam on the brakes; then they'd swerve to miss the oncoming crisis; then they'd swerve back; and then they'd floor it again. But you can't run an economy or a car that way without eventually wrecking it. And that's exactly what was happening.

In January of 1977, just after Jerry Ford left the White House, inflation was at 4.8 percent. The prime interest rate was under 7 percent. You could get a home mortgage for 9 percent, and consumers could afford not only mortgages but auto loans. But then America took a giant step backward.

How many of us remember we had 5 economic programs proposed in 4 years? Our economic policy was flip-flopping like a fish on dry land. And those five programs of the last administration left us with five gigantic headaches. But wait a minute -- maybe I should only say four, because the fifth economic program was proposed in August just before the 1980 election, and that was the only one that proposed a tax cut. They said it would be $27 billion. Well, they never gave us the tax cut, and the program was never implemented.

By the time we took office, we faced double-digit inflation, high unemployment, a 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate, runaway government spending, and the highest peacetime tax burden we have ever known. We also had nearly a trillion-dollar debt. Now, that means that this year, before the Government can spend a dime to feed the hungry, care for the sick, or protect our freedom, it must plan to spend $110 billion in this one year just to pay the interest on that debt. $110 billion is much more than the total Federal budget was just 20 years ago. And still the big spenders wonder why the American people want what a stubborn minority in the House denied them -- a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. They're going to get another chance to vote on that, because we're going to keep shoving it at them.

Our nation is still paying the penalty of those tragic excesses of the past. Unfortunately, many are paying with their jobs. I didn't cause this recession. Bob Michel didn't cause it. But I do have a responsibility for getting us out of this recession, and I can't do it without Bob Michel in the Congress.

Bob Michel's reelection means jobs. From our very first day, we've been working to undo the economic wreakage that was left behind. As a matter of fact, when I finished taking the oath on office on that January Inaugural Day, the first thing I did was go back into the Capitol Building -- and I didn't even take off my topcoat -- I signed a memorandum freezing the size of the Federal Government.

At my age, I didn't go to Washington to play politics as usual. I didn't go there to reward pressure groups by spending other people's money. And most of all, I didn't go there to further mortgage the future of the American people just to buy a little short-term, political popularity. I wanted to try and solve some problems, not sweep them under the rug and leave them for those who would come along later.

Now, I don't pretend for a moment that in 21 months we've been able to undo the damage of 20 years or more. Twenty-one months ago, we faced five immediate and critical problems: runaway spending; double-digit inflation; the worst interest rates in a hundred years; the highest peacetime tax burden, as I've said, in our history; and high unemployment. But we've made dramatic gains on four of those five problems.

The inflation rate that reached a high of 18 percent in January of 1980 has been cut to 5.1 percent for the first 8 months of this year. The experts said it couldn't be done, but we did it. The prime interest rate, that had reached 21\1/2\ percent before we came to office, is now down to 12 percent, and we're not finished with it yet. We've cut the annual growth in spending -- government spending -- by nearly two-thirds. And we will have cut tax rates 25 percent by next July.

And look what's been happening to the stock and bond markets. They're trying to pooh-pooh that a little bit on the other side. But if you haven't noticed, the market today closed 20 points up at 1034 plus .12, and that is the highest point the market has hit since early 1973, 10 years ago.

Confidence is returning to America's economy. Sadly, unemployment is always just about the last to feel a recovery. If you'd look at the charts that they can show you of those seven preceding recessions, and they go up in a big -- and then they go down. But each time, when they come out of the recession, unemployment stays a little higher than it was the time before. So, it always starts from a higher level. That's why the other day I said that I'd take the responsibility for the 2.7 percent that unemployment's gone up since I took office, if they'll take responsibility for the 7.8 percent that it was up before we took office. But we're going to beat that just as we're beating the rest of the economic problems. And when we get it licked, this time, it's going to stay licked.

We're on a new road now, a road that's leading America to better times. But we've got to keep the courage to stay our course. It's the only way to lasting recovery. If we don't, our problems will just grow worse than they were before. And that's the sad, sorry history of past decades -- lost nerve and squandered opportunities. The people deserve better from their leaders. And I want all of you to know this: that I intend to stay the course and to turn this economy around, and I need your help to do that.

So, please promise me that you will mobilize your friends and neighbors to get out the vote for a great victory on November 2d for Bob Michel. We have a mission to renew all the dreams and the hopes that our nation was placed on this good Earth to provide.

I met someone else before I came out here tonight -- a young lady, sixth grade of Sterling School, who has won a statewide essay contest. And she won it with a letter that she wrote to our country. And I was pleased to meet her. Maybe you've all seen the letter, but let me just remind you, if you haven't, that first sentence. She wrote, as I say, it as a letter.

The Stacy Hodgkins and all those young people and the young people that are here tonight, they're what this election is all about -- what kind of an America we're going to leave them. And I pray every day of my life that before we leave the stage, we will have made some payments -- installment payments on that trillion-dollar debt and not leave all of it for them to take care of.

And the best way, the most immediate way to keep our rendezvous with destiny and to achieve those dreams and those hopes that I spoke of is to reelect Bob Michel and those from other districts -- send these other Representatives back, send these candidates into office, and let's us have a turn at being the majority in Washington and see what we can do for the people of this country.

Republican State chairmen at the Continental Regency Hotel. When he arrived at the civic center, he greeted five leaders of Americans for an Independent Lebanon and members of the Bradley University basketball team.

After speaking at the rally, the President attended a fundraising reception for the Phoenix Club, a local Republican organization. He then left Peoria and traveled to the Red Lion Hotel in Omaha, Nebr., where he remained overnight.

I am going to sign a bill here. I'm very happy to sign it, and I know that these people behind me are very happy, also, because I know that Governor Thone, when he was in Congress, worked very hard with regard to the use of grain for alcohol or fuel, as an energy source. And the three House Representatives here from Nebraska -- Doug Bereuter, Hal Daub, Virginia Smith -- who isn't with us this morning -- but all of them were sponsors of this particular bill.

And it is a bill, now, that will enable the Department of Agriculture to take the grain that is held in storage there and convert it into agricultural byproducts and, principally, alcohol for fuel use. And one of the advantages of that is that the presence of the large stock of government-held grain has always been a factor in holding down prices. It was a threat to a legitimate pricing of grain.

And I'm pleased to announce what I think is a piece of good news for the American steel industry and the many thousands of American workers and their families who depend on the steel industry for their livelihood. And it's good news for the economy.

Commerce Secretary Baldrige and Vice Presidents Haferkamp and Davignon of the Commission of the European Communities have successfully ended negotiations for an agreement, an arrangement that will restrain European steel exports to the United States for the next 3 years.

These revisions of the Steel Trade Agreement, concluded last August 5th, cover 90 percent of steel imports from Europe and will relieve our domestic steel industry from the unfair competition of subsidized foreign products. And that, in turn, will mean more and lasting jobs in the steel industry, which will translate into good news on the employment front. In return for the agreement on imports, the American steel industry will drop its countervailing duty and dumping suits against over 40 European companies.

Baldrige and his European counterparts for their outstanding efforts. They have resulted in a mutual understanding that is reassuring evidence that America and her allies and trading partners can work together for the amicable settlement of differences in an atmosphere of cooperation and understanding. It's also one more small but important step toward the lasting inflation-proof, job-creating economic recovery we've all been working so hard to achieve for our people.

Now, don't worry about questions. Mac Baldrige is in Washington. This has just been piped into the newsroom there and will be piped to your own newsroom here. And he will be able to handle all the details of the briefing on this, which lets me home free.

But, you know, there's one big difference between Nebraska and Washington -- you've got your priorities straight. Now, in Washington, too many in the Congress vote against balanced budgets so they can run up big, red-ink deficits. Here in Nebraska, a balanced budget is an article of faith between you and your leaders, and the only Big Red in your State is a football team. Back in those broadcasting days, I have described that team a number of times when I was a sports announcer doing play-by-play football broadcasts.

But let me just say a few words about your Governor, and I'm mighty proud to stand here with him today. He doesn't just believe in your Nebraska bedrock values -- values like self-reliance, love of family, patriotism, and faith in God. I've known Charlie Thone and valued his friendship for a long time. I've seen the job he's done, and no one works harder or has done more to increase Nebraska's farm and industrial exports. He doesn't play both sides of an issue; he's a man who says what he means, means what he says, and does what he promises. Charlie Thone has stood by Nebraska through sun and storm. He's earned your support. And if you give it to him -- and I mean all of it -- he'll stay right where he belongs, doing his great job as your Governor.

Federal income tax. And then when we changed the Federal income tax and reduced it, he was faced with having to make a rate change in order to not change your tax. But those who said that he raised your taxes in doing that are lying in their teeth. He had a hard decision to make, and he made it. And now I understand that he is faced, as we're faced in Washington, with having in these hard times to make some adjustments in State budgeting and in cutting government spending. And that's the approach that he's taking. And I'd like to know who in America -- well, I do know who in America, but I don't like them -- [laughter] -- thinks that's wrong. The right way to change is to reduce government spending.

Let me, if I could, because there is some mystery to many people about the way things work there in Washington and what that means -- as he told you, the first time we've had a Republican Senate in 26 years. As a matter of fact, all the past Republican Presidents, all the way back to the war, only for one 2-year period, has a Republican President served with a Republican legislature, a Republican Congress.

And here's what it means to have -- we only have a slight majority in that Senate. But that slight majority is so important, because having that majority means our party names the committee chairmen; our party names the majority to the committees. And look at the difference in this last session that we've just been through. The balanced budget amendment, which 80 percent of the people in this country said they wanted, passed out of the Senate with a two-thirds majority. For a year, it was held in the House in committee and not allowed to come to the floor for a vote, because they control the majorities and the chairmen of the committees in that other House.

Finally it came out when 218 signed a petition to bring it to the floor. And it got a majority vote, but it fell short of the two-thirds it needs. But I've got news for them: They're going to have another chance to vote on that balanced budget amendment, because we're going to keep presenting it.

Your train here today -- and I might add with a very lovely cargo -- represents a great success story -- an industry of new growth, of jobs, and progress, carrying your people and their goods toward brighter horizons and a better life. It wasn't long ago that people were saying that rail industry couldn't make it without government subsidies. Well, we're seeing proof of how wrong they were. This industry has turned around; it's getting stronger. The payoff is more jobs and opportunities, and that's darn good news for Nebraska. And part of the reason that it can do that is because we've been lifting the stultifying hand of government regulations that's been hindering business and industry in this country for too many years.

Let me speak a moment about another turnaround, another comeback story: Our economy is turning around. Our critics are saying our economy is on its knees. Well, you know something, if the economy is back on its knees, that's quite an improvement because 2 years ago it was flat on its back.

A little less than 2 years ago when we went to Washington, all those years of government living beyond its means had come to roost with a terrible vengeance. Today's Monday morning quarterbacks have already forgotten the monster they left us: spending shooting up at an annual rate of 17 percent; double-digit inflation, 2 years in a row of that; high unemployment; a 21\1/2\-percent interest rate, the highest in more than a century; and nearly a trillion-dollar debt, which if we don't correct things soon is going to be handed as a heritage from us to these wonderful young people who are here today. And I'm determined that must not happen. And we were having the highest tax burden, peacetime tax burden, that the people of this country had ever known.

Now, I don't want it reported that I'm being partisan here, so let me quote a source from the other side -- way on the other side. [Laughter] It happens to be the senior Democratic Senator from the State of Massachusetts. In May of 1980 Ted Kennedy warned that under his party's leadership America was sliding into the worst recession since the Great Depression. So you see, it isn't true that he and I don't agree on everything.

In 1980 government was growing like toadstools after a rainstorm, spinning out of control like a washing machine that was out of cycle. Washington and the bureaucracy were growing fatter and fatter while they were making everyone else poorer and poorer. Think about that trillion-dollar debt. This year, the Government will have to spend $110 million just to pay the interest on that debt. That is much greater than the total Federal budget was just 20 years ago. That's about $3,500 for every time your heart beats.

We wouldn't be worrying about a deficit today if big spenders hadn't wallowed in red ink for 21 of the last 22 years. And we wonder why it's so hard to bring down interest rates, make more money available to your consumers and small businessmen and family farmers. But those in the Congress who have spent your hard-earned dollars with such glee still resist the medicine of a balanced budget amendment. They claim it would be a dangerous risk. Well, there is no more dangerous risk to America or the loved ones that we'll leave behind us than deliberate, planned inflation that would destroy our country, and we're not going to permit that.

Here in America's heartland, farmers are still paying dearly for the mistakes of the past. The sky-high inflation and interest rates of the late seventies and that mistaken Soviet grain embargo led to a vicious cost-price squeeze and lost markets. Confidence in America as a reliable supplier was shattered. Those in Washington forgot what Dwight Eisenhower once warned: ``Without a prosperous agriculture there can be no prosperity in America.'' Well, we're remembering, and with your help, we're going to put the pieces back together.

As I told the people of this country in my television address last week, I didn't go to Washington to play politics as usual, to spend other people's money, to sweep long-neglected problems under the rug. I went there to face up to those problems and, with your support and prayers from wonderful Americans like yourself, to begin to solve them.

Much of the legislation that we need still hasn't been enacted, but we're taking action. And of those five critical problems I mentioned -- runaway spending, runaway taxing, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and high unemployment -- we've already made solid progress on four. And in anybody's league, four out of five's not bad.

First, we cut that bankrupt government spending growth by nearly two-thirds. Second, despite tremendous resistance from the big spenders, we passed the first real tax reduction for all American taxpayers in nearly 20 years. And that tax bill was not a giveaway to the rich; that was an across-the-board tax cut that benefited everyone in this country and today is benefiting those at the bottom of the scale probably even better than it is those at higher earnings and at the upper level of the scale.

Here's what it means for your families: When next July 1st comes and the third installment of the income tax cut is put in place, it'll be a total of a 25-percent personal rate cut. Then indexing will follow in 1985, to protect you from being pushed into higher tax brackets when you get a cost-of-living pay raise. And that's what's been happening. Inflation has been one of the finest tax increases -- the highest tax increases -- that our government has managed for all these inflationary years.

A reduction in the marriage penalty -- the unfairness of the fact that a working husband and wife were cheated in the amount that they had to pay, it being greater than if they weren't married. A reduction -- or an increase in the child care credit for working mothers -- does that sound like it's a benefit for the rich? New incentives for retirement savings -- again, hardly something that benefits the rich. And a major benefit for family farmers and family businesses. We're raising the estate tax exemption, in installments, to $600,000. And of even greater help, there will no longer be any estate tax for a surviving spouse. It's not right for widows and children to lose a business, to have to give up a business or a farm that generations of love and toil had created, just in order to pay the Government a tax because of death in the family. And now they won't have to do that.

Third, that double-digit inflation rate hit 18 percent in January of 1980. It is now down for the first 8 months of this year to 5.1 percent and has been even lower in the most recent of those months. The experts said that it couldn't be done. They said that it was institutionalized inflation in our system; no way to get rid of it. Well, we've got news for them. We did it, and we're going to do even better. It's going to come below where it is.

Now, that leaves unemployment, which everyone knows is far too high. But just as surely as single-digit inflation started the interest rates tumbling, getting interest rates down will drive unemployment back down to single digits, too. And then we will have delivered the knockout blow to the recession once and for all.

We are on course to recovery, but not another counterfeit recovery like all those other seven in the past that sent inflation and interest rates shooting right back through the roof. I wish you could see some of the charts that we have of what has been happening in recent years: to see this peak and then drop into recession, and then this artificial stimulant of the money supply and so forth, the quick fixes that they employed, and things would go back up, only 2 years later to go back down into a recession. But each time the recovery came we have noted that the unemployment rate stayed higher than it was before the recession, so that each time we started increasing unemployment from a higher base, and now we have the present rate of unemployment.

But we're on course to recovery, not, as I say, another counterfeit recovery. Unlike some before us, this administration is determined to get the job done and to get the job done right. You hear so much in Washington, of course, with all of this, about fairness and compassion. Well, we're providing compassion that never existed under the policies of the past. It's easy for all of us, because we're the most generous people on Earth, to feel sorry for that person who through no fault of their own must have help from the rest of us. And nothing is ever going to change that in this country. We're going to continue doing that. But under the policies of the past, in the empire building that goes on in government, there was only one way to go in enlarging those programs and enlarging the bureaucracy. They had to keep raising the levels at which people became eligible for those helpful programs until people who had no moral right to be receiving benefits from their fellow taxpayers were getting them.

But, yes, we've cut back on some programs, trying to correct that and be able to continue helping the people of real need. But what we've done without any expensive government programs is bring them help of a different kind. You know, a family at the poverty-income level today is about $500 better off because of the drop in inflation. Their purchasing power has increased that much.

The average family of four on a fixed income of about $20,000 is about $1,500 better off than if inflation and taxes had stayed at their 1980 rates. And none of these called for any bureaucracy or none of them called for any high administrative overhead on presenting some kind of a grant.

There's an example that has to do with the Aid for Dependent Children. During the decade of the seventies, their grants were increased by a full one-third. In that same decade, their ability to purchase declined by almost a third. So that now, even the people on those benefit grants, because of their need, are better off and have more purchasing power than they did before.

For farmers trapped in that vicious cost-price squeeze, our progress against inflation and interest rates spells R-E-L-I-E-F, if a well-known football player in a commercial will forgive me for saying that. It can make a life and death difference. The price of fuel, so important to farmers, has actually dropped in real terms. And each decline of 1 percentage point in the interest rate on the farm debt will translate into a $2 billion reduction in interest costs to farmers in America. And that's not all.

We didn't put that Soviet grain embargo on your farmers, but, as the Governor told you, we took it off. And as you heard last Friday, we want to sell the Soviets a lot more grain, a total of 23 million metric tons, and we will guarantee -- give assurances of reliable delivery. And we share Governor Thone's determination to increase your exports throughout the world.

From the first moment we took office we've been working to cure our terrible economic disease and make America well again. Oh, yes, I hear those who say that we haven't done enough. And there's a double standard there. Why won't they accept responsibility for what they did during the last 25 years when they controlled both Houses of the Congress? But they insist on demanding that we take full blame for not producing a miracle in less than 25 months.

But I've listened and I've listened to their criticism, and I've waited to see if they'd propose an alternative. And they don't. All they have to offer is a blind return to big spending, big taxing, more regulations, meddling, and make-work, more government coming through the windows, under the doors, and down the chimney. And I don't think that's an alternative for the American people.

You know, there's a passage in the Psalms which says, ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' Well, America has endured a long, terrible night of economic hardship, but now we are seeing the first welcome bursts of sunshine, the dawning of a new day for our country. We know the momentum for recovery is building, and we know that confidence is returning and that America is on the move again.

You have to ask, do those critics in this election year, do they really want a recovery? Or would they be smiling broadly if things were getting worse, simply because it might be politically advantageous to them?

Franklin Roosevelt warned that fear can paralyze us. Let us turn away from voices of fear and doom, and move forward together to embrace recovery with confidence and courage. Those who made our country sick, however their intentions, must not keep her from getting well now.

Partisan politics must not delay the healing of America. If others cannot encourage, pitch in, and help the rest of us, then let them stand aside and get out of the way. This nation wants to move forward.

And we can do it by, as I said, you keep Charlie Thone right here in that Governor's chair. You send Doug and Hal and Virginia and Jim back to Washington with us, and we will get these things done. We only need to believe in each other and believe in the God who so blessed this land of ours.

Myasthenia gravis is a chronic neuromuscular disease marked by progressive weakness and abnormally rapid fatigue of the voluntary muscles. An estimated 100,000 Americans suffer from this cruel disease, and experts say that there may be as many as 100,000 others in whom the condition is as yet undiagnosed.

Formerly, many people with this disease died within the first few years of the illness. Today, a number of therapeutic approaches exist that give thousands of patients marked relief and allow them time to live normal life spans.

Since its establishment in 1965, the National Head Start Program has helped over eight million low-income pre-school children and their families. In so doing, it has earned recognition and support for its success in early childhood education and development.

Equally important, the health and nutrition aspects of the program have improved the prevention, detection, and treatment of children's medical, dental, and nutritional problems, thereby removing barriers to growth and learning.

Perhaps the most significant factor in the success of Head Start has been the involvement of parents, volunteers, and the community. Their commitment and the services provided by dedicated Head Start staff have been instrumental in creating a quality program that truly provides young children with a ``head start'' in life.

The President. Our meeting today with King Hassan and the delegation is an important milestone along the road toward a common objective: a just and lasting peace in the Middle East. His Majesty King Hassan and his colleagues were forthright and helpful to us in clarifying the positions of the Arab League adopted last month in Fez, Morocco. I've clarified for His Majesty and the delegation a number of points concerning the peace initiative that I announced September 1st.

Peace in the Middle East means achieving security for all the states in that troubled region -- security for the Arab States and security for Israel and a sense of identity for the Palestinian people. We must pursue these goals rigorously, thoughtfully, and in close consultation with all here.

And like our guests today, we all share the hope of peace. Our mutual goal of peace and the road to it lies through a negotiating process which I hope can be resumed in the very near future. I hope they realize -- all the delegation and His Majesty -- how welcome they are here in the United States and how much we appreciate their coming here.

The King. Mr. President, I and my colleagues would like to assure you, would like to express our gratitude for this wonderful reception we received today and the hospitality which we have received here today.

We also would like to thank you for the depth and the good will which we have witnessed here today as we reviewed with you the hopes of the Arabs and their objectives, which is peace with justice and dignity. I personally believe that we will find in the framework of Security Council Resolution 242 and in 338 and your program, your plan for peace, and the decisions of the Fez conference -- we will find in all these, which will save us a lot of time, in order to achieve our noble aim and objective which is peace and coexistence and construction for the welfare of the region and all mankind.

Earlier in the day, the President and the King held a meeting in the Cabinet Room with members of the delegation and U.S. officials. The President and Mrs. Reagan then met separately with King Hassan and his children. The private visit was followed by a working luncheon in the Residence with the American and Arab League delegations.

During the last three decades, when tens of thousands of our airmen, soldiers, marines, and sailors went to Southeast Asia and Korea to prevent aggression and protect the vital interests of our country, a number of Amerasian children were born. When the fathers returned to the United States, far too often innocent children were left without parent or without a country. Through no fault of their own, these children have frequently lived in the most wretched of circumstances and often have been ostracized in the lands of their birth.

Today it gives me great pleasure to sign Senate bill 1698, a major step toward facing up to the moral responsibility that we can't ignore. This good and humane law -- and it is that -- recognizes the rightful claim of Amerasian children to American citizenship and permits their entry into our country after arrangements have been made for their care with the families or with private organizations.

I understand that this program can create thousands and thousands of jobs and leverage billions of dollars, several billions of dollars of investment capital into small business, where most of the new jobs that we need will be created in this country.

Bill Verity, the Chairman of the Task Force on the Private Sector Initiative, has been looking into the area of how the Federal Government can work in connection with the private sector, and I know that he supports this effort a hundred percent. In fact, Jay Moorhead, who runs the White House Office on the Private Sector Initiative, and Bill Verity are going to report soon to the Cabinet on how the Federal departments and the agencies can become more creative in leveraging public sector funds to the private sector.

I also hope that the initiatives will stimulate States and local governments to find new and innovative ways to finance the new businesses -- and business itself -- without looking to the Federal Government -- those existing businesses.

And now I have another pearl, real pearl of good news for all of you on the country's economic recovery. Lower interest rates are the key to recovery, key to jobs, and the hope of all across America, and the Chemical Bank today has lowered the prime rate to 11\1/2\ percent, the lowest level in 25 months.

For every family, whether their livelihood is in a farm or in homebuilding, auto, steel, or retails, this is the kind of news that brings health, security, and opportunity. When the prime rate comes down, lower mortgage rates and loan rates for consumers are sure to follow.

Governor Bond. Mr. President, thank you, sir, on behalf of the National Governors' Association committee on community and economic development, which had asked your administration to proceed with a small business economic revitalization program, we appreciate very much the next step in new federalism.

I can say that in our State of Missouri, as one of the States that will be participating in this pilot project with the National Development Council, we believe that we can use the resources that this will make available to help us in implementing new financing programs to provide jobs. And that, of course, is our great need right now.

The falling interest rate is probably the best news that we can have for jobs, but to know that we can work with Housing and Urban Development on their UDAG and their community development block grant programs, and SBA on the 503 programs, means that we can coordinate the resources available from the private sector, through State agencies, and available Federal programs to get the most bang for our buck and provide the most jobs.

So, we look forward to making it work in Missouri. I assure you we'll do our best, and I know the other 20 States participating will make their best efforts to create the jobs that this program promises.

Program. Congressman Evans' amendment provides the authority for EPA to continue promoting meaningful employment opportunities for older Americans in Federal, State, and local agencies, as they accomplish important short-term environmental protection projects. The amendment is based on a highly successful demonstration project carried out by EPA in conjunction with the Administration on Aging and the Department of Labor. I believe the amendent would further this Administration's goals of providing productive, meaningful employment to older workers, and providing the benefits of a cleaner, safer environment to future generations.

Nevertheless, enactment of S. 2577 would represent a major step backward in achieving the goal of assuring that our vitally important environmental research programs reflect the best judgment of the scientific community, unhampered by partisan or interest group politics.

S. 2577 would mandate that the EPA Science Advisory Board membership include representatives from ``States, industry, labor, academia, consumers, and the general public.'' This requirement runs counter to the basic premise of modern scientific thought as an objective undertaking in which the views of special interests have no role. The purpose of the Science Advisory Board is to apply the universally accepted principles of scientific peer review to the research conclusions that will form the basis for EPA regulations, a function that must remain above interest group politics.

In addition, under the statutes governing actual promulgation of EPA rules, the Administrator is obligated to seek public comment from any and all interested parties and to weigh such comment in shaping final rules. That is the stage of the rulemaking process at which involvement of special interest viewpoints is appropriate, not the earlier stage of developing a sound scientific understanding of the research findings that may be relevant to a particular rulemaking or class of rules.

Environmental regulation involves scientific, political, social, and economic judgments. The laws mandating protection of our air, water, and land against harmful pollution reflect this necessity to balance a wide range of factors. But for the entire regulatory process to function effectively, it must have as its starting point an objectively developed review of the state of scientific knowledge. The Science Advisory Board is vital to the preparation of this objective scientific review; to require that the Board become a political entity, with representatives from various special interests, would completely undermine the use of scientific knowledge in EPA rulemaking.

The maintenance of a free, essentially self-governing scientific research community is one of the great strengths of our Nation. To undermine this tradition by requiring that the scientists appointed to the EPA Science Advisory Board wear the label of ``industry'' or ``labor'' or ``consumer'' is a modern-day version of Lysenkoism to which I must strongly object.

Advisory Board, S. 2577 contains a number of other objectionable features. It authorizes spending that is $46.4 million above the previously enacted appropriation bill; it mandates an increase in the proportion of funds devoted to basic research from 15 percent to 20 percent, which will take funds away from high-priority research needed for the support of regulatory proceedings; it mandates a duplicative and wasteful effort to create another national environmental monitoring network; and it mandates a number of research activities that are inconsistent with the previously enacted appropriation.

Over the years, we Americans have faced many hard choices, and politics being politics, there have been a few who have tried to obscure the issues and exploit them for political gain. But time after time, the common sense of the American voter has outsmarted those who would mislead us.

So today, in the midst of this noisy election year, let's clear the air for a moment and talk facts, not opinions. Specifically, let us expose six big myths that are being spread by people who ought to know better.

Myth number one -- and I'm sure you've heard this one again and again -- is that increases in defense spending in recent years are one of the main causes of projected Federal deficits. The fact is that the defense share of the Federal budget and the gross national product has been shrinking sharply over the last 20 years. It was 9 percent of the gross national product in 1960. This year, it's only 6 percent.

It's nondefense spending that's been growing. During the last 22 years, while defense spending was shrinking as a part of the gross national product, nondefense spending nearly doubled -- from 9 percent of the gross national product to nearly 18 percent. If it weren't for the drastic growth in nondefense spending, we'd actually have a big budget surplus today.

Myth number two is a whopper you've been hearing a lot from the people who'd like to take back your tax cuts. They claim that the other cause of big Federal deficits is the well-deserved tax relief we won for you over the objections of the big spenders in the Congress. That just isn't true.

The reality is that the effect of the tax cuts enacted in 1981 was mainly to hold tax rates even, to keep the hard-pressed American taxpayer from being bled even drier through further hikes and the bracket creep caused by inflation. Between 1980 and '85, taxes, as a share of the gross national product, will drop by less than 1 percentage point. The real culprits for those whopping deficits are the same congressional big spenders who voted down the balanced budget amendment.

Myth number three -- and I'm sure you've heard this one, too -- is the charge that this administration has slashed Federal social spending and caused a lot of human hardship. Well, that sounds bad. But is it true? The answer is no.

It's easy to see how the myths persist. Not too long ago, a family of six in a Northeastern State was portrayed on television as destitute. That family was eligible for programs totaling $1,159 per month, tax free.

Myth number four is an especially cynical one because it tries to exploit the real suffering many people are feeling and feeds on the kind of fear and despair that I spoke of last week and which can slow the recovery we all want. It claims that the 11 million people who are currently unemployed won't find jobs until after the recession is completely over and we're back to full recovery.

In effect, this myth cruelly condemns millions of our friends, neighbors, and family to a future without hope. The reality is a lot better. Bad as current unemployment is, in most individual cases it's a temporary problem. For example, of all the workers who became unemployed last July, one-third were no longer unemployed within 30 days, and two-thirds were off the unemployment list within 60 days. Now, true, some of those people had withdrawn from the job market. But the majority of them had found new jobs and were helping achieve the economic recovery we're all working so hard for.

Myth number five would have you believe that America's best days are behind us, that we're falling behind our foreign competitors in our standard of living. Well, what's the fact behind the myth? The good old U.S.A. is still the most productive of the world's major industrial countries.

In 1980, the last year with reliable information, real per capita income in the United States was 14 percent better than Germany, 20 percent better than France, and a whopping 35 percent ahead of Japan. In the last 2 years, with those countries suffering from the same worldwide recession we're experiencing, the United States is still number one.

And finally, there's the biggest and cruelest myth of all -- the doom-peddling argument that there is no end in sight for this bitter recession. The reality behind the myth: We aren't out of the woods yet, but we're getting there. Inflation and interest rates are down. Yesterday a leading bank lowered its prime rate to 11\1/2\ percent, and others will follow. Real wages and retail sales are moving up. Housing starts and car sales, so vital to recovery, are both heading up again. And the strong surge of investor confidence we've witnessed in recent weeks means new growth for our economy and more jobs for our people.

It's been a long, hard fight, going on for much more than the last 2 years, and it isn't over yet. But thanks to your patient courage and your ability to see the truth behind the political fairytales, America is on the road to lasting recovery.

I have signed into law today H.R. 6170, a bill that establishes a new incentive grant program to encourage States to establish programs to reduce or eliminate drunk driving. Accidents caused by drunk drivers are a serious problem that cost this country vast amounts of money each year, cause thousands of deaths or injuries, and cause untold grief to these victims and their families.

While I have decided to sign H.R. 6170 into law, I must express my strong opposition to one provision of the bill. Section 102 would authorize one House of Congress to veto regulations promulgated by the Secretary of Transportation to govern supplemental grants for alcohol traffic safety programs. The Attorney General has advised that, because such congressional action has the force and effect of law, the Constitution requires that action to be taken by legislation be presented to the President for approval or veto before it can become effective. Section 102, however, omits the President from this process of lawmaking. Moreover, Section 102 unconstitutionally involves the Congress in the executive functions of promulgating regulations under authority previously conferred, in violation of the principle of separation of powers. This act will be administered consistently with these constitutional principles.

Despite large increases in drivers, vehicles and traffic, there has been a significant reduction in the fatality rate per 100 million miles of travel. The rate has decreased by 38 percent, from 5.5 in the mid-60's to the present level of 3.4. This means that motorists can drive more miles today with less risk. Had the rate remained at the 1966 level, nearly 280,000 more people would have been killed since then.

Although we can be proud of this accomplishment, the actual number of fatalities each year remains unnecessarily high. In 1980, 51,077 people met violent deaths in traffic accidents -- an average of 140 lives lost every day. Compounding the tragedy is the fact that most of the victims were young people, killed at a time when they had the most to contribute to society and the most to gain from life.

The overall regulatory framework established since 1966 has contributed to motor vehicle safety in this country. Federal motor vehicle safety standards have encouraged the introduction of safety improvements. In the future, new regulations will be issued when there is no practical alternative and when we are certain that they will result in a clear and beneficial payoff. We are convinced that these reforms can be accomplished without jeopardizing the safety and consumer goals and policies that you have established.

Reducing the annual traffic death toll will not be easy. Motorists today are better informed and are driving in safer vehicles and on safer roads. But they are still victims of habit and of human nature.

They choose not to wear a safety belt because they do not expect to be in an accident. They drink and drive because alcohol is part of our social mores. And they sometimes speed and take unnecessary chances because being in a hurry is an unfortunate fact of modern life. Changing these driving behaviors is the traditional and most challenging obstacle to improving traffic safety.

The answer lies in widespread public education efforts and a national traffic safety commitment that involves government, industry and the public. We are convinced that significant progress can be made and that American motorists and pedestrians will ultimately enjoy a greater level of personal safety as a result.

The Chairman of the Railroad Retirement Board informs me that despite changes in railroad retirement negotiated by rail labor and management and enacted in the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, the railroad retirement system faces severe financial difficulty. With the railroad industry's strong tradition of collective bargaining, it is my belief that the parties should be free to negotiate and implement changes in the railroad retirement system as part of their normal collective bargaining. Restoring the rail industry's pension to the private sector as proposed would free rail labor and management from inappropriate Federal intrusion in their affairs. The rights and benefits of active and retired rail workers would be unaffected by this reorganization, with the Federal government continuing to provide social security to retired rail workers, their families and dependents.

The Secretary of Labor, the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, and the Director of the Office of Personnel Management, who serve jointly as my Pay Agent, found that an overall increase of about 18.47 percent in General Schedule rates of pay would be required to achieve comparability with private sector pay as that concept is defined in the Federal Pay Comparability Act of 1970. The Advisory Committee on Federal Pay agreed with that finding.

Productivity. Approval of this legislation reflects my continuing concern for improving productivity in the United States -- a concern that lies at the heart of our economic recovery program, which focuses on reduced growth in Federal spending, incentive-based tax reductions, regulatory relief, and steady, moderate growth in the money supply. All these measures contribute significantly to the growth of productivity.

Greater productivity growth is necessary for achieving full employment, price stability, and sustained economic growth. It is vital to regaining our competitive position in world markets and creating job opportunities for an expanding American labor force. Productivity is essential to raising incomes and maintaining stable prices. It also contributes to real economic growth and rising standards of living.

Our concern for and awareness of the productivity problems confronting the Nation led to the establishment last November of the National Productivity Advisory Committee to advise the President and the Cabinet on specific actions the Federal Government can take to improve productivity in the United States. The Committee is comprised of 34 distinguished leaders from business, labor, government, and academia, representing a broad cross section of economic and business experience. The Advisory Committee, which has met several times during the year, has already developed a number of recommendations for specific actions that will further promote productivity growth.

While I am concerned about the need for yet another Conference, I believe that under the auspices of the National Productivity Advisory Committee, a White House Conference on Productivity can make a significant contribution to the ongoing efforts in this area.

William Simon, who chairs the Advisory Committee, has agreed to undertake this added responsibility, and he will work with me, the Secretaries of Commerce and Treasury, and my other advisers to select a Conference Director.

It is only 4.8. And by curious coincidence, 4.8 -- the last time we had that inflation rate was the last time that there was a Republican administration here. It was 4.8 when President Ford left office, and we're back to that inflation rate. As I say, the rate of increase in the last couple of months even would suggest that it's going to be a lower rate as the year progresses.

The President. Well, on Sunday, one of your networks, at least, had two of the most eminent economists from Wall Street on the air. Both of them said unequivocally this was a bull market, the beginning of a bull market, which, as you know, means increase. They even suggested that they could foresee the Dow Jones getting to 1,200. But they said they were predicting that within the next couple of weeks there would be a leveling and some drops and some ups and downs, because that was always typical of the beginning of a bull market. And, actually, the percentages bear this out, because in the last 10 weeks the market has gone up 260 points, and in the last 2 days the drop has only been the fraction under 42 points. So, it is still an up market with this drop.

The President. Well, no. I believe that we are going to see this period of ups and downs, as has been predicted. But I believe that the rate of increase -- it's gone up over 33 percent, and it's only dropped 4 of those percentage points, so it's still up 29 percent.

Nothing could be finer than to be in Carolina. Your beautiful State is rich in tradition and strong in character, dreams, drive, courage, refusing to quit -- they've made the difference in North Carolina before, and they make the difference now. If you want the proof, watch the Wolfpack and the Tar Heels.

You know, you taught me a thing or two about that winning spirit. I haven't forgotten a great turning point in my life, our great primary victory here that got everything rolling in 1976. And I haven't forgotten an even bigger victory in 1980, when we were together again. Now, of course, I should be saying a thank you, but really I'm back to ask a favor. Please, go out there and work for your great candidates so this year we can make it three for three.

You have great candidates. First is Congressman Bill Hendon from your 11th District. He's been a real star in his freshman class -- and I'm a member of that class, too. Bill is locked in a tough race, and it would be a tragedy if we didn't have him back in January. With your support, he'll be back.

District. I've been very grateful to have his support, and we can't afford to lose him. Nor can we afford to lose your two fine, experienced Representatives from the 9th and 10th Districts, Congressmen Jim Martin and Jim Broyhill.

Fourth District, he's bright, and I understand he's done some mighty good recruiting for one of your great universities. I think that anyone who can produce that many champions is a champion himself and deserves to be elected.

Then there's Anne Bagnal from the Fifth District. She was part of our ticket in 1980 and just barely fell short. And if you can convince responsible Democrats and Independents to get behind her this year, she's going to make it, and we need her.

POW in North Vietnam, he was condemned to a living hell of torture for a period of a long 6 years. The Communists hadn't reckoned on this man's courage. They didn't realize you can't destroy the spirit of a true American hero. You can't trample on his faith; you can't kill his feelings of hope and love when he's tasted the truth of a better life.

In his book, ``Scars and Stripes,'' Red McDaniel wrote that the greatest moment of his life was seeing his wife Dorothy waiting with open arms, a reunion he dreamed about every night for those 6 years. And when he threw his arms around his family, he said it was worth it all for this moment.

Well, like Red McDaniel, I, too, have a special moment I've dreamed about, and I think that many of you've shared this one. It'll be that day when we can tell our children and our grandchildren that we have begun to pay off this nation's national trillion-dollar debt, and some of the burden will be spared that coming generation.

Now, the problems we face today don't require the same sacrifices that heroes like Red were called upon to make. But they do require courage -- courage to look to the future rather than cling to the past; courage to say, ``I will carry on,'' rather than, ``I give up;'' and courage to believe in our hopes rather than to be ruled by our fears. Only by believing in each other, by living up to the values we share, by trusting in the God who has blessed our land, can we Americans solve the problems that have hit our nation.

Well, I have some good news for you. Just as you were told a few moments ago, we are changing the direction of America. We're putting her back on the course of hope that was charted by our Founding Fathers. We've begun to handcuff the big spenders, to get the Federal Government off your backs, promote economic recovery, and put you, the people, back in charge of your country again. With your support and with the help of your fine Representatives and your two great Senators, Jesse Helms and John East, we're clearing away the economic wreckage that was dumped in our laps.

Now, of course you'd never believe that if you listened to the drumbeat of doom and gloom from our critics. They say our economy is on its knees. Well, do you know something: If our economy is on its knees, that's a big improvement, because 2 years ago it was flat on its back.

Today's Monday morning quarterbacks have already forgotten the monster that they left us: spending shooting up at an annual rate of 17 percent; double-digit inflation; high unemployment; a 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate, the highest in more than a hundred years; nearly a trillion dollars in debt; and the highest peacetime tax burden this country had ever known.

But those in Congress who spent your hard-earned dollars with such glee still resist the medicine of a balanced budget amendment. They claim it'd be a dangerous risk. Well, let me make one thing plain: There is no more dangerous risk to America or to the loved ones we leave behind than deliberate, planned inflation such as they gave us, and which could destroy our country. Only we're not going to let it.

Let me assure you, there are two other struggles we'll never give up on: protection of innocent human life of an unborn child and the right of your children to begin their school days the same way the Members of the United States Congress begin theirs -- with prayer.

Together, we've pulled America back from the edge of disaster. Of those five critical problems that I mentioned that we inherited -- runaway spending, runaway taxing, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and high unemployment -- we have already made solid progress on four.

And now they say they aim to repeal the third installment, that third year of your tax cut that's due next July 1st, and indexing -- which will follow that -- which is to stop you from being shoved up into higher tax brackets simply because you get a cost-of-living pay raise. Now, that would mean, if they had their way, a loss of about $2,500 over the next 5 years for the average American family. It's about time the people who blow so much smoke about compassion started showing some real compassion for the people who pay this country's bills. We will protect your tax cut.

Third, we're helping to lighten the load of your own bills by beating down that double-digit inflation and the price increases that it brings. Inflation hit 18 percent in January of 1980. We're doing a little better than that; we're doing a lot better. It's back to where it was -- believe it or not -- well, I just have to say that, as of yesterday, I would have still had to say that we reduced inflation from that 18 down to 5.1 percent. But this morning at 8:30 eastern time, the news came out about September. And it's kind of an interesting coincidence. The inflation rate now for this year, the 9 months of 1982, is 4.8 percent. And, by coincidence, it is exactly the same 4.8 percent that it was when Jerry Ford left office -- the last Republican President -- because that's what it was then.

You know, it's hard to mince words, because in these difficult first 21 months we've managed to undo much of the damage of those irresponsible big tax and big spending policies that those who came after President Ford insisted were good for America.

You know, as a matter of fact, someone asked me this morning before I got on the plane up there about the situation, and I just happened to think that they're blaming us, you know, consistently for the high unemployment, which is a great tragedy -- and they're blaming us for that. And if we're to blame for that, how come they say that we're not responsible also for all these reductions that I've just told you about?

Certainly, as I indicated, as we meet today, unemployment remains far too high. But just as surely as single-digit inflation started interest rates coming down, getting those interest rates down so that people can buy automobiles and take mortgages out on homes and so forth, that will dramatically drive unemployment back down to single digits, too. And then we will have delivered a knockout blow to recession once and for all. So, unlike some before us, we intend to get the job done and get it done right this time so that it'll stay.

And I hear those who say we haven't done enough. I think there's a double standard there. They won't accept responsibility for what they did in 25 years that they controlled both Houses of the Congress, but they want us to take the full blame for not producing a miracle in less than 25 months.

But the real truth is, our critics are playing with the people's fears, trying to scare them into believing that things will get worse so their own political fortunes will get better. The picture of fear and despair that they paint on the network evening blues -- [laughter] -- that's a picture of America where she was, not where she's going. We didn't create the grain embargo, and we didn't create double-digit inflation or 21\1/2\-percent interest rates that caused so much misery. We ended them.

America has a future of courage and hope -- hope that grows brighter as more people respond to the drop in inflation, tax rates, and interest rates. Not every statistic is strong yet, but look at the trend. Real wages, adjusted for inflation -- real wages are up. Retail sales are up; housing starts and permits are up; the value of the dollar is up; productivity is up; research and development spending is up; venture capital in small business near a record. And, while you're hearing all the story about bankruptcies in these times of stress, business new starts -- the starting up of new businesses is near a record high.

Personal savings is at a 6-year high, and new IRA accounts are pumping $30 to 35 billion into savings and investment that can then be used to provide jobs. Can there be any doubt that what all this means -- that slowly, surely, confidence is being restored, and America will lead the world out of this worldwide recession that we're all in?

This great country of ours is ready to move again. It's time that others stopped trying to scare the people and subvert recovery. If they can't encourage, if they won't work with the rest of us, then let them get out of the way.

We all could recite the criticisms. We've all heard all the things that they've said that we're supposedly doing wrong. But has anyone heard them suggest an actual alternative? All they can talk about or think about -- they don't dare mention it in this election year -- is they'll go right back, if given the chance, to more big spending, big taxing, more regulations, more meddling and make-work, more big government coming through the windows, under the door, and down the chimney.

One week from today you and millions of Americans will have a private moment in a voting booth, the place where you have as much influence and power as any other American in this country. When all of you prepare for that moment, I urge you to consider some very important questions. Ask yourselves: Will we create more jobs by returning to the old policies that sent those interest rates skyrocketing? Will we create more jobs by returning to old policies that gave us back-to-back years of double-digit inflation? Will we create more jobs by going back to the old policies that taxed working families as if they were millionaires? Or is there a better way? Do you think that the program that all of us worked so hard to pass, a program that is still so young, but that has already brought down the spending growth, the tax rates, the inflation, the interest rates -- do you think that program deserves just a little more time to fix the one remaining problem -- unemployment -- so we can put people back on the job and get this country back on its feet?

There's a passage in the Psalms which says: ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' America has endured a long, terrible night of economic hardship, but now we're seeing the first welcome burst of sunshine, the dawn of a new day for our country. America is entering a new season of hope, a genuine hope which springs from the vitality of the American spirit. We will put strong wings on weary hearts.

Well, those words, ``Act worthy of yourselves,'' echo in my ears. Over these last 21 months, I've been sustained and inspired by the strength of each one of you. Your spirit and the warmth of your good wishes have made me more determined than ever to fulfill the enormous trust that is placed in this office. You know, you don't -- maybe not everyone has realized it when they've held the job -- you don't really become President. You are given temporary custody of this great institution which was created by our Founding Fathers.

Through this long night of economic hardship, you the people, the heroes of America, American democracy, have measured up to Dr. Warren's admonition. With your continued help, through the magnificent reach of your determination, by the mighty force of your personal prayers, I know that this great, new season of hope will bring that day of renewal and national regeneration and will bring a better world for our children.

I know every time in one of these rallies when I see the young people that are present here, I am so delighted, because our generation has to realize that's what this election is all about, this country we're going to leave them.

Kate Smith is one of America's great singers of this or any other century. Her splendid voice alone has earned her a place in the history books. But it's also won her a place in our hearts because of the extra something that reaches out to the spirit as well as to the ear of the listener.

Kate always sang from her heart. And so, we always listened with our hearts. It's been truly said that one of the most inspiring things that our GI's in World War II in Europe and the Pacific, and later in Korea and Vietnam, ever heard was the voice of Kate Smith. The same is true for all of us.

The voice of Kate Smith is known and loved by millions of Americans, young and old. In war and peace, it has been an inspiration. Those simple but deeply moving words, ``God bless America,'' have taken on added meaning for all of us because of the way Kate Smith sang them. Thanks to her they have become a cherished part of all our lives, an undying reminder of the beauty, the courage and the heart of this great land of ours. In giving us a magnificent, selfless talent like Kate Smith, God has truly blessed America.

So, Kate, on behalf of a grateful nation, it's my privilege to present to you the Presidential Medal of Freedom, an honor that you have earned many times over through your singing, charitable work, love of country, and by being an inspiration to all of us.

Lately, the airwaves have been full of charges, attacks and, yes, cruel scare tactics. Some have argued that our economy is heading over a cliff. Well, they're wrong. Slowly, but surely, we're lifting our economy out of the mess created over the past several decades. We're on the road back. Others have tried to frighten the elderly about social security. Well, they're wrong, too. And they know it. As long as I'm President, we will protect the solvency of social security, and we will protect the benefits of those who depend on it.

It's time to stop playing on people's fears and to begin asking what we can do together to make things better. None of us can afford to play politics as usual. We love this land of ours, because it's a special place where people are free to work, to save, to believe, to build a better future. The cynics may call it corny, but this way of life we all cherish is best summed up in three simple words: the American dream.

From our beginnings as a nation, that dream has been a living, breathing reality for millions. It still is. But it faces serious threats. There's no mystery about those threats. They've been gradually worsening for a long time, while politicians played the same old games.

I could reel off a lot of numbers, but I don't think I need to. I know you understand what it is we're up against and what we have to do to make our country and the American dream well again. Our way of life is based on some very fundamental values -- family, faith, patriotism, hard work, and opportunity. But for too long, those values have been eroded, instead of strengthened, by government policies of spend and spend, tax and tax.

The big spenders gave us record inflation and high interest rates that left you with less and less of your earnings at the end of the week. They made it harder for your family to save for the future, to afford the home of your own, that new car, and all of the other basic products and services that keep our economy going and create jobs. They even drove prayer out of our nation's classrooms.

Well, I'm trying to change that. But to do it, I sure need your help. It takes more than 21 months to undo the damage of 20 years, but we've made a beginning. Already we're winning the war on four out of five economic problems we inherited.

We've cut the growth of government spending by nearly two-thirds. We've lowered your tax rates by 25 percent. We've cut inflation by more than half. And we've driven down those crippling high interest rates from 21\1/2\ percent to 12 percent. And here's the vital bottom line. By solving these problems, we've laid the foundation for lasting, inflation-proof recovery that will mean more jobs.

We've begun to correct the problems and policies that did so much harm to groups like farmers, workers, housewives, and small businessmen. We're doing the job that must be done, and we're seeing unmistakable signs that our program is working -- real wages, retail sales, and housing are all up. Americans have reason for hope again.

So, before you cast your vote on Tuesday, please ask yourself if you and your children will be better served by those who are quick to criticize but offer no real alternative, or by those who share our basic values and who will stick to the task before us -- making government live within its means and making your future a future of opportunity and prosperity again.

Think about it, my fellow Americans. Can big spenders like the ones who got us into this tragic situation now be trusted to lead us out of it? I believe you know the answer. And I'm counting on you to cast your votes for hope, not despair; for responsible men and women who are pledged to help us, not hinder us, on the road to recovery.

The President. Well, we have some very distinguished and honored guests here today, and their families are also with us. We welcome Alberto Salazar, Grete Waitz, Linda Down to the White House and congratulate them all on their New York Marathon performances.

Mr. Salazar. I'd like to present this model of Nike-Mariah shoes. They're the same brand which I wore in winning the New York Marathon. I'd like to present these to President Reagan, and I hope that these will help him in his race for reelection. And I'm sure that he will be reelected President.

Ms. Waitz. I want to say thank you, Mr. President, and as a representative from a small country I feel very honored to be here today. And I hope that my presence here can be an inspiration for female athletes all over the world. Thank you.

Ms. Down. Hi. I just want to say thank you for inviting me here. And even though I was the tortoise in the race, I think I felt very blessed to have had the chance to do it, and I felt honored to be an American and a woman. Thank you.

All Series EE bonds purchased on and after November 1, 1982, and held at least 5 years, will earn at least 85 percent of the average yield during the holding period on outstanding Treasury marketable securities with approximately 5 years remaining to maturity. New bonds held less than 5 years will continue to earn interest on a fixed, graduated scale.

This major change in the way Savings Bonds interest is computed will help return bonds to the forefront of savings instruments. Savings Bonds will now be able to keep pace with other investments, and their owners are guaranteed a competitive return regardless of market conditions. This is another important step in our effort to encourage added savings, which are a key to our country's economic growth.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

Today marks the beginning of a year-long celebration commemorating the one hundred twenty-fifth anniversary of the birth of Theodore Roosevelt, one of America's heroes and larger-than-life personalities.

Born with considerable physical handicaps, Theodore Roosevelt overcame his afflictions and drew strength from his triumph over personal adversity, a strength he would later devote to the public good. Through sheer willpower, he became a rugged outdoorsman and active conservationist, the organizer of the Rough Riders, a fearless crusader against corruption and for law and order, an explorer, a social reformer and author, our youngest President, and the first of our citizens to receive the Nobel Peace Prize. He was truly an American Renaissance man. His life was a voyage of discovery guided by deep principle and private morality.

He was also our first modern chief executive, rejecting isolationism and leading America into active participation in world decisions for which we shared responsibility. Never again would the leaders of the Old World act without regard to this new world power called the United States. He understood our people and our spirit. He identified the national character with the words, ``Americanism means the virtues of courage, honor, justice, truth, sincerity, and hardihood -- the virtues that made America.'' And I might add, the virtues that made Theodore Roosevelt.

The President. Senator Wallop, Senator Simpson, Congressman Cheney, ladies and gentlemen, our candidate for Governor, the other candidates who are here on the platform for your statewide races: It's great to be back here in Wyoming, back where your farmers and ranchers and workers and small business people dream big and toil hard to make dreams come true.

I'm pleased to be here and to speak on behalf of people I very much admire. The first, of course, is the man who went to Washington as your Senator, but I can tell you he left his heart in Wyoming -- Malcolm Wallop. He shares your values, and he's always on the job, using his experience to help and protect the people of this great State. As chairman of the Subcommittee on Public Lands and Reserved Water, he shepherds legislation crucial to your State.

And, you know, that's very important, because many of us have tended to forget that in the beginning of our country, the two Senators from each State were sent there by the State to be a body representing the States, the sovereign States, keeping alive the idea that this nation is a federation of sovereign States, not 50 administrative districts of the Federal Government. Whether it be working for prosperity and peace -- the peace we all want for our children, for these young people who are here today, or protecting the pensions of senior citizens, who've already given so much, Malcolm Wallop has a solid record of keeping faith.

And, you know, having mentioned those senior citizens, I can predict that in these last few days of the campaign nationwide, our opponents are going to broadcast widely one of the most dishonest canards that has ever been fostered in a political campaign. They are going to tell you that we -- and I really include myself, because I'm kind of a target of that -- that we are some way out -- some way we're on our way to changing or reducing or doing away with social security. And let me tell you that is what I said before -- a falsehood.

I pledged during the campaign, when we were aware that social security has some fiscal problems that must be resolved to keep the program's integrity, those problems must be solved, but not at the expense of taking anything away from the people who are presently dependent on their social security checks. So, in the next few days when you hear that other side saying those things, just hold your nose and smile -- [laughter] -- because you now have the truth.

And I know that your former statehouse speaker, Warren Morton of Casper, is a man of great experience, and he would make a fine Governor. And I'm an ex-Governor saying that. He will bring to Wyoming the same responsible principles of government that we're trying so hard to bring to Washington. So, please promise me something: Go out from here; mobilize an army of Republicans, Democrats, and Independents; and get your great statewide candidates elected next Tuesday, November 2d.

With your support, and the leadership of Malcolm Wallop, Alan Simpson, and Dick Cheney, we're changing the direction of America; we're putting her back on the course of hope that was charted by the Founding Fathers. We've begun to handcuff the big spenders, get the Federal Government off your backs, promote economic recovery, and put you, the people, back in charge of your country again. For too long the Federal Government has been violating the Constitution in its usurpation of the rights that belong to the States, the local communities, and to the individual people in this country.

But now our critics are determined to beat the drums of doom and gloom. They say the economy is on its knees. Well, you know, if the economy is on its knees, that's quite an improvement, because 2 years ago it was flat on its back.

The truth is, thanks to your courage, your patience, and your support, we've already accomplished a minor miracle: We've pulled America back from the edge of disaster. Of the five worst economic problems that we inherited -- runaway spending, runaway taxing, double-digit inflation, record interest rates, and high unemployment -- we have already made solid progress on four of them, and that's not a bad beginning.

In 1977, they passed the biggest single tax increase in our history, and it still has further installments of increase built into the law that will go into effect between now and 1990, the payroll tax. And then when we arrived in 1981, they tried to stop us from giving any tax cut at all.

And now that we've got some of it, they're aiming and they've made public that it is their intention to repeal that third-year tax cut, the 10-percent income tax cut that is due next July -- and the indexing, which keeps you from being pushed into a higher tax bracket when you get a cost-of-living pay raise.

You know, inflation has not been an accident. It's a tax by which government, without having to bear the onus of passing a tax bill, can get more money out of your pockets through that thing called bracket creep. So, their idea of fairness means the average family of four, if they have their way, would lose more than $2,500 in tax benefits over the next 5 years.

It's about time the people who blow so much smoke about compassion start showing some real compassion for people like you who pay the country's bills. Well, I know and I cannot only speak for myself but for these gentlemen here on the platform, and that is, we're going to protect that tax cut, and you're going to continue to get the other installments that are still due.

Just consider one of the features of that tax cut which Malcolm and Alan and Dick worked so hard to get. It contains a major benefit for you: family farmers, for ranchers, for family-owned businesses. We're raising the estate tax exemption to $600,000. Of even greater help, there will no longer be any estate tax for a surviving spouse.

No, you're not. You're talking about the corner grocer. You're talking about the farmer. You're talking about the people who, because of inflation having increased the value of the property, find that, if there is death in the family, the widow and the children who might remain no longer have that source of support because it has to be sold to pay the government's tax on death. Well, that's not going to happen anymore.

And third, we're trying to lighten the load on your family budget by beating down double-digit inflation. It hit 18 percent in January of 1980. We're doing a little better. As a matter of fact, we're doing a lot better. Inflation is all the way down to 4.8 percent in 1982. And, you know, I could have said it's back down to 4.8 percent, because the last time it was 4.8 percent was when the last Republican President, Jerry Ford, left office. And we're not finished yet. We're going to bring it down even lower. 1982 could go down in history as the best performance against inflation in the last 10 years.

So, that's four out of five, and that leaves us with unemployment, which remains far too high. But just as surely as single-digit inflation started the interest rates tumbling, getting these interest rates down will drive unemployment back down to single digits, too. And then, we'll have delivered a knockout blow to the recession once and for all.

And I say ``once and for all,'' because it won't be like those seven previous recessions that we've had since World War II, when our opponents had controlled the Congress for 26 straight years, and every time there was a recession they applied the gimmick of big government spending, bigger deficits, and the quick fix. And all it led to was a little temporary boost, and then 2 years later we were right back in another recession.

Just this week, the National Association of Realtors came to Washington to report to me a surge of homebuying in early October that was far above the average for this time of year. That surge of buying means that housing is becoming affordable for more Americans again, and this will mean more jobs. Unlike some before us, this administration intends to get the job done but to get it done right for a change.

Now, I hear those who say that we haven't done enough. But, you know, there's a kind of a little inconsistency, a double standard there. They won't accept responsibility for what they did in the 25-plus years they controlled the Congress, but they demand that we take full responsibility for not producing a miracle in less than 25 months.

Well, the truth is, our opponents sometimes sound to me, particularly in this election year, as if they don't really want a recovery. Their only concern is a political victory. Well, we didn't create the grain embargo. We didn't create double-digit inflation. We didn't create the 21\1/2\-percent interest rates which caused so much misery on Main Street and the farm; we ended them. And while not every statistic is strong yet, the trend is unmistakable. Real wages are up; real retail sales are up; housing starts and permits are up; the value of the dollar is up; productivity is up; research and development spending is up; venture capital in small business is near a record. And while there's been a lot of talk about the bankruptcies which the high interest rate has brought on -- and it did -- there is now a figure of business starts -- new businesses coming on line, that is virtually a record in our history.

Does all of this sound like an economy that's getting weaker or getting stronger? Confidence is being restored. You and your children can look to the future with hope again. And that's good news for America, and it's the thing that our opponents are not talking about.

Don't let the doomcriers and the scaremongers frighten our citizens and subvert recovery. All they offer is a return to their failed policies of the past: more big spending, more big taxing, more regulations, more meddling, and more make-work -- more big government coming through the windows, underneath the door, and down the chimney. And that's an alternative we don't need. If they can't encourage, if they can't work with the rest of us, then let them get out of the way, because we're going to do it.

You know, another thing you're hearing in this election year is that, well, we've had our program, gave it a try, and it didn't work. Well, my friends, yes, we've been there 21 months, but the program didn't start going into effect until 13 months ago. And there are still further installments of it to come next year, as I told you. I urge you, when you vote next Tuesday, vote for your hopes, not your fears. Vote for your children's future, not for the return of a failed past. Vote for the real hope of Wyoming: Malcolm Wallop, Dick Cheney, Warren Morton, and your statewide candidates.

There's a passage in the Psalms which says, ``Weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.'' Well, America's endured a long and terrible night of economic hardship. But now we're entering a new season of hope -- genuine hope which springs from the vitality of the American spirit.

Before I go, I'd like to read you just some lines from a letter I received from a Wyoming mother not too many miles from here. Her son had written an essay, ``What America Means to Me.'' And in the essay the young man said, ``I'm glad that I'm a citizen of the United States. I should help this country in any way I can. I think America is the best country in the world to live in; America has very good standards so that you and I can live in peace.'' Those are only a few of the lines the young man wrote. But I think we all get the general idea of his essay.

Well, with your continued help, with your determination, and with the mighty force of your prayers, I know that we can live up to those standards. And I know, too, that a great new season of hope will bring the better world that we owe to our children -- children like that young lad who wrote that essay -- and one day to their children.

I thank you for your support. I thank you for your courage. Thank you for being Americans. Send these people back to Washington -- Malcolm Wallop, Dick Cheney. And I know that Warren Morton and these State candidates should go back to your State capital. I know, of course, that Alan Simpson is going definitely back to Washington, not being in this election. But we need them all there. We need your continued support, and then we'll do the job together, I guarantee you.

But our incredible national debt and what led to it is one major reason why I'm here today. We're approaching an election that is every bit as crucial as the election of 1980. Americans remember all too well the days of double-digit inflation, skyrocketing interest rates, the days of hostages in Iran and the national malaise, the days of leadership in Washington that blamed you, the people, for their mistakes. Now, none of us wants to return to those days. But make no mistake: The decisions made by Americans next Tuesday and throughout this decade will determine whether we stay the course and maintain our national renewal or whether we stagger off on one more economic binge -- a binge that we and our children would have to pay for. And we'd pay for it with another pounding hangover.

Government will spend this year just in interest payments on the debt. That's as much as it took to run the whole Federal Government only 20 years ago. But our trillion-dollar debt is only one small part of the chaos, confusion, and all-purpose mess left us by the failed policies of the past.

Remember when inflation was in double digits for 2 years in a row? Remember when interest rates hit 21\1/2\ percent? Can you remember when the growth in the gross national product had gone down for the third year in a row, and the money supply had increased by 13 percent in the last half of 1980 -- the highest rate in postwar history? Remember when unemployment was already a serious problem, business failures were increasing, and a recession was on its way that would hit us with hurricane force -- a recession that was the legacy from all those years of boom and bust, of wild spending, erratic monetary policy, and of tax and tax, and spend and spend, and borrow and borrow?

Now, I'll admit that these statistics aren't at the fingertips of every American. But I do know that in their own quiet way, Americans fully understand the mess we inherited in 1980 and the obstacles we faced in trying to straighten it out.

And what a job we did face 21 months ago. In the last 10 years, Federal spending had tripled. In the last 5 years, Federal taxes had doubled. In 1980 alone, Federal spending had gone up 17 percent. The budget for the Department of Health and Human Services, the one that does all the charity programs and so forth, had become the third largest budget in the world, just after the national budgets of the United States -- the total budget -- and of the Soviet Union.

Those automatic spending programs we call ``entitlements'' were completely out of control. Those are the programs that the Congress doesn't have to change them every year. They're there with automatic increases built in. The food stamp program alone had grown in 15 years from $65 million to $11.3 billion -- an increase of more than 16,000 percent.

Well, on Inaugural day, just minutes after I took the oath of office, I went back into the Capitol and I signed a memorandum -- without even taking my coat off before I did it -- that put a freeze on Federal hiring. In the next three and a -- or a year and three-quarters, I should say, we cut the rate of growth in government spending by nearly two-thirds. We got individuals and businesses their first real tax cut in nearly 20 years and achieved the historic reform of tax indexing. That was stopping government from moving people into a higher percentage tax bracket just because they'd gotten a cost-of-living increase. We cut into the thicket of Federal regulations that were smothering economic growth, and we saved businesses and citizens at least $6 billion annually.

Now, that's not a cut in the spending of government; that was a savings out in the private sector to the people who had to do all the paperwork connected with those regulations. And we reduced the number of man-hours of paperwork the citizens were performing by nearly 200 million man-hours.

We knew it would take time. But even though our economic recovery program has been in effect for only 13 months, the dollar is stronger than it's been in any time in 10 years. Inflation -- once the number one concern of every American; double digit for 2 years -- is down to 4.8 percent so far this year. And you know, it's a very interesting coincidence, because 4.8 percent was exactly what inflation was when the last Republican President, Jerrry Ford, left Washington. And that 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate is all the way down to 12 percent and even in some banks 11\1/2\ percent. We're still working to bring them down further. But let's face it, we've already come a long way from that 21\1/2\ percent that we inherited.

And you know, the source of our economic problems is even beginning to dawn on the bafflegabbers and those fancy dudes in Washington. They're finally realizing what Montanans have known for a long time: Government is too big. It spends too much of our money. You can't drink yourself sober or spend yourself rich. You can't prime the pump without pumping the prime.

Democratic Party is talking about taking back your third-year tax cut scheduled to go into effect on July 1st and revoking the historic reform of tax indexing, which I mentioned. If they have their way, the average family of four would lose over $2,500 in tax relief over the next 5 years.

Senate. We couldn't have done what we've done if we didn't have a majority in the Senate, slim as it is. And we must have control of the key committees of the Senate which comes with having a majority. We have to put men and women in the House of Representatives who have a record of being part of the solution, not part of the problem.

Now, I ask you, is there anyone who's fought harder against big government, anyone who's fought more eloquently against higher spending and more taxes than your own candidate for the United States Senate, Larry Williams?

As head of your National Taxpayers Union, Larry has led the battle here in Montana for the tax indexing initiative and for an amendment to balance the Federal budget. Montanans aren't going to have to worry about where he's going to stand or how he's going to vote at the crucial moments in the next Congress. Now, let me tell you, he's no rubber stamp; I know that. And there are probably going to be times when Larry and I won't always agree. But I do know this: I know his personal integrity and his conscience will always be his guide. I need Larry Williams; Montana needs him; the country needs him. We need a proven fighter in the battle to get government off our backs, out of our pockets, and back to the standards of excellence once envisioned by the Founding Fathers.

And I say that as someone who's spent more than two-thirds of his life as a member and a worker in the Democratic Party, and I just couldn't follow the leadership any longer when it took the turning it took and the path that it has taken in these recent years.

Now, just let me add something right now that I hope all voters from all parties in this State know: There isn't a single Congressman who's done more to help not just this district and State, but the entire country in the areas of agriculture, defense, and controlling big government -- not one -- more than Ron Marlenee. We need Ron back in the House. And I don't have to ask you -- it's apparent that I ask you for your support -- but when you go out of here, start buttonholing friends and neighbors and make sure you get their support, too.

So, here are the stakes. Do we go back to tax and tax, spend and spend? Do we go back to economic stagnation at home? Do we go back to dishonor and retreat abroad as we've known it in recent years? Or do we stay the course? Do we offer hope and incentive and opportunity? Do we keep alive the beacon of faith and freedom that is the American dream?

I know that all of you believe in these things -- the love of freedom, the belief in the basic values, the sense of daring that we've returned to Washington. It's in your very being. It's in the ground you walk on, the air you breathe, and the grandeur that you see every day.

Believe me, this election is important to our future. Help me, help your State, and help this country. Send Larry Williams to the Senate and Ron Marlenee and Bob Davies to Congress. And together, we can make America great again -- not just for ourselves, but I'm so happy to see all these young people here, because that's what this election is all about -- America great again for them.

But I'm delighted to be here, and candidate -- Senator Hecht, if these people do what I think they're going to do, I thank you for your kind words, and I thank all of you for a great Western welcome. Governor List, Chic Hecht, Peggy Cavnar, Barbara Vucanovich -- it's an honor to be here supporting your candidacies, and it's a pleasure to breathe deep and know that Washington is thousands of miles away.

You know, some folks in the East don't really understand how ingrained the pioneer spirit is out here. Quitting wasn't something that our forefathers dwelled upon. And although the going was rough -- sometimes the mountains were steeper and the deserts were hotter than expected -- they weren't the kind of people to turn back. And that same spirit still thrives out here on the Nevada plains. On November 2d the people of Nevada, just like honest, hard-working people in the rest of the country, are going to give a message to the quitters and the Washington gloom-and-doomers.

We charted a new direction, because things were not right with our country. You know it, and I know it. And as much as some politicians want the American people to forget what it was like 2 years ago, we're not forgetting, and we won't go back.

You know, when we got to Washington, this country was in the fast lane headed toward economic oblivion. The folks who'd been at the wheel were more reckless than the Dukes of Hazzard [Television program] -- [laughter] -- they'd been spending, taxing, inflating, and borrowing as if there were no tomorrow. But there was one thing different than them and the Dukes of Hazzard: The Dukes of Hazzard are funny when they do it. And there wasn't anything funny about what was going on in Washington.

When you go into the voting booth on Tuesday, November the 2d, think about what's being offered. Runaway spending is finally under control. We cut an annual growth rate of -- annual Federal spendings from 17 percent by almost two-thirds -- down to 6 percent. You only have to listen to the opposition to know that no matter how they try to disguise it, what they're talking about is reopening the floodgates.

And more spending means more taxes. Taxation has been called the art of plucking the feathers without killing the bird, but before we got there the folks in Washington didn't seem to know when to stop plucking. We've put in place the first real tax cut rate -- or rate tax -- rate cut -- it works both ways, I guess -- [laughter] -- in almost 20 years. And when you go into the voting booth, remember that those who oppose our program did everything in their power to stop us from cutting your taxes, and they still want to take those tax cuts away from you. They're aiming right now at the remaining installment -- 10 percent in the income tax that is due next July 1st -- they want to cancel that.

Now, let me tell you what that reduction means to you in inflation. If we'd let prices continue going up the way they were, keep the same rate that they had, an average family of four would now be paying $25 more a month for their groceries, and almost all of your everyday expenses would be substantially higher.

But what about those of you who are retired? If we had permitted inflation to continue as it was, a pensioner on a fixed income of $8,000 would now be $640 poorer in purchasing power. I don't have to tell you what that means to an older person trying to make ends meet. Because of what we've done, your pension is going farther. It buys more food and the necessities of life. Older people, as a result, are more independent.

Today, with inflation dropping and with the upward trend of the stock market, billions of dollars have been added to the value of the assets of this country's pension funds, making those pensions stronger and more secure.

So, when you go into that voting booth, remember that those who oppose our program would return to policies that produced one of the worst inflations in the Nation's history. Do you want to pay more for groceries? Do you want pension money to be worth less?

Yes, unemployment remains too high. It was too high when we got here. It'll be too high as long as there is one American who wants to work and can't find a job. But it would be no favor to the unemployed to go back to the policies that knocked the wind out of our economy in the first place. We're building a lasting recovery that will mean real and lasting jobs.

There are other industrial countries that have continued down that economic path that we left 21 months ago. And today they're far worse off than us, suffering both high unemployment and high inflation with little relief in sight. By contrast, America is heading into a period of growth and stability. All we need is the courage to stick with it and get the job done.

And those telling us that our program can't work -- politicians who'd rather exploit our trouble than make things better -- ought to realize that they're yelling down a blind alley. Their negativism is being drowned out by the ever-building buzz of economic recovery. Real wages are up. And, in addition to real wages, retail sales are up; housing starts are up; the value of the dollar is up more than it has been in the last 10 years; productivity is up; research and development spending is up; venture capital investments in small business are at a near-record high; new IRA accounts are pumping some 30 to 35 billion dollars into savings and investment for jobs.

Lasting economic progress doesn't happen overnight, and in 21 months you can't cure problems that were more than 20 years in the making. But the gloom-and-doomers should wake up. The train is pulling out of the station, and they're still complaining that the engine wouldn't start.

And don't you think that it's about time that you had a Senator who doesn't spend all of his time canceling out Paul Laxalt's vote? Chic Hecht will be a steady hand holding the reins, a man we can count on. Along with Peggy and Barbara, he offers Nevadans a chance to play a significant role in restoring vitality and opportunity to our country.

And remember, this is not a fight between Republicans and Democrats. It's a choice between those who are building a better tomorrow versus those who only 2 years ago, when they held the reins of government, were suggesting that we should lower our expectations. Do you remember those litanies, those songs they gave us that we'd have to learn to live with lower standards of living, that America's best days were behind us, we were entering an era of scarcity?

And while putting our economic house in order, we've also taken the first steps to give back to the States and to the people the powers that have been usurped by Washington. It's bad enough that the Federal Government owns most of the land of your State, but in recent years it's been trying to own the people also. We want to bring government back closer to the people. And if that's going to work, we need strong leadership at the State level. And that's why I'm proud that Governor Bob List is with us today -- he and these other State office candidates. He's been a source of strength and encouragement in our efforts. Back when I was Governor of California, I got into a habit of relying on Governors from Nevada. We got along just fine, and I hope you'll reelect Bob, because it's a habit I don't want to break.

Here in the West people have never doubted America's potential. You know that with freedom and faith in the future we can overcome any obstacle. It's as true today as when our forefathers rolled up their sleeves and turned a desert into a thriving State and a bastion of progress.

Together there's nothing we can't accomplish. And together we can leave our children an America as strong and free and filled with opportunity as the one that was passed on to us by those Americans who came before us. I've told audiences all across this country -- and I'm so happy to see so many young people and youngsters out here today, because they're what this election is all about -- that's our challenge and our most sacred responsibility. And together we can do it.

Once again, I say I'm delighted to be here. And, please, send these people, part of them, back to your own State capital, and send those others -- Chic Hecht and Barbara and Peggy -- send them to Washington, where we need them so much. And we're going to continue on that road and make things right for America.

The President. Well, thank you very much for, believe me, a warm Utah welcome. It's great to be in the Beehive State again. I love to be out West, and it's especially good to be able to stop the plane and recharge my batteries here in Utah, a State that's just as famous for its good, old-fashioned, clean living as its fresh, clean air.

Here you understand the importance of honest work, family life, and dedication to those traditional values that made the Utah desert bloom. And let me tell you, that same American spirit will make this great country of ours come alive again, too, and I must add, and your faith and belief in God.

As a nation, we've awakened from a long and painful nightmare. We're rebuilding America, and ours is the courage of hope charted by the Founding Fathers. We intend to handcuff big spenders, get the Federal Government off your backs, promote recovery, and put you, the people, back in charge of your country again. Now, we aren't there yet, but unlike those before us, this administration intends to get the job done and get it done right.

But already we've made dramatic progress in four of the five worst economic problems that faced this country when we took up the challenge. We've cut the rate of growth in government spending -- once raging out of control -- we've cut it by almost two-thirds. When we took office, the largest tax increase in history was just beginning to take effect, and there are more installments of that tax increase yet to come between now and 1990, built into the law by those who preceded us.

But our administration is a little old-fashioned. We still believe that the dollars you work so hard to earn actually belong to you, not to the Federal Government. So we took on the big spenders, ignored their screams of pain, and won the first real tax cut for every American family in nearly 20 years.

We're not out of the woods yet, but we can see daylight beyond the trees. We're determined to find jobs for our people, to balance the budget, to protect the tax cut, and to whittle away at the national debt. There's one thing our generation must do before we leave the stage and that is not turn over to these young people that are here today that trillion-dollar debt without at least making some effort to reduce it before we go.

Now, no President can do all that alone. I need all the help I can get in Washington. And that brings me to the point of this visit. I count on Utah's delegation in the Congress. I'm talking about Jake Garn, Orrin Hatch, Dan Marriott, and Jim Hansen. And without them, we couldn't have made the progress that we have. Without them, America would risk a further slide to economic ruin -- the return to bigger, more intrusive government, higher, more punishing taxes, growing deficits, more spending, soaring inflation, and record interest rates. Well, we've left that litany of despair behind. Together, we've turned a corner in the history of America. We've put aside the policies of fear and despair and replaced them with a program of hope.

Each week brings fresh evidence that our program is working and momentum for recovery is building. Yesterday, we learned that productivity increased sharply in the third quarter. This morning -- I don't know whether the news has reached here yet or not, but in the East it has been announced already -- Americans awoke to see another patch of blue. The leading economic indicators, which measure the vital life signs of our economy to forecast its future direction, were up in September, and that's the fifth month of increase in the last 6 months. And I might add that at the same time the 1 month out of the 6 in which those indicators were down, they readjusted and corrected, because in August they had said that the economic factors were down nine-tenths of 1 percent. Well, they were only down two-tenths of 1 percent. So, the whole 6 months looks pretty good. And those are the statistics, small as they may seem, by which we indicate whether the economy is going up or going down. Pretty soon, even the diehard doom-peddlers will have to admit it: America is on her way back, and we will lead the way out of this worldwide recession.

With all the crying today that the issues of this campaign, based on that one factor of the unemployment which is always the last to recover, what are our opponents ignoring? What are they trying to keep you from realizing? Listen to this: Real wages are up; retail sales are up; housing starts and building permits are up; the value of the dollar is up higher than it has been in 10 years; productivity is up; research and development spending are up; venture capital in small business near a record; business starts -- in spite of the bankruptcies -- new starts of business near a record; personal savings rate at a 6-year high; new IRA accounts pumping $30 to 35 billion into savings and investment for more jobs.

We are doing everything we can to make a sick nation well again. But is it too much to ask those who controlled the Congress for 26 years and who spent this country to the brink of bankruptcy that they stop trying to reap political gain by preying on the people's fears? All they offer is a return to the past -- more big spending, big taxing, more regulations, meddling, and make-work, more big government coming through the windows, under the door, and down the chimney, and that's something the American people don't need. If they can't at least acknowledge the truth and at least encourage, if they can't work with the rest of us, then let them get out of the way, because we're going to keep on.

One year ago -- one year ago -- they warned that interest rates would soar back above 20 percent, breaking all the old records. Well, they were wrong again. The prime rate, as we've told you, has been cut nearly in half, and we're not finished yet. We're going to keep it heading down.

One year from now they will be warning us that the recovery cannot be sustained. But with the help of your Jake Garn, Orrin Hatch, Dan Marriott, Jim Hansen, and others like them, we can give the American people something brand new -- a recovery built to last, not just another cure of a recession like the seven that we've had since World War II. We can do it if we finish the job and get Federal spending under control once and for all.

Your Senator and my friend, Orrin Hatch, is one of the leaders in our quest. He led the fight to pass a constitutional amendment to balance the budget this year. That proposal was one of the most important to pass the Senate in this Congress, but, as you know, a minority of big spenders in the House blocked it, thwarting the express wishes of the people of Utah and the over-whelming majority of Americans everywhere. The liberal House leadership claimed the balanced budget amendment was too much of a risk. Well, I think you and I should make something plain: There is no bigger risk to America or to the children we leave behind than deliberate, planned inflation that would destroy our country, and we will not permit it.

Orrin, Jim, and Dan, and to send Howard Nielson to Washington. Utah needs them. You didn't think I was going to leave him out did you? [Laughter] No, you know your delegation in the Congress may be small, but they're scrappers. They remind me of something that Dwight Eisenhower once said: It's not the size of the dog in the fight that counts; it's the size of the fight in the dog.

Please do me one favor. I know how you feel, but mobilize an army of Republicans, Democrats, and Independents between now and Tuesday. Tell the good people of Utah: Vote for your hopes, not your fears. Vote for your children's future. Vote for your children's future and not the return of a failed past. Vote for the real hope of Utah -- Orrin Hatch and Dan Marriott and Jim Hansen and Howard Nielson.

Let me just interject something here. We've heard cries from the other side that in this time of tragic unemployment -- and no one could feel worse about it than any of us and, certainly, not someone like myself and those of you who lived through the Great Depression. We know the tragedy of unemployment. But we've heard so much about, well, we should resort to more make-work programs as they have in those seven other recessions in the past -- spending money for temporary jobs that don't do anything but add to the deficit and set the country back. And I think we have a better approach.

We have passed and are going to put into effect a job training program. It's going to be a little different than some in the past, because the Federal Government is going to work with local officials and community business and industry leaders all across the country to train the people in those communities for the jobs that are open in those communities. And even in this time of great unemployment, the need for this kind of improvement in job skills and training and spreading of job skills to newer lines of activity can be indicated by the fact that, well, just a week ago Sunday, I counted the pages of help wanted ads in the Washington Post -- 34 full pages of employers advertising for people to work. It doesn't mean that people were shirking and not taking those jobs. It means there were people -- that we lack the skill and training and enough people to fill them. On that same day in Los Angeles, across the country, it was 52 full pages in the Los Angeles Times. And this is true of metropolitan newspapers on Sundays all over the United States.

Well, previous work training programs by the Government before averaged spending about 18 cents out of each dollar for training. Our program will spend 70 cents out of each dollar for actual training.

I thank you all for the help that you've given me and our party. With leaders like yours and with the help of the people of America and the God who watches over us all, we will secure our way of life for generations to come.

A Presidential agricultural task force will arrive in Caracas, Venezuela, on October 30. Resulting from President Reagan's initiative at last year's summit meeting in Cancun, Mexico, the task force will study ways in which Venezuela and the United States can cooperate in agriculture and review agricultural matters of importance to the Venezuelan Government.

Members of the task force will work with the Venezuelans to improve their marketing, storage, and distribution of food. They will also make recommendations on how to develop information systems for agricultural planning and promote greater private investment in the country's agroindustry. The task force will return to the United States on November 13, 1982.

The President. Thank you very much. I thank you very much, and I thank the Senator for his very kind words, the Governor for his -- [laughing] -- and I may be a little previous with that, although I'm sure -- for his words of greeting. And in all the things that Senator Domenici said about the State here, he kind of left out the fact that you must be kind of a crosswords, because someone just held up a sign over there, ``Ex-Iowans,'' greeting me. When I got out of school, I became a sports announcer in Iowa, and I have just found out that over here is a lady that was in first grade in Galesburg, Illinois, when I started to school.

Well, I am happy to be here on behalf of New Mexico's Republican Party and all of its fine candidates for office. And right off, let me pay special thanks to Corky Morris and all the campaign workers who are going to bring us the Republican results that we need next Tuesday.

Members of the Congress had voted with his integrity and foresight, there wouldn't be 11 million people in our country unemployed. There wouldn't have been the double-digit inflation or crippling interest rates that caused recession. And there would have been prosperity. It seems to me that a man with that kind of perceptiveness is the kind that you want in the United States Senate.

And that's what this economy was falling into until we got a Republican Senate majority and turned things around. Now, Jack is one of the Senators who brought logic, common sense, and strong character to the task of making government work again. He has shown the grit and the honesty it takes to make the hard choices, to cast the tough votes. I came here to tell the people of New Mexico I need Jack Schmitt in the Senate. And I need Manuel Lujan, Joe Skeen, and Marjorie Bell Chambers in the House just as much.

And let me add a word about John Irick. As you know, we're working on something back there called federalism, in which we intend to restore the 10th article [amendment] of the Constitution, which means giving back to the States, to the local communities, and to the people, the powers that have been seized over the years by the Federal Government. And to do that, you need someone in charge here who knows about accepting those responsibilities. And incidentally, our plan is not one of dumping those responsibilities on the States. We intend to also provide the means to support them that have also been taken and usurped by the Federal Government. So I know that I can count on John Irick as an individual, just as the people of New Mexico can count on him.

But with Jack's, Manuel's, and Pete Domenici's and Joe's help, we've been cleaning away the economic wreckage that was dumped in our laps. Now, of course, you'd never believe that if you listened to our critics. They say this economy is on its knees. Well, if that's true, that's quite an improvement, because 2 years ago it was flat on its back.

But I realize there is still hardship among our people. And if I thought that what we were seeking to accomplish would be only temporary, I wouldn't ask for the American people's patience. But for the first time in our postwar history, we're trying to build a recovery that will last, not just a quick fix to see us through the next election. There have been seven previous recessions since World War II. All of those in the 26 years in which the Democrats controlled the Congress, both Houses -- all of them have been treated with a quick fix. Yes, temporarily they seemed to bring an answer and then, a couple of years later, there was another recession.

When we took office in '81, the American economy was being cannibalized. It was being devoured by runaway Federal taxes, Federal spending, and Federal borrowing. And the result was double-digit inflation for 2 years in a row, high unemployment, a 21\1/2\-percent interest rate -- the highest in more than a century -- nearly a trillion-dollar debt, the largest peacetime tax burden the Americans had ever known, and government spending shooting up at an annual rate of 17 percent a year. And still the big spenders wonder why the American people want what a stubborn minority in the House of Representatives denied them -- a constitutional amendment to balance the budget. Well, they're going to get another chance to vote on that, because we're just going to keep pounding on the door with it until we finally get it.

You know, from our very first day there, we've been working to undo the economic mistakes of the past. When I finished taking the oath of office on that January Inaugural day, the first thing I did was go right back into the Capitol Building -- I didn't even take off my topcoat -- I sat down and signed a memorandum freezing the size of the Federal Government, that it would not increase in size.

You know, at my age, I didn't go to Washington to play politics as usual. [Laughter] I went there to face up to our problems, and with the support and the prayers from wonderful Americans like yourselves, we are beginning to solve them.

Now, I don't pretend that in 21 months we've been able to undo the damage of more than 20 years. Twenty-one months ago, we faced five immediate problems: runaway spending, double-digit inflation, catastrophic interest rates, the highest peacetime tax burden ever, and high unemployment.

The prime interest rate that was 21\1/2\ the month I was sworn in is now down to 12 percent, and we're not finished with it yet. We've cut the growth in Federal spending by nearly two-thirds, from 17 down to 6 percent. And we will have cut your tax rates by the first of next July by 25 percent.

Now, that leaves unemployment, which is much too high. In homes across this country, including a home at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue, unemployment is the problem on everyone's mind. Getting Americans back to work is an urgent priority for all of us, and other than keeping the peace, I have no higher priority. And just as surely as lower inflation has started the interest rates tumbling, lower interest rates will reduce unemployment.

Unfortunately, unemployment is always just about the last to feel a recovery. It has been in all the other seven recessions. The interest rates have to come down. People have to be able to afford mortgages again and installment payments on cars and so forth. And then as that takes place, more and more people go back to work. Well, the big difference now is that we're going to do it right. We're building a lasting, inflation-proof recovery instead of a quick political fix.

And make no mistake about it, America's future is a future of hope, and it grows brighter each day as more people respond to the drop in inflation, tax rates, and interest rates. That's where the trends are pointing.

Just today in the East -- I don't know whether the news has reached here yet, but it was announced this morning in the East that again the economic indicators, that indicate whether we're dipping deeper or whether we're coming up out of it, for the fifth out of 6 months was up, continuing the climb toward prosperity. And also, interesting enough, that 1 out of 6 months, which was August, when they said that the indicators were down nine-tenths of 1 percent, they corrected that this morning and said, no, they were only down two-tenths of 1 percent in August.

But look at the other indicators that the opponents of these candidates are denying or refusing to recognize. Real wages are up. Retail sales are up. Housing starts are up. The value of the dollar is up higher than it has been in the last 10 years. It's the highest priced money in the world. The stock market is up -- about 220 - odd points in the last 10 weeks. Research and development spending is up. Business starts are near a record. Personal savings rates are at a 6-year high. And new IRA accounts are pumping some $30 to 35 billion into savings and investments that will be able to help provide jobs. Confidence is returning to America.

This great nation of ours is on the move again. And I say to our opponents, if they aren't ready to get on aboard and help, then tell them to get out of the way. But all we can read in what they say is they want us to return to the policies of the past. Well, I don't think the American people want to return to the policies of failure.

The President. The policies of the past have burned to the ground; they failed. And those who would turn America back have nothing to offer except more of the same old programs that got us into this mess. So, I say let's stay the course and finish the job.

Well, Stacy Hodgkins and all our young people -- they're what this election is all about. What kind of an America are we going to leave them? I pray that I will see the day when we will have made some payments to reduce that trillion-dollar debt that is hanging over that young generation, and that they will know that at least we tried and we didn't want to leave it all to them.

Now, when you go into that voting booth next Tuesday, vote for your children. Vote for the men and women who are looking to the future and to your children's future, not to those who look to the failed policies of the past. Jack Schmitt is a man who understands the future. He's seen it out there in space, and he's seen it in your children's faces. Jack, along with all of these fine candidates -- John Irick for Governor, Manuel Lujan, Joe Skeen, Marjorie Bell Chambers, all of them in the House -- all of them will bring to government the responsible principles that will serve future generations.

Together we can make our country the source of all the dreams and opportunities that we wish for our children. And it's only fair enough, because some generations that preceded ours left us a pretty good deal to take over. We can make America what she was placed on this good Earth to provide.

And you know, with all those uniform caps that I saw waved there, I want to tell you something about this all-volunteer service of ours. There were people that were pessimistic and said that it couldn't work, that we'd have to use compulsion. Well, it's working. And the morale, the quality of your men and women in uniform should make every one of you proud. And that's not because we're warlike; that's because, more than anything else, we want peace. And with them we have a far better chance of keeping the peace than when we were looking helpless and unilaterally disarmed in the eyes of the world.

New Mexicans to send all of these people, all of these candidates who are up here to the statewide jobs they are seeking, to the House of Representatives. And please don't send a Senator up there who would cancel out Pete Domenici's vote. You send Jack Schmitt.

Agreement, and it has been terminated by an exchange of notes between the two parties, effective on October 30, 1982. I have further decided that the rate of duty on TSUS item 121.61 shall on that date be restored to the level at which it would have been but for the Agreement.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

I've received a letter declaring that our economic recovery program must be changed before it causes ``more economic destruction and human suffering.'' Well, the writer then went on with further criticisms, as well as proposals for specific actions I should take. Since he's gone public, nationally, on TV and in the press, with much of what was in his message, I am replying to his specific points with an open letter on today's broadcast.

Now, we both know the high interest rates led to layoffs in the automobile industry. And as that industry slowed down, so did steel, rubber, and glass. Those same high interest rates brought down the housing industry as mortgages became too costly, leading to layoffs in lumber, appliances, furniture, and many other related industries.

This had the effect of maintaining the high interest rates well into the summer of '81, when the recession worsened substantially. Our economic recovery program didn't go into effect until October of '81, and then only a part of the program. So, we've only had 13 months of the economic recovery program, and not the entire program at that. And yet, inflation has come down to 4.8 percent so far this year. Interest rates are 11\1/2\ and 12 percent, not 21\1/2\. The rate of increase in Federal spending per year has been lowered from 17 to 6 percent. And our people have had the first real tax cut since the one John F. Kennedy gave them in the early 1960's.

Is the economy continuing to decline as you said it was? Housing starts and building permits are up. There's been an above-normal increase in home sales for this time of year. Real purchasing power is up. The rate of personal savings is higher than it's been in 6 years. The stock market is some 215 points higher than it was just 10 weeks ago. Now, it's true, there have been a great many bankruptcies and business failures, but the number of new businesses starting up is near a record level.

You suggest that I urge the Chairman of the Federal Reserve to loosen the money supply so as to reduce interest rates. But interest rates have come down almost 50 percent. In 1980, when the money supply was loosened, interest rates skyrocketed. You say put a moratorium on loans for corporate mergers, but that would be getting into credit control, which was tried and failed a few years ago.

With regard to your proposal to send our special trade representative, Bill Brock, and others to negotiate trade regulations with Japan and our European trading partners -- they've been doing that and have had considerable success and intend to continue.

You mentioned defense spending and two particular construction projects that we could do without. Well, defense spending is providing jobs for hundreds of thousands of American workers, besides providing for our national security.

But there also are jobs that do exist and are unfilled because of the lack of workers with the particular training or skill called for in those jobs. Count the pages of help wanted ads in our metropolitan papers on any given Sunday. Two weeks ago, the Washington Post ran 34 such pages. On the other side of America, the Los Angeles Times on that same day carried 52 pages.

Government will work with local officials and businesses and industrial leaders at the community level. The idea will be to train individuals for jobs now available in the communities where they live. Now, since two out of five of today's unemployed are between the ages of 16 and 24, the group with the highest unemployment rate, the program has a great potential.

Will the economic recovery last and the job market continue to improve? Well, I believe the answer is yes. I'm bullish on America. I've been called an optimist. But I'm not like the fellow who notices a car has a flat tire, and says, ``It's all right; the tire's only flat on the bottom.'' My optimism springs from solid evidence that America has turned the corner toward long-term economic expansion. If all of us act responsibly we can enjoy a renaissance of growth, progress, and opportunities, free from the ruinous inflation and record interest rates of old.

Growth creates more growth. As workers are called back and start receiving paychecks, the economy expands, increasing the need for still more workers. Since last December the number of unemployed has declined by 1.3 million, and economic growth has added nearly 2\1/2\ million people to America's work force. But we must not rest till every American who wants a job can find a job. We need the strength of every back and the power of every mind. Still, let's not be swayed by downbeats who never admit anything's right, never acknowledge the huge problems we inherited, and never admit the progress we've made reducing inflation, interest rates, and yes, creating new jobs.

The truth is more Americans are working now than at any time in this nation's history. The rising tide of employment is reaching across America into communities large and small, farms and factories, and it's helping people from all walks of life. Sixty percent of the jobs lost in the construction industry during the last recession have been recovered; add to that 70 percent of the jobs in furniture and fixtures, 90 percent in rubber and plastics, 90 percent in automobiles, and 125 percent in lumber and wood products.

One of the most encouraging trends we're seeing is higher employment for women: 2.3 million more women are working now than before we took office. And the jobs are better, too. Women filled more than half of all new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields between 1980 and 1982. Also, did you know that self-employed women are the fastest growing part of our business community -- growing, in fact, five times faster than the number of self-employed men?

Now, many of the people who remain jobless are part of a category economists call ``structural unemployment.'' They may live in economically depressed areas where firms and factories have become outmoded, or they may lack the skills and training needed to seize opportunities in the new service industries and areas of high technology. One of the most serious problems we still face is youth unemployment. Nearly 40 percent of the unemployed in America are less than 25 years old, and nearly half of that group are teenagers.

But there's hope. To strengthen the skills of young Americans, to provide new opportunities for prospective workers of all ages, we've charted a new approach that looks to the future rather than the past. Beginning today, October 1st, an historic and bold program -- the Job Training Partnership Act -- will train and retrain more than a million people a year for productive, lasting jobs in the private economy. At the core of my philosophy is the belief that progress begins with trusting people. You at the grassroots can spend your tax dollars far more wisely and productively than any collection of bureaucrats in the Federal Government. That's why this Job Training Partnership Act will be a major step forward from past programs.

Unlike the old CETA program run primarily by government officials and which either didn't provide enough training or else trained people for jobs that didn't exist, this program will be planned by business and labor people in your own communities -- those who know best what training is needed for existing jobs. They'll be receiving the block grants that the Federal Government sends to their own State governments. This time, private enterprise will be participating in a very meaningful way. The business and labor people will be working together in organizations called PIC's -- Private Industry Councils, designed to provide training skills needed right on Main Street America. At least 70 cents of every Job Training Partnership Act dollar must go to training.

On Monday, the Indianapolis Private Industry Council will start sponsoring training at ITT to place low-income youth and adults in existing jobs. In Wilmington, welfare women will be trained for skilled, entry-level jobs. These are just two examples among many of hope being reborn across America. No civilization can survive and grow if it does not learn the lessons of its own history.

The Job Training Partnership Act is an important reform that demonstrates we're not only correcting mistakes from our past, we're moving with wisdom and confidence to shape a brighter future. The outlook for America is good and getting better.

America is justifiably proud of its accomplishments in aeronautics and in space research. In the 25 years since the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) was created by an Act of Congress, our country and the world have witnessed an unsurpassed record of scientific and technical achievements which has established the United States as the world leader in aerospace research and development.

In aeronautics, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration has conducted an effective and productive research and technology program that continues to contribute materially to the enduring preeminence of United States civil and military aviation. Two-thirds of the world's commercial aircraft fleet is American designed and built, accounting for some $10 billion in positive trade balance in 1982. NASA's wind tunnels, laboratories, and such experimental aircraft as the X - 15 provide the solid essential research base for technology advancement and leadership.

In space, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration has conducted one of the most dramatic of all human endeavors: the Apollo Project which, 14 years ago, landed men on the Moon for the first time and returned them safely 240,000 miles to Earth. In addition, remotely controlled spacecraft have been dispatched on missions extending from near Earth orbit to the far reaches of the solar system. Through the Viking mission, the winds of Mars have been measured; through the Voyager mission, volcanoes on a moon of Jupiter have been observed and the rings of Saturn have been counted. More information has been gathered about the cosmos in 25 years than had been gleaned in all the preceding centuries. In the Space Shuttle, first launched in 1981, America now has a sophisticated new system for space research -- a machine that delivers payloads routinely to orbit; allows humans to work in space; returns crew, experiments, and unrepairable spacecraft to Earth; and is reconditioned within a short period for its next launch.

The Shuttle is booked through 1988, an indication of how utilitarian space has become. The government uses it to preserve the national security; the private sector uses it for commercial advantage; NASA uses it in a search for knowledge, not just of the beyond, but applied knowledge which will shed light on conditions and circumstances critical to the Earth and its inhabitants.

Significant benefits have already been derived from space research. For example, communications satellites now provide worldwide communications to well over 100 countries. Communications satellites have profoundly changed modern life, making events immediate, impacts instantaneous, and instruction possible almost anywhere. Future benefits will be even more impressive. The future looks bright, and NASA will be an important part of it.

The government-industry-university partnership, pioneered by NASA, has worked exceedingly well in aerospace research, providing a model to others on how the different sectors of American society can work together. This effort reflects America at its best: peacefully seeking knowledge and enlightenment, advancing technology for mankind's benefit, and organizing resources to accomplish great missions.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Today the United States faces major challenges to both our economic well-being and our national security. We turn increasingly to science and technology to help us maintain the competitiveness of our industries in the international marketplace and to ensure the continued technological superiority of our defense capabilities.

Administration is addressing these challenges. The significant increases in Federal R&D support, especially in basic research -- the fount of new technologies and new knowledge -- is evidence of our long-term commitment to strengthening the economy and security of America through science and technology. Programs to increase the supply of well trained scientists and engineers will ensure the best possible talent for continued technological advances in industry, universities, and government. The results of these important actions, in conjunction with the vigorous investment in research and development by the private sector, will be greater security and strong economic growth in the years ahead.

As is the case so often when appointments are made to prominent positions, we're not welcoming a new person on board. Instead, we're congratulating someone already on the team for moving up. Katherine Ortega's been a Commissioner on the Copyright Royalty Tribunal and a member of our Advisory Committee on Small and Minority Business Ownership. She's been one of those invaluable individuals who has shaped the character of our administration -- always taking her task seriously, getting her job done, and rarely winning public attention. She's a true professional, a hard worker, and a good American.

Katherine is the youngest of nine children and comes from a family whose heritage is the stuff of which novels are made. She comes from sturdy pioneer stock, brave people who tackled the wilderness, when it was a wilderness, of New Mexico. And she's demonstrated that same pioneer spirit in her own endeavors.

Well, it's important that key positions within an administration be filled by people who reflect the goals and ideals for which the people voted. And this is certainly the case today. As Treasurer of the United States, Katherine will oversee a budget of $340 million and supervise over 5,000 employees. I have faith in her, and I'm pleased and honored that she's a part of the team.

Being Treasurer gives one a certain immortality, because it's the Treasurer's name which appears on all new paper currency. I can't think of a better name to have on our money than Katherine Ortega. So, let's get on to the main event, and then I understand we'll get a chance to see her put her signature to good use.

President Reagan, by appointing me as Treasurer of this wonderful country of ours, you have provided an inspiration to women and to members of the Hispanic community. Many will take encouragement that, yes, it is possible to work and to attain the many opportunities available in our country.

Treasurer. And following the Hispanic tradition, I have chosen to have my name appear on our currency as Katherine Davalos Ortega. For in doing so, I will be honoring my father as well as my mother. Thank you.

Secretary Regan. As the three former Treasurers of the United States who are here will recognize, what Katherine Davalos Ortega is doing is putting specimens of her signature that will later be translated to those on the actual bills. What she will do over the next year is to see that name on about 5\1/2\ billion separate notes with a value of about $60 billion.

Thank you, and welcome to the White House. We are here today to celebrate the contributions of minority business to American economic life, and we're also here to encourage the development of minority business itself.

Having one's own business is a powerful engine for social and economic progress. Countless of our minority citizens are taking advantage of the opportunity called free enterprise. It's very fitting that today we acknowledge what minority business people are doing, not just for themselves and their families but for our nation. You know, there were some hearings on the Hill the other day on the way minorities, especially black and Hispanic Americans, are portrayed on television. And if you'll bear with me for a moment, it relates to what we're doing here today.

Many who spoke at the hearing believe that television very often stereotypes minorities and ignores their range of talents and interests. Well, let me put on my old actors' union hat for a moment, because there's some truth in that. There are hundreds of thousands of small business men and women in this country who are black or Hispanic, as you well know. Why can't the casting directors more frequently assign parts as shopowners and business people to minorities?

After all, there are 600,000 minority businesses in this nation. Now, our minority actors should also get parts as lawyers and doctors, even cowboys -- there were a great many black cowboys in our history. You know, this isn't the first time I've said things like this because for six terms I was president of the Screen Actors Guild, my union, and, believe me, we were working on this very problem then as a union.

But minority business people contribute a great deal to our economic well-being, and I think it's time that they are recognized more, including on television and the screen. And recognition is one reason for Minority Enterprise Development Week, and why we're here. We also have some awards, as you've seen, that symbolize what minority business people are doing out there in the American economy. And let me first, if I may, recognize, as you already have, the winners of the Small Business Administration 8(a) Contractors of the Year Award.

As you know, the 8(a) program, you've been told, provides greater access for minorities to government contracts. Since 1968, over $15 billion in Federal procurement contracts have been directed toward minority-owned businesses. Our winners today participated in that program, and I'm very pleased to congratulate our co-winners: Mr. Jaime Torres, of El Paso, Texas, the founder of J. T. Construction, and Mr. Norris Carson, the founder of N. L. Carson Construction of Carthage, Mississippi. And let me also congratulate all the regional winners and say that the Nation is just as proud of your contributions. And we wish you, too, continued success.

Agency at the Department of Commerce. MBDA, as it's called, provides managerial and technical assistance to minority enterprises, and it assisted our winner today. And the winner, as you know, the Entrepreneur of the Year Award is Mr. Liborio Hinojosa from Mercedes, Texas, the president of H & H Meat Products Company. He couldn't be here today, but it's a genuine pleasure to honor his entrepreneurial spirit, as well.

Minority business is contributing to a stronger America, and this administration intends to encourage that. It's one reason we strongly support a bold initiative called Enterprise Zones, to stimulate business activity in some of the most destitute areas of our country. It's tragic that this legislation has been bottled up in the House of Representatives for so long. If the Congress refuses to act, hopes and dreams of millions will be lost in a cloud of indifference.

An important tool is the 8(a) pilot program which gives a wider range of contracts to minority businesses. And I have designated the Department of Transportation to participate in this program. Federal procurement in the last year of the previous administration was $3.1 billion.

But my congratulations again to the winners, and it's especially good that we could honor them during the first annual Minority Enterprise Development Week. And I've signed many proclamations designating days and months and years and weeks particular things. But I was very delighted to be able to sign that particular proclamation. Again, God bless you all.

The President today announced his intention to nominate T. M. Alexander, Sr., to be a member of the Board of Directors of the African Development Foundation for a term of 6 years. This is a new position.

In view of the fact that Congress will be in session, that key appropriations bills have not yet been enacted, and that a continuing resolution has been enacted but will expire November 10, it is clear that the first 2 weeks in November will be particularly demanding legislative weeks.

Our relations with the Philippines, Indonesia, and Thailand are excellent, and we expect them to remain so. The President is disappointed that his original plans had to be changed, but this fact does not alter in any way the fundamental, positive relationship between the United States and the ASEAN countries.

America's future is dependent upon the health and vitality of her education system. Although thousands of businesses, industries, individuals, organizations, teachers, administrators, and government at all levels have been involved in the education of our youth, there is more work to be done. More people must become active in improving the quality of education in our Nation.

Recently, many schools have developed private sector partnerships in an effort to broaden available resources and reach out to their communities for support. The private sector has much to offer the growing national movement to improve our education system. Some of the most effective methods include helping educators identify the learning needs of our society; encouraging professional exchanges between teachers, educators, and businesses; contributing expertise, financial resources, and equipment; and providing technical assistance in school administration and curriculum development. In order to encourage this trend, I call upon businesses, organizations, individuals, and agencies to become involved with their local schools.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

It's wonderful for Nancy and me to be here tonight and see old friends like Joe Coors. Actually, I was a little surprised by the warmth of Joe's introduction. I'm not sure how many of you know this, but there's a certain coolness between Joe and me tonight. I guess maybe that's my fault.

Historians who seek the real meaning of events in the latter part of the 20th century must look back on gatherings such as this. They will find among your numbers the leaders of an intellectual revolution that recaptured and renewed the great lessons of Western culture, a revolution that is rallying the democracies to the defense of that culture and to the cause of human freedom, a revolution that I believe is also writing the last sad pages of a bizarre chapter in human history known as communism.

Now, we have been living in an age when the cult of overwhelming government was the reigning ideology. It dominated our intellectual thought and claimed some of the best minds of our society and civilization. And now all of that is changing. The evidence is before us in this room and in the astonishing growth of a remarkable institution called the Heritage Foundation.

You know, during the years when I was out on the mashed-potatoes circuit I was sometimes asked to define conservatism, and I must confess that, while I have the cream of the conservative intellectual movement before me, I'm tempted to use Justice Potter Stewart's definition. He gave it for another subject, by the way. He said he couldn't define it exactly, but ``I know it when I see it.'' [Laughter] He was talking about pornography. [Laughter] Well, I can see conservatism here tonight. There is no better evidence that the time of the conservative idea has come than the growth of the Heritage Foundation.

Feulner with only a few staff members, some modest offices, and not very much in the way of funding. And today, of course, you know Heritage has more than a hundred staff members, many more associates and consultants, as you've been told, a brand-new office building -- its picture is on the program there -- a budget that's gone from 3 million to 10 million in 5 years. But it's not money or numbers of people or size of the offices that measure Heritage's impact. Your frequent publications, timely research, policy papers, seminars, and conferences account for your enormous influence on Capitol Hill and, believe me, I know at the White House. Yes, the Heritage Foundation is an enormous undertaking and achievement.

I particularly want to single out here for their enormous efforts some who've already been mentioned: Joe Coors, the Noble family, our master of ceremonies, Frank Shakespeare, and, of course, Heritage's guiding light, Ed Feulner.

Ed likes to say that not too many years ago a phone booth was just about big enough to hold a meeting of conservative intellectuals in Washington; he said it here tonight. I know what he means. Washington has a way of being the last to catch on. [Laughter] Just as the growth of Heritage has stunned the pundits, the conservative cause itself -- the Goldwater nomination in 1964, the growth of the New Right in the 1970's, the conservative victory in 1980, and the tax-cut victory of 1981 -- all of these came as huge surprises to the Washington technocrats who pride themselves on knowing what's going on in politics.

Well, the reason is plain. Many people in the power structure of our Capital think that appealing to someone's narrow self-interest is the best way to appeal to the American people as a whole, and that's where they're wrong. When the American people go to the polls, when they speak out on the issues of the day, they know how high the stakes are. They know the future of freedom depends not on ``what's in it for me,'' but on the ethic of what's good for the country, what will serve and protect freedom.

Success in politics is about issues, ideas, and the vision we have for our country and the world -- in fact, the very sum and substance of the work of the Heritage Foundation. Don't take my word for it. In a book called ``The Real Campaign,'' a study of the 1980 campaign, commentator Jeff Greenfield argues that gaffes or polls or momentum and all those other issues Washington experts thought were important in the election of 1980 were not. Mr. Greenfield argues that issues and ideas did count, that the electorate voted the way they did in large part because they rejected what liberalism had become, and they agreed with the coherent conservative message they heard from our side.

This point about politics and elections is reflected in what some have been saying about our economic system. As George Gilder points out, it isn't just self-gain or personal profit that drives the free market and accounts for the entrepreneurial spirit. There are larger issues involved: faith, a clear vision of the future, a hidden altruism, that simple human desire to make things better.

One current bestseller, ``In Search of Excellence,'' has caused a great flurry in the business management world, because it argues that intangibles like shared values and a sense of mission are the great overlooked factors in accounting for the success of business institutions. Well, this is true of nations as well. The American electorate seeks from its national leadership this sense of shared values, this reaffirmation of traditional American beliefs. They do not want a President who's a broker of parochial concerns; they do not want a definition of national purpose, a vision of the future. And I believe that we conservatives have provided that vision during the past few years.

We delivered, instead, on the promises we'd made to the American people, promises that were part of a consistent and coherent view of this nation's needs and problems. We had a policy; we put it into effect. We made our promises, and we kept them. We said we would stop the juggernaut buildup of 40 years of increased Federal spending, and we did.

Despite the momentum accumulating from a host of new social welfare and entitlement programs, we still managed to cut the growth in Federal spending by nearly 40 percent. For the first time since 1964 all personal income tax rates have been cut, and cut by a hefty 25 percent across the board. And we made the most important reform of them all; in 1985, your income taxes will be indexed, so never again will you be pushed into higher tax brackets by inflation.

The story is the same for our efforts to deregulate the American economy. It was only a few years ago that every time you turned around, some government bureau had slapped on more restrictions on our commerce, our trade, and our lives. We were at the point where we could hardly adjust our thermostats or use our credit cards without checking first with Washington. Our regulatory task force has already cut the number of final regulations issued by almost 25 percent and saved American industry some 300 million hours of filling out forms.

I never did call it that. That was their name when they thought it wouldn't work. I just called it common sense. But is it because our program is doing what we said it would, making America prosperous and strong again?

I think the picture on the foreign front is very much the same. You can all remember the days of national malaise and international humiliation. Everywhere in the world freedom was in retreat, and America's prestige and influence were at low ebb. In Afghanistan the liberty of a proud people was crushed by brutal Soviet aggression. In Central America and Africa Soviet-backed attempts to install Marxist dictatorships were successfully underway. In Iran international law and common decency were mocked, as 50 American citizens were held hostage. And in international forums the United States was routinely held up to abuse and ridicule by outlaw regimes and police state dictatorships.

That was an America that once upon a time not too long ago knew that an American in some distant corner of the world could be caught up in revolution or conflict of war of some kind, and all he had to do was pin a little American flag to his lapel, and he could walk through that war and no one would lay a finger on him because they knew this country stood by its people wherever they might be. We're going to have that kind of America again.

Verifiable and equitable arms control agreements were nowhere in sight, and our own military might had sharply declined. Even friendly governments were toning down their pro-American rhetoric, abandoning their anti-Soviet declarations, withdrawing support for our diplomatic initiatives, and beginning to be influenced by Soviet diplomatic and commercial programs they had previously dismissed outright.

Second, the willingness of the American people to back our program for rebuilding America's defenses has added to the respect, the prestige, and deterrent capability we need to support our foreign policy goals.

Fourth, throughout the world today the aspirations for freedom and democracy are growing. In the Third World, in Afghanistan, in Central America, in Africa and Southeast Asia, opposition to totalitarian regimes is on the rise. It may not grab the headlines, but there is a democratic revolution underway.

Finally, our new willingness to speak out forthrightly about communism has been a critically effective foreign policy step. We're making clear that the free world, far from plunging into irreversible decline, retains the moral energy and spiritual stamina to tell the truth about the Soviets, to state clearly the real issues now before the world. That issue is not, as our adversaries would have us believe, the choice between peace and war, between being dead or Red, but, rather, the choice between freedom and servitude, human dignity and state oppression.

And now let me speak a word for a moment about a matter that needs to be cleared up. There are a number of Congressmen on the Hill, including conservatives, who, while being inclined to vote for our defense policies want to be absolutely sure of our desire for arms control agreements.

Any American President, anyone charged with the safety of the American people, any person who sits in the Oval Office and contemplates the horrible dimensions of a nuclear war must, in conscience, do all in his power to seriously pursue and achieve effective arms reduction agreements. The search for genuine, verifiable arms reduction is not a campaign pledge or a sideline item in my national security agenda. Reducing the risk of war and the level of nuclear arms is an imperative, precisely because it enhances our security.

In our relations with the Soviet Union, we're engaged in a comprehensive agenda of major arms control negotiations. And for the first time, the Soviets are now talking about more than nuclear arms ceilings; they're talking about nuclear arms reductions. And tomorrow I will be meeting with Ambassador Ed Rowny to give him the new instructions he will carry back to the START talks in Geneva on Wednesday. In fact, let me take this a step further and explain why it's our willingness to be candid about the Soviet Union, about its nature and expansionist policies. It improves the chances of success in the arms control area.

History shows us what works and doesn't work. Unilateral restraint and good will does not provide similar reactions from the Soviet Union, and it doesn't produce genuine arms control. But history does teach that when the United States has the resolve to remain strong and united, when we stand up for what we believe in, and when we speak out forthrightly about the world as it is, then positive results can be achieved. Weakness does not offer the chance for success; strength does. And that strength is based on military capability, strong alliances, a willingness to speak the truth and to state our hope that someday all peoples of the world will enjoy the right to self-government and personal freedom.

You can remember one administration that tried to minimize the differences between the Soviets and the democracies. They lectured us on our ``inordinate fear of communism.'' Under that administration arms control efforts not only failed, but the hope of improved East-West relations ended in Soviet expansionism on three continents, the invasion of Afghanistan, and an actual discussion by an American President before a joint session of Congress about the use of military force against any attempt to seize control of the Persian Gulf.

We must never be inhibited by those who say telling the truth about the Soviet empire is an act of belligerence on our part. To the contrary, we must continue to remind the world that self-delusion in the face of unpleasant facts is folly, that whatever the imperfections of the democratic nations, the struggle now going on in the world is essentially the struggle between freedom and totalitarianism, between what is right and what is wrong. This is not a simplistic or unsophisticated observation. Rather, it's the beginning of wisdom about the world we live in, the perils we face, and the great opportunity we have in the years ahead to broaden the frontiers of freedom and to build a durable, meaningful peace.

Let us never underestimate the power of truth. Not long ago, Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn reminded us that righteousness, not just revolutionary violence, has such power. Indeed, that's why I believe the struggle in the world will never be decided by arms, but by a test of wills -- a test of Western faith and resolve.

And this brings me to a second point: The goal of the free world must no longer be stated in the negative, that is, resistance to Soviet expansionism. The goal of the free world must instead be stated in the affirmative. We must go on the offensive with a forward strategy for freedom. As I told the British Parliament in June of 1982, we must foster the hope of liberty throughout the world and work for the day when the peoples of every land can enjoy the blessings of liberty and the right to self-government.

This, then, is our task. We must present to the world not just an America that's militarily strong, but an America that is morally powerful, an America that has a creed, a cause, a vision of a future time when all peoples have the right to self-government and personal freedom.

Well, America has not been a story or a byword. That small community of Pilgrims prospered and, driven by the dreams and, yes, by the ideas of the Founding Fathers, went on to become a beacon to all the oppressed and poor of the world.

One of those early founders was a man named Joseph Warren, a revolutionary who would have an enormous impact on our early history -- would have had, had not his life been cut short by a bullet at Bunker Hill. His words about the perils America faced then are worth hearing today. ``Our country is in danger,'' he said, ``but not to be despaired of. On you depends the fortunes of America. You are to decide the important question on which rests the happiness and liberty of millions yet unborn. Act worthy of yourselves.'' Well, let his idealism guide us as we turn conservative ideas into political realities.

And as I urged in those closing days of the 1980 campaign, let us remember the purpose behind our activities, the real wellspring of the American way of life. Even as we meet here tonight some young American coming up along the Virginia or Maryland shores of the Potomac is looking with awe for the first time at the lights that glow in the great halls of our government and the monuments to the memory of our great men.

We're resolved tonight that young Americans will always see those Potomac lights, that they will always find here a city of hope in a country that's free so that when other generations look back at this conservative era in American politics and our time in power, they'll say of us that we did hold true to that dream of Joseph Winthrop and Joseph Warren, that we did keep faith with our God, that we did act worthy of ourselves, that we did protect and pass on lovingly that shining city on a hill.

I transmit herewith, with a view to receiving the advice and consent of the Senate to acceptance, an Amendment to the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora (CITES), done at Washington, March 3, 1973. The Amendment provides for accession by regional economic integration organizations to CITES and, upon entry into force, would permit the European Community to become Party to the Convention. Accession of the Community would serve to make application of CITES within the Community an internationally binding obligation and thus enhance implementation and enforcement of the Convention, an objective which the United States strongly supports. The report of the Department of State is enclosed for the information of the Senate in connection with its consideration of the Amendment.

CITES was established to facilitate international conservation, providing for the control and monitoring of international trade in specimens of species endangered or threatened with extinction. The Convention, as currently constituted, provides only for accession of States. The European Community seeks to achieve accession through an Amendment which would open the Convention for accession by regional economic integration organizations constituted by sovereign States which have competence for the negotiation, conclusion and implementation of international agreements in matters transferred to them by their Member States and covered by the convention.

This year has special significance. We celebrate the 300th anniversary of the first German immigration to America. Those first families -- or settlers, I should say, were 13 families from the Rhineland. They were followed by millions of their countrymen, men, women, and children who became a strong thread running through the fabric of America. German Americans have meant so much to the development of this nation. And today German-American friendship is vital to the security and freedom of both our peoples.

Nineteen eighty-three is a landmark year for our two countries and for the NATO alliance as a whole. We and the rest of our allies must continue to have the courage and mutual trust to do what is necessary to maintain peace and security in Europe.

We decided in December 1979 that if no agreement with the Soviet Union could be reached, maintaining a balance of force in Europe would require the modernization of NATO's deterrent forces. So far, the Soviet Union has not been willing to negotiate a fair and verifiable arms reduction agreement with us. Let there be no mistake, an agreement will be far better for all concerned. We seek the elimination of these weapons, and we will continue our unflagging efforts to reach an acceptable agreement. But if the Soviet intransigence continues, we must begin deployment and ensure NATO's deterrent.

German-American partnership will be a major factor enabling NATO to do so. For our part, we remain convinced that a strong NATO alliance remains the key to European peace, and German-American cooperation and trust are the linchpin of that alliance.

In meeting today and in your visit to many parts of the United States, I believe that you will see that the reservoir of good will our people hold for the Federal Republic of Germany runs just as deep as ever.

January, the year 1983 is the tricentennial year of German settlement in America. Commemoration of this momentous event in the life of our two nations has been and will be vigorous on both sides of the Atlantic. The cities on your itinerary are poised to welcome you. The people of America are waiting to share the high points of their celebrations with you. Your presence here marking this anniversary touches us deeply. We are proud to say -- and I hope I can correctly -- Wir heissen Sie willkommen.

President Carstens. Mr. President, thank you very much for your warm words of welcome and thank you for your invitation to visit this country together with the Vice Chancellor and Foreign Minister, Mr. Genscher.

Germany and the United States of America. We commemorate the arrival of the first German settlers in Philadelphia 300 years ago. And you, Mr. President, proclaimed that day as a day which we all should celebrate. We also commemorate the contribution which millions of German emigrants made to the building of the American nation.

But I further want to express the gratitude of us Germans towards the American people for what they did after two World Wars. And I have only to recall millions of CARE parcels which were sent from America to Germans when we were in great need. I have only to recall the Marshall plan, which saved our economy after World War II. And I have only to recall the Berlin Airlift of 1948 - 49, which saved the freedom of Berlin.

Under the terms of this alliance, 250,000 American soldiers serve in Germany. We greet them as allies, partners, and friends. And in saying this, I speak in the name of the vast majority of the citizens of the Federal Republic of Germany.

But we are not only linked by our alliance, we also have -- and I think that is as important -- common values underlying our system of government. And by that I mean democracy, personal freedom, human dignity, and rule of law. Looking to the future, I think we must give our peoples the opportunity to understand each other even better. And particularly we must give this opportunity to the young generation.

While I'm here, I shall, together with members of the German parliament -- and I'm happy to say that Mrs. Renger, the vice president of the parliament, is here -- I shall work for the implementation of different exchange programs under which more than 10,000 young Americans will go to Germany and young Germans will go to America. This is, I think, the best way for nations to become friends, because they will realize that we, the Germans, and you, the Americans, have much more in common than most of them have been aware of.

Ladies and gentlemen, later today Ambassador Ed Rowny and the other members of the START delegation will depart for Geneva for the opening of the fifth round of the strategic rrms reduction talks. They'll carry with them a new set of instructions. From the first day of these negotiations our highest goal has been to achieve a stable balance at reduced levels of nuclear arsenals. We want to reduce the weapons of war, pure and simple.

All our efforts in both the START and the INF negotiations continue to be guided by that objective. Just this morning, I repeated this commitment to President Carstens of the Federal Republic of Germany. As I pledged to the United Nations, the United States will accept any equitable, verifiable agreement that stabilizes forces at lower levels than currently exist. We want significant reductions, and that pledge stands.

In the last round of negotiations we proposed a number of new initiatives which where in harmony with the recommendations of the Presidential Commission on Strategic Forces and which provided additional flexibility to our negotiations. Those initiatives supported our basic goals, and they also responded to a number of Soviet concerns.

I deeply regret that the Soviet Union has yet to give any significant response. Throughout the negotiating process it's the United States who's had to push, pull, probe, and prod in an effort to achieve any progress. The heartfelt desire shared by people everywhere for an historic agreement dramatically reducing nuclear weapons could and indeed will be achieved, provided one condition changes: The Soviet Government must start negotiating in good faith.

Now, let me emphasize that the United States has gone the extra mile. We've removed the dividing line between the two phases of our original proposal; everything is on the table. We're still most concerned about limits on the fast-flying, most dangerous systems, but we're also prepared to negotiate limits on bomber and air-launch cruise missile limits below SALT II levels.

We've gone a very long way to address Soviet concerns, but the Soviets have yet to take their first meaningful step to address ours. Particularly in the INF talks, but also in START, they've been stonewalling our proposals. When we proposed confidence-building measures that could be agreed to right now, they said wait. Apparently they believe that time is on their side, that they can exploit one democracy against another, and that their uncompromising attitude and delay will ultimately win out.

Well, we'll prove them wrong. The diversity of our democracies is a source of strength, not weakness. From free discussion among free people comes unity and commitment. The sooner this is understood, the sooner we'll reach an agreement in the interests of both sides. We'll continue to press Moscow for an equitable, fair, and verifiable agreement.

When the START negotiations resume tomorrow, the United States delegation will again have sustained flexibility. Within the framework of the basic principles that have guided us throughout these negotiations, I am directing Ambassador Rowny to offer the following new initiatives. We're incorporating into START a series of build-down proposals. The United States will introduce a proposal for a mutual, guaranteed build-down, designed to encourage stabilizing systems. The proposal will include specific provisions for building down ballistic warheads and, concurrently, for addressing a parallel build-down on bombers.

To discuss these major new initiatives, we will also propose the establishment of a U.S.-Soviet build-down working group in the Geneva talks. On another front, and in our effort, again, to be absolutely as flexible as possible, we will be willing to explore ways to further limit the size and capability of air-launch cruise missile forces in exchange for reciprocal Soviet flexibility on items of concern to us.

We seek limits on the destructive capability of missiles and recognize that the Soviet Union would seek limits on bombers in return. There will have to be tradeoffs, and the United States is prepared to make them, so long as they result in a more stable balance of forces.

The Soviet Union should not doubt the bipartisan support for our efforts. During our review process I looked for ways to broaden America's bipartisan approach to our overall arms control effort. We've consulted with many Members of the Congress and again with the Commission headed by Brent Scowcroft. Their counsel has been invaluable, and I want to thank them for their tireless efforts and helpful advice.

A solid, national, bipartisan consensus, sustained from year to year and from administration to administration, is crucial if we are to keep America safe and secure and if we're to achieve successful arms reductions. Therefore, I've decided to take a number of new steps. Among these are to designate a member of the Scowcroft commission, James Woolsey, as a Member at Large to our START negotiations. These actions reflect America's democratic process at its best.

Ambassador Rowny, as you and your team depart for Geneva, you go with the certain knowledge that you're negotiating with the full support of the American people. Our bipartisan support is stronger than ever before, and you carry with you fair, equitable proposals that are in the interest of both nations and all humankind.

It's fitting today to repeat what I said last week. The door to an agreement is open. All the world is waiting for the Soviet Union to walk through. Should the Soviet leadership decide to join us now in our good faith effort, the fifth round of these negotiations will be the one in which, finally, a breakthrough was made, and finally the world began to breathe a bit easier.

Total energy efficiency has increased, domestic energy resources are being developed more effectively, oil prices have declined, U.S. dependence on foreign energy sources has diminished, and the Nation's vulnerability to energy supply disruptions has been reduced markedly, especially through additions to our Strategic Petroleum Reserve and through lower levels of oil imports.

A key factor contributing to today's improved U.S. energy situation is the implementation of a national energy policy first described in my 1981 National Energy Policy Plan. This policy includes a goal, strategies for pursuing that goal, and Federal programs and action determined by those strategies.

A hallmark of our national energy policy is to foster an adequate supply of energy at reasonable costs, minimize Federal control and involvement in energy markets, and promote a balanced and mixed energy resource system.

Since the end of 1980, the amount of oil stored in the Strategic Petroleum Reserve has tripled, to more than 360 million barrels today. It now holds about 90 days of our average net oil imports and well over a year of our Arab OPEC imports. Together with private petroleum stockpiles, the SPR is an important part of our program for improving international energy security. It can be an invaluable form of insurance against the potentially severe effects of an oil supply interruption.

The world energy scene remains volatile. Even though we now produce about 90 percent as much energy as we consume, we need to press onward with improvements. The National Energy Policy Plan we transmit to Congress today discusses all of our plans and accomplishments, but it emphasizes the need to finish the task of decontrolling natural gas. Today the regulatory system has led to higher prices and lower supplies. Today we have unused capacity that natural gas control is restricting. That capacity could lower prices, reduce oil imports, and set us on a sensible course for the future. I will be working closely with the Senate and House in the weeks ahead to pass sensible natural gas legislation to allow the market to work.

We can face the energy future with confidence, not complacency. We must all continue to use energy prudently and to improve our technology for finding and conserving energy. With the leadership of Secretary Hodel in the Energy Department, and under the guidance of the National Energy Policy Plan, we will continue to improve our energy situation through the efforts and genius of the American people.

The challenge of greater productivity growth is of supreme importance to America's future. Only through productivity gains can real living standards be improved. Greater productivity growth is the cornerstone of price stability and sustained economic growth. It is vital to regaining our competitive position in world markets and creating job opportunities for an expanding American labor force.

Productive societies reward saving, investing, building, and creating rather than consuming. A productive society lives within its means and does not pursue a pattern in its spending habits that results in simply shifting its burdens forward to the future. Productive societies also nourish the spirit of adventure, innovation and entrepreneurship. Productive societies share common objectives and their leading institutions work together -- business, government, labor, and academia view each other as partners, not adversaries.

We have made much progress in restoring the foundation for a prosperous and productive society. By reducing the rate of growth of government spending, by strengthening the incentives to save and invest, by eliminating many unnecessary and burdensome regulations, and by encouraging monetary policies that ensure the price stability needed for lasting economic growth we have created an environment for sustained increases in productivity.

White House Conference on Productivity brought together an outstanding group of distinguished citizens from all walks of life and sectors of our economy. Their recommendations for actions at all levels in the public and private sectors will help us build on the foundation we have laid.

In order to encourage better understanding of the need for productivity growth and the development of methods to improve productivity in the private and public sectors, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 142, has designated the week of October 3 through October 9, 1983, as National Productivity Improvement Week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President was naturally disappointed today to hear press reports quoting Speaker O'Neill as saying that immigration reform legislation would not be considered by the House this year. The President hopes that the Speaker will reconsider and allow the House to vote on a bill that is essential to the future well-being of this nation.

As we understand it, the Speaker commented that there was no discernible constituency for the bill and that there had been mixed signals from the White House. We respectfully disagree with the Speaker on those points.

The Senate has twice passed immigration legislation -- by overwhelming bipartisan margins. And in the Congress immigration legislation has also been considered and approved by four committees in the House, including the Committee on the Judiciary. Administration officials have testified on the reform measures a total of 28 times.

This is not a political issue; it is not a partisan issue; it is an issue that concerns all Americans. And it is in the best interests of all Americans to have the Nation regain control of its borders.

I said this morning, and I would like to say it again, how happy and proud that Nancy and I are to welcome you to the United States. Your own ties with our country, including a master of laws degree from Yale University, are longstanding and deep. Your life is a monument to the shared values and interests that have long provided our two peoples with a bounty of good will. And today, all Americans celebrate our ties and are grateful for our solid friendship with the German people.

Three hundred years ago, a small group of hardy pioneers set out from Krefeld, in the Rhineland, to sail into the unknown. In America they found the religious freedom they sought, but hard work was the price they paid for their new-found freedom. And those 13 German families brought with them courage and industry to build new lives. Their talents and those of their descendants helped create the great city of Philadelphia and the great State of Pennsylvania, both of which share our honor in welcoming you.

This year we commemorate the remarkable odyssey of the Krefelders and of the millions of others who followed them. The virtues of courage, industry, and belief in freedom which they brought helped build our country, contributing to what is best about the United States. The contributions of German Americans have been invaluable to the development of our great country.

The people of the Federal Republic of Germany have proven that they still possess those traits that helped build America. From the rubble of the Second World War the industrious German people constructed a strong, healthy, and free democracy. We stand firmly together in the search for peace and freedom.

Anniversary celebrations tend to look back, but we should not limit our commemoration to reminiscences of the past. A strength of both of our peoples is that we also look to the future. The true meaning of this anniversary week is an enduring partnership that will lead to a more secure peace in the decades ahead.

It gives me great pleasure, Mr. President, to be your guest here in the White House. And I thank you most cordially, also, in the name of my wife and in the name of the Vice Chancellor, Foreign Minister and Mrs. Genscher, and of our other German guests, for the warm and generous hospitality which you are again extending to us.

I am deeply moved that it has been granted to me, as representative of the German people, to visit the United States and to strengthen the bonds of friendship with your great country. I look forward with eager expectation to the days in Philadelphia, St. Louis, Dallas, Seattle, Madison, New York, and New Haven.

Let us, Germans and Americans, bear in mind our common history, and let us take strength from our common ideals and our common goals. On this visit, personal memories shall be accompanying me. I have been to the United States on numerous occasions in an official capacity.

The year which I spent there added a new dimension to my life. The good will and the cordiality which I encountered are firmly engraved in my memory. At Yale I studied American constitutional law, and I later qualified as a university professor in Germany with a study on this subject. This aroused my interest in public affairs and in politics. I felt more and more called upon to work for the common good.

And it also became clear to me at Yale as to what constitutes the real strengths of the American nation; namely, the conviction of its citizens that there are basic values which precede every and any governmental system. Among these values rank the dignity of man, justice, and freedom, and also something which you, Mr. President, have repeatedly stressed; namely, trust in God. This has been true from the beginning, and the tricentennial of the first German immigration into North America marks an appropriate moment for recalling it.

Leviticus, are inscribed on the Freedom Bell in Philadelphia. In the first place, they refer to religious freedom. But they also included the other human rights, the inalienable rights -- life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness, as the Declaration of Independence expresses them. In these ideals, and in the earnest endeavors to realize them, lay the great attraction of the United States from the very beginning. Millions of Germans felt this attraction and went to America, and they included many of our nation's best sons and daughters -- freedom-loving, industrious, adventurous men and women who found a new home here.

Germans played, as you have mentioned, Mr. President, a role in the advance of American civilization and the natural science, the social sciences, the fine arts and music, a civilization which has entered upon an unparalleled, victorious march through the whole world in our epoch and which has profoundly influenced the lifestyle of almost all countries, including ours.

Clearly it is difficult always to comply with such a high claim. However, the benevolence and magnanimity remained guiding principles for American policy. And we Germans also experienced the charitable assistance of the Americans after the Second World War. The granting of eonomic aid in the shape of the Marshall plan furnish examples of this, as does the airlift to Berlin, a city which owes so much to America and which you visited last June -- June of last year -- Mr.

Safeguarding freedom in Europe -- that is the purpose of the North Atlantic alliance in which our two countries are partners. This alliance is a defense community. And I need not stress that it only serves to defend. It is an alliance between free peoples who have joined together because they share the same values, including freedom, which they wish to preserve.

This alliance has granted us security and peace over three decades. During this time, about 9 million American citizens served as soldiers in Germany. Together with our young German conscripts and troops from other member countries of the alliance, they ensured that we can live in the manner desired by the overwhelming majority of our citizens; namely, in a free democracy governed by the rule of law.

Germany is a divided country; yet we Germans adhere to the unity of our people. The policy pursued by the Federal Republic of Germany is directed towards a state of peace in Europe in which the German people will regain their unity through free self-determination. We thank America for always supporting this goal of ours.

As I said, for about 30 years the United States and Germany are members of the alliance. And if the alliance endeavors to obtain a military equilibrium at as low a level as possible, this will guarantee not only freedom but also peace. Both of these, freedom and peace, would be endangered, I think, if the other side were to acquire military superiority. The fate of Afghanistan provides a sad example. We must never tire of pointing out these implications time and again to those among our citizens who champion the cause of unilateral disarmament, even though I respect their motives.

We Germans shall stand by your side as your allies and partners also in the future. And with this thought in mind, may I now raise my glass to drink to your health and success. Mr. President, to your health, Mrs. Reagan, to a happy future for the United States of America, the leading power of the free nations, and to another three centuries of German-American friendship.

Well, thank you all, and I say that -- I think I can say that on behalf of the Vice President and myself. We're delighted to welcome all of you distinguished members from the diplomatic community, the Senators and Representatives and honored guests.

And today we celebrate the passage of legislation that I've held close to my heart for a long time. I know all of us wished it could have come sooner, but as I promised when some of you were here last December, the time is short and the needs are great. We're all Americans. Together we can be a mighty force for good. We can show the world that we conquer fear with faith, we overcome poverty with growth, and we counter violence with opportunity and freedom. And now we're making good on our promise. I'm proud to stand with you for this celebration on the long-awaited first stage of implementation of the Caribbean Basin Economic Recovery Act.

Central America -- a partnership that's born of our shared vision that democracy is a God-given birthright and that faith, freedom, and respect for the dignity of every citizen are the mainsprings of human progress. From the very outset of our administration, we've never wavered in our long-term goal to foster true stability and democracy. And to do so, we must work together to help improve the underlying conditions for economic development.

Peace and security in the Caribbean Basin are in our vital interest. When our neighbors are in trouble, their troubles inevitably become ours. What these countries need most is the opportunity to produce and export their products at fair prices. That's what the Caribbean Basin Initiative is all about. It offers them open markets in the United States and initiatives to encourage investment and growth. Far from a handout, the proposal will help these countries help themselves. Trade, not aid, will mean more jobs for them and more jobs for us.

The CBI package proposed to the Congress in March of '82 was designed by the governments and private sectors of the region's countries, including those of Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. It had three major elements: a supplemental appropriation of $350 million to provide emergency balance-of-payment support, the elimination for 12 years of nearly all of the remaining tariff barriers on Caribbean Basin country exports to the United States, and tax incentives to promote new investment in the tourist industry.

The $350 million supplemental appropriation received strong bipartisan support and was approved by the Congress in September of 1982. These moneys have now been obligated, allowing the importation of raw materials and capital goods to help get stalled economies in the region moving again.

Aid levels to the Caribbean Basin have doubled since 1980. The other CBI proposals were an innovative and unprecedented plan to integrate trade preferences, investment incentives, and other measures to encourage the economic and social development of the countries of the Caribbean Basin. We seek to help countries implement free market strategies to stimulate their exports and strengthen their economies by expanding growth.

The first element of this legislation is a 12-year, one-way, free trade arrangement for all goods produced in the Caribbean Basin except textiles, apparel, canned tuna, leather goods, shoes, and petroleum products. This marks a step our country has never taken before. It's evidence of our commitment to the economic health of our good neighbors.

Now, these benefits will become all the more important as the vigorous expansion of our own economy brings about an increase in our imports and more and more business travel. As a footnote, you should know that we have 125 Peace Corps volunteers trained in small-scale agribusiness. They're helping small farmers increase and diversify food production for their countries' needs and for winter markets in Europe and North America. Fifty more American volunteers will receive this training within the next few weeks.

I was especially gratified that support for the CBI was overwhelming and bipartisan. I offer special recognition to the many Members of Congress who strongly supported our proposals, guided them through the approval process, in particular, Congressman Dan Rostenkowski and Senator Bob Dole.

In that spirit, I extend my appreciation to the governments and peoples of the Caribbean Basin countries themselves. They never tired in explaining why the CBI should be passed. They include the very effective spokesmen for both the region's private sectors and labor unions.

I also want to express my appreciation to David Rockefeller and his associates at the Council of the Americas and Central American Action for their help in providing key business support for passage of this bill. And I pledge to you today that enactment of the landmark Caribbean Basin economic recovery act will be followed by a vigorous implementation effort on the part of this administration.

Ambassador Brock will continue as Chairman of our Senior Interagency Task Force responsible for its policy and program development. I'm calling on the other Cabinet members who've contributed to the CBI's development to give Ambassador Brock by January 1st their proposals on how to make the CBI the most effective means of expanding economic opportunity in the region.

The formal process of designation which the Congress has given me the responsibility to carry out has been with delegations visiting with all the potential beneficiaries. Those discussions have been conducted with the kind of mutual commitment to friendship and good will which has made us all so excited about the future of the region.

I'm optimistic that we will be extending the benefits of the program to virtually all the beneficiaries by the first of next year. The economic and social development of the Caribbean Basin should be part of a collective effort by the international community. Even before my original announcement of the CBI, we held consultations with the Governments of Canada, Mexico, and Venezuela, as well as with our European allies and Japan. Colombia subsequently agreed to become a participant.

Enactment of the CBI should encourage other donor governments and appropriate international organizations to expand their assistance activities in the region. The problems of the Caribbean Basin region are deep-seated, and reducing them will be a great challenge. But we can gain strength from our shared vision.

I'm confident we will. I think back to an incident during my last trip to Central America. As I was beginning to speak in Costa Rica, suddenly I was loudly interrupted by a gentleman who was determined to make his own speech out there from the audience. I didn't know exactly what was going on, and I turned to the President of Costa Rica, asked him, and he informed me that this was a Communist, a Marxist member of their congress, their legislature, and that he was determined to denounce us. And that's what he was doing.

I have to tell you a little postscript there, that later the President told me that that Communist member of the legislature was the only member of the legislature that could afford to drive a Mercedes. [Laughter] But if the people of the Americas are given a free choice, they'll all choose to be like Costa Rica, not Castro's Cuba.

Only a counterfeit revolution builds walls to keep people in and employs armies of secret police to keep them quiet. The real revolution lives in the principle that government must rest on the consent of the governed, and this spirit of democracy and freedom of opportunity is the driving force behind the Caribbean Basin Initiative. We're building together a future of new hope and more opportunity. And I pledge the best efforts of our administration to carry this positive program forward, making it worthy of the ideals and dreams that gave it birth.

Secretary Al Angrisani -- and I understand that maybe we wouldn't be celebrating this particular event today, Ray tells me, Al, if it hadn't been for your devotion to this cause and all that you've put in -- our other guests here on the top shelf -- [laughter] -- I thank you for inviting me over today to be a part of this ceremony for the Job Training Partnership Act.

You know, so much of what we're trying to do, so much of this depended on real communications. And I can't resist. I've told this story before, and if some of you've heard it before -- it illustrates communications -- you'll have to forgive me. But life not only begins -- or lumbago, I should say, not only begins at 40 but so does the tendency to tell the same story over and over again. [Laughter] But I've always thought of the importance of communication and how much a part it plays in what you and I, what all of us are trying to do. And one day a former placekicker with the Los Angeles Rams, who later became a sports announcer, Danny Villanueva told me about communications.

But we really do have a lot to celebrate, because this act, which went into effect a couple of days ago, initiates a new, more effective way of helping our unemployed, as you've been told. The people up here on the dais, other people in the administration and the Congress, and many of you in the audience, especially you in the Employment and Training Administration, played a role in making this positive program happen.

Washington when I came here. I had seen many Federal programs out there from another vantage point as Governor of a State, and I want to thank all of you for bringing this particular program about. I'm very proud of your work. This program will train, as you've been told, more than a million people a year for permanent, self-sustaining employment. And you know what is different about this program is, the primary goal is real, results-oriented job training, training that leads to jobs people can build lives and futures on.

It represents genuine opportunity, not temporary balm to a liberal conscience. It focuses on the long-term needs of the unemployed, not on short-term political quackery. Its moneys go to real training, not simply to income transfer, welfare-type programs or into administrative overhead.

This program, as Secretary Donovan said, is a partnership between Federal, State, and local government and the private sector. The government has trained too many individuals in skills that aren't needed in their communities. Still other unemployed people have been steered into make-work government jobs. This program will make a difference on Main Street. It'll provide help; it'll bring hope and encourage self-reliance.

Private enterprise will be participating in a very meaningful way. Business and labor will be working together in organizations called private industry councils, designed to provide training skills needed right in the community. And unlike a great many other programs in the past, at least 70 cents of every Job Training Partnership Act dollar must go to actual training.

This act provides the possibility of a fundamental change, not only in job-training practices but in welfare, vocational education, and economic development. State legislatures and Federal agencies are looking into the State and local councils set up as a result of this act as a funnel for other programs. This could be a great step forward for other programs, for federalism, and for meeting the needs of our communities, and that's a pretty exciting prospect.

You see them peddling the same old economic nostrums that got us into our economic difficulties in the first place. Well, I can assure you, we're not going backward. We're heading forward toward the future.

Not only in terms of this job training act but in other areas as well, we've begun to turn things around a little bit here in town. Inflation, which had been running at those horrendous double digits, has for the last 12 months been running 2.6 percent. That's the lowest 12-month average in 17 years. Now, of course, they said it couldn't be done. And we said it could. And we did it. It's nice sometimes not to know how many things you can't do -- [laughter] -- because usually you can.

The tax take doubled in the 5 years before we had a chance to do anything about it. Well, we cut personal tax rates 25 percent across the board. And beginning in 1985 taxes will be indexed so that never again will inflation push you into higher and higher tax brackets just because you got a cost-of-living pay raise.

The economy's been growing at a good clip. There have been increases in housing, construction, retail and auto sales -- all those things that show that the economy is recovering nicely. And that brings me to the place where America's nest eggs, billions of dollars, workers' pension funds are invested. The gains in the stock market have met a higher return for all of America's workers and their retirement savings. And that's very good news for retirees and workers.

These are some of the good things that have been happening. Unemployment is going down, but it's usually the last of the major indicators to turn around. And, yet, a month ago we had a drop that was the biggest 1-month drop in unemployment in 24 years.

Partnership Act is directed toward those who would have trouble in getting jobs even if the unemployment rate was not at the level it is. It's targeted toward those who face significant barriers to employment. These are the people that government can help through training. This money is much more effectively spent than all-purpose, politically motivated jobs bills that you see working their way through the Congress.

So, I'm very proud of the work that you've accomplished with this new legislation. America is regaining her confidence. We're headed in a new and a better direction. I'm very optimistic about the accomplishments to come.

For too long, the Polish Government has tried to make Lech Walesa a nonperson and destroy the free trade union movement that he helped to create in Poland. But no government can destroy the hopes that burn in the hearts of a people.

The people of Poland have shown in their support of Solidarity, just as they showed in their support for His Holiness Pope John Paul II during his visit to Poland, that the government of that nation cannot make Lech Walesa a nonperson, and they can't turn his ideas into nonideas.

This award demonstrates that the world will always remember and will honor the commitment to freedom and the commitment to free trade unions that Lech Walesa and millions of brave Polish people share. This award also underlines the need for the Polish Government to turn away from a policy of confrontation toward one of reconciliation with all of the Polish people. And I earnestly hope they will seize this opportunity.

Americans with myasthenia gravis cannot move about freely, as most of us can. This chronic neuromuscular disease, which has no known cause, produces progressive muscular weakness and abnormally rapid fatigue of the voluntary muscles. Myasthenia gravis can also result in a life-threatening medical crisis, particularly when a patient's throat muscles are affected.

Myasthenia gravis can strike any person, at any age, at any time. At least 100,000 people have been diagnosed as having this disorder, and scientists estimate that another 100,000 persons with myasthenia gravis have not yet been diagnosed.

In the past, myasthenia gravis patients died or were severely incapacitated by their weakened muscles. Several forms of treatment developed by scientists in private and Federal research institutions have led to improved management of the disease. Research supported by the Myasthenia Gravis Foundation, Inc., in collaboration with the Neurological Institute of the National Institutes of Health, has made important contributions to the management of this neurological disorder. Today, myasthenia gravis patients can expect to lead nearly normal lives.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

All of America is saddened by the loss of Cardinal Cooke, a saintly man and a great spiritual leader. In life, Terence James Cooke inspired us with his personal holiness, his dedication to his church, his devotion to his flock. But in death as well, he had for us a special gift and a special inspiration. The world has rarely seen a more moving display of the three cardinal virtues than in the faith, hope, and love with which Cardinal Cooke confronted and conquered death. He bore his suffering in imitation of his savior.

Nancy and I consider it one of the great privileges of our lives that in his final months we had the chance to visit and pray with Cardinal Cooke. We join the people of New York and all America in mourning the grievous loss of a wonderful and holy man.

Thank you, Bill. Ladies and gentlemen, Members of the Congress, I think all of us can feel privileged to be here today. We are in the presence of authentic heroes. You know, there's a great tendency in this business of government to get lost in the pursuit of policy and power. We tend to forget in all the hustle and bustle of official Washington the really important things in our lives.

One of those important things is our sense of wonder at the incredible heights of generosity, courage, and magnificence that human beings can rise to. Well, I can think of no better way to renew that sense of wonder than the stories of our two medal winners here today. The accounts of their deeds are simple and straightforward, but they speak volumes about the mobility -- the nobility, I should say, of the human spirit and about the nobility of our two medal winners.

Without hesitating, Ben went to the rescue. He crashed through the ice himself, into water that was over his head, but somehow managed -- Ben was 10 years old at the time -- to keep the younger boy's head above water, to get him to shore, finally to safety.

Karen risked her own life to rescue two other members of her family. Karen suffered second- and third-degree burns over 80 percent of her body. This has required months of care in the Burn Unit and, later, the Children's Rehabilitation Center of the University of Virginia Medical Center.

Ben and Karen, I think I speak for everyone here when I say you honor us with your presence. I know your families are proud of you and proud to be here today. And I know, Karen, that in one sense your father is not with us today. And I want to extend my sympathy to you and to the rest of your family. But in another sense, Karen, I believe with all my heart he is here. And he's very proud. I hope you know you gave him a priceless gift before he died -- wonderful moments of love and pride.

Someone once said that heroism is the brilliant triumph of the soul over the flesh -- that is to say, fear. Heroism is the dazzling and glorious concentration of courage. Well, it goes without saying that today all of us are dazzled by the deeds of these two medal winners and even more overwhelmed by the fact that they are so young.

Since the founding of this nation, freedom of the press has been a fundamental tenet of American life. The economic freedom that has earned us such great bounty and the precious freedoms of speech and assembly would have little meaning or be totally nullified should freedom of the press ever be ended. There is no more essential ingredient than a free, strong, and independent press to our continued success in what the Founding Fathers called our ``noble experiment'' in self-government.

Today, as we survey the globe, we find increasing hostility to the principles of open communication. Both the governments of many nations and certain international organizations advocate or enforce policies alien to a free flow of ideas. This promotion of censorship reflects a manifest fear of the truth and depreciation of the great importance of liberty to human advancement.

Throughout National Newspaper Week, all Americans are pleased to note the many contributions of the men and women of our nation's press to the preservation of the First Amendment's guarantee of freedom of the press. Of the forces shaping the destiny of our civilization, none is more crucial to our future than the responsible reporting and truthful analysis of the events of our era. I commend your dedicated efforts in pursuit of their goals.

This occasion provides a welcome opportunity for me to express my high regard for your role in keeping Americans informed. Millions of our citizens depend on you to receive the essential and timely in-depth information that only newspapers bring to our daily lives.

In recognition of the national program which is underway to call public attention to the importance of schoolbus safety, and in recognition of the importance of safe transport of our young students to and from school, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 137, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation designating the week of October 2 through October 8, 1983, as National Schoolbus Safety Week.

I've found out in this job there are some days better than others. [Laughter] And I told an interviewer yesterday, with regard to '84, that I believe the people tell you whether you should or not. So, I shall remember what you have said.

Your work and dedication and that of all your members who aren't here today have resulted in the election of thousands of Republicans all across this country -- people who have carried our ideas and principles at the Federal, State, and local levels. Thanks to your energy and talent, you've often been called the foot soldiers of our party. But that description is becoming outdated. You've got a good share of generals in your ranks -- [laughter] -- and that share is growing.

We Republicans have always been in the forefront of supporting women's rights and encouraging their participation in all shades of society. It began with our backing of women's suffrage, and it continues today with many able women serving in public and political office.

I believe we should set a new goal for ourselves. Let us at least double the number of Republican women in the House and Senate, and let's do it in 1984. And, Claudine Schneider, I hope you're listening, because I'd like to think that one of those new Senators will be you.

I want you to know that back in Washington we're appointing top-quality people to responsible positions throughout the Government. And because we're looking for the best, we've appointed many women to key jobs -- women like our United Nations Ambassador, Jeane Kirkpatrick; women who come from among your ranks, like Elizabeth Dole, our Secretary of Transportation, Margaret Heckler, our Secretary of Health and Human Services, and another member of whom we're all extremely proud, Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor. And on some 5-to-4 decisions since she arrived there, how I have thanked heaven that she is there.

They are the stars. But throughout the administration, women are involved in making the serious decisions that are shaping America's destiny. I'm glad your convention is focusing on the crucial issue that is facing America in the 1980's -- the economy. America's society has changed dramatically during the last decade, and American women have been a major force behind those changes. Fifty-three percent of you are working outside the home, up from 38 percent just 20 years ago. And that's one reason why the key to your, or anybody else's, progress is a strong, growing economy. And believe me, our goal is not just economic recovery. We seek to build a new era of lasting economic expansion filled with opportunities for all our people that will be a dramatic improvement from what we inherited.

Let us remind our fellow Americans what our opponents want everyone to forget: They had their chance, and they failed. For 4 straight years they exercised total control over the Federal Government. They controlled both Houses of the Congress, the White House, and every department, bureau, and agency.

America with double-digit inflation, record interest rates, huge tax increases, too much regulation, credit controls, farm embargoes, and phony excuses about malaise are the last people who should be giving sermonettes about fairness and compassion.

Sometimes people buying their groceries and other items don't realize how much inflation is down, because the prices are still going up. The difference is they're not going up much -- or they are going up much more slowly than before. For example, if food prices had continued rising the last 2 years at the same rate as in the 2 years before we took office, a loaf of bread would cost 7 cents more today; a half gallon of milk would cost 18 cents more; a pound of hamburger would cost 60 cents more; and a gallon of gas would cost 97 cents more. But I'm not going to be satisfied -- and I don't think you are -- until inflation is zero. And that's where we're going to get it.

In 1980 the prime interest rate hit 21\1/2\ percent, the highest level in more than 100 years. Now it's about half what it was. The cost of doing business, mortgage, education, and car loans have come down. Parents, students, entrepreneurs, workers, and consumers -- all are benefiting. And if the Congress would just act responsibly, we can knock those interest rates down even more.

On another front, we've cut 300 million hours of Federal paperwork. This will save consumers, business, and State and local officials billions of dollars. It's taken time, but virtually every sector of the economy -- from housing to the auto industry to high technology -- is expanding, creating greater opportunities and new hope for a better and more secure future. The gross national product, the GNP, is growing faster than even we expected -- growing by a whopping 9.7 percent in the second quarter of this year and an estimated 7 percent for the next quarter.

Unemployment, which, tragically, is often the last indicator to turn around in a recovery, is on a downward path. Just this morning we received the more welcome news; at 8:30 they released the statistics. Total unemployment in September dropped to 9.1 percent. As you'll remember, in August it dropped the biggest single monthly drop in 24 years. The number of people holding jobs in September increased by 382,000 to a total number of people working in this country of 101.9 million and that is an all-time high in the history of the United States.

Now one of the ways to get there is by a constitutional amendment. Now, I recognize that that idea would not be a cure-all; it wouldn't even go into effect right away. But in the interim period, the Congress and the President would have to sit down together to agree on a budget of real discipline and one that would not penalize those dependent on government for help.

Now I still believe this idea is right for America. Our goal was and remains to bring the Federal budget into balance by bringing spending down in line with revenues. And this is the only true course toward fiscal sanity.

This upside-down logic is at the core of their so-called deficit solutions. Well, hold on to your seatbelts, because I warn you, the day the liberal leadership regains control of the government -- if it ever does -- Americans are on their way to being taxed into the poorhouse.

Several months ago we had to beat back their plan to raise taxes by $315 billion over the next 5 years. Nor did they have any intention to spend less, not on your life. Along with the tax increase they planned a $181 billion increase in domestic spending. Just imagine how quickly this would have decimated savings and investment, sunk the recovery, and raised unemployment -- all of which would have made the deficit much bigger, not smaller.

Our idea of fairness is not tax increases, it's tax reductions and indexing. Our tax cut is already saving the average working family $700 a year. Our idea of opportunity is not to destroy hope, but to work with responsible Republicans and Democrats to reward initiative and help all Americans achieve economic equality. We've been doing it by reducing the marriage tax penalty, increasing the maximum child care credit -- almost doubling it -- increasing the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and by virtually eliminating estate taxes on family farms and businesses for a surviving spouse. Now, this is real progress for America.

Question: How much money would we raise? Answer: Approximately $33 billion, enough to run the government for 14 days and cover about 18 percent of the deficit, less than one-fifth of the deficit. Well, sorry, that won't quite do it. And remember, the government would only confiscate that $33 billion one time. Raising taxes sets off an alarm. It tells people don't take risks, don't invest more, don't produce or save, because government is waiting to take it away from you next year. Thirty-three billion would not be there to tax and the deficit would grow.

Now, what was their other idea for reducing the deficit? Oh, yes, cut military spending and, as a few urge, cut it to the bone. After their proposed tax increase the deficit, according to their estimate, would still be around $150 billion. Now remember we have already reduced our planned defense increase by $66 billion. We did that ourselves. Forget that defense spending as a share of the Federal budget is nearly 40 percent less today than it was under John F. Kennedy 20 years ago. Forget that the Russians have been out-investing us in defense by about 2 to 1. We have a deficit left of about $150 billion, which our opponents say can be eliminated by reduced defense spending. So, let's start by eliminating -- for an entire year -- spending on the Pershing missile, the B - 1 bomber, the MX missile, the cruise missile, the Trident submarine and its missiles, the M - 1 tank, and then cancel the orders for all the ammunition for all our weapons, including even the bullets for our soldiers' rifles. And that will reduce the deficit of $150 billion by $13.2 billion in 1984.

What else would they have us do -- ask the soldiers, sailors, marines, and airmen to work free and give up eating? The path to lower deficits is not paved with tax increases and unilateral disarmament. We will reduce deficits by encouraging growth and handcuffing the big spenders.

Yes, the President is a Republican, and there's much talk in Democratic circles that the budget and the deficit are the President's; they come full-blown from the White House. But the Constitution doesn't give the President power to appropriate or spend money. That power belongs only to the Congress, and the Congress has only been Republican in both Houses for 4 of the last 50 years.

When we protested over those years the size of the growing debt, how many remember they told us the debt didn't mean anything because we owed it to ourselves? Indeed, we can recall them saying that deficit spending and its accompanying inflation were essential to continued prosperity.

Now, that can only be called hypocrisy. These people who sabotaged the balanced budget amendment, who resisted tooth and nail our efforts to break runaway spending, are now delivering daily broadsides against deficits, even as they cook up a whole host of new spending bills. Look at only a portion of their spending wish-list, and you will be staggered. Sixteen House Democratic proposals alone would raise the deficit by almost $50 billion in fiscal year 1984 and by a whopping $192 billion over the next 5 years. It is their profligacy, not our economic recovery program, that is the source of Federal red ink.

I will not hesitate to veto their tax increases, and I must and will veto their budget-busting bills as fast as they reach my desk. And on my desk is a letter signed by 146 Congressmen, the overwhelming majority Republicans, pledging to me that they -- that's the number required -- will uphold my vetoes when I sign them.

Let us urge the American people to keep working at the grassroots for a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced budget. If you want to make it happen, it will happen. We'll continue the lonely battle to restrain spending. One tool I used in my California days, and which I've always been attracted to, is the line-item veto. Presidents don't have it. About 30 Governors do, and it works every time you use it.

Let's also keep our eyes on something encouraging: The deficit is coming down. The deficit is falling because of new economic growth. Even with lower tax rates, revenues are coming in strong, because those lower tax rates stimulated the economic recovery.

Economic growth is making life better for everyone, and that's the Republican blueprint for the future. The Republican message is dream the big dreams. With freedom and opportunity, there's no limit to what we can accomplish as individuals and as a nation. But let us also remember we cannot prosper unless we are secure, and we cannot be secure unless we're free. The Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, their chemical poisoning of innocent civilians, their brutal occupation and subversion of one country after another, and their recent attack against 269 innocent civilians aboard KAL Flight 007 are all important reminders: We live in a dangerous world, with cruel people who reject our ideals and who disregard individual rights and the value of human life.

It is my duty as President, and all of our duties as citizens, to keep this nation's defenses second to none, so that America can remain strong -- [applause]. Thank you. God bless you all. America is going to remain strong, free, and at peace; I know that now.

I told you a little while ago, some days are better than others. There are days, also, in which things happen. I just have to tell you this little incident. I have received some letters from the families of some of those who were on that Korean airliner. And the other day I received one from a mother whose 28-year-old daughter was on that plane. She had lost her husband the year before through a terrible illness. She had two small children. And now this mother, as grandmother, had to tell those two small children their mother was dead. And she told me how the little 6-year-old boy turned without a word and then a short time later came back and handed her a drawing he'd made of a little boy crying and said, ``That's how I feel.'' I sometimes think if it would do any good, I'd like to send a lot of those letters to Mr. Andropov.

Peace through strength is our goal. We're undertaking the most sweeping proposals for mutual and verifiable arms reductions since nuclear weapons became a threat. In strategic nuclear forces and in measures to build confidence and trust, in intermediate-range nuclear forces and in conventional forces, we want to lessen the danger to ourselves and our children. We remain flexible in our bargaining, but as Commander in Chief, I have an obligation to protect this country, and I will not let political expediency influence these crucial negotiations.

And I urge you: Take our message to the people. Remind them where we were, what we've done, and how far together we can still go. You've always been our greatest strength. You've made the difference before; you can do it now. With your talent, your drive, your brains, and your heart, we can out-organize and out-do anyone. And if enough of you run for public office, if enough of you continue to work as you always have, American women will make history again. You'll make 1984 the year of the Republican renaissance. And all I can say to all of you is God bless you all, and God bless America.

I'm most pleased to be with you today to support the candidacy of an individual whose strength of character, unbounding energy, and unmatched creativity is going to make Kentucky one heck of a fine Governor -- Jim Bunning.

Jim's been talking about reform that will bring business and commerce into your State. He's talking about lowering certain taxes to encourage industry to locate here. He's talking about getting rid of useless regulations that discourage economic development. He's talking about tax credits for the creation of new jobs, and about vocational training for those unprepared to meet the challenge of changing times. He's got the ideas, he knows how State government works, and he'll do the things he's talked about.

As you all know, better than me, perhaps -- no, you don't know better than me because I broadcast baseball for several years -- [laughter] -- he played professional baseball for 17 years before getting into politics. He's proven his political savvy is as good as his pitching arm, and he hasn't forgotten what it means to be on a team.

American people. We Republicans -- and I know there are a host of Democrats who agree with us about this -- believe that government works best at levels close enough for people to influence the decisions that affect their lives.

Centralizing power in Washington doesn't work. It expanded the bureaucracy, it drained resources from the State and local level, but the problems remained and often got worse. When I was a young man, it's hard to believe that government in the United States only took 10 cents out of every dollar being earned. And two-thirds of that was for State and local government and one-third for the Federal Government. Today they're taking something like 44 cents out of every dollar earned, and two-thirds of that goes to the Federal Government, leaving one-third for the States and the local communities.

We're coming to the end of an era when politicians can sell the idea that the best solution to any problem is letting Washington do it because Federal money is free. Well, Washington money isn't free money, as I think most of you are well aware. It comes right out of those same pockets. Just between 1976 and 1981, the Federal tax take doubled. That deprived our economy of the resources that it needed for investment and new job creation. We fell into a pit of high inflation and economic stagnation. Some of the government programs have made little sense, except to those making a career out of administering those programs.

But you know, it's -- sometimes these government programs, it's a little bit like the story of the country preacher who called on a town about 100 miles away from his own. He went there for a revival meeting. And on the way to the church, he noticed in that town that sitting on the porch of a little country store was a man from his own hometown, a fellow that was known for his drinking. And the minister went up to him and asked what he was doing so far from home.

That was the kind of logic that fit some of the Federal programs of the last 20 years. It wasn't any better than that. But today, we know that for America to move forward and meet the challenges of tomorrow, we must have strong leadership and community involvement.

Jim Bunning is just the person to provide the kind of leadership Kentucky needs to get the people involved. There's no better example of this than the education issue of such concern to so many of us. He's taken some pretty courageous stands on that. This is a subject about which I've been deeply concerned as a parent and as a public official, and I admire him for hitting the issue head-on.

I think voters should remember that those who offer easy answers and quick fixes are doing everyone a disservice, especially our children. Jim has suggested annual testing of students and ending the automatic promotion of pupils.

He's proposed lengthening the school year to bring Kentucky in line with the national average, raising the compulsory age for school attendance to at least attempt to give Kentucky children a better chance to graduate from high school. Jim knows that a well-educated future generation will make Kentucky stronger economically -- a view that his opponent may have missed. He's endorsed increasing the pay of your teachers, but he's also had the courage to call for merit pay and competency testing to ensure that the money is well spent.

I've looked over the things that Jim Bunning has proposed during this campaign, and I'm impressed. Since I got to Washington 3 years ago, we've tried to turn back the block grants power and authority to the States. With an individual like Jim in the Governor's office, I know that Kentuckians will benefit greatly from the new authority on block grants, the authority that it gives to the States.

Strong and effective State government is a vital part of the American system of government. Here in Kentucky, home of Henry Clay, one of the giants of American federalism, you well understand the relationship between our freedom and the balance of power between Federal and State government.

We are working on federalism at the national level. This country is as free as it is -- you as individuals owe much of your freedom to this very unique thing about our country -- that it was set up by the Constitution to be a federation of sovereign States, not administrative districts of a Federal Government that retained all the power itself.

It is that ability of citizens to choose where they will live that has kept government at the State levels from becoming tyrannical. It is that that preserves our precious liberty and unleashes productive forces among our citizens that produce abundance such as the world has never dreamed.

Thank you, and God bless you. And I can tell you in this spirit of federalism, you'd be surprised how much help it is to someone in my job if it's Republican Governors we're dealing with out there, Governors who believe as we believe.

Lebanon. Congress, on a strong bipartisan basis, has passed a resolution approving their presence there for 18 months if need be. But in the debate, many questions were raised as to what they were doing there and whether their presence there was in our national interest. In the midst of all this debate, I received a letter from the father of a young marine corporal stationed in Beirut, Lebanon.

Many believe we are involving ourselves needlessly in someone else's quarrel and should bring our young men home and mind our own business. The corporal may not have spelled out the specifics as to why it was in our best interest to be there, but he was certainly correct in his conclusion that it is our business.

A little over a year ago, I proposed a peace initiative for the entire Middle East. It was based on the Camp David accords and the United Nations Resolutions 242 and 338. We offered our help in bringing the Arab States and Israel together in negotiations to settle the longstanding disputes that had kept that entire area in turmoil for many years. We sought more peace treaties like the one between Egypt and Israel.

Lebanon, the site of refugee camps for a great many Palestinians, had been torn by strife for several years. There were factions, each with its own militia, fighting each other. Terrorists in Lebanon violated Israel's northern border, killing innocent civilians. Syrian forces occupied the eastern part of Lebanon. Israeli military finally invaded from the south to force the PLO attackers away from the border. There could be no implementation of our peace initiative until this situation was resolved.

With our allies -- England, France, and Italy -- we proposed a withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon and formed a multinational force to help maintain order and stability in the Beirut area while a new Lebanese Government and army undertook to restore sovereignty throughout Lebanon.

Over the course of several months, Lebanon and Israel negotiated a friendly agreement for security of the border between the two. We stand by this as a good agreement. But Syria, which had earlier agreed to withdraw if Israel did, changed its mind, and today has some 5,000 Soviet advisers and technicians and a massive amount of new Soviet equipment in its country, including a new generation of surface-to-surface missiles -- the SS - 21. We have to wonder aloud about Syrian protestations of their peaceful intentions.

Gemayel is committed to a process of national reconciliation as the means to end factional fighting. The presence of our marines as part of the multinational force demonstrates that Lebanon does not stand alone. Peace for the Middle East and a fair settlement of the Palestinian problem is truly in our national interest.

Today Jim Watt talked with me by telephone and delivered to me his letter of resignation. He feels that he has completed the principal objectives that he and I agreed upon when he became Secretary of the Interior. I respect his decision to leave the Government and thus have reluctantly accepted his resignation. He will continue in office until his successor is confirmed.

Jim has done an outstanding job as a member of my Cabinet and in his stewardship of the natural resources of the Nation. He has initiated a careful balance between the needs of people and the importance of protecting the environment. His dedication to public service and his accomplishments as Secretary of the Interior will long be remembered.

The United States deplores this vicious attack, as it does acts of terrorism whenever and wherever they occur. The President and all Americans share the grief and the deep sense of loss of the Korean people at the tragic death of these fine public servants. We admired their profound contributions to the relationship between the United States and Korea, and we knew them as friends. We mourn their loss.

While threats to disrupt the Geneva talks have consistently been part of Soviet propaganda tactics designed to undercut support for planned U.S. INF deployments to Europe, the Soviets have not asked for a recess either in START or INF talks.

For our part the U.S. has made clear that we will stay at the negotiating table in Geneva. We will continue to work for progress, and if the deployment of Pershing and ground-launched cruise missiles has to begin because we have not reached an agreement in the INF negotiations, we will remain at the negotiating table thereafter. In that event, if an equitable agreement to reduce or eliminate U.S. and Soviet LRINF missiles can be reached, the U.S. stands ready to halt its deployments or reverse them.

The Radio Broadcasting to Cuba Act (S. 602), which I signed on October 4, 1983, was adopted with broad bipartisan support in the Congress and responds to an important foreign policy initiative of my administration: to break Fidel Castro's monopoly on news and information within Cuba. For the first time in the 25 years of Communist domination of Cuba, the Cuban people will be able to hear the truth, and to hear it in detail, about Cuban domestic and foreign policy. The Cuban people will be in a better position to make Cuba's leaders accountable for their conduct in foreign policy, economic management, and human rights.

I would have preferred to place Radio Marti under the Board for International Broadcasting instead of the Voice of America, because the distinct nature of its mission is akin to that of Radio Free Europe and Radio Liberty. Nevertheless, I am satisfied this legislation will permit the new Cuba service to broadcast programs that promote freedom in Cuba, while maintaining the historic high standards of the Voice of America for accuracy and reliability. This kind of broadcasting is 25 years overdue.

The rising number of injury and illness claims from Federal employees has meant increased human suffering, a loss of valuable services from injured employees, and increased costs for compensation payments, which are rapidly approaching a billion dollars each year.

In the interest of protecting Federal employees, I am now setting a government-wide goal of three percent per year for the reduction of workplace injuries. The goal will be in effect for five years, starting with Fiscal Year 1984, and will cover both injury and occupational health claims.

Establishing this goal gives us a standard against which to measure progress. Specific goals for agencies will be worked out with the Occupational Safety and Health Administration of the Department of Labor.

Ambassador Petrignani. Mr. President, your presence here today carries an extraordinary political significance and a great symbolic value. With your presence at the Italian Embassy, sir, you honor the country which gave birth to Christopher Columbus. But you also give recognition to the hundreds of thousands, the millions of other Italians who, after Columbus, came to these shores to find on the new continent a land of liberty and equality, a land where to open up wider horizons and offer renewed energy to that fascinating, unique, incomparable human venture which is the Western civilization. America can be proud of those immigrants who contributed in making her so great, so strong, so noble, so idealistic.

The strength of America and the idealism of America, the former at the service of the latter, are a guarantee to all free men, an irreplaceable guarantee for the protection and the expansion of freedom and democracy in this continent, in Europe, in the entire world.

Your gesture today, Mr. President, not only honors us, but it also reveals a generous political vision, and it embodies your personal commitment to the inspiring American concept of an open and pluralistic society. Italian Americans can be proud of what they have achieved and what they represent today in this society, shaped also by their genius and in which they have become prominent in all fields of human endeavor.

Washington of the Italian Prime Minister, Bettino Craxi, underlines the great significance which the United States attribute to the friendship of Italy. In a world beset by uncertainties and dangers, as one of your major European partners, Italy stands by you, bound by common commitment for the defense of peace and security and for the preservation of the precious political values of our common, historic heritage.

Never as in these days has the Atlantic alliance been such an irreplaceable bulwark for upholding the indivisible security of the West. And I would like to think that by paying tribute to Christopher Columbus we pay tribute to a forerunner of this alliance, of this bridge which spans today the two sides of the Atlantic Ocean.

The President. Mr. Ambassador and Mrs. Petrignani and distinguished guests, it's fitting that we should be enjoying this excellent luncheon on Columbus Day in the home of Italy's Ambassador to the United States.

Americans of Italian descent -- indeed, all Americans -- are indebted to Italy. The historic and cultural bonds between our two peoples and nations are strengthened by the magnificent contributions Americans of Italian descent have made and are making to our country.

Italian who altered the course of history by exhibiting great moral character and individual courage. Along with Galileo, da Vinci, and other great figures of the Italian Renaissance, Columbus symbolizes a quest for knowledge, a willingness and fortitude to go beyond accepted barriers to progress.

Our precious liberty, so important to Italians and Americans, depends on the quality of character that we honor on Columbus Day. Italy has long been a particularly close and important ally of the United States. In our commitment to genuine arms reductions and to the maintenance of a stable balance of power so necessary for peace, Americans and Italians are of one mind.

Within the NATO alliance, Italy is shouldering increasing responsibility through its commitment to deploy new intermediate-range missiles in Sicily if negotiations with the Soviets do not succeed in banning this category of weapons. In Lebanon, Italian troops have joined American and other forces in the difficult and dangerous task of trying to keep the peace. As constructive Italian involvement in world affairs has grown, so has our admiration and respect for your great nation.

Modern Americans are enjoying the accomplishments made possible by Columbus' initiative and courage. So, on this Columbus Day, please join me in raising our glasses to the first of the many great contributions Italians and their descendants have made to our country.

This resolution provides important support for the United States presence and policies in Lebanon and facilitates the pursuit of United States interests in that region on the bipartisan basis that has been the traditional hallmark of American foreign policy. In my view, the participation and support of the Congress are exceedingly important on matters of such fundamental importance to our national security interests, particularly where United States Armed Forces have been deployed in support of our policy objectives abroad. I am grateful to those of both political parties who joined in the expression of resolve reflected by the enactment of this resolution, and especially to the bipartisan leadership of Senate Majority Leader Baker, House Speaker O'Neill, House Foreign Affairs Committee Chairman Zablocki, and Senate Foreign Relations Committee Chairman Percy.

The text of this resolution states a number of congressional findings, determinations, and assertions on certain matters. It is, of course, entirely appropriate for Congress to express its views on these subjects in this manner. However, I do not necessarily join in or agree with some of these expressions. For example, with regard to the congressional determination that the requirements of section 4(a)(1) of the War Powers Resolution became operative on August 29, 1983, I would note that the initiation of isolated or infrequent acts of violence against United States Armed Forces does not necessarily constitute actual or imminent involvement in hostilities, even if casualties to those forces result. I think it reasonable to recognize the inherent risk and imprudence of setting any precise formula for making such determinations.

However, complete accord on such debatable issues is less important than the process that has taken place and the bipartisan policy goals that have been articulated. We must not let disagreements on interpretation or issues of institutional powers prevent us from expressing our mutual goals to the citizens of our nation and the world. I therefore sign this resolution in full support of its policies, but with reservations about some of the specific congressional expressions.

There have been historic differences between the legislative and executive branches of government with respect to the wisdom and constitutionality of section 5(b) of the War Powers Resolution. That section purports to require termination of the use of United States Armed Forces in actual hostilities or situations in which imminent involvement in hostilities is clearly indicated by the circumstances unless Congress, within 60 days, enacts a specific authorization for that use or otherwise extends the 60-day period. In light of these historic differences, I would like to emphasize my view that the imposition of such arbitrary and inflexible deadlines creates unwise limitations on Presidential authority to deploy United States Forces in the interests of United States national security. For example, such deadlines can undermine foreign policy judgments, adversely affect our ability to deploy United States Armed Forces in support of these judgments, and encourage hostile elements to maximize United States casualties in connection with such deployments.

I believe it is, therefore, important for me to state, in signing this resolution, that I do not and cannot cede any of the authority vested in me under the Constitution as President and as Commander in Chief of United States Armed Forces. Nor should my signing be viewed as any acknowledgment that the President's constitutional authority can be impermissibly infringed by statute, that congressional authorization would be required if and when the period specified in section 5(b) of the War Powers Resolution might be deemed to have been triggered and the period had expired, or that section 6 of the Multinational Force in Lebanon Resolution may be interpreted to revise the President's constitutional authority to deploy United States Armed Forces. Let me underscore, however, that any differences we may have over institutional prerogatives will in no way diminish my intention to proceed in the manner outlined in my letter of September 27, 1983, to achieve the important bipartisan goals reflected in this resolution.

States Forces alongside those of France, Italy, and the United Kingdom helped bring about the recent cease-fire and the start of the reconciliation process in Lebanon. The security and the stability of the Beirut area and the successful process of national reconciliation are essential to the achievement of United States policy objectives in Lebanon, as stated in the resolution. It is my fervent hope and belief that this reaffirmation of the support of the executive and legislative branches for the Government of Lebanon and for our partners in the multinational force will promote a lasting peace and hasten the return home of our Armed Forces.

I am pleased today to congratulate Prime Minister Thatcher and the British people on the silver anniversary of the Technical Cooperation Program. It was due to the foresight of President Eisenhower and Prime Minister MacMillan that the program was established and given the high-level government support required for its initial impetus. Immediately afterwards, Canada joined, followed by Australia and New Zealand, in 1965 and 1969 respectively.

New Zealand lead a more secure existence as a result of this cooperative effort. The primary purpose of the program has remained as originally expressed in the Declaration of Common Purpose by President Eisenhower and Prime Minister MacMillan: that no member country possessed the resources to provide adequate defense research and development by itself and each must assist the other by sharing resources and tasks in many fields so that progress and security can be found by all.

May I also say hello to those who are joining us by way of closed-circuit television -- the students and teachers of the Congress Heights Elementary School here in Washington. It's good to be talking to Congress Heights and to welcome all of you here for this important ceremony here at the White House. It's a home that belongs to you and to all Americans.

Jefferson to humble self-taught people like Abe Lincoln and from inventors like Thomas Edison to visionaries like Martin Luther King, Americans have put their faith in the power of education to enrich lives and to make our nation strong. We see the evidence of this in many fine schools, like Congress Heights, with thousands of dedicated superintendents, principals, and teachers. But we also face tremendous problems.

Too many of our States demanded too little of their students, imposing lax graduation requirements. And compared to students in other industrialized nations, many of ours performed badly. Yet even as we've recognized the challenge, our nation has begun to respond.

One of our administration's first priorities was to establish a National Commission on Excellence in Education. And we asked it to help us chart a new course that would permit us to correct the mistakes of the past. Even before the Commission released its report, grassroots America had begun to move. Since 1980 no fewer than 20 States have passed tougher certification laws so that only fully qualified teachers can enter the classroom. In about the same period, more than half the school districts in the country have raised the number of credits they require in such basics as English, science, and math. And 38 percent more school districts will upgrade their standards by 1985.

Across the country groups of working men and women have been forming partnerships with schools -- partnerships in dedication. To form a partnership, volunteers from a business, a government agency, or other organization strike an agreement with a school to develop programs that will help the school's students in a number of basic ways. The volunteers might tutor students, establish scholarship funds, donate furnishings and equipment, or teach classes.

American schools out of a total of some 110,000. So, today I'm issuing a challenge to America to ensure our children get the education they deserve. Let us resolve that every one of our country's public, private, and parochial schools and community colleges -- all 110,000 of them -- will have formed a partnership in education. The goal is lofty, but well within the reach of the Nation that can send men to the Moon.

I know that this room is filled with men and women from business and education who've helped create partnerships in education in their communities. To you, on behalf of all Americans, thank you: large companies like Xerox, IBM, Federal Express, General Motors, and CNA Insurance; organizations like the American Bar Association, the Professional Engineering Societies, and the National Association of Manufacturers; and let's not forget the smaller companies like thousands of Burger King restaurants, local Radio Shack stores, and the group and cable TV stations.

Federal Government to promote partnerships in education in every way that it can. Last week I signed a proclamation naming the 1983 - 84 school year the National Year of Partnerships in Education. My Special Assistant you met here, Jim Coyne, and his staff will work on the program throughout the year. They'll be working with State governments, industry organizations, business associations, and other groups, and working with a nationwide computer system called DATA/NET to help schools and partners get together.

Government to follow the example of those sailors in San Diego by forming their own partnerships with local schools. Now, this won't be an expensive new government program. It'll be human and effective with thousands of men and women whose jobs range from designing satellites to building our bridges and highways, joining those in the private sector to lend a hand to our nation's schools.

Mr. Dalton, all of you watching at Congress Heights, I have a surprise for you. You were told that closed-circuit TV's put in your school were there because WJLA Television here in Washington was going to form a partnership with you. Well, that wasn't quite right. With your permission, Mr. Dalton, it's the White House which would like to form a partnership with your school.

And finally, let me just say a word to you, the students at Congress Heights. You don't have to take notes, because I promise not to give a pop quiz. You've probably heard a lot about the importance of dwindling resources. Well, I want you to know that our greatest resource is the human mind, and it isn't dwindling at all. There's no limit to the human capacity for intelligence, imagination, and wonder. And that's why giving all of you a good education is so very important.

Just a hundred years ago, in the time of our great-grandmothers and great-grandfathers, oil was nothing but so much sticky, smelly fluid. And it was the invention of the internal combustion engine that turned oil into a resource, and today oil fuels the world economy.

Just 10 years ago, around the time many of you were born, sand was nothing but the stuff that deserts are made of. Today we use sand to make silicon chips that guide satellites through the infinite reaches of space.

So, remember, in this vast and beautiful land that God has given us, it's not what's inside the Earth that counts, but what's inside your hearts and minds, because that's the stuff that dreams are made of. And America's future is in your dreams. Make them come true.

Scientists believe that lupus is caused by disturbances in the body's immune system; hormonal abnormalities and genetic factors also seem to be important. In its systemic form, the disease may involve the skin, joints, kidneys, heart, lungs and brain, in varying combinations.

The outlook for victims of lupus has been improving in recent years. The survival rate has increased as a result of greater awareness of the disease, improved diagnostic methods, and more effective treatments. However, new research findings and new approaches to diagnosis and improved treatment are urgently needed to eliminate lupus as a cause of human suffering. The Federal government and private voluntary organizations have developed a strong, enduring partnership committed to lupus research. I am confident that this cooperation will hasten the time when the cause and cure for the disease will be found.

Farms provide the basic food, fiber, and timber for consumer needs. The rural countryside also provides watersheds, and natural environment for clear water and clean air, outdoor recreation, open spaces, and landscapes. The cities sustain industry, services, cultural centers, and house 97 percent of the population.

Each year the people of our farms and cities pause during Farm-City Week to reflect on their interdependence and the strength and vitality that each brings to our national life. It is appropriate that Farm-City Week comes near Thanksgiving, the traditional time since Colonial days for Americans to reflect on the rich bounty of the harvest. As a people we are indeed blessed to live in a land with a plentiful supply of wholesome food.

In a short period of time, the United States has developed from an agricultural economy with scattered rural outposts, clinging to life in the New World, to an efficient production system in which only three percent of the Nation's people feed and clothe the entire population. This rapid growth has been made possible through the unparalleled productivity and cooperation of farm and city people working in close harmony.

In order that farm and city people may continue to reflect on the benefits of mutual support, and to show their grateful appreciation for their combined efforts, the American people have traditionally set aside a week each year to pay tribute to farm-city people.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President. Thank you all very much, and good afternoon. And thank you also for honoring us by coming by here today. I'm very grateful to have this chance to speak with you. Many groups come to visit here, but I believe yours is the first leadership group of Christian women to be welcomed to the White House in a long, long time, and I'm glad to be the one that's doing the greeting. I won't speculate why this hasn't been done before. I only know that as long as I'm President, your group and others who stand up for our Judeo-Christian values will be welcome here, because you belong here.

I can't say strongly enough what a tremendous force for good you are. As life-bearers, carrying on traditions of family in the home, but also in our schools, the corporate world, in the workplace, you're teachers of cooperation, tolerance, compassion, and responsibility. No greater truth shines through than the one you live by every day: that preserving America must begin with faith in the God who has blessed our land. And we don't have the answers; He does.

Him.'' I hope you won't mind my saying I think I know you all very well. Nelle Reagan, my mother, God rest her soul, had an unshakable faith in God's goodness. And while I may not have realized it in my youth, I know now that she planted that faith very deeply in me. She made the most difficult Christian message seem very easy. And, like you, she knew you could never repay one bad deed with another. Her way was forgiveness and goodness, and both began with love.

For some time now I believe that America has been hungering for a return to spiritual values that some of us fear we've tended to forget -- things like faith, families, family values, the bedrock of our nation. Thanks to the creation of new networks of faith by so many of you and your families, we're seeing more clearly again. We're remembering that freedom carries responsibilities. And we're not set free so that we can become slaves to sin.

America's becoming a great nation. George Washington kissed the Bible at his inauguration. And to those who would have government separate us from religion, he had these words: ``Reason and experience both forbid us to expect that national morality can prevail in exclusion of religious principle.'' And Ben Franklin, at the time when they were struggling with what was to be the American Constitution, finally one day said to those who were working with him that, ``Without God's help, we shall succeed in this political building no better than the builders of Babel.'' And if we ever forget that, we're lost. From that day on they opened all of the constitutional meetings with prayer.

It said that the first amendment does not prevent legislators in the Nebraska State Assembly from hiring a chaplain to open their sessions with prayer. And it said the Constitution does not prevent the State of Minnesota from giving a tax break to parents who choose private or religious schooling for their children. In both cases the Court decided in favor of what our Justice Department recommended in friend of the court briefs.

Now we're making another recommendation. We believe the city of Pawtucket, Rhode Island, and for that matter, any city in America, has the right to include the Nativity scene as part of its annual Christmas performance.

We think it's also time for a vote on tuition tax credits. Education's the fundamental right and responsibility of every parent. And we should remember that those who pay private tuition also pay their full share of taxes to support the public school system. Tuition tax credits would only threaten public schools if you believe that more competition, greater parental choice, and stronger local control will make our schools worse, not better.

Finally, let me just say a few words about another part of freedom that is under siege: the sanctity of human life. Either the law protects human beings, or it doesn't. When we're dealing with a handicapped child -- say, a mentally retarded baby girl who needs medical care to survive, is she not entitled to the protection of the law? Will she be denied her chance for love and life because someone decides she's too weak to warrant our help, or because someone has taken it upon themselves to decide the quality of her life doesn't justify keeping her alive? Is that not God's decision to make? And isn't it our duty to serve even the least of these for in so doing, we serve Him?

Our administration has tried to make sure the handicapped receive the respect of the law for the dignity of their lives. And the same holds true, I believe deeply, for the unborn. It may not help me in some polls to say this publicly, but until and unless it can be proven that the unborn child is not a living human being -- and I don't think it can be proven -- then we must protect the right of the unborn to life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.

Now, I've been talking longer than I intended, because I had a little something else to suggest here. But hardly a day goes by that I'm not told -- sometimes in letters and sometimes by people that I meet and perfect strangers -- and they tell me that they're praying for me. Well, thanks to Nelle Reagan, I believe in intercessionary prayer. And I know that those prayers are giving me a strength that I otherwise would not possess.

Q. Mr. President, I was very interested -- and if you had noticed, I was the first one to laugh and applaud when you mentioned the Supreme Court. I'm very concerned about the Supreme Court -- nine unelected officials with no expiration date other than death, legislating morality in this country, abortion being the prime topic. Could you address that, please?

Court does not interpret the law, but does legislate. And I think then it is up to the people through their elected representatives to such as an amendment with regard to prayer in schools, an amendment regarding abortion, to correct that with law.

We're separated into three branches of government, and we're supposed to be blessed with checks and balances. And I don't suppose there's ever a time that one branch or the other doesn't try to seize more authority than it should have. Then it's up to those checks and balances to go to work.

The President. Well, as a matter of fact, I have challenged sometimes that maybe those of us who are trying for a constitutional amendment or something, maybe we've missed an opportunity. And that is the thing that I mentioned in my remarks. The Constitution protects life, liberty and so forth. And all we need to do, I think, is demand that someone either prove to us that the unborn is not a living being, or then recognize that it is already entitled to consitutional protection. And we have such dichotomy in the law.

What happened, he was robbing a public place, and a woman evidenced that -- a young lady -- that she perhaps recognized him, and he shot her in cold blood. He wounded her but killed the baby that she was carrying. Now, under the law, he is now arrested, not charged with wounding her, charged with killing the unborn child. Now, how can we rule that she could have killed the unborn child if she wanted to, and it was called abortion?

And I know in our own State of California that there was a case where a man beat his common law wife so severely that her unborn child was killed. And the legislature of California some years ago unanimously and almost instantaneously passed a law that anyone who maltreats a woman with child to the extent of causing the death of the unborn child shall be tried for murder. Now, if it's murder, then it's murder all the way.

The President. Thank you. I will. And may I put your mind at ease that some of those rumors that started out -- yes, she has lost some weight. She -- a death in her family that affected her greatly when her father died, her mother's illness, and she had lost some weight. But she caught cold.

Q. Mr. President, are you planning between now and election time to have a couple of televised, well-publicized televised portions on -- that will show what you have done for women in the United States? We think your record is fantastic, but the grassroots voter is not hearing it because the press is only giving them the feminist view, and we want everybody to hear the truth. And I think we need to have it right directly from you.

The President. Believe me, I don't know -- [applause] -- thank you. I don't know just what procedure we're going to use to do this, but I have to tell you that I think our record with regard to what we have done for women is probably one of the best kept secrets in Washington.

Q. Mr. President, sir, I want to thank you for proclaiming 1983 as the Year of the Bible, and I think I can speak for all Christians everywhere. But there is something in that proclamation that was a little bit unsettling, and I'd like for you to explain it to me. It said that the world is facing a tremendous challenge in the next decade. And more important than armament, than the resources of armament, more important than the resources of technology, and more important than the resources of education is resources of spirit. And I'd like to know what you mean by -- that's the most important thing facing us.

The President. Well, because of what I said, I think, in my remarks here -- I have believed for a long time that we got off the track and our young people got off the track. And we saw a period in the generation gap where young people were discarding all the tried-and-true values upon which civilization has been based. And the only reason for discarding them was that they were old. And I then began saying that I sensed that there was a hunger in America for a spiritual revival.

And I think that -- yes, all the things that we may want to do -- all the strength of military and so forth -- all of these things are useless if we as a people are not dedicated to those values. And the basic values -- and, believe me, I don't want a war and I believe that if we have the right kind of military with the right strength, they will never have to use the science they have learned. But the great values that make for civilization are the values for which people have always been willing to die. And that we must have.

Secretary of the Interior, I have decided to turn once again to someone who has been a troubleshooter and a result-oriented professional. So, it is with a good deal of pleasure that I tell you that I have asked my Assistant for National Security Affairs, Judge Bill Clark, to be my nominee for this Cabinet position. He is a God-fearing westerner, fourth generation rancher, and a person I trust. And I think he will be a great Secretary of the Interior. And may I just tell you, I think he is succeeding a very fine Secretary of the Interior.

From 1967 to 1969, Mr. Clark was chief of staff to Governor Reagan in Sacramento. He was responsible for the reorganization of the executive branch of State government. Mr. Clark dealt extensively with several departments of the Federal Government's executive branch as well as the congressional delegation from California.

Inauguration of operational flights of the Space Transportation System in 1982 promises greatly broadened contributions from space now and for the Nation's future. Following the Shuttle's earlier test flights, which carried scientific experiments into space as well as the first Department of Defense payload, the first operational mission delivered two commercial satellites to orbit, demonstrating that the Space Shuttle provides practical, utilitarian, round-trip access to space.

Other space projects expanded vital civil and military communications, weather observation, earth resources monitoring, and studies of life sciences, the earth, the sun, and the universe -- supporting the national space policy goals I enunciated in July 1982. In outlining the space policy, I reaffirmed the United States commitment to explore and use space for the national well-being and to maintain U.S. leadership in space transportation, space science, applications, and technology.

Welcome to the White House. Today we pause to observe World Food Day, marking the anniversary of the founding of the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations back in 1945. The FAO, of which the United States is a founding member, was conceived as the focal point of civilization's fight to eliminate poverty-related hunger -- an admirable and worthwhile goal.

One child in four born in developing countries may die before the age of 5 because of malnutrition. Each year as many as 100,000 young children reportedly may go blind because of a lack of vitamin A in their daily diets. The statistics are grim; yet all Americans can be proud of our country's continuing efforts to battle world hunger.

President Eisenhower, the Food for Peace program has provided over $40 billion in aid to developing countries, more food assistance than given by all the other countries combined. And in addition to funding Food for Peace at $1\1/2\ billion for this fiscal year, we're taking new steps to devote more government food stocks to the needy overseas.

So far this year, we've already given over 83,000 tons of butter, cheese, and nonfat dry milk to 14 different countries. Our food and assistance efforts are especially vital in Africa, where drought has devastated farms throughout the sub-Saharan part of the continent. We have earmarked $25 million in emergency food assistance for these drought-stricken nations and increased our economic assistance to the continent by over $80 million, bringing it to an all-time high of nearly $1 billion for this fiscal year.

At the same time, we make the largest single contribution to many international organizations concerned with hunger, including the Food and Agriculture Organization, the World Food Program, and the international development banks. We were there to help found these organizations, and we stand firmly with them today.

It's not just our government programs of which we can be proud. There are numerous American religious and philanthropic groups, supported by voluntary contributions, which are playing a significant role in our battle against hunger -- groups like CARE, Catholic Relief Services, Lutheran World Relief, the American Jewish Distribution Committee -- all represent the best of the American tradition of personal involvement.

Whether through government-sponsored programs or through the efforts of churches and private charities, America and Americans lead the way in this humanitarian endeavor. I would hope that those who criticize the United States would take time to compare our efforts with those of Communist nations, countries that so loudly proclaim their concern for the downtrodden.

Soviet efforts in the area of humanitarian relief are virtually nonexistent. I challenge the Kremlin to explain why it refuses to provide anything but weapons of destruction to the underdeveloped world. One explanation, of course, is that the Soviet system is incapable of producing enough food for its own population, much less enough to help others in need. What this points to is the undeniable relationship between free enterprise and material abundance, between freedom and caring.

Our agriculture system is made up of millions of people and a host of enterprises. It includes farmers, processors, distributors, transporters, retailers, storage operators, packagers, advertisers, and many others. It's still a system based on the profit motive and on the freedom of those involved to operate as they see fit.

It's this special x factor that makes our food system the most productive in the world and the gem of our economy. With less than three-tenths of 1 percent of the world's farmers and farm workers, we produce 65 percent of the world's soybeans, 48 percent of the corn, 32 percent of the sorghum, 25 percent of the oranges, 31 percent of the poultry, 26 percent of the beef, and you can go on down the line with the other products the same.

Today, wheat grown in the Midwest is eaten as pasta in Italy. Our soybeans make soy sauce used in the Orient. Our cottonseed is pressed into oil and shipped to Venezuela, and our grain is consumed in the Soviet Union.

Along with food, we have been more than willing to share our expertise in this vital area of agriculture. Over 70,000 agriculturalists have come to us for training, and we have technical assistance projects in 76 countries.

Cancun Economic Summit 2 years ago that development of the private sector and the potential for trade is essential for economic progress either in industry or agriculture. We'll continue to help the hungry in every way we can. But let's remember that government repression, mismanagement, and corruption have created as much deprivation and hunger as drought and other natural disasters. Lasting progress in the battle against hunger to a large degree depends on freeing the productive forces needed to produce a better way of life.

An adequate, wholesome food supply is essential to the physical and economic well-being of every individual and every nation. Countries throughout the world are dedicated to eliminating poverty-related hunger to the fullest extent possible. Although this objective is widely acknowledged, the resources and policies needed to achieve that object vary widely from country to country.

This Nation is richly endowed with natural resources. Through the generations, our people have developed the knowledge, the technology, the policies, and the economic system to transform our endowment into agricultural abundance. Not all nations are similarly endowed. Hunger persists throughout the world. The Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations estimates that as many as 500 million people suffer from poverty-related malnutrition, especially in lesser developed countries.

We are strongly committed to the constitution of the Food and Agriculture Organization, which calls upon member nations to ``raise the levels of nutrition and standards of living of the peoples under their respective jurisdiction'' and to contribute to ``expanding the world economy and ensuring humanity's freedom from hunger.'' We have sought, and will continue to strive, to improve the economies and food production abilities of those countries where the need is greatest.

To this end, the United States has provided needy nations more than $40 billion of assistance under the Food for Peace Program since 1954. This year alone our food aid activities are assisting 70 countries. We are training an average of more than 2,000 agriculturalists per year from developing countries, and we are providing technical assistance to 50 nations in Asia, Africa, and Latin America to help develop their food research and production capabilities. In addition, we actively encourage American businesses to invest in projects that help build the agricultural economies of developing countries.

The people of the United States, as well as the people of other countries that have joined in the battle against hunger, can justifiably share a sense of accomplishment in the fact that food production per person has increased 21 percent in lesser developed countries since 1954. The concern of the international community with the problem of poverty-related malnutrition is reflected in the response to World Food Day. We particularly salute the Food and Agriculture Organization which, on World Food Day this year, celebrates 30 years of dedication to the elimination of hunger and malnutrition.

Last year about this time, the Nation was shaken by the Tylenol tragedy in Chicago. Seven people lost their lives as a result of that vile and reprehensible act of product tampering. The repercussions of that tragedy were felt far beyond the boundaries of Chicago, however, as every American became keenly aware of the tremendous harm that can be done by a single deranged person.

Department of Justice quickly realized that Federal jurisdiction in such cases was questionable and that Federal law only provided misdemeanor sanctions for product tampering. During the 97th Congress, Senator Strom Thurmond steered through the Senate legislation to establish tough Federal sanctions for product tampering. Unfortunately, Senator Thurmond's bill was ultimately added to a defective House bill which I found it necessary to disapprove in January.

In this Congress I included similar legislation as part of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act, which I submitted to Congress on March 16th of this year. In addition, Senator Thurmond reintroduced separately his product tampering legislation as S. 216 in the Senate, and Representatives Bill Hughes and Hal Sawyer introduced similar legislation in the House. S. 216 was recently approved by the Congress.

S. 216 establishes Federal criminal jurisdiction over tampering with foods, drugs, cosmetics, and other consumer products. The maximum penalty for such product tampering, where it results in death, would be imprisonment for any term of years up to life plus a fine of $100,000. We believe this will put real teeth into Federal law and provide a meaningful deterrent to product tampering.

I cannot, however, let this occasion pass without noting that much more needs to be done by way of criminal justice reform. The Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1983 proposes a broad range of anticrime measures. The Senate has moved quickly on this legislation and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary has reported virtually the entire package. We expect and urge that the full Senate will act on this legislation very soon. In light of the fact that in the 97th Congress the Senate passed a similar bill by a vote of 95 - 1, we are optimistic that the Senate will overwhelmingly approve this very important anticrime package.

While the Senate, both last year and again this year, has processed landmark crime legislation in the spirit of bipartisanship and compromise, the House of Representatives has taken no action whatsoever on the Comprehensive Crime Control Act. In the Senate, we have had bipartisan support led by Senators Thurmond, Laxalt, Biden, and Kennedy. In the House we have had no action, and nothing is scheduled. This is deeply troubling.

We are convinced that most Members of the House of Representatives are eager to vote on meaningful anticrime legislation. I hope the House Committee on the Judiciary and the House leadership will give the Members of the House an opportunity to vote on the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1983. This legislative package can make a difference. It is a reasonable and balanced package which not only strengthens criminal laws but makes those laws fairer. I urge the House of Representatives to join the Senate in taking prompt and serious action on the Comprehensive Crime Control Act.

Sec. 4. This Order shall be effective as of midnight between October 14 and October 15, 1983, and shall remain in effect until terminated. It is my intention to terminate this Order upon the enactment into law of a bill reauthorizing the authorities contained in the Export Administration Act.

The launching of a Trident Submarine is indeed a special event. But when that submarine bears the name U.S.S. Henry M. Jackson the event has greatly added significance. This submarine will join other strategic missile submarines named for men of great character: George Washington, Woodrow Wilson, Thomas Edison, Daniel Webster. Henry Jackson belongs among these Americans. This living vessel is a fitting monument to him. Statues and configurations of stone cannot carry on his life's work. However, the mighty ship you launch today will carry on his lifelong quest for peace for all mankind and security for our country.

Like Senator Jackson, those who built and will man the U.S.S. Henry M. Jackson, are content to do their job professionally and silently, foregoing greater material rewards they could claim in other fields. As with Senator Jackson, this ship's real achievement will not be in conquest but in restraint, not in waging war but in preserving peace.

The U.S.S. Henry M. Jackson through decades to come will be a constant reminder to the fleet and to all Americans of the virtues for which your husband and father stood: truth, peacefulness, strength and steadfastness. These were the personal traits which commanded our respect when he was alive. These are the qualities for which he will be remembered.

I know I court trouble when I dispute experts who specialize in spotting storm clouds and preaching doom and gloom. But at the risk of being the skunk that invades their garden party, I must warn them: Some very good news is sneaking up on you. The quality of American life is improving again. ``Quality of life'' -- that's a term often used but seldom defined. Certainly our standard of living is part of it, and one good measure of that is purchasing power.

Just a few years ago, double-digit inflation was bleeding our purchasing power. Record price increases, interest rates, and taxation punished the thrifty, impoverished the needy, and discouraged entrepreneurs. When an economy goes haywire, confidence is destroyed. Well, today the tables have been turned. Double-digit inflation is gone, and confidence is coming back.

Sometimes when we shop we don't realize how much inflation has dropped, because prices are still going up. But they're going up much more slowly than before. If food prices had kept rising as fast the last 2 years as the 2 years before we took office, a loaf of bread would cost 7 cents more than it does today, a half gallon of milk 18 cents more, a pound of hamburger 60 cents more, and a gallon of gas 97 cents more.

The prime interest rate has been cut nearly in half, so costs of business, mortgage, education, and car loans have dropped. The Federal income tax on a typical working family is $700 less than if our tax program had not been passed. With parents, students, entrepreneurs, workers, and consumers feeling more secure, opportunities for jobs are expanding. Our work force in September rose by nearly 400,000 to 101.9 million -- the highest level in American history. And the trend will continue.

Quality of life is not just more jobs, it's also better jobs. And we're seeing better opportunities opening up for all Americans. Women, for example, filled more than half of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields between 1980 and 1982. The number of women-owned businesses is growing five times faster than men's. The future looks brighter. To get a peek at what tomorrow's jobs and products may be, look at the venture capital industry.

Capital spending by business, a key source of higher productivity and new jobs, helped propel the economy forward in the third quarter. Much of the increase in spending went for products of high technology like computers and word processors.

We're witnessing an industrial renaissance, and this is only act one. It's being nourished by incentives from lower tax rates, starting with the 1978 capital gains tax reduction, passed, incidentally, over the objections of the last administration, and followed by our own more sweeping tax cut program in 1981.

Our program to create opportunity and bring big government under control, the subsequent decline in inflation and interest rates, and prospects for robust growth have all led to another basic change: Americans' confidence in their institutions is turning up after nearly two decades of decline. A 1982 survey by the University of Michigan found people more likely to say they trusted the government to do what is right.

Looking beyond the economy, we see more evidence that the quality of life is improving. Life expectancy reached a record high last year, climbing to 74.5 years. Infant mortality declined to an all-time low with only 11.2 deaths per 1,000 live births. And the number of divorces dropped for the first time since 1962. Serious crime dropped 3 percent, the first measurable decline since 1977. Quality education, an American tradition -- but one neglected for years -- will be restored, thanks to leadership in Washington and vigorous action by your families at the grassroots.

Good things are happening in America. Confidence is returning. Our quality of life is improving because your voices, voices of common sense, are finally getting through. Believe me, it wasn't Washington experts who said government is too big, taxes are too high, criminals are coddled, education's basics are neglected, and values of family and faith are being undermined. That was your message; you made reforms possible.

With your help, we'll make even more progress, because I'll be the first to admit much more progress needs to be made. We're on a new road for America, a far better road, filled with hope and opportunities. Our critics may never be satisfied with anything we do, but I can only say those who created the worst economic mess in postwar history should be the last people crying wolf 1,000 days into this administration, when so many trends that were headed the wrong way are headed back in the right direction.

I am writing this letter in response to your decision to chair Reagan-Bush '84. I deeply appreciate your action. The work of your Committee will be of great help to me at such time as I may make a formal decision to seek a second term as President.

Committee must file with the Federal Election Commission as a committee that will be working on behalf of my re-election. This letter will serve as my consent for the purpose of allowing you to form this Committee, and I request that Angela M. Buchanan Jackson serve as the Committee's Treasurer.

I have been advised that on October 17, 1983 a political committee known as Reagan-Bush '84 whose address is 440 First Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20001, registered with the Federal Election Commission, as my authorized campaign committee for the nomination as the Republican candidate for the office of the Presidency of the United States in 1984. Since the work of this Committee will be of great help to me at such time as I may make a formal decision to seek a second term as President, I am hereby authorizing this Committee as my principal campaign committee to allow those persons who support my candidacy to express their support in a manner that fully complies with the Federal election laws.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 17th day of Oct., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Sec. 2. In discharging this authority, the Secretary shall apply the procedures and technical conditions set forth in the Annexes to the Conventions set forth above, as those Conventions are modified, amended, or otherwise supplemented from time to time.

Sec. 5. Regulations issued by the Secretary of Transportation under Executive Order No. 11459 shall continue in force and effect until superseded by regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Treasury under this Order.

United States Code, relating to redetermination of credit for military and naval service, shall be applied to annuities payable under this chapter. The Secretary of State shall redetermine service, and may request and obtain information from the Secretary of Health and Human Services, as the Office of Personnel Management is directed or authorized to do in Section 8332(j).

The President. Last week I took pride in announcing that one of my most trusted and valued advisers, Judge William Clark, would become Secretary of the Interior. And today I take pride again in announcing that his successor as Assistant for National Security Affairs will be another man who has won my utmost confidence and respect, Ambassador Robert McFarlane.

Bud brings a treasure of experience and talent to this new post -- a decorated marine, a scholar, adviser to three Presidents, a veteran of Capitol Hill, Counselor of the Department of State, Deputy Director of the NSC staff and, most recently, my personal representative to the delicate negotiations in the Middle East. He is ideally qualified to assume these new responsibilities.

I should tell you that I was looking for more than experience in filling this post; I also wanted someone of strong principle, someone of keen judgment, and someone who could effectively manage the affairs of the NSC. He shares my view about the need for a strong America -- an effective, bipartisan foreign policy based on peace through strength. He enjoys the respect and affection of my other principal advisers in the national security community. And working closely with me, he'll provide the leadership and spirit of teamwork that we value in this administration.

Mr. McFarlane. Thank you, Mr. President. For someone who has devoted his life and the life of his family to government service, it's a profoundly humbling moment, one for which I'm very deeply grateful to you, Mr. President.

The opportunity to serve is, for all of us and for you, the highest gift that any of us can expect. To be given that chance for a cause and for principles in which you believe very deeply is all the more so.

I look forward to doing whatever I can to helping the completion -- the fulfillment of the promise of President Reagan's goals on national security affairs. They have stemmed the tide, and they have set us on a course which I believe deeply will prove Spengler was wrong -- that the West can indeed define its interests, defend them, demonstrate that freedom, democracy, free enterprise is the hope of the future.

The President. May I say that there was a lot of speculation and declarations that were based, again, on those faceless and nameless sources. Jeane Kirkpatrick is Ambassador to the United Nations. She continues there as Ambassador to the United Nations where she has done, I think, as magnificent a job as anyone who has ever held that post and probably more so than most. And she is invaluable in what she's doing.

In 1958 he graduated from the U.S. Naval Academy at the head of his class. He was a Burke scholar at the California Institute of Technology in Pasadena, where he earned the degree of doctor of philosophy in nuclear physics in 1964, studying under the Nobel laureate Rudolph Mossbauer.

During his naval career, Admiral Poindexter served aboard a number of surface ships. He commanded the guided missile cruiser U.S.S. England (CG - 22) and later commanded destroyer squadron 31. In this capacity, he was a battle group antisurface and antisubmarine warfare commander on deployments to the Western Pacific, Indian Ocean, and South Pacific.

The President. Well, ladies and gentlemen, a little over 3 years ago I kicked off my 1980 campaign at a rally held in the shadow of the Statue of Liberty and Ellis Island. And it's a memory I'll always cherish. There were many nationalities and family backgrounds represented in that rally, and yet practically all of them were Americans. One of those who hoped to be an American was the father of Lech Walesa.

All of us were or are descended from immigrants, most of whom came here looking for freedom and an opportunity to better their lot and the lot of their families. America was a land of hope for so many who suffered the pains of tyranny and deprivation. America was a magic place where anyone willing to work hard could live a decent life. And while our country had its flaws, the vision of opportunity was true enough for large numbers of immigrants to send back word of freedom and abundance.

Three years ago, it seemed like something, however, had gone terribly wrong. Stagnation and inflation were snuffing out the opportunity that had been the hallmark of our country. We were perched on the brink of an economic disaster and suffering a loss of confidence both at home and abroad. And for the first time, it was being said that America's best days were past. Well, you and I didn't believe that. And if the 1980 election carried any message, it was: Make America strong again.

The most important goal of this administration has been restoring the opportunity and the social mobility of all our citizens. This is especially significant for black and ethnic Americans, who were hit hard by economic decline. It's taken hard work and time, but we've turned this grave situation around.

The economy is -- as I'm sure you've been told in the briefings already -- in the first phase of sustained growth. We've brought inflation down -- and I suppose somebody's already told you this, too; but anyway, I'll repeat it -- from double digits to 2.6 percent for the last 12 months. And that's the lowest 12-month inflation rate in 17 years. Taxes skyrocketed in the years before we got here. We've given the people a 25-percent across-the-board reduction in their personal income tax rates. We've also, through a highly successful deregulation effort, trimmed 300 million man-hours of needless paperwork from the private sector and from State and local government.

December. The number of unemployed has dropped by 1.8 million -- pardon me; 1.6 million. I guess it was just a Freudian slip. I was hoping for eight. [Laughter] And a healthy, growing economy has added almost 3 million of our fellow citizens to the Nation's payrolls. Blacks and teenagers made gains last month. And we look for continued improvement. They were the hardest hit in the unemployment.

Our economic recovery program made fundamental changes in Federal taxing, spending, and regulating policies. But we should never forget: It was the policies of tax, spend, and inflate that stagnated our economy, and it's been the reversal of those policies and replacing them with a positive program aimed at economic growth that has put us back on the path to a better life for all our citizens.

Along with this, we've recaptured a spirit of optimism and hope. In foreign affairs, we have reaffirmed our leadership again as an ally worthy of trust. We've begun a program to rebuild our defensive capabilities that were permitted to seriously erode during the last decade. We're firm in our belief that peace is more likely if the United States remains a strong force in the world.

In the area of nuclear weapons, we're working with our European allies to reestablish a stable balance in Europe, which was destroyed by the massive Soviet buildup in the last 10 years. We have made clear, however, that no new weapons need be deployed. We have been, and continue to be, serious in our efforts to reach arms reductions agreements with the Soviets, especially in the area of intermediate-range missiles.

Let me emphasize today -- and I would urge the young people in Europe to reflect on this -- it is not the United States and NATO which threaten peace. We have no intermediate, long-range missiles in Europe. And we're willing to forgo them entirely. It's the Soviet Union which has over 1,300 intermediate-range nuclear warheads threatening the countries of Europe, Asia, and elsewhere. And they continue to deploy SS - 20 missiles at a rate of one a week -- each missile containing three warheads. Now, these are actions of intimidation, pure and simple.

We stand ready to make any arrangement with the Soviets which will be verifiable and fair to all sides. This includes eliminating an entire class of nuclear weapons, or, if they won't go that far, at least a portion -- and the more the better. But we can't negotiate forever with ourselves. If Soviet intransigence continues, we will move forward to reestablish the balance and ensure NATO's deterrent ability.

Our goal, both in the economy and in protecting our national security, is to meet the mandate of the 1980 election, to make our country the strong nation, the mighty force for good that it was meant to be.

Q. Heny Dende from -- [inaudible] -- Scranton, Pennsylvania. Would you consider lifting some of the sanctions against Poland in view of the recent developments that have occurred in release of prisoners?

The President. We are studying and reviewing that to make sure that this is really a change and not just cosmetic. And as you know, we have joined in many of the independent and the church-related agencies that are providing help directly to the Polish people, and we continue to do that. But before we make any real changes with regard to the Government, we feel we must know that what they have done is really a change and really a restoration of the human rights that they heretofore have denied before we make those changes and find out that they just have made a few little cosmetic gestures.

Q. Mr. President, inasmuch as the sanctions must continue until the Polish Government actually makes some changes for the benefit of the people, do you foresee any sort of diplomatic initiative in order to get the stalemate which is currently on between the Polish Government and the United States Government -- for example, the lack of exchange of ambassadors, et cetera -- some sort of other initiative in order to get us from this stale point at which we've been for the last few months?

Q. Mr. President, I'll put -- a difficult question. Our Vice President Bush in Vienna said a few weeks ago that American Government is considering, if I repeat it properly, to get out from the present system created in Europe by Yalta agreement. Does it mean that there is any political concept behind it, or is it just a nice expression of wishful thinking?

The President. Well, we have always felt and why we continue to have a Freedom Day for the enslaved nations of the world every year and to observe that -- we think that that has to be the ultimate goal of the free world, is to bring about a time when all the people will have the very basis of democracy, which is the right of self-determination. And I don't think we should ever give that up.

Ethnic Groups. When are we going to break off diplomatic relations with the Soviet-imposed government in Afghanistan and extend more effective material assistance to the freedom fighters in Afghanistan?

We haven't seen that as providing an advantage yet. There are some times when we think that it is very valuable to have eyes and ears on the scene of some of these places. This does not mean that we are not doing everything we can to bring about a change in that situation and get the Soviet Union out of there and restore freedom to the Afghanistan people and let those millions of refugees come home. But we don't believe that creating a wall of silence between us would be beneficial right now.

The President. I have had the pleasure twice of having Madam Gandhi here as our guest, and she has very graciously urged me to come there. But that isn't on the schedule as yet. But I look forward to that and certainly want to do that.

The President. Oh. I -- the only official stand that I can tell you we have is one opposed to terrorism on both sides. And I can't help but believe that there's virtually no one alive today who was living in the era of that terrible trouble. And it seems to me we ought to be able to sit down now, an entirely new group of people who know only of that from reading of it, to sit down and work out our differences and bring peace at least to that segment of humanity.

Barely a month after attending an international conference in Madrid and joining 34 nations in a commitment to respect human rights, the Soviet Union has gone back on its word, launching a new campaign of repression against human rights activists.

Moscow has just sentenced a well-known Soviet refusenik, Iosif Begun, to 7 years imprisonment and 5 years of internal exile. The punishment of this courageous Jewish believer is the most severe measure specified in article 70 of the Soviet criminal code, dealing with dissemination of so-called anti-Soviet propaganda. Soviet persecution of religious and political dissidents is not new. In the case of Mr. Begun, the Soviet regime has refused for 13 years to honor his request to emigrate to Israel.

But Soviet policy toward Jewish emigration and dissident movements has sunk to a new low of brutality and repression. Antisemitism has escalated dramatically, as has harassment of other human rights defenders. We have received reports that Father Sigitas Tamkevicius, a Lithuanian Catholic priest active on behalf of religious freedom, is facing a similar fate as Iosif Begun.

Finally, we have received reports that Oleg Radzinskiy has also been tried. Mr. Radzinskiy, a member of the unofficial Soviet peace organization Group To Establish Trust Between the U.S. and U.S.S.R., was arrested October 28, 1982, and has been held for almost a year. The inability of Soviet authorities to tolerate any activities by those who are not members of their government-controlled, ``captive'' peace groups illustrates the hypocrisy of their statements. There is a night and day contrast between aggressive Soviet efforts to encourage peace demonstrations in the West and their brutal arrests and exile of peace activists in the East.

We condemn these illegal and inhumane acts. We hold the Soviet Union accountable for its violations of numerous international agreements and accords on human rights to which it is a party. We call upon the Soviets to reverse their inhumane policies and to prove to the world they will back up their words with action and start living up to their agreements.

Now, don't get me wrong. I've never been for politicizing this issue. In fact, it was just that tendency that I believe set us off on the wrong track a few decades ago. Too often the political side of education has been emphasized -- money, regulations, bureaucracy, government intrusion, in fact, just about everything about our schools, except the two most important elements: the students, of course, and especially you, the teachers.

It's been very evident today that the American people are realizing again how important our schools are and how vital and honorable the role of the teacher is in our communities. This is especially so in the area of science and mathematics, fascinating in and of themselves as intellectual disciplines, but also vital to the success of the individual and our nation in this new era of technology.

The educational standards are going up everywhere and nowhere more sharply than in math and science. Yet with all the demands for educational reform, we mustn't forget the most important goal of all: to attract the most competent and dedicated people to teach and then to hang on to them.

In preparing for this ceremony today, we did a little calculation and discovered, using conservative estimates, of course -- [laughter] -- that each of you teachers is likely to interact with more than 5,000 students in the course of your careers. So, when I look out on this group, I not only see you master teachers, but I also see a half a million students who will have the privilege of being challenged, stimulated, and guided by you.

And at this point, I want to acknowledge the really tireless efforts of those professional organizations, especially the National Science Teachers Association and the National Council of Teachers of Mathematics, which shared their expertise and judgment with us in this round of Presidential awards.

Now, I'm sure that no one has to explain to teachers the difficulty of getting everything done in a limited period of time. My regret is that I won't have time to meet all of you individually. But with your understanding, I'd like to just call a few of you up here as representatives of all the dedicated teachers that we're honoring here today. So, will Edna Corbett, Jo Anne Rife, Tony Sedgwick, and Akehiko Takahashi, please, come up here and join me for a minute or two of embarrassment.

Edna Corbett has been an award-winning biology teacher in Portsmouth, Virginia, for nearly 20 years. I've asked her up here because she so clearly demonstrates a trait that seems so common among you successful teachers. She's just incredibly busy. In fact, I'm little surprised that you were able to squeeze in this event today. [Laughter] And like many of you, Mrs. Corbett is not only on the run with her school activities, like afterschool student groups, science fairs, and the inevitable faculty committees; she is fully immersed in family, professional, church, and community activities as well. I'm sure that one of the lessons she conveys to her students is how to use their time effectively.

Jo Anne Rife from Harrison, Arkansas, has taught basic science to thousands of students in smalltown school districts throughout the State. And she's done something I find reassuring. After leaving the classroom a few years ago to apply her experience as a science coordinator for a large school district, she returned, reinvigorated, to the classroom to continue serving on the frontline.

Mrs. Rife has had her share of success in sending students on to careers in technical fields, including careers as science teachers. But she takes equal delight in opening the world of science to all of her students no matter what their interests are.

Tony Sedgwick from Tacoma, Washington, recognizes that mathematics is a tool that everyone needs. And he spreads his efforts generously to try to reach all kinds of students. He's as likely to be teaching ``I hate math'' students -- [laughter] -- at the advanced level, and his efforts have paid off. Ten years ago when he took over his high school math department, it enrolled only 21 percent out of 1,800 students and only 12 percent of its minority students. Today he has tripled those numbers.

And finally, Akehiko Takahashi is an immigrant to America and a very welcome one. He began his education in his native Japan, but finished it in Missouri, where he's been a math teacher for the past 20 years. Like Mr. Sedgwick, he teaches all levels of math, and I understand he's fiercely demanding of all his students. The students at Wentzville High know that when you get an ``A'' from Mr. Takahashi, you've earned an ``A''. Those high standards have rubbed off on his students.

Now that we've all shaken hands -- [laughter] -- in addition to your experiences in Washington, you, as teachers, will also have two souvenirs from your trip. One is the $5,000 grant that each of your schools will receive from the National Science Foundation for you to use in your math and science instructional programs. I know that money will be used well. The other is a handsome certificate which will be handed out by the impressive trio that are here with me -- my science adviser, Jay Keyworth; Secretary of Education Ted Bell; and the Director of the National Science Foundation, Ed Knapp.

All of you here today are those selfless and dedicated professionals. So, for all your students, past and present, and students to come, for all the mothers and fathers of America, can I extend to you a heartfelt thanks, and God bless you all.

Well, it does remind me of a story, and I have to have something to start with. It was about a -- it's a true story, I understand, about a newspaper photographer out in Los Angeles. He's called in by his editor and told of a fire that was raging out there in Palos Verdes. That's a hilly area south of Los Angeles, a lovely residential area. His assignment was to rush down to a small airport, board a waiting plane, get some pictures of the fire, and be back in time for the afternoon edition.

Well, he raced down the freeway. He broke the law all the way. He got to the airport and drove his car to the end of the runway. And sure enough, there was a plane waiting with the engines all there revved up, ready to go. He got aboard, and at about 5,000 feet, he began getting his camera out of the bag, told the fellow flying the plane to get him over the fire so he could get his pictures and get back to the paper. And from the other side of the cockpit there was a deafening silence.

Well, today we celebrate a 25th birthday. If it were the birthday of an individual, we would be marking an important milestone. At 25 a person begins to enter the most productive part of life, a time for which everything else has been just preparation for great achievements ahead. And today this is also true for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration. NASA has accomplished so much. But on its 25th birthday, we celebrate our potential as well as our accomplishments.

Being here in the Air and Space Museum is a fitting environment for this commemoration. It offers us a perspective on how far we've come and should also help us catch a glimpse of the incredible possibilities that await us in the years ahead. For 25 years NASA has been the focal point for an activity that is fundamental to the American character: blazing the trail to an exciting new frontier.

Historically, we've always been a people willing to take risks and dream great dreams. We weren't the people who stayed on the shores of the Old World. Instead we were the Italians, the Frenchmen, the Dutchmen, the men and women of every race, nationality, and religion who came here to push back the limits and in the process become Americans one and all.

A little over 200 years ago we embarked on the greatest experiment in human history with the founding of the first modern democracy. All of what we've accomplished can be traced to the energy, creativity that is unleashed when the human spirit is free. Americans have proven that there's no mountain too high, forest too thick, desert so vast, or problem so perplexing that it can serve as a barrier to the progress of free men and women.

Our forefathers and mothers spread across this continent. When they reached the western shore they didn't stop. Early in this century we built the Panama Canal and expanded the frontier of American commerce. Today that same spirit, the American spirit, is alive and well. There's no better example of it than that which is found in NASA.

It was 25 years ago when a 31-pound, cylinder-shaped satellite was launched -- Explorer One, the first American satellite. And later that year, NASA was formed to oversee our space efforts: to ensure our leadership in aerospace science, to enhance cooperation with other nations in the peaceful application of space technology, to expand human knowledge of the atmosphere and space, and to pursue the practical benefits gained from these activities in order to improve the lot of mankind.

Men and women of NASA: Well done! Your accomplishments in these two and a half decades have already served your country and the people of this planet well. Today, we're reaping the returns that we've realized from our investment in space. And let me add, when the figures are put together we're not only getting our money's worth; our commitment to space has been one of the best investments we've ever made as a nation.

Communications satellites allow us cheaper and easier long-distance phone calls and live, worldwide television overseas -- and coverage worldwide. The value to our country created by this leap in communications is astronomical. Similarly, weather satellites are now a part of our daily routine. Countless lives are saved and property protected when weather emergencies are charted more accurately than ever before imagined. Navigation, search and rescue, and other such activities in the air and on the sea are aided by services that you've implanted in near space.

Through satellite remote-sensing, we can find the location of new resources and better manage those we're already using. At one time, the only thing people could think of as a spinoff of our space effort was Teflon pans. [Laughter] In an era of high tech, all of us are now aware of what the technological advances we've made mean to our way of life. Computers and electronics are now indispensable to American economic progress and well-being.

And how does one put a dollar value on world peace? Certainly space technology has contributed enormously here as well. Our eyes-in-the-sky make us all a little safer. In the vital area of arms control, it's opened new avenues to approach the issue of verification. These are all achievements to one degree or another that can be related to our commitment to exploring and utilizing space for the benefit of mankind.

We have holidays when we celebrate our freedom, but most of the time, we're on our own as independent individuals. And that is, after all, what American liberty is all about. But there are moments that bind us together, moments of sadness and happiness that make us more than a conglomeration of people living in proximity to each other. The death of President John F.

Perhaps NASA's greatest gifts have been the moments of greatness that you've allowed all of us to share. All of us -- whether we were schoolteachers, actors, government employees, farmers, factory hands, secretaries, or the cop on the beat -- all of us were along on those early Mercury missions. We were part of the NASA team launching probes into deep space to chart the unknown, to photograph the rings of Saturn and the surface of Mars. We were there, and our hearts were filled with such pride when Neil Armstrong, an American, the first person to set foot on the Moon, said, ``One small step for a man; one giant leap for mankind.'' And we saluted right along with him when he planted Old Glory in the lunar soil.

NASA's done so much to galvanize our spirit as a people, to reassure us of our greatness and of our potential. In recent days the space shuttle has, as another NASA project before it -- or other projects before it, captured our hearts and imaginations. Modern-day heroes like Sally Ride, Guy Bluford are emerging and inspiring new faith in our system and new hope for the future.

I was honored a year ago to be on hand to welcome the space shuttle Columbia when it returned from its mission and landed in the California desert on Independence Day. That was a day I and millions of other Americans will never forget.

The space shuttle, like your many other accomplishments, didn't just happen. It's the result of hard work and a vision of the future. The shortsighted were unable to understand. In fact, some individuals who would lead America today led the fight against the space shuttle system a decade ago. What you've proven with the success of this new transportation system is that there's never a time when we can stop moving forward, when we can stop dreaming.

Right now we're putting together a national space strategy that will establish our priorities, guide and inspire our efforts in space for the next 25 years and beyond. It'll embrace all three sectors of our space program -- civil, commercial, and national security. The strategy should flow from the national space policy that I announced July 4th last year.

On this 25th anniversary, I would challenge you at NASA and the rest of America's space community: Let us aim for goals that will carry us well into the next century. Let us demonstrate to friends and adversaries alike that America's mission in space will be a quest for mankind's highest aspiration -- opportunity for individuals, cooperation among nations, and peace on Earth.

Your imagination and your ability to project into the future will open up new horizons and push back boundaries that limit our goals on this planet. The goals you set and your success in achieving them will have much to do with our children's prosperity and safety and will determine if America remains the great nation it's intended to be. Don't be afraid to remind the rest of us that once in a while being a leader in space is a very wonderful accomplishment. It has given us the wherewithal to share with others the fruits of our adventure. The American people know this and support it. And let's continue to ensure that this program belongs to the people. Our strategy must demonstrate to them that through challenging the unknown and having the courage to aim high, their own hopes, dreams, and aspirations will be fulfilled.

There are those who preach the doctrine of limited resources. They pessimistically suggest that we're on the way to depleting all of what we have and that slowly the condition of humankind will deteriorate into a Malthusian catastrophe.

This pessimism cuts across the grain of the American character. Our history has been not of accepting what is, but striving and working with our sweat and our minds to create something better. By inventing and putting to use machines, we've improved our productivity and created enormous new wealth. By discovering medicines, we live longer. By improving our agriculture -- with a big help from industry and science -- our nutrition is improving.

In my lifetime, aviation has gone from those barnstorming pilots who landed their biplanes in pastures and took passengers aloft for 10 minutes at $10, to a massive industry that contributes so much to our national prosperity and way of life. By the time a young person born in the same year as NASA reaches my age, our way of life may be as much tied to space as it is today tied to aviation.

Private companies are already beginning to look to space. In this regard, the space shuttle program could well be compared to the first transcontinental railroad. And when profit motive starts into play, hold onto your hats. The world is going to see what entrepreneurial genius is all about and what it means to see America get going.

H.R. 1062 would authorize the Secretary of the Interior to convey to any person, without consideration, the real property they claim to have been deprived of in Lane County, Oregon, as a result of a particular Bureau of Land Management (BLM) resurvey. All right, title, and interest of the United States to such property could be conveyed if an application, accompanied by such proof of title, description of land, and other information as the Secretary of the Interior may require, is received by the Secretary within five years after enactment of the bill.

The title defects affecting the beneficiaries of this legislation were caused by the reliance of the developers and subsequent purchasers of this tract on an inaccurate private survey -- not by any act of the United States. To authorize the United States to convey public lands to persons who rely on erroneous private surveys is not in the public interest. Moreover, enactment of this legislation would create a clearly undesirable precedent, encouraging other persons who do not verify the validity of their title to assert claims for conveyance, at no charge, of the Federal lands on which they are encroaching. Without doubt, these claims would hinder effective public land management.

Federal lands. There was no error in the survey by the United States. Instead, the problem arose because of an improper private survey. There is, therefore, no justification for legislating a conveyance of this tract without payment of fair market value or for bypassing administrative procedures that already exist for the conveyance of public lands in appropriate cases.

This week we marked an anniversary here in Washington -- at least some of us did -- the 1,000th day since we charted a new course for America. From the outset, we knew that a breaking with the past and beginning on the new road would be long and hard, and it has been. Coming to grips with the most serious economic crisis in postwar history has tested our mettle, our patience, and our unity. And believe me, I understand how difficult it's been to hear that America is making sure and steady progress when it's our family and friends who are suffering the ache and disappointment of hard times. But we Americans are a people of deep faith, hard work, and common sense, and we never stopped believing in ourselves. So, we're emerging with renewed confidence.

We've made great strides in these first thousand days. Inflation and interest rates are down dramatically. We've passed the first real tax cut for everyone in nearly 20 years. And now a strong recovery is sending Americans back to work. Almost 400,000 found jobs last month. We have the highest number of people working in our history -- almost 102 million. Virtually every sector of the economy from construction to the auto industry to high technology is expanding, creating new hope and a more secure future.

We have the chance to build the kind of lasting economic expansion that this nation has not enjoyed since the 1960's. And I ask the Congress for cooperation in these last 4 weeks before it leaves for the year. Many key budget decisions remain, and we have a real opportunity to hold down spending and reduce deficits. And I think we should remember these deficits didn't just spring up in a thousand days. They're the product of too many years of tax and tax and spend and spend.

In these closing days of Congress, let us rededicate ourselves not to taxing people more, but to making government spend less. This is the way to keep the United States on a steady path of economic growth and opportunity for all our people.

I'm not going to comment on what, if any, connection such activities might have had with what has been going on or with some of the specific operations down there. But I do believe in the right of a country, when it believes that its interests are best served, to practice covert activity.

Q. Mr. President, there's growing concern about the marines in Lebanon, and your national security affairs adviser has said that the loss of life is unacceptable and that the partition of Lebanon is unacceptable. What are you going to do about it? And I'd like to follow up.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], we're going to keep on doing what we have been doing, trying to complete the plan that we launched a little more than a year ago. We know there are hazards there, and no one can feel more deeply about the loss of life and the wounding of some of our men there. We knew it was a hazardous undertaking when we joined in the multinational force. But our objective remains the same.

We have made great progress there. If you'll remember back, Beirut itself was being shelled daily in an exchange of fire that was killing literally hundreds of civilians on a daily basis, wounding others grievously, that a cease-fire followed there. A government was created. Representatives to a parliament were elected. The Israelis have withdrawn to the Awali River and have announced their intention of permanently withdrawing.

The disorders that have plagued Lebanon for some 8 years have, of course, taken over. This was one of the reasons for a multinational force, to try and have some stability while the government -- and, incidentally, I left out the fact that the Lebanese Army, which has been created by this new government, and in which we've helped with training and supplies, is a fine army -- not as big as it should be, for the problems it's confronted with. But the mission is to enable the Lebanese Government and its military to take over its own country with the withdrawal of all forces. Earlier in that first cease-fire there was a successful ousting of some 10,000 of the PLO militia from the country.

Q. May I ask what plans do you contemplate? How will you broaden the peace in the Middle East and bring about a reconciliation of all the parties and the restoration of the legitimate rights of the Palestinians?

The President. Well, this -- you've named exactly the goals of the plan that I proposed a year ago last September, and it began with trying to straighten up the Lebanese situation, with the border of Israel, the northern border being violated as it was by terrorist groups, innocent people there being killed. They had a responsibility to try and defend that border.

Now an agreement has been reached between the Lebanese Government and Israel. We are doing everything we can to persuade Syria to quit being a roadblock in this process. But that was the first phase, Lebanon; then, and our intention remains the same, working with the more moderate Arab States to bring about the kind of peace with Israel that Anwar Sadat helped bring about.

The President. We'll know in about 35 years, won't we? No, I don't fault Senator Helms' sincerity with regard to wanting the records opened up. I think that he's motivated by a feeling that if we're going to have a national holiday named for any American, when it's only been named for one American in all our history up until this time, that he feels we should know everything there is to know about an individual. As I say, I don't fault his sincerity in that, but I also recognize there is no way that these records can be opened, because an agreement was reached between the family and the government with regard to those records. And we're not going to turn away from that or set a precedent of breaking agreements of that kind.

I happen to -- while I would have preferred a day of recognition for his accomplishments and what he meant in a stormy period in our history here, I would have preferred a day similar to, say, Lincoln's birthday, which is not technically a national holiday, but is certainly a day reverenced by a great many people in our country and has been. I would have preferred that, but since they seem bent on making it a national holiday, I believe the symbolism of that day is important enough that I'll sign that legislation when it reaches my desk.

Q. Mr. President, when I was in the marines the doctrine was to take the high ground and hold it and not deploy on a flat, open field like the Beirut airport. What reason is there to prevent the marines from taking some more defensible positions in pursuit of the policy for which you've sent them there?

But you must remember, you were talking about when you were being trained as marines for combat. And if these marines had gone there to join in the combat on the side of whatever force we might have picked, then all of those rules would apply. But they're there as part of a multinational force to try and maintain a stability. And their sector happens to be trying to maintain that airport and open it up for traffic. So, airports just happen to be flat. And we're doing everything we can and making everything possible for them to defend themselves.

The President. All I can tell you is that -- I can't answer that question right now, but I virtually daily tell our people that are to be in consultation with the men on the ground, the commanders there of those units or anything, that in keeping with our mission, that we can do to help ensure their safety.

Q. Mr. President, you had said in the past, a year and a half ago -- following up on Sam -- that you had real reservations about the expense of another national holiday. In fact, to quote you, you said, ``It might be that there is no way we could afford all of those holidays that we would have with people who are also revered figures in history of many of the groups that make up our population.'' So, I'm wondering, why have you changed your mind now about the holiday for Dr.

The President. Because I think this has become so symbolic of what was a very real crisis in our history and a discrimination that was pretty foreign to what is normal with us and the part that he played in that -- I think that the symbolism of it is worthy of this.

The President. I don't know anything about the membership, but I know that there is nothing in the bylaws of that club that advocates any discrimination of any kind. I saw in a recent tournament down there, a national tournament -- I saw blacks playing in that tournament on that course.

Q. Mr. President, your recent nomination of Judge Clark as Interior Secretary shocked just about everybody but yourself and Judge Clark, I think. [Laughter] I wonder, sir, if you could tell us what qualifications he has for that Interior Department post?

The President. Well, I think, the qualifications of being a very able and fine administrator and manager. I have known him from the time when he was my chief of staff when I was Governor in California. I know that on the bench as a Supreme Court Justice of California he dealt with many problems of this kind. I know of his own personal interest and knowledge in this field. He's a fourth-generation rancher, as he himself has stated.

Q. Mr. President, after years of bipartisan work on a comprehensive immigration reform bill, it appears House Speaker O'Neill has successfully blocked action on it in the House and even suggested that you might veto it for political purposes. What, if anything, are you going to do to help House Republicans who are trying to free up that bill?

The President. I am going to try and get, and have been supportive of, some immigration legislation for a long time. This country has lost control of its own borders, and no country can sustain that kind of position.

I supported actively and worked hard for the passage twice of the Senate bill on immigration. I will admit that the House bill -- I had some disagreements with some of the structure and the form of that bill, but recognized that there was a process called conference when there was differences between the two bills.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. Let's speak about reelection if we might for a moment. You have said that you want to delay the decision as long as possible to maintain your credibility with Congress, for instance. This is understandable, as I see it, as long as you run. But it's getting late, and if you don't run at this point, other Republicans who would then have an interest in it would be way behind their Democratic opponents. It would seem to hurt the party. Therefore, practically speaking now, don't you have to run?

And I don't think -- in the first place, I think that campaigns are too long. And I think one of the reasons we don't have as many people voting as we should in this country is not because they haven't got an interest, but because we satiate them and we wear them out until they seem to be campaigning year in and year out and day in and day out. And if any of the Democratic candidates are listening, yes, I mean them -- [laughter] -- too with this.

Q. Mr. President, back to the Middle East. You said that the Syrians are being a roadblock to the situation in Lebanon. But there are analysts who say that they are deliberately foot-dragging and in fact harrassing us and the marines over there in order to wear you down so that you will pull the marines out. Number one, do you agree with that assessment? Is that what the Syrians are doing? And, secondly, can you be worn down?

The President. Well, the answer to the first part of the question is that I know the Syrians are dragging their feet, but there have been other indications as to the reason for that. Syria, for many years, has talked about a thing called Greater Syria, in which they've believed that much of Jordan and much of Lebanon truly should belong to them. And I think that they have that kind of an interest in this, and aided and abetted by about 7,000 Soviet advisers and technicians and some pretty sophisticated Soviet weaponry, I think that they are contributing to the disorder and the trouble.

But we're going to -- I know that many of the Arab nations have been joining us -- we're going to continue the diplomatic process that was advanced so brilliantly by Phil Habib and by Ambassador McFarlane, which brought about the present situation and the desire of the government there to now broaden its base and bring in some of the dissident groups and all. We're going to continue with that process.

The President. I think the Soviets are going to negotiate seriously. There is a great propaganda effort going on on their part now, because their target is -- they've been encouraged by some of the demonstrations that they've helped organize throughout the world. They think maybe they could persuade our allies to turn back and not ask us for the deployment of the intermediate-range weapons. Well, we're going to deploy, and deploy on schedule. And once they see we're going to do that, and now that they know that we're determined to build our strength and not unilaterally disarm, as we so foolishly have done over recent years, I think they're going to see that the best thing for them is to negotiate with us and in good faith.

The President. Well, I hope very much that we will. We've been at this. I realize the history of negotiations in the past has been long drawn out. But if you will look at some of the negotiations in the past, maybe it was long drawn out because the longer the Soviets sat there, the more we unilaterally disarmed. And they found that just by waiting they could get things that they wanted.

Q. Mr. President, before the United States went into Vietnam, the French suffered a devastating defeat there by putting their troops in a saucer-shaped depression with the enemy up around the sides shooting down on them. Doesn't this appear uncomfortably similar to you to the way we are deploying our troops in Lebanon on the low ground? And how soon can we expect that we're going to redeploy them to a spot that makes more sense?

The President. Well, right now, with the cease-fire, it isn't from high ground that they're being fired upon. Actually, much of this that has tragically taken lives there is literally coming from civilians, from radicals, in residential neighborhoods where we have always refrained from using artillery cover or anything of that kind. And when they were fired upon from the hills, that's when naval gunfire responded, and maybe the French at Dien Bien Phu in that terrible defeat didn't have a New Jersey sitting offshore as we do.

The President. I know, and, as I say, most of this from the sniper-type fire. As a matter of fact, some of the TV news accounts have carried actual interviews with the very young men who are doing this and who are claiming their right. And yet they are not even members of some of the unofficial militia; they are just individuals that are out murdering.

And we're not sitting idly by. We're looking at every option and everything that we can do that can leave us in the position to carry out the mission for which they were sent and, at the same time, make their lives safer.

Q. Mr. President, Iran has threatened to close the Strait of Hormuz if Iraq uses its French fighters against Iranian interests. Is the U.S. prepared to use military force to stop Iran from cutting off our oil, and do you believe we would be successful?

The President. Let me just say that I don't think it would be proper for me to talk about tactics or what might be done, but I will say this: I do not believe the free world could stand by and allow anyone to close the Straits of Hormuz in the Persian Gulf to the oil traffic through those waterways.

Sir, I want to ask you about a proposal that you are backing that's before the Senate now. I don't think they've passed it quite yet, but they're about to. It's that project for democracy. It would mean, I believe, that we would provide taxpayers' money and private sector leaders to go into other countries and decide if they have a democratic government or not. And if we think they don't, then we would turn over that government and set up a government that we like. Don't you think that would get us into a lot of wars?

The President. Sarah, that's not the aim of this program. What you're talking about is the thing that I spoke to the British Parliament about when I was there at the European summit. No, what we have in mind is that the Marxist-Leninists, and the World Socialist Movement, for that matter, they've been ardent missionaries for their beliefs all over the world. And we in the democracies, where free enterprise is practiced, have just sort of thought that maybe everyone could see how well we're doing and follow our lead.

No, the proposal is for people to go and be the same kind of missionaries and see if they cannot explain democracy. One of the first meetings we had in connection with that was here in this room in which people from all over the world came, and it was a session during our election year to tell them about elections and how legitimate elections could be won; not those kind where you've only got one person to vote for and you'd better vote for him or somebody'll come and get you. And it's an education program, the idea of worldwide -- and pointing out the differences that those countries that have chosen -- new countries, whether it's Taiwan, Singapore, South Korea -- those countries that have chosen our idea, our way instead of statism, authoritarianism or totalitarianism. Their living standard, their prosperity, their freedom for their people is so much greater than anything the other countries have. We just want to explain to people how it works.

The President. Gary, nothing has actually been presented to me as yet. I'm fascinated with reading all about it, but I haven't seen it. And I can tell you that no one has suggested any such figure in the billions of dollars that have been proposed.

All of this is simply the carrying out of what I asked for quite some time ago. And that was for us to see if there is not a defensive weapon that can stop this race in offensive weapons throughout the world that can render maybe a system of horrifying weapons obsolete. And so, they're proceeding with the research on that. But I think there's a great exaggeration of the kind of money that's being talked.

The President. If you've got everybody building defense, then nobody's going to start a war. And that's, maybe, part of the idea. The danger that we're in today was voiced by Dwight Eisenhower in a letter to a publisher back in 1956 in which he, a man of war, said that couldn't we see that the weapons that we're building today are making victory or defeat obsolete, that we are coming to a stage in weaponry in which there can be no victory as we've always thought of it -- no winner or loser in war. There can just be the destruction of the people.

And he said, when that moment arrives -- and I think it has arrived -- he said, then won't we have the common sense to sit down at a negotiating table and do away with war as a means of settling our disputes.

Q. Mr. President, new figures out today show that housing starts were down pretty sharply last month, and the number of building permits went down for the second month in a row. Analysts are saying this could mean the economic recovery is going to level off, maybe kind of peter out next year. And more people are becoming concerned about high interest rates. And given the big deficits being projected by your own administration, isn't it time for some strong action by you to get interest rates down?

The President. Well, I think what we're doing is aimed at getting interest rates down. Now, I'm not sure that interest rates entirely are to blame for this. And I don't know whether the recent figures -- in the first place, they're still way above what they were not too long ago, before this recovery started -- running around a million seven or something. But what I want to know is, are they seasonally adjusted or not? And I have to tell you I have not seen any evidence as to whether they are. And I'm going to make an inquiry, because if they're not, then you have to say, well, is interest rate -- is that the principal cause or only cause? Or is it possible because people don't start building houses back in the east and the middle west and in the snow country when autumn comes?

Now, there is a great dropoff in building. Now, if it is seasonally adjusted, then we have to look at things like the interest rates. And it wouldn't surprise me if people are waiting, because I think there's a great expectation that there's going to be further drops in the interest rates. So, anyone would be smart to wait for that drop to take place.

But what we're doing about that, and the deficit -- first of all is the economic recovery program, which is working -- is about half your deficit is caused by the recession. So, economic recovery can halve your estimate. Our previous estimates of the horrendous deficits have already been trimmed back by the amount of recovery that we've had so far. The other part of that is structural.

It is built-in because of government spending. And I'm going to continue, as hard as I can, trying to get further reductions in government spending as a means of bringing down the deficits and getting us to the point of balanced budget, which we must reach.

I have grown up listening to the other party, year after year, in the 40-odd years in which they have controlled both Houses of the Congress, tell us that deficit spending was necessary -- and a little inflation also -- to maintain prosperity. Well, I used to predict out on the mashed-potato circuit that what is happening would happen -- the bottom would fall out. And it did. But now that recovery -- and if we can continue more spending cuts -- if we had obtained the cuts we asked for in the beginning of our economic recovery program, the deficit would be $40 billion smaller than it is right now.

The President. Prime Minister Craxi visits us as the leader of one of America's closest and most stalwart allies. Italy in recent years has emerged as one of the principal nations of the Western alliance. Prime Minister Craxi, by assuming leadership of the Italian people, has quickly established himself as a major figure in global politics. We're impressed by the dynamic and statesmanlike leadership provided by the new Italian Government, and we're particularly pleased by this opportunity today to deepen our consultations and broaden our cooperation with our trusted Italian friends.

Europe. In our discussion today Prime Minister Craxi and I reviewed the INF negotiations between the United States and the Soviet Union and reaffirmed our goal -- an equitable and verifiable agreement. If Soviet intransigence continues, we're committed to NATO deployment of U.S. missiles. We remain hopeful that an understanding will be reached, and we'll continue negotiations even after initial deployments. Indeed, for 2 years the United States has negotiated in good faith while the Soviets have continued to deploy theater nuclear weapons.

Italy was among the first nations to offer its forces for service in the Sinai to help implement the historic Camp David accords. Italian and American soldiers now are bearing the difficult burdens of peacekeeping in Lebanon. We are cooperating there not only in keeping the peace but in making peace, as well. The Prime Minister and I reviewed our common efforts to promote genuine political reconciliation within Lebanon and to work toward the restoration of Lebanese sovereignty throughout that troubled nation. I cannot overemphasize the importance of the Italian diligence in this crucial effort.

We examined the world economy, discussed our respective efforts to deal with the economic challenges we face. I expressed our understanding of the difficult economic problems Italy presently confronts and our support for the tough but essential measures the Italian Government is taking to restore balanced and noninflationary growth. I expressed the hope that our own strong recovery would help Italy lift itself out of its present recession.

I've been especially impressed by Prime Minister Craxi's commitment to attack organized crime and narcotics trafficking. We share a crucial interest in efforts to suppress the international traffic in narcotics. Accordingly the Prime Minister and I have agreed to establish a joint Italian-American working group on organized crime and narcotics trafficking.

Prime Minister Craxi comes to our shores as an especially welcome guest. In international affairs where the element of personal trust is so essential, such meetings as this are invaluable. I'm delighted to say that the Prime Minister and I have laid the basis today for continuing the open, cooperative, and mutually helpful relationship which has been traditional between our two governments and their leaders.

The Prime Minister. I am particularly grateful to President Reagan for the warm welcome accorded me during my visit to the United States. I consider this welcome primarily as a homage to the Italian nation. I also thank President Reagan for the special attention that, together with members of his government, he has dedicated to the problems and to the views which I've had the opportunity to expose to him this morning on behalf of the Italian Government.

Italy and from the Italian people to the Government and to the American people, also -- a friendship that belongs to the history of our democratic tradition as well as to the future of our two countries.

During our talks, which have been friendly and open and, I believe, reciprocally very useful, we have carefully examined -- with mutual constructive hopes -- several matters. These matters are essential to attain peace both in Europe and in the world: problems and prospects of international economy, the development of Italian-American relations, issues of common interest for industrial cooperation and for an in-depth struggle against crime and the international drug traffic connected to it.

Both the United States and Italy are firmly seeking peace, which they consider with absolute conviction the most precious gift to mankind, and are both committed to solve international problems and disputes through peaceful means. Within the framework of the Atlantic alliance, our two governments will work toward strengthening peace, aiming to maintain open prospects for negotiations in the field of disarmament and arms control so as to guarantee peace through security.

On the question of nuclear balance in Europe, which presently is the most important in East-West relations, we intend to maintain the present system of close consultation and of constructive solidarity and to develop a line of combat coherent with decisions already adopted by our countries. We have followed the path of negotiations which must remain open in any case. Should a launching of the program for the modernization of NATO missile systems occur, due to the negative negotiation policy followed by the U.S.S.R. and by the Warsaw Pact, our intention is to continue to urge Soviet willingness towards serious negotiations without preconditions, aimed at achieving a reasonable agreement, providing for some means of control and some guarantees toward an equilibrium of the agreed forces at the lowest possible level, a policy of peace, which must operate in every region of the world so as to terminate conflicts and to reduce the most dangerous frictions, in full respect of the sovereignty of nations and of the rights of peoples.

In this spirit Italy intends to assure its constructive contribution by taking upon itself direct responsibilities in humanitarian and peace missions, such as is the case for the Sinai and Lebanon, aimed at achieving unity, independence, and the reconstruction of Lebanon.

However, a policy of peace must necessarily be linked to a wider international economic cooperation. This is why we have compared our points of views on the difficult period that the world economy is experiencing. In view of fostering a stable and lasting recovery, Italy and the United States must promote a further increase in the volume of their trade and cooperation which will further strengthen the excellent political relations already existing between our two countries.

Also, in view of an ever-effective fight against organized crime which is involved in international drug traffic and which is challenging and threatening our societies, a special joint commission will be set up and the necessary steps will be taken so that it may operate in the most effective way.

In our meeting today, both President Reagan and myself have reaffirmed the feeling of friendship which binds our two countries, reaffirming the commitment of our governments for the safeguard of peace.

House. The remarks were scheduled to be given outside at the South Portico, but because of inclement weather the event was held in the East Room. Prime Minister Craxi spoke in Italian, and his remarks were translated by an interpreter.

Among this Nation's greatest treasures are the creative talents of our people and the opportunities available for them to develop their talents and thereby enhance the richness of our cultural life. In every artistic discipline, great American artists and institutions have established ever-rising standards of achievement to challenge and inspire successive generations.

Metropolitan Opera, which is celebrating 100 years of extraordinary contributions to the culture of America. Legendary performances of music theater masterpieces have filled the Metropolitan Opera House in New York, halls across the country during the Company's annual tours, and millions of American homes through live radio and television broadcasts which have become part of our national tradition. The Metropolitan Opera also reaches out to discover and encourage young American talent by auditions held throughout the country, and it nurtures and develops great singers of the future.

Through its deep involvement with artists, audiences, and patrons, and with the voluntary assistance of the members of its National Council, the Metropolitan Opera has contributed invaluably to the growth of an American opera community whose vitality and brilliance are acclaimed around the world.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

I'd like to talk to you today about the deep desire we share to reduce nuclear weapons and to make our world more safe. Just as important I want you to know why, despite all our good faith efforts, we are being frustrated in our goal to negotiate an arms reduction agreement.

No issue concerns me more and has taken up more of my time -- not just in meetings with advisers but in deliberations with Members of the Congress and close and constant consultations with our allies -- than this quest for a breakthrough on arms reductions. And believe me, I do so willingly, because as your President and also as a husband, father, and grandfather, I know what's at stake for everyone.

The trouble is, the obstacle to that agreement we want so dearly is not Washington, and it never has been; it's Moscow. And that's been the case in all our current arms reduction negotiations with the Soviet Union.

NATO alliance, not the United States alone, decided the Soviets' large and growing advantage in both nuclear and conventional forces would threaten our safety. So, the alliance made what was called the ``dual-track decision.'' We would redress the imbalance by deploying comparable weapons, while seeking an agreement at the negotiating table that would eliminate the need for deployment.

Nothing more dramatically illustrates our sincere desire for peace than our willingness not to deploy if the Soviets would stop threatening Europe with their missiles. How did the Soviets respond? By adding one new missile every week. They now have 1,300 warheads or more, and that number is growing. NATO still has zero.

All along we've been negotiating in good faith. We asked the Soviets to consider the total elimination of these missiles. It took them less than 24 hours to answer, ``Nyet.'' So we proposed an interim solution, some equal but lower number, and the lower the better. With knee-jerk speed, the same answer came back again, ``Nyet.'' And it's remained the same for all our new proposals, because the Soviets insist on a monopoly of longer range INF missiles. They offer what can only be called ``a half-zero option,'' zero for us, hundreds of warheads for them. As I told the members of the United Nations, that's where things stand today. We will continue our efforts to make the Soviets heed the will of the world, stop stonewalling, and start negotiating in good faith.

But that wish should not become father to the thought. We must look at Soviet words and deeds with a clear head and ask some long overdue questions. Why does a regime which says it seeks peace repeatedly reject equitable proposals that would preserve peace? What are we to think of Soviet threats against NATO countries: warning Turkey it could become ``a nuclear cemetery;'' telling Scandinavian countries they are ``a bridgehead for aggression;'' and advising West Germany if new missiles are deployed, the military threat to it will grow manifold?

My fellow Americans, the values of Western civilization and the beliefs that bind free people together are being tested. The Soviets are engaged in a campaign to intimidate the West, but it will not work. At home, bipartisan support in the Congress remains strong. And the unity of our NATO alliance will not break. Just this week, Prime Minister Craxi of Italy visited the White House and assured me of Italy's continued staunch support. Earlier this year, at the Williamsburg summit, the leaders of the industrialized nations agreed the policy is correct, fair, and should go forward. The spirit of Williamsburg is as strong as ever.

There is simply no sensible alternative to the parallel goal of deterrence and arms reduction. We will remain at the negotiating table just as long as it takes to reach a breakthrough. But the Soviets must undertand: NATO's mission is to defend Europe and preserve peace, which it has done for 34 years. And NATO will continue to meet its responsibilities. Our countries will remain united, strong, and we will protect the safety of our people.

I know there are no words that can express our sorrow and grief over the loss of those splendid young men and the injury to so many others. I know there are no words, also, that can ease the burden of grief for the families of those young men.

But I think we should all recognize that these deeds make so evident the bestial nature of those who would assume power if they could have their way and drive us out of that area that we must be more determined than ever that they cannot take over that vital and strategic area of the Earth or, for that matter, any other part of the Earth.

Note: The President spoke at 8:38 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House. He was returning from a weekend stay in Augusta, Ga., after conferring for several hours with his advisers on the bombing incidents.

As a mark of respect for the American and French military personnel who died violently in the performance of their peacekeeping duties in the tragic bombings of October 23, 1983 in Beirut, Lebanon, I hereby order, by virtue of the authority vested in me as President of the United States of America, that the flag of the United States shall be flown at half-staff upon all public buildings and grounds, at all military posts and naval stations, and on all naval vessels of the Federal Government in the District of Columbia and throughout the United States and its Territories and possessions through Monday, October 31, 1983. I also direct that the flag shall be flown at half-staff for the same length of time at all United States embassies, legations, consular offices, and other facilities abroad, including all military facilities and naval vessels and stations.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President held extensive meetings today with his senior advisers to consider the United States response to the deliberate and heinous acts of international terrorism in Beirut against American and French forces. These forces are present to assist a peaceful settlement of the Lebanese crisis.

This settlement is essential to regional and world peace. These attacks were clearly designed to weaken our determination and to disrupt the efforts of the Government of Lebanon to regain control and sovereignty over the country. One thing is clear: Those who sponsor these outrages believe that they can intimidate the Government of Lebanon, its people, and their friends in the international community. They are wrong. We will not yield to international terrorism, because we know that if we do the civilized world will suffer and our values will be fair game for those who seek to destroy all we stand for.

The President has directed that General P. X. Kelley, Commandant of the Marine Corps, depart for Beirut to undertake a complete review of ways to provide better protection for the marine contingent in Lebanon. We also intend to respond to this criminal act when the perpetrators are identified. The President is consulting closely with our MNF allies and the Lebanese Government.

The President is communicating with our MNF partners and the Government of Lebanon. He is stressing that we remain determined to pursue our stated objectives in Lebanon which are to ensure that Lebanon can be restored as an independent and sovereign nation, free of all foreign forces, and free to reconstitute a national consensus. We and the Government of Lebanon remain committed to the process of national reconciliation and an accommodation of the legitimate interests of all the Lebanese people. We have stressed to President Gemayel the necessity of persevering in his courageous decision to broaden the political base and composition of his government, and we will assure that he can do so without surrendering to those who reject political solutions and seek to impose their will by violent means.

Yesterday's acts of terrorism in Beirut which killed so many young American and French servicemen were a horrifying reminder of the type of enemy that we face in many critical areas of the world today -- vicious, cowardly, and ruthless. Words can never convey the depth of compassion that we feel for those brave men and for their loved ones.

Many Americans are wondering why we must keep our forces in Lebanon. Well, the reason they must stay there until the situation is under control is quite clear: We have vital interests in Lebanon, and our actions in Lebanon are in the cause of world peace. With our allies -- England, France, and Italy -- we're part of a multinational peacekeeping force seeking a withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon and from the Beirut area while the new Lebanese Government undertakes to restore sovereignty throughout that country. By promoting peace in Lebanon, we strengthen the forces for peace throughout the Middle East. This is not a Republican or a Democratic goal but one that all Americans share.

Peace in Lebanon is key to the region's stability now and in the future. To the extent that the prospect for future stability is heavily influenced by the presence of our forces, it is central to our credibility on a global scale. We must not allow international criminals and thugs such as these to undermine the peace in Lebanon.

The struggle for peace is indivisible. We cannot pick and choose where we will support freedom; we can only determine how. If it's lost in one place, all of us lose. If others feel confident that they can intimidate us and our allies in Lebanon, they will become more bold elsewhere. If Lebanon ends up under the tyranny of forces hostile to the West, not only will our strategic position in the Eastern Mediterranean be threatened but also the stability of the entire Middle East, including the vast resource areas of the Arabian Peninsula.

In conjunction with our multinational force partners, we're taking measures to strengthen the capabilities of our forces to defend themselves. The United States will not be intimidated by terrorists. We have strong circumstantial evidence linking the perpetrators of this latest atrocity to others that have occurred against us in the recent past, including the bombing of our Embassy in Beirut last April. Every effort will be made to find the criminals responsible for this act of terrorism so this despicable act will not go unpunished.

The President. The option that we cannot consider is withdrawing while their mission still remains. And they do have a mission, contrary to what some people have intimated in the last 24 hours or so. And it is tied in with the effort that we launched more than a year ago to try and bring peace to the total area of the Middle East because of its strategic importance to the whole free world, not just the United States.

Kelley, the Commandant of the Marine Corps, is on his way to Lebanon to review again what we can do with regard to improving the defensive measures, the safety measures for the marines who are stationed there. And we're looking at every possible option in that regard. But the mission remains, and it remains as yet unfulfilled, although there's been tremendous success so far.

Middle East. We know, of course, our country, since 1948, has been pledged to the continued existence and the security of Israel. And we've had these numerous wars between the Arab States and Israel, with a number of the Arab States, or virtually all of them, refusing to accept the existence of Israel as a nation. We have, back over the years -- as witness more recently in the previous administration, the Camp David accords. So, what we submitted was the idea of us continuing to help, as we did at Camp David, in furthering that process, bringing more nations into the kind of peaceful arrangement that occurred between Egypt and Israel -- producing more Egypts, if you will.

They've had factions. And from just factions and kind of rioting situations, they've developed over the years to where kind of war lords set up with their own military forces. So we recognized that before we could proceed with the peace plan -- remember that when we started this, Israel had been forced across its own border, was shelling Beirut. The PLO militias inside Beirut were shelling back. The casualties were hundreds of civilians, every day, dying and being grievously wounded.

So we recognized that what we had to resolve first was this issue: to get Syria, which had crossed from the other border, to get Syria, get Israel, get the PLO organization out of Lebanon and then to have a stabilizing force while a government could be established in Lebanon and their military could then acquire the capability necessary to reinstitute their control over their own borders. And this was why the multinational force went in -- to provide that stability so that when the Lebanese forces moved out, as the other forces, the Israelis and the Syrians left, there could be a maintenance of order behind them.

Now that mission remains, and it did have measures of great success. Some 5,000 of the organized PLO militias, as you'll remember, were shipped out of Lebanon. Some of those, we fear, have been infiltrated back in, mainly by way of Syria now. But that was accomplished. A government was established. We have helped very definitely with the training of the Lebanese Army, and they proved the quality of that training recently in the fighting in the hills and around Suq al Gharb. And we think that they have -- they don't have the size yet to where they could take over in, let's say, the policing of that area and of the airport and still have enough manpower to go out and restore order as they're supposed to.

So that mission remains. And, as of now, they have finally agreed upon a date and a place for a meeting in which the Government of Lebanon is going to try and bring in representatives of the hostile factions within Lebanon to broaden the base of the government.

Q. Mr. President, Susan Hutchison, KIRO - TV, from Seattle. I'm a journalist, but I'm also the wife of a U.S. Marine Corps captain, and as such I am personally grieved over the loss of lives. I am wondering what message you can give to Americans who are frustrated with the loss of life in a region that historically has not known peace -- and, many think, will never know peace -- and yet, our men are over there as peacekeepers.

I understand your concern. I understand all Americans' concern, and I have to say that I don't know of anything that is worse in the job I have than having to make the calls that I have made as a result of these snipings that have taken place in the past.

I wish it could be without hazard, but the alternative is to look at this region which, as I say, is vital. Our allies in Western Europe, the Japanese -- it would be a disaster if a force took over the Middle East. And a force is ready to do that, as witness what has taken place in Yemen, in Ethiopia, and now the forces of some several thousand that are theirs in Syria.

The free world cannot stand by and see that happen. Yes, this has been an area torn by strife over the centuries, and yet not too many years ago, before the kind of breakup, Lebanon was a very prosperous, peaceful nation that was kind of known as the Gateway to the East. And we believe it can be again.

Probably no one -- or no country was more at war with Israel than Egypt, and yet we saw Egypt and Israel come to a peace treaty and Israel give up the Sinai and so forth that it had conquered in war. We have to believe that this we must strive for, because the alternative could be disaster for all of our world.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Rollin Post from KRON in San Francisco. I want to ask you, you've addressed it now several times, the issue that we cannot get out of the Middle East. But would you address the other argument that if you're not going to get out, then let's just not put marines back in to replace those who have been killed and wounded to do exactly the same thing in the same place but, if you're going to do a job, go into Lebanon and do it with some real force, which is another argument -- [inaudible].

The President. But you see what that entails -- and that is the difficult thing -- we would then be engaged in the combat. We would be the combat force. We would be fighting against Arab States, and that is not the road to peace. We're still thinking in terms of that long-range peace.

Lebanon must be resolved and resolve within itself its own problems. And incidentally, not much attention has been paid to the diplomatic process that's been going on for all of this time, and before, round-the-clock. And we now are seeking a replacement for Ambassador McFarlane, who is with us here today, who is now national security adviser -- but someone to replace him. But he could tell you. And I used to sit here feeling guilty, hearing his schedule from Damascus to Beirut to Tel Aviv, back, and hours and hours of meetings. But they have all led to this present cease-fire, to this government that is now in Lebanon, and to the effort to enlarge that government. So we're keeping on with that process.

But with the present mission of the multinational force -- and remember there are four nations involved there -- enlarging their forces, if it would help with the mission they're performing, would be one thing. But to join into the combat and become a part of the combative force, actually all we would really be doing would be increasing the number of targets and risking, really, the start of overall conflict and world war.

No, our mission, I think, makes sense. I think it has proven itself so far. The tragedy is coming not really from the warring forces, it is coming from little bands of individuals, literally criminal minded, who now see in the disorder that's going on an opportunity to do what they want to do.

That was the headquarters building. There were more than 200 men sleeping in that building when this occurred. The records, the personnel records are either destroyed or buried someplace beneath all that rubble. And because they were sleeping, many of the men were not wearing their dog tags. And the delay in notification of the families -- and it must be a terrible, cruel, additional punishment for these people who wait in suspense. And we have no answers until -- we're doing everything, or the marines are, that they can to identify. And when they can get actual identification, such as bodies that did have dog tags or where comrades can recognize and identify, to notify the individual families. But it's a long, tragic story because of the other, the loss of the records.

But, yes, I think this recovery is solid, and I think that it is based on something that we're never had in any of the previous recessions. There have been about eight since World War II. And every one of them prior to this was treated with a quick fix, an artificial stimulant by government spending and money supply and so forth. And if you'll look back at the history of them, every one of them was followed within a matter of 2 or 3 years by another one, and each time inflation was higher and unemployment was greater than before.

But this one, we have brought inflation, as you've probably been told in briefings already, down from 2 years of double digit -- and even figures as high as 17 percent -- to where for the last 12 months it has been 2.6 percent, which is the lowest 12-month average in 17 years. And I think that what we're seeing there in the stock market -- it flurries a little bit, goes up, but then every once in a while there's some profit taking and it drops a few points. But I think one figure that's been ignored, and maybe all of you can treat with it -- just a week or so ago it was announced that we were up now to 70 -- more than 78 percent of our industrial capacity is now at work. We were way down far below that to where there was just unused industrial capacity because there wasn't any demand for the product. But this is getting practically up to prosperous times to have that much of our capacity used.

The President. Well, if this were recommended on the basis that their mission, as I say, could be furthered by some difference in the size of the mission, I would certainly take seriously the recommendation of the man who's the Commandant of the entire Marine Corps.

There are a number of other things to look at, options that have been presented. We know, for example, that we have to find a new headquarters, an operational post for the headquarters, because that was totally destroyed. One of the options being considered is, could part of the support services of that kind be stationed on one of our ships that are offshore there, one of our naval vessels? More improvements in the actual defensive structure? There are any number of options, and that's why an expert is going over there to come back and tell us what can be done.

But your remarks about treating with the regional press, believe me it is a great pleasure. And I wish -- I'm going to tell them that next time they've got to schedule any luncheons like this for about a half an hour extra, or give me some free time following it so that I can run over if I want to, because you do ask questions, and I learn as much from your questions as -- maybe more -- than you learn from my answers. And it's been a great pleasure to have all of you here.

She is a consultant at the American Indian Institute at the University of Oklahoma. She has been a teacher of cultural studies at the Institute of American Indian Arts in Sante Fe, N. Mex., and has also lectured in public schools across Oklahoma on music, legends, customs, and other aspects of Indian culture.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, on Sunday, October 23d, the United States received an urgent, formal request from the five member nations of the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States to assist in a joint effort to restore order and democracy on the island of Grenada. We acceded to the request to become part of a multinational effort with contingents from Antigua, Barbados, Dominica, Jamaica, St. Lucia, St. Vincent, and the United States. I might add that two of those, Barbados and Jamaica, are not members of the Organization, but were first approached, as we later were, by the OECS and asked to join in that undertaking. And then all of them joined unanimously in asking us to participate.

We have taken this decisive action for three reasons. First, and of overriding importance, to protect innocent lives, including up to a thousand Americans, whose personal safety is, of course, my paramount concern. Second, to forestall further chaos. And third, to assist in the restoration of conditions of law and order and of governmental institutions to the island of Grenada, where a brutal group of leftist thugs violently seized power, killing the Prime Minister, three Cabinet members, two labor leaders, and other civilians, including children.

From the start we have consciously sought to calm fears. We were determined not to make an already bad situation worse and increase the risks our citizens faced. But when I received reports that a large number of our citizens were seeking to escape the island, thereby exposing themselves to great danger, and after receiving a formal request for help, a unanimous request from our neighboring states, I concluded the United States had no choice but to act strongly and decisively.

Let me repeat, the United States objectives are clear: to protect our own citizens, to facilitate the evacuation of those who want to leave, and to help in the restoration of democratic institutions in Grenada.

I understand that several Caribbean States are asking that the Organization of American States consider the situation in Grenada. Our diplomatic efforts will be in close cooperation with the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States and the other countries participating in this multinational effort.

Grenada. We, as part of the Organization of East Caribbean States, realizing that we are, of course, one region -- we belong to each other, are kith and kin; we all have members of our state living in Grenada -- we're very concerned that this event should take place again.

It is true that we have managed to live with the regime since March '79. And we felt quite clearly and we had good reason to believe that the Bishop regime was seeing it our way and was on the way to have elections. And we think this is the reason why himself and his Cabinet were destroyed, because he realized that the pressure we put on him to have elections was worthwhile, was right, and he'd begun to see that the democratic institutions must be put in place in any of these small countries.

It is even more important in a small island state, poor island state, to have the democratic institutions. And this we have had for a long time, and we've continued it and we wish to continue it. Grenada was an aberration in this respect. But that these men, who had for all these years accepted the Bishop regime should then, for their own reasons -- and I think the power-hungry reasons -- decide to destroy the persons whom they had accepted as their leaders for so long, made us realize that this sort of assassination must not be allowed to continue in our country. It means that our people there are not safe. It means that Grenadians had never been given the chance to choose for themselves the country that they want. And, therefore, it is necessary for us to see to it that they have the opportunity to do so.

The President. I could -- well, we don't know how long that will be. We want to be out as quickly as possible, because our purpose in being there is only for them to enable -- to take over their own affairs. As far as we know, the citizens are safe. We have been monitoring that very closely. And one of our prime objectives in the actual invasion that was almost instantly done was the securing of that St. Georges Medical College, where several hundred of the students were.

The President. They were in no danger in the sense of that, right now, anything was being done to them. But we know that there was concern on the part of those, because already we'd been informed of several hundred who wanted to leave. But the airports were closed. There was no way of leaving. This was a case of not waiting until something actually happened to them.

But we did manage to get some intelligence out of the island, intelligence information on this. And the tenuous situation was, as I said, the only authority that you could say of a governmental nature on that island was a 24-hour curfew with orders to shoot on sight anyone found moving in those 24 hours.

The President. I can only tell you that we've secured both the airports, and the landings have been completed. But we are yielding to the influence of General Vessey in that we don't think in these early hours of that landing that we should be on the horn asking the commanders to stop and give us detailed reports.

Prime Minister just said. Once these nations, which were once British colonies, were freed, they, themselves, had a treaty. And their treaty was one of mutual support. And Grenada is one of the countries, signatories to that treaty -- and observe that treaty at one time when they had a democratic government and a constitution -- a constitutional government, the constitution that was left to them by the British. So, this action that is being taken is being taken under the umbrella of an existing treaty.

Now, the Prime Minister and I are going to depart, but I know there are going to be a lot more technical questions of that kind and Ambassador Motley is here, and I'm going to put him before you to ask all of the technical questions you may have.

Mr. Abram authored legislation outlawing Ku Klux Klan violence, fought and won the landmark one man one vote case before the Supreme Court, and served for 9 years as chairman of the United Negro College Fund.

Robert Destro, a professor of law, pioneered the development of legal services for a nationwide civil rights practice devoted to combating discrimination based on religion or national origin as general counsel of the Catholic League for Religious and Civil Rights.

Aside from their party affiliation and high qualifications, their only common denominators are intellectual independence and lifetimes of persistence in opposing discrimination based on race, sex, national origin, or religion.

Under the Constitution and the relevant statute (42 U.S.C. 1975), members of the Commission serve at the pleasure of the President. That fact is confirmed on the certificate of appointment held by every Commissioner who has ever served -- including all current members -- and was acknowledged yet again last spring by the report of the House Committee on the Judiciary.

Rather than permitting the Senate to consider these nominees on their merits, some Senators have refused to vote to move the nominations out of committee and to the Senate floor. Instead, they have claimed that the very act of nominating these distinguished individuals somehow compromises the ``independence'' of the Commission. That argument is not supported by history.

When controversy arose on this matter, the President directed members of his staff to meet with representatives of the Senate Judiciary Committee to see if a solution to the impasse could be reached. The President made it clear from the beginning that he was prepared to accept arrangements that permitted some or all of the current members of the Commission to remain in office. In the discussions between the White House and members of the Judiciary Committee, tentative agreements were reached on a number of occasions. Each time the President agreed to the compromise formula; each time those opposing the nominations ultimately rejected the compromise. The latest tentative agreement would have expanded the Commission to eight members now (including two of the three Presidential nominees) and then in the spring of 1984, the third Presidential nominee would replace one of the present incumbents. The President agreed to that proposal, but again it was rejected by the other side.

It should be emphasized that the issue at stake in this matter is not the removal of certain individuals or the Civil Rights Commission itself. The issue is the responsibility of the President to exercise the power given to him by law. It is that constitutional power of appointment, so long a part of the American political tradition, that is at stake here. The President is appreciative of the efforts made by a number of Senators to help reach a common solution on this matter.

Over the past year and a half, General Ershad's government has taken steps to restore democratic institutions and economic growth to the people of Bangladesh. In our useful and cordial conversations today, the General and I have had an opportunity to discuss these admirable goals and other matters of concern to our two countries. We especially appreciate the General's dedication to the economic development of his country. The self-help reforms which his government has put in place reflect this commitment to reinvigorate development and better the lives of the Bangladesh people.

In the political realm, the General has now set in motion a process designed to build a broad base of popular support for economic and social development in his country. We endorse this goal since we believe that long-term political stability can be achieved only through representative government.

Lastly, the United States wishes to applaud Bangladesh, a member of the nonaligned movement, for its constructive approach to issues of regional and global concern. To cite only a few examples: Bangladesh clearly manifested its courage and resolve in its unswerving responses to aggression in Afghanistan and Kampuchea. It also took the lead in establishing the South Asian Regional Cooperation Organization, a body designed to build a more prosperous and stable region for the people of South Asia. Bangladesh's foreign policy has exhibited an activism, moderation, and force of moral conviction which has earned the respect of the world.

We are grateful to President Ronald Reagan for the thoughtful and cordial invitation which he has kindly extended to visit this great country. We bring with us the warm greetings and sincere good wishes of the people of Bangladesh.

My meeting with the President was very satisfying, and I thank him for having received me despite his preoccupation at this critical moment. The comprehensive and productive exchange of views which we have just had is an unmistakable demonstration of our friendship. The object of my visit is to reinforce and consolidate the relations between the United States of America and Bangladesh, which, I'm happy to say, has been achieved.

During our meeting, the President and I covered a wide range of subjects. It gives me great pleasure to say that we have had the opportunity of reaffirming our two countries' shared perceptions and close identity of interests in strengthening the process of peace, progress, and prosperity for mankind.

I have apprised the President of the intensive level of activity which my government has undertaken to improve the quality of life of our 95 million people, a large measure of whom live in rural Bangladesh. I have explained that my government is committed to laying firm political and economic foundations for the long-term development and social benefits for our people. We have already undertaken significant measures in the fields of population control, food production, rural unemployment, and energy production. These have involved the organization and decentralization of our administration, the streamlining of our judiciary, and extensive work in reviewing colonial laws, on the one hand, and our outdated education system, on the other. We hope, sir, that these basic efforts will substantially reinforce the base we must have for the restoration and maintenance of democratic values which are integral to our society.

We are about to launch ourselves into local government elections this winter, followed by elections at progressively higher political echelons throughout 1984, leading to the elections to our Parliament in March 1985. Over 40 million people will go to the polls, not merely to elect their representative, sir, but to lay the political and economic foundation for our future, to enable our people to live freely and to live with honor and dignity by the grace of God.

The President and I have agreed to explore possible ways and means towards furthering strengthening the close bonds of friendship and cooperation between our two countries. Indeed, I am most grateful to you, sir, for the deep and abiding interest you have personally shown in the welfare and progress of our people and for the moral support and economic assistance which have been extended to us.

As members of the Organized Islamic Conference, an unaligned movement in the Commonwealth, and -- [inaudible] -- as chairman of the Group of 77, Bangladesh firmly believes the current international economic situation needs the closest vigilance by the whole community of nations, recognizing that interdependability is indispensable as a way of life in this day and age. The role of the United States is a crucial and critical one in this regard.

It is, indeed, a matter of great satisfaction that the President and I, in discussing these issues, fully agree that global peace and stability is closely interlinked with the need to restore confidence in the current economic climate in both developing and developed countries.

We in Bangladesh deeply appreciate the importance of the vital role of the United States in upholding the principles of maintaining peace and stability in the world, as enshrined in the charter of the United Nations. I warmly welcome your recent reassuring statement in the United Nations General Assembly in this regard.

I'd like to mention here that I have conveyed to the President our profound sorrow and anguish at the tragic loss of life in the recent days in Beirut. We share your grief, and on behalf of my government and people, I extend our heartfelt condolences to the families of the deceased.

My wife and I have been deeply touched by the warm hospitality extended to us and the members of our delegation. Our stay in the U.S. Capital, the beautiful city of Washington, though short, has been most pleasant and rewarding. I have no doubt that I speak on behalf of all of us when I say that we shall treasure these happy moments and cherish the memory of your warm friendship.

Bangladesh as early as is convenient. It is my sincere hope that you will visit our country soon and see for yourself the high esteem in which you are held and the enormous fount of good will that exists in Bangladesh for your people.

On October 12, a violent series of events in Grenada was set in motion, which led to the murder of Prime Minister Maurice Bishop and a number of his Cabinet colleagues, as well as the deaths of a number of civilians. Over 40 killings were reported. There was no government ensuring the protection of life and property and restoring law and order. The only indication of authority was an announcement that a barbaric shoot-to-kill curfew was in effect. Under these circumstances, we were necessarily concerned about the safety of innocent lives on the island, including those of up to 1,000 United States citizens.

The Organization of Eastern Caribbean States (OECS) became seriously concerned by the deteriorating conditions in the member State of Grenada. The other members of the OECS are Antigua, Dominica, Montserrat, St. Kitts/Nevis, Saint Lucia, and Saint Vincent and the Grenadines. We were formally advised that the Authority of Heads of Government of Member States of the OECS, acting pursuant to the Treaty establishing the OECS, met in emergency session on October 21. The meeting took note of the anarchic conditions and the serious violations of human rights and bloodshed that had occurred, and the consequent unprecedented threat to the peace and security of the region created by the vacuum of authority in Grenada. The OECS determined to take immediate, necessary steps to restore order in Grenada so as to protect against further loss of life, pending the restoration of effective governmental institutions. To this end, the OECS formed a collective security force comprising elements from member States to restore order in Grenada and requested the immediate cooperation of a number of friendly countries, including the governments of Barbados, Jamaica and the United States, in these efforts.

In response to this call for assistance and in view of the overriding importance of protecting the lives of the United States citizens in Grenada, I have authorized the Armed Forces of the United States to participate along with these other nations in this collective security force.

In accordance with my desire that the Congress be informed on this matter, and consistent with the War Powers Resolution, I am providing this report on this deployment of the United States Armed Forces.

United States Marine Corps personnel began landing in Grenada. They were supported by elements of the United States Navy and the United States Air Force. Member States of the OECS along with Jamaica and Barbados are providing approximately 300 personnel. This deployment of United States Armed Forces is being undertaken pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief of the United States Armed Forces.

States Armed Forces in Grenada, our objectives in providing this support are clear. They are to join the OECS collective security forces in assisting the restoration of conditions of law and order and of governmental institutions to the island of Grenada, and to facilitate the protection and evacuation of United States citizens. Our forces will remain only so long as their presence is required.

The President asked for this meeting to underline his personal endorsement of the high-level group's recommendations, which the President believes are vitally important to NATO's future, and to convey his hope that the assembled NATO ministers will act favorably on them.

The NATO high-level group, chaired by Assistant Secretary of Defense Richard Perle, was formed in 1977 for the purpose of reviewing the total NATO intermediate-range and short-range nuclear force structure. The high-level group's report to defense ministers at their meeting in Canada will culminate several years work by experts from throughout the the alliance on the future size and composition of NATO's nuclear stockpile. The conclusion of this vital work will be a further step in the implementation of NATO's 1979 dual-track decision on intermediate-range nuclear force (INF) modernization and arms control. Besides addressing the modernization of NATO's longer range INF missile forces, the 1979 decision also provided for the initial net reduction of 1,000 existing NATO nuclear weapons, which has already been carried out, and committed the alliance to review further adjustments that could be made to NATO's medium and shorter range nuclear forces. The high-level group's report completes this review.

Finally, the President underscored his personal opinion that, if adopted by NATO ministers, the recommendations will enhance the alliance's credibility and effectiveness in continuing to maintain peace -- as it has for nearly four decades.

Childhood poisonings continue to pose a major public health problem in the United States. Each year, more than 100,000 children are treated in hospital emergency rooms because they accidentally ingested chemical household products.

For the past 23 years, the Poison Prevention Week Council has coordinated a network of organizations which seek to raise public awareness of the importance of preventing childhood poisonings. Working together as sponsors of National Poison Prevention Week are national medical, pharmacy, nursing, dental, and hospital associations; health and safety groups; organizations representing manufacturers, packagers, and distributors of consumer products, including medicines; the media; and government agencies. Most of these groups have State and local chapters and affiliates that, along with community organizations, are the backbone of what has become a successful nationwide poison prevention program.

In recent years, the number of poisonings among children has fallen dramatically for those substances that have been required to be packaged in child-resistant closures. However, despite these successes, many childhood poisonings continue to occur. Some adults purchase regulated products in conventional rather than child-resistant packaging or, alternatively, defeat the child-resistant packaging. In addition, adults who are using potentially poisonous products sometimes are distracted for a moment by a telephone call, a doorbell, or food cooking on the stove. These seemingly innocuous distractions can have disastrous consequences if a child ingests the poisonous product. The theme of National Poison Prevention Week is ``Children Act Fast . . .

To assist in encouraging the American people to learn of the dangers of accidental poisoning and to take appropriate preventive measures, the Congress, by a joint resolution approved September 26, 1961 (75 Stat. 681), requested the President to issue annually a proclamation designating the third week in March as National Poison Prevention Week.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Edmund Stohr, of Illinois, for the rank of Minister during the remainder of the tenure of his service as the Representative of the United States of America on the Council of the International Civil Aviation Organization.

Before getting into today's subject, I would just like to say a heartfelt word of thanks to all of you for the thousands of wires and calls that have come in, supportive of the actions of these last few days and, particularly, supportive and grateful to those young men in uniform who are performing so magnificently.

As you know, we're negotiating with the Soviets in Geneva on the longer range missiles. The current imbalance on those systems is over 350 to 0 in their favor. But with regard to the shorter range missiles, the tactical missiles, I think you'll be very pleased with today's news. But first, a little background.

The nuclear forces in Europe are fundamental to our overall strategy of deterrence and to protecting our allies and ourselves. The weapons strengthen NATO and protect the peace because they show that the alliance is committed to sharing the risks and the benefits of mutual defense.

Just by being there, these weapons deter others from aggression and, thereby, serve the cause of peace. Unfortunately, we must keep them there until we can convince the Soviets and others that the best thing would be a world in which there is no further need for nuclear weapons at all.

In December of 1979 NATO reached a decision to reduce immediately the number of shorter range nuclear weapons stationed in Europe. In 1980 we carried out that decision by removing 1,000 of these weapons. The same decision also committed the alliance to a further review of the remaining systems of this category, and that brings us to our decision of Thursday.

When these 2,400 weapons have been withdrawn, the United States will have reduced its nuclear weapons in Europe by over one-third from 1979 levels, and NATO will have the lowest number of nuclear weapons in 20 years. What this means is that the alliance will have removed at least five nuclear weapons for every new missile warhead we will deploy if the negotiations in Geneva don't lead to an agreement.

Union. The Soviet leaders have so far refused to negotiate in good faith at the Geneva talks. Since our 1979 decision to reduce nuclear forces, the Soviet Union has added over 600 SS - 20 warheads to their arsenal. Coupled with this, they offer threats and the acceleration of previous plans, which they now call countermeasures, if NATO carries through with its deployment plan intended to restore the balance.

On Thursday NATO took a dramatic and far-reaching decision, a decision that puts us a giant step along the path toward increased stability in Europe and around the world. As we reduce our nuclear warheads in Europe and, of equal importance, take the necessary actions to maintain the effectiveness of the resulting force, we will continue in the future what we've accomplished so well in the past -- to deter Soviet aggression. We seek peace and we seek security, and the NATO decision serves both.

Now, let me bring you up to date on the negotiations in Geneva. Progress toward an equitable, verifiable agreement on the reduction of intermediate-range nuclear missiles has been slow to come. Most recently, I proposed three initiatives which go a long way toward meeting important concerns expressed by the Soviet Union. By our actions on the talks we have ensured that all of the elements of a mutually advantageous agreement are on the table. The Soviet Union has now advanced some additional proposals of its own. We'll study these proposals, and we'll address them in the talks in Geneva.

Geneva talks. I hope that the Soviet Union is truly interested in achieving an agreement. The test will be whether the Soviets, having advanced their latest proposals, decide finally to negotiate seriously in Geneva.

Captain Sims has worked as a daily newspaper reporter for the Jackson Sun in Jackson, Tenn., and as a weekly newspaper editor and publisher. His writings include ``The Pentagon Reporters,'' a book to be published this year.

He has a bachelor of arts degree from Union University and masters degrees in journalism and in political science from the University of Wisconsin. He was a Rotary Foundation fellow studying international relations at the University of Sydney, Australia, and is a graduate of the National War College.

Mr. Welch is an attorney engaged in the private practice of law in the St. Louis, Mo., area. He is director of the Missouri Association for Children with Learning Disabilities and is former vice chairman of the National Network of Learning Disabled Adults. He was a cofounder of St. Louis Young Adults with Learning Disabilities.

I'm very proud to be the first to address you with those words -- my fellow Americans, welcome to your country. Of all the things that a President does, nothing is as rewarding as events such as this. This is a ceremony of renewal. With you, today the American dream is reborn.

Today you've joined a people who are among the freest on the face of the Earth. We're a nation greatly blessed. We were founded by men and women who wanted it said of our country: Here the people rule. They created a philosophy of freedom that is expressed in the document by which our country was established, the preamble of which was read to you, the Constitution.

Now, I know that most Americans are immigrants from other countries, and most of those countries have constitutions. I haven't read all the constitutions of all the nations of the world, but of all that I have read, I've noticed a difference that is so subtle it almost escapes you, and yet it is so tremendous it describes the difference. Those other constitutions give the people, or grant the people, in most instances, many of the same rights that our Constitution says are yours. But those constitutions say that government grants you those rights. Our Constitution says we, the people, have those rights by grace of God by our birth, and we, the people, will grant to the government the following rights.

You've joined a country that has been called ``The least exclusive club in the world -- with the highest dues.'' America was founded by men and women who understood that freedom doesn't come free. It has a cost. But I don't suppose anyone would know the cost of freedom, the price of freedom better than you who have taken this oath today.

Some of you came from places that, sadly, have not known freedom and liberty. Some of you have come from places that don't offer opportunity. Some of you are probably here because you are, by nature, adventurous. And some of you have no doubt come here for a new start, to wipe the slate clean and begin your life anew.

These strike me as all good reasons. In fact, they're the very same reasons that our forefathers came here. And they did pretty well -- so well, in fact, that two centuries after they invented this country it is still what they intended it to be: A place where the oppressed, the lost, the adventurous, can come for sanctuary and comfort and chance.

Divine Providence here between the two great oceans, and only those who really wanted to get here would get here. Only those who most yearned for freedom would make the terrible trek that it took to get here. America has drawn the stoutest hearts from every corner of the world, from every nation of the world. And that was lucky for America, because if it was going to endure and grow and protect its freedoms for 200 years, it was going to need stout hearts.

Fifty million immigrants came to this country in the last 200 years. Some of the most recent have crawled over walls and under barbed wire and through mine fields, and some of them risked their lives in makeshift boats.

And I know that all of them felt as the immigrants of the early part of this century felt. So many of them steamed into New York, and as they would see the approaching skyline and the Statute of Liberty, they'd crowd to the side of the boat and say, ``America! America!'' And in that word they heard the sound of a New World. In that word they heard everything.

And all of them have added to the sum total of what your new country is. They gave us their traditions. They gave us their words. They enlivened the national life with new ideas and new blood. And I urge you -- you probably don't need to be urged, but I'll urge you anyway, just for fun -- urge you to remember, as they did, the land of your birth. Bring to us its culture and its heritage. We don't reject them. We need them. They enrich us.

You know, man can take unto himself a wife. A wife can take unto herself a husband. That doesn't mean that they abandon their mothers and fathers and forget them. So, you know, every now and then academics talk about assimilation and how our various ethnic groups have, with time, dropped their ethnicity and become more ``American.'' Well, I don't know about that. It seems to me that America is constantly reinventing what ``America'' means. We adopt this country's phrases and that country's art, and I think it's really closer to the truth to say that America has assimilated as much as her immigrants have. It's made for a delightful diversity, and it's made us a stronger and a more vital nation.

Arguing is something of a tradition here. We like to disagree. But it's usually pretty good-natured arguing, and it doesn't tear us apart. I think you'll find that for all our disagreeing, Americans remain united around certain shared ideas and shared dreams -- which takes me back to where I began. All of us want ``one nation under God . . . with liberty and justice for all.'' Most of the disagreeing just has to do with the best ways to secure liberty and justice and the best ways to protect them.

They've wondered if our nation still has meaning. And then we see you today, and it's an affirmation. You, standing here, reveal we all must still stand for something. I know that the eldest among you is 92, and the youngest among you is 2. And we thank you all for the compliment of your new citizenship.

But it was here in Detroit that we embarked on a new beginning for America 4 years ago, and I'd like to speak with you today about what I consider the most important issue in the 1984 campaign -- America's choice for the future.

This election offers the clearest choice in 50 years on the direction our country should take -- a choice of whether we go forward together with the courage, common sense, and new spirit making America strong again, or whether we turn back to those policies that weakened our economy, reduced opportunities, and reversed America's tradition of progress.

I believe America works best when we trust our people -- all our people. When we trust their vision, faith, judgment, and courage, when we give them opportunities to climb higher and reach for the stars, a million dreams can become the golden dream of America.

But we know that in the recent past, our government had stopped placing trust in the people, and too many dreams were allowed to die. Higher taxes, more government spending, and greater government intrusion -- the same approach advocated today by my opponent -- had dramatically changed the landscape of America.

We saw policies with devastating results -- families encouraged to break up, bedrock values of work and strength of neighborhoods undermined, crime going up, our children's achievement in school going down. In retrospect, there was only one thing fair about those policies: They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable.

In short, America wasn't working very well. Now, I know the last administration didn't want these things to happen. I don't question my opponent's good intentions. He sincerely believes his philosophy of bigger government is in the best interest of America. Well, I would simply suggest that all of us remember, given the track record, that there is a well-known road paved with good intentions, but no one wants to go where it leads.

You know, I was once asked how I hoped, personally, to be remembered for my time as custodian of this office. I was appearing just a week or so ago before a college group when that question was asked by one of the students. Well, knowing that I believe that Americans do better by themselves, I said that with the courage of -- millions of Americans are coming to grips with the problems that had built up for more than a decade -- I said I would hope that I would be remembered as having given the government of this country back to the people.

Together we've made a new beginning, restoring America's economic and military strength, her sense of community and fidelity to shared values, and her spirit of national unity. We recognize that much remains to be done to help the people that were hurt most by past mistakes. But we believe our policies now in effect, with the initiatives we're supporting for the future, will continue to improve life and opportunity for all Americans. And with your support, we're going to get that job done and get it done right.

We must make this nation so strong, so united that when today's young Americans become tomorrow's leaders, they will inherit an America that can remain the great shining light for progress and peace for generations to come.

American opportunity society, a society that ensures that every individual will have his or her chance to climb higher, to climb up to the ultimate in individual freedom, consistent with an orderly society, to achieve the fullness of creative human potential.

There's a true and tested path to a bright and hopeful future; but it's not the path of good intentions by bigger government. It's the path of greater responsibility in government and greater opportunity for every man, woman, and child. And that's the America we've been working for, and that's the America we mean to keep working for.

The needy were hit hardest of all. A family on a fixed income of $8,000 in 1979 was about $600 above the poverty line, but in 1980 it was almost $400 below it, as double-digit inflation eroded purchasing power and pushed the poverty line up. Inflation reduced the real value of government benefits and especially hurt the poor who were forced to spend a larger share of their income on necessities. In the last administration, per person Aid to Families with Dependent Children fell 10 percent. The value of the maximum allotment of food stamps fell by almost 6 percent.

Despite the great torrents of rhetoric about compassion, the only people who benefited from those high inflation and interest rate policies were people wealthy enough to invest in expensive inflation hedges. Working Americans and the needy were left out in the cold.

Inflation and high interest rates are not caused by people living too well; inflation and high interest rates are caused by government living too well. So, we took action to bring runaway government spending under control. We cut its rate of growth by more than half. Experts warned it would take 10 years to bring inflation down to the level of the 1960's. Well, we did it in 2 years. And today the third-quarter gross national product deflater is estimated at 2.9 percent, and inflation stands at only 4.2 percent. Not only are we determined to keep inflation down, we'll not be satisfied until inflation is 0.0. Interest rates have fallen by more than one-third. That's still not enough, but the prime recently dropped, and I think we'll see more of that ahead.

While the value of the maximum allotment of food stamps fell by almost 6 percent in the last administration, the value of that same allotment has gone up by almost 8 percent during our administration.

The decline in interest rates, while not yet enough, has reduced the average cost of home mortgages by $143.00 a month, put home ownership within the reach of 5 million more Americans than before, and made car purchases more affordable, too.

Too many families are still not where they need to be, but our progress has made them more financially secure, they have more opportunities, and I happen to believe this is what fairness is all about.

I'm asking for your strongest support for two long-overdue reforms supported by the American people, but resisted by the Democratic leadership -- a constitutional amendment mandating that government stop spending more than government takes in and a line-item veto giving a President authority to veto individual items on appropriation bills.

Now, just remember, you don't need to make them see the light, you just have to make them feel the heat. [Laughter] Forty-three State Governors have this authority, and when I was Governor of California I used the line-item veto more than 900 times. But legislation for a line-item veto is tied up in the Congress. Tell the Congress to give democracy a chance, and I promise you we'll get rid of the pork-barrel spending that slips through every year. Incidentally, none of those more than 900 vetoes in California were overridden.

Democrats in the House killed the balanced budget amendment in 1982, and their leadership still resists allowing a vote on that amendment. Now, I recognize that idea wouldn't be a cure-all; it wouldn't even go into effect right away. But I believe it would force the leadership of the Congress to work with the President on long-term budgets of real discipline -- one that would not penalize those dependent on government for help -- and it's high time that this be done.

Getting spending under control for good will keep the deficit on its downward path, help bring inflation and interest rates down more, provide greater security for all our people, and give investors and businesses the confidence they need to make long-term investments for our future.

But the other side of that equation is pursuing incentive policies for growth. And to meet our challenge -- to build an American opportunity society -- we must have tax policies that spur America to challenge the very limits of growth.

Now, I believe that the tax policies in place before we got to Washington were antigrowth, antipeople. Government always, under the guise of compassion, had penalized Americans with record taxes that reduced rewards for hard work, thrift, and risk-taking. They wanted us to substitute limits for the American dream, and for once they managed to do what they wanted.

Savings fell as inflation raised marginal tax rates so high it didn't pay to save. By 1979 and 1980, investment was declining, inflation had driven up the replacement cost of business equipment, but the tax laws mandated such slow writeoffs for the purchase of new equipment that many businesses were using up capital every year rather than replacing it. Little wonder that workers' productivity fell in '79 and '80 -- the first back-to-back years of decline in postwar history -- and that housing, steel, autos, and our basic industries were in a slump.

America was sinking, losing our can-do spirit and our stature as world economic leader. So, we began with a commonsense principle: Government must remove the burden of excessive taxes and restore opportunity to people.

Our critics complained our tax cuts were unfair. This was after they fought the idea of any tax cut when we made it a major issue in the 1980 campaign. They also tried to do away with the third year of the tax cut and do away with indexing, which doesn't help those in the top tax brackets at all, but does help working families trying to keep from being pushed into those high brackets.

Now, I majored in economics, but I never appreciated, until the great hue and cry over our program, how true it is that economics is the dismal science. When the shaky economy really started to falter in July of 1981, many blamed it on our program. Well, the trouble is our program hadn't even been adopted yet. We were still operating on the same budget we inherited. Our tax cuts and budget savings were not passed until August of 1981. The first tax cut didn't become effective until October of 1981, so that made it only one and a quarter percent for the year, and the full tax cut didn't go into effect until 1983.

Lester Thurow, an economist often seen and quoted, said in October of 1982 just before recovery began that: ``The engines of economic growth have shut down here and across the globe, and they are likely to stay that way for years to come . . .'' That's right, he said years.

I can only see a modest or anemic recovery coming as a result of the recent declines in interest rates and some pickup in consumer buying.'' And that's right, he said anemic. Well, again, I would have thought he should have known better how to recognize anemia.

What actually happened? From strength in autos and construction and renewed leadership in high technology, from a rebirth in productivity and surging investment to the creation of 6 million new jobs, America is in the midst of the best economic expansion in over 30 years. And, my friends, you ain't seen nothin' yet.

Now, also, 1 year ago we put into place a real job training program that substitutes the make-work policies of the past with training for real jobs in the marketplace. Over 700,000 people have been served by the Job Training Partnership Act, with a job placement rate in excess of 70 percent. Next year we'll do better; we'll serve a million people.

Commitments to the venture capital industry increased sixfold from 1980 to 1983. Business investment has risen almost 26 percent during this recovery, faster than any postwar recovery and more than double the rate of any recovery since 1958. The U.S. Patent Office records indicate that there have been, on average, about 6,000 more patent applications filed each year of this administration than during each year of the previous administration. New business incorporations set a record last year and will probably do so again this year. And private research is growing strongly, with the computer industry's 20-percent annual increase in research and development expenditures for 1983 to '85 leading the way.

Just as many failed to foresee when I was growing up how dramatically the invention of radio would transform our economy, so are many today ignoring how technological breakthroughs in computers, robotics, biotechnology, and information processing will revolutionize our economy with new jobs, products, and progress in the future. Our economy is no longer, as some believe, an old and quivering thing in the industrial age; it's being transformed into a strapping young adolescent, flexing its muscles in the increasingly advanced technological age.

Our secret weapon is the power of productivity. We've seen efforts to expand productivity pay off right here in Detroit for your automobile industry. New leadership by management, with aggressive, wise investments in new technology, together with strong, spirited cooperation by labor, have enabled Chrysler to expand productivity from 10.2 vehicles per employee per year in 1980, to nearly 20 vehicles per employee this year.

Other currents of progress are gathering momentum and will make our economy and society stronger and more successful. Three years ago, we established a National Commission on Excellence in Education, then went forth to lead a grassroots crusade to restore in our schools needed discipline, new emphasis on basics, merit pay for teachers, greater parental involvement, and standards of excellence that again sought the best for America.

After 20 years of steady decline, scholastic aptitude test scores have risen 2 of the last 3 years, and this year's jump is the biggest in 21 years. And that's just a start. Young Americans are trying harder, they're doing better, and they can and will do better still. Their improvement should give us confidence that our work force will continue to grow more productive and more competitive in a fast-changing world.

And something else is invigorating America, giving us new hope for our future. Those guiding values of mind and heart and spirit -- our faith, our love for family and neighborhood, our belief in peace through strength, and our commitment to protect the freedom which is our legacy as Americans -- all have gained a new sense of worth in our lives, all are infusing America with the bounce of confidence and optimism that many thought we'd lost.

This new spirit is not only rewarding in its own right; it, too, helps our economy, helps our productivity, when men and women from labor and management come together in the workplace with renewed confidence in what they can do by pulling together as a team. In 1980, with Washington in charge, all they ever did was fumble. Well, in 1984 the people are back in charge, and America is scoring touchdowns again. And I think the world is about to learn that once we Americans put our minds to it and are provided the proper tools and equipment, we can outproduce, outsell, and outcompete anybody, anywhere in the world.

Now, all of us know our work is not yet done. We must help all those in agriculture and in the industries not back on their feet to participate fully in the expansion. And I pledge to you that I won't rest until every American who wants a job can find a job.

But my message to this nation is: We can meet this challenge together, and we will, because all of us are creating something new and very much better than before. Not only are Americans working again, America is working again.

We see what progress opportunity is bringing, and so we know that for our future nothing less than an American opportunity society will do. But we won't create those opportunities until we simplify our tax system to bring yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up; extend the full benefits of IRA's to spouses working in the home, as well as those working outside the home; pass enterprise zones legislation to restore distressed areas such as you have here in Detroit; couple enterprise zones with a youth opportunity wage to help teenagers learn skills and escape dependency and get on the economic ladder; go forward with initiatives to help public housing residents purchase their dwellings and take on the responsibility of home ownership; make America's educational system a great center of leadership for excellence; and summon all our skills and determination to push back the frontiers in space, technology, and science.

Everything that we've done, everything we mean to do, is to give the American people opportunities to make this great, free nation, greater and freer still. And that's why the choice in 1984 is so clear, because my opponent's policies would take us off the path toward an opportunity society and put us back on the path toward defeatism, decline, and despair.

My opponent, who opposed our tax program, said it would be murderously inflationary -- before inflation went down; said there would be no recovery -- before recovery began; and then said recovery would be only anemic -- before the strongest economic expansion in 30 years; and now says there's no denying that the deficit must be reduced with tax increases. Well, forgive me, but judging from the record of those who are philosophically or constitutionally opposed to what we're doing, we might be better off if we consulted astrologers about what the deficit will be in 1989.

But there are two things we do know that are not a matter of prediction: First, my opponent is committed to large spending increases and a tax increase equivalent to $1,800 per household, and, second, those policies, which he has supported all his political life, gave America an economic hangover that we must never, ever suffer through again.

The differences and the choice for the future can be summed up this way: He put his faith in more power for the Government; we place ours in more opportunity for the people. He sees America wringing her hands; we see America using her hands. We see America -- or he sees America divided by envy, each of us challenging our neighbor's success; we see an America inspired and uniting for opportunity, all of us challenging the best in ourselves. We believe in knowing when opportunity knocks, and he goes out of his way to knock opportunity.

Thank you for welcoming me back to Detroit, for giving me this chance to speak with you. And thank you for what you're doing to make America the source of all the dreams and opportunities she was placed on this good Earth to provide. God bless you all.

Mr. Fisher. Mr. President, the first question, of course, would be about the automobile industry, being in Detroit. The question is, 4 years ago when you successfully ran for the Presidency you said you wanted to help the auto industry. During an interview last month, you suggested the auto unions should show wage restraint and to aim at higher industry productivity. It appears the UAW and General Motors have achieved that goal. Now, what happens to the remainder of that equation, extension of voluntary restraints on Japanese autos until the yen-dollar misalignment and other problems with Japan are resolved?

Well, I think for one thing, and some figures -- I know I threw a lot of statistics at you in there, but I think also when the auto industry's unemployment was up where I said it was, today it's down to 6.4 percent. And, yes, I guess I made a general statement when I knew the negotiations were going to begin. But with our fight against inflation, I just hope that everybody in the marketplace will keep inflation in mind and observe some restraint to make sure that we don't turn that tiger loose again.

Now, with regard to the voluntary restraints, they were put on by the Japanese industry itself and, believe me, totally voluntarily. Their Minister Abe had come here, and we met in the Oval Office and talked, and I told him our situation as frankly as I could, and what we were up against, and he went back, and very shortly they announced their willingness to have a voluntary restraint on imports. We never at any time asked for that. And we've since made great progress with Prime Minister Nakasone, who I believe is sincerely dedicated. He's got some political problems, I can understand that -- [laughter] -- with his legislature, and he is working hard.

We just had meetings recently in which we have probably increased the beef exports to Japan more than double over the next 4 years. And they again, without any urging from us, they modified somewhat, but held their voluntary restraint. And I'm hoping that they will continue. But I don't happen to believe in protectionism. There are times when necessarily, to let some industry that has been overwhelmed by some happening, let it get back on its feet, but for the most part I believe in free and fair trade because protectionism is a two-way street.

And again, I believe with what our industry is -- the automobile industry is doing, and the product they have -- I think parents out there ought to argue with their young people when their first car time comes along and they start looking at foreign brands, because I think we're making better than anybody's making.

The President. I'm having an echo or something up here that gives me trouble, Max. I'm having awful trouble with this writing, too. [Laughter] Oh, what was it like to meet Mr. Gromyko, were my talks constructive, and do I think we could become friends?

I don't know whether we could become friends, or whether that's important, but I think the talk was very constructive. And all of us in Washington are very encouraged by the outcome of those talks. And we made it very plain: We don't like their system; they don't like ours. We're not out to change their system, and they better not try to change ours. But we are the two superpowers, and between us we could, if we got careless, we could destroy the world.

But by the same token, if we decide to stand together on some issues that should be of interest to both of us, namely, reduction and hopefully elimination of nuclear weapons, we can save the world. And I think that they've gone home with a recognition that we're looking at them realistically but, at the same time, we are ready to join with them in approaching this principal problem of runaway armaments in the world.

America. We've always tried to help our friends out and help developing countries. But I tell you, from the old days of just throwing money out there and not knowing where it went, we're trying to do it in a way now that will enable them to become self-sustaining and build their economy.

The President. Am I going to put nuclear wastes in Mississippi? Well, our director of energy has said that we just were not going to do anything against the State's will, and having been a Governor myself of a State, I'm a great believer in States rights.

The President. Do I think I'm better than Mondale? No, I don't think in this country anyone thinks that you're better than anyone else. I just think that I should keep on being President for 4 more years.

The President. Oh, here's a question I have to answer. And I know the people behind me, after the signal they just gave, will be very happy. The young lady wants to know, am I going to raise taxes? No.

The President. Thank you very much, and thank you, Trent, for that introduction. I was having so much fun listening, I kind of hated to get up here. [Laughter] Thank all of you for a most heartwarming welcome.

It's great to be in Gulfport, and greetings to all of you who come from the delta, the home of the outstanding Congressman Webb Franklin. Webb can't be with us here tonight, because he's up there with my friend Billy Mounger, having a fundraiser up in Jackson -- carry on so he can be back there again in the Congress.

House of Representatives, has worked with skill and devotion. And I know it's a great uphill battle and a very difficult one, but just as he remarked about a certain Speaker of the House of Representatives, wouldn't it be wonderful to be calling Trent Lott the majority whip?

Senate, and Thad Cochran is in the first rank of that majority, and that's why he's there. He and some other stalwarts are battling against those who are still out for the old-fashioned idea of spending your money faster than you can send it in.

But it's great to be back in the South. You know, I'm always happy when I visit this part of the country, maybe because you make me feel so much at home. You in the South have always given our country more than its share of greatness and courage. Here are the traditions and values that shaped our land. Here is steadiness of purpose, fidelity to ideals, love of country. Our opponents may be ready to ignore this region, but Vice President Bush and I happen to consider that the South is worth respecting, worth listening to, and, yes, worth fighting for.

Four years ago, the economy of the South and of all America was in a shambles. In just 5 years, taxes had nearly doubled. The average monthly mortgage payments more than doubled. And the real after-tax income of the average American actually began to decline. From 1979 through 1980, just 2 years, working Americans' weekly earnings declined in real terms by 8.8 percent.

Our defenses had grown so weak that many of our planes were too old to fly. And those that weren't too old couldn't fly for lack of spare parts or lack of pilots. Many of our ships couldn't leave port.

This great nation is moving forward again, and we're not going back to that unhappy past. We've knocked inflation down from 12.4 percent to 4.2. Productivity is up, consumer spending is up, and take-home pay is up. In contrast to that 8.8 percent decline in real weekly earnings that I mentioned, in the last 2 years they've risen 3.2 percent. You tell me whose policies are more fair to the working people of America. During the past 20 months, we've created 6 million new jobs.

That was just 2 months before the start of the best recovery in postwar history. That's why when I hear some of the projections they make for what it's going to be like in 1989, they're blowing smoke. They don't know what it's going to be like in 1989. It all adds up to a simple lesson: Don't trust the professional pessimists. [Laughter] Trust the American people.

My friends, I believe our great nation has turned the corner. The shadows are behind us, and the bright sunshine of hope and opportunity lies ahead. But I wouldn't want to take that for granted, so let me just ask you: Do you feel better off than you did 4 years ago?

The President. They call it bitter medicine, but that's just because they think they can get us to swallow anything. [Laughter] I think the word shrimp means something different to our opponents than it does to Gulfport. To you, it's a livelihood; to them, it's your paycheck after they get their hands on it.

The President. We all watched the Olympics this summer, and we cheered to see American athletes go for the gold. Well, making our economy bear the burden of their tax hike would be like having a coach tell an Olympic swimmer to do laps carrying an anvil or a runner to sprint with a ball and chain.

We'll fight for enterprise zones, to help Americans in disadvantaged areas get off unemployment and welfare and start climbing the economic ladder. And we'll keep government under control by working for a line-item veto. I had it as a Governor, 43 Governors have it; the President needs it.

A southerner named Thomas Jefferson, back shortly after the Constitution was ratified and put into place, said it had one lack. It needed a clause to prevent the Federal Government from borrowing. Jefferson was right, and it's time we recognized it.

Forgive me, but Harry Truman believed, with F.D.R. before him and John Kennedy after him, in strength abroad and self-reliance at home. Now, to all those Democrats here today -- and I hope there are many -- there would have to be, in this place. [Laughter] And I hope that you feel that under its present leadership, the Democratic Party no longer stands behind America's role in the world, that it no longer represents the working men and women. So, we say to you -- and I say this as one who, for most of my adult life, was also a Democrat: Come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity.

Add your strength to ours, and all of us can build something new for America, something far better than before. And it will be a true bipartisan achievement between millions of patriotic Democrats who know they can no longer follow the leadership of that party.

As our economy grows, we'll need to go forward with bedrock values that have always sustained the people of the South -- the values of faith, family, neighborhood, and good, hard work. And together, we're already making an impressive start.

No crime strikes harder at the heart of America than drug smuggling, for drugs tear families apart and turn healthy, productive Americans into sick people unable even to care for themselves -- men and women who often turn to robbery to pay for their habit. We've established the National Narcotics Border Interdiction System, under the superb leadership of Vice President Bush, to wage war on drugs. And today drug seizures and arrests are at record levels. I know that Coast Guard men and women stationed here in Mississippi are playing a leading role in this vital effort.

In a case that just took place, days ago, the Coast Guard cutter Acushnet, right here in Gulfport, came across a fishing boat that flew no proper flag. The Acushnet pulled alongside, and five Coast Guard officers went aboard. Well, the Coast Guard officers knew for certain something was wrong when they saw that all the hatches had been nailed shut. In the end, they confiscated almost 4 tons of marijuana, towed the fishing boat into Gulfport, and made six arrests. I know that you'd like to join me in thanking the officers and crew of the Acushnet for a job well done.

Central America. Some would have us take a position of weakness in Central America or withdraw from the region altogether. They want to hang a ``Do Not Disturb'' sign on our border and pretend there are no problems. But that would betray the brave people of Central America and ignore our own national interests, for if Central America falls, make no mistake about it, refugees will flood our borders. I pledge to you that we will give firm support to the forces of liberty, democracy, and economic progress and that we'll do so as long as I hold this office.

Now, I know that many of you have a special interest in the great effort to defend our freedom, whether you serve in our Armed Forces, help to build our ships, or are veterans that have served our nation with pride. Let me assure you, we're determined to give America defenses that are second to none.

Since we took office, we've built up our stocks of ammunition. We've replenished our military supplies, and we've begun work on new equipment, including important new aircraft. And today America is once again giving the men and women in our Armed Forces the pay, the training, and the respect they've always deserved.

One of our proudest accomplishments concerns the Navy. In the two decades before we took office, our total fleet had been cut nearly in half. Well, we've turned that around. In the past 4 years, we've added 44 ships to the fleet, bringing the total to 523, and that's well on our way to our goal of 600. Now, many of the new ships have been built right here in Mississippi. And when I look at the sleek ships around us, once again we can say with pride: Columbia is the gem of the ocean.

The President. Well, yeah, but I can't help but remark about something that I've seen more and more at rallies of this kind all over the country: so many bright, young faces here today, so many young people. Listen, I can remember a time when the only young people that ever came to one of our rallies looked like they couldn't join anything else. [Laughter] Listen, and I see enough short haircuts that I believe there are some people here that aren't in uniform, also. But they wear the uniform every day, men and women.

And it's kind of struck me that so often you hear the -- when the young man in uniform or woman in uniform answers, you so often the proud and lilting cadence of Charleston or Memphis or Jackson or Gulfport, Biloxi. The South was the home of patriots in 1776, when a southerner wrote our Declaration of Independence. And today, more than two centuries later, the South is the home of patriots still.

Gulfport or Biloxi or wherever, maybe, if you think of it, just nod and smile and say hello, and maybe let them know how all of us feel about them. It'll make you feel real good, and I know how good it'll make them feel.

The President. Who was responsible for Lebanon. Secretary Shultz had acknowledged a responsibility himself on the air on Sunday. That was typical of George, and I appreciate it very much. But the answer to the question is, I am responsible, as I said that I was on the previous tragedy. I was responsible -- and no one else -- for our policy and our people being there.

And obviously there is an international effort going to try and find a way to apprehend, to prevent these things from happening. But how do you without knowledge beforehand of what a target is going to be or why someone, who with no regard to who they kill, is going to kill themselves in an effort to do this?

The President. No, Bill [Bill Plante, CBS News]. There, a government with whom we had relations, a government allowed this to happen. There was no war or anything else with regard to the hostages. And all I criticized the previous administration about was for our abandonment of the Shah and our allowing what happened to happen. I think it is a blot on our record.

No, it wasn't. And it wasn't because the threat had been while we were in a much less protected place, and we moved ahead of schedule into this place where the defenses were only about 75 percent complete.

The President. The only sleaze factor that I've seen in all of the things that have been going on in these 4 years, if there is one, is on the other side, with their baseless charges and accusations that have all been proven false.

Well, it's great to be in Texas again, and to be here with -- as I said a little earlier in different words -- one of Texas' greatest contributions to economic sense in Washington, Phil Gramm, and to see this Texas spirit in action here.

You know, when we were in Dallas in August, there were some of our people that were driving by the Texas Stadium, where the Cowboys play, and they were remarking about the stadium and how big it was and  all, and then they noticed the interesting way in which the top sort of was scooped out to let in the sunlight. And they mentioned this to a Texan who was with them. And he said, ``Sure, we do that so God can watch.'' Well, we can use more of that kind of spirit.

Now, there are so many things I want to talk with you about today, and just one of them is how the Texas spirit is spreading throughout the Nation. In the past 3\1/2\ years, as Phil was telling you, there's been a broad economic renewal in our country. The economy is expanding again, millions of jobs, as he told you, are being created; hundreds of thousands of new businesses are being incorporated. Inflation is down; interest rates are down, not down far enough, but at least they're moving in the right direction.

It's your government, after all, just as it's your country. And our guiding philosophy has been that you know best what's right for you. You don't need a big government in Washington to tell you what's right for you.

I look at all of you today, and I think of the people I met this morning as -- just a little while ago here, in touring this campus. And it's just so clear that the people of Brownsville are a marvelous mixture of pride and enterprise, and you have a lot to be proud of here in your city.

But we know that Brownsville and some other cities here in the Rio Grande Valley have had some special problems the past few years -- economic problems and some bad turns in the weather. And I don't want you to think for a second that you're left out of the American renaissance.

We must continue to keep forcing personal tax rates down, not up. We're going to fight for the working men and women of this country to keep a bigger share of what they earn. And as they spend it or save it, sales will go up, businesses will expand, the spirit of investment will continue to grow. Expanding businesses and new businesses will mean new jobs. And that'll mean new workers who join the work force and who pay their modest -- and I underline modest -- taxes.

But our program doesn't rest only on growth. It rests on creative new ideas that'll make the future brighter for all of us -- ideas like enterprise zones, in which the parts of a city that have known steady economic setbacks are revitalized by giving businesses tax incentives to go in and create jobs and opportunity. It's a great idea. And we're not going to stop fighting until enterprise zones flourish in those towns and cities that would benefit from them.

There are ideas that we've already been able to implement. For instance, a year ago yesterday we started a real jobs program that works in partnership with private employers, determining in the local areas what are the jobs that are there available for the trained workers. And, now, there used to be a costly Federal program called CETA, and lots of its jobs were just make-work, and the people who held them didn't receive any sound training. Well, in the first 6 months of our program, the Job Training Partnership helped train 500,000 people; and its placement in jobs, its rate is over 70 percent of those that go through the training, already placed in employment. Now, that's a program that works. And it's a success not just because it involves private employers who know the marketplace. It's a success because it operates on the principle that people don't want a handout; they want some help that will enable them to operate in the world as the independent souls they want to be.

You know, there's been a lot of confusion about this word ``help.'' It's an election year, and maybe some people think it's in their interest to create a little confusion. But our philosophy has always been to help people achieve prosperity by giving them back their freedom, and to help those who truly need assistance, even if it's only for a while, as they try to get their share of the American dream.

Now, here at this school, for instance, there are a number of students who are receiving some sort of Federal financial aid for their tuition, and, believe me, they're students who really need that help. And their student loans haven't been cut. In fact, we recently asked the Congress to increase to $3,000 the grant aids for the truly needy.

But we've also made it our policy to help only those with a clear, demonstrable need. Those who can do it on their own shouldn't be taking the money we need to help those who couldn't receive a higher education without it. And, believe me, I know whereof I speak, because a long time ago I was on a campus getting a diploma, and I had to work my way through.

Now, some of the people in this valley have really been hurt by the devaluation of the peso. And because of that, last year our administration became the first ever to set up a special southwest border initiative to give you the special attention that the border cities need. And after last winter's freeze, we directed the Farmers Home Administration to make more loans to local families without adequate housing. Now, this has encouraged new construction and employment in the valley.

We freed up more Federal funds for small business loans for farmers affected by the freeze. And the city of Brownsville, for example, was given funds to help build a supermarket in a deprived part of the city, and that construction is to create 43 permanent jobs and 30 construction jobs. We also provided financial assistance to help with bilingual programs in the schools of the valley.

Now, these are just three demonstrations of prudent Federal assistance in a case of clear and demonstrable need. In the past year alone, our administration has committed over a hundred million dollars to the valley.

The money that we sent for the supermarket here in the valley was matched by $800,000 in private funds. And there's Project HOPE, another public-private partnership. Earlier I toured the labs where local students are being trained to work as health-care professionals here and in other border cities. And I know that program is going to be a great success and a great example of public and private cooperation.

Now, I've been talking on about the economy -- something I tend to do because I think a healthy economy will truly transform the lives of the people of our country. But there's just one more thing I'd like to say about it. Sometimes it takes patience when you try something new. But I tell you, well, it's hard to hang on when times are tough. But I tell you with complete conviction, that if we stay on the right track nationally, then the people in the towns of the valley will make a comeback. It won't happen overnight, but it will happen in Brownsville as it has happened in much of the rest of the Nation.

But let me say in closing that even though economic matters are important -- well, the old, old saying is true: Man does not live by bread alone. Man lives by belief, by faith in things that are larger than himself. We really almost diminish all the things we are when we limit the debate to money and how it's distributed in our country. We lose a sense of the mystery in men's souls and the mystery of life.

I'm proud that we've tried the past few years to softly encourage respect for the traditional values of faith in God and respect for the family. The family, after all, is the main generator of the good things that people bring to the society at large. We're nothing without the family, and we've tried to reflect that knowledge in all that we've done in the past few years.

Respect is an important thing. The United States never wants to be a bully or a braggart, but it's important to show the people of the world that we stand for something and we're proud of it. And though we're patient when provoked, well, Uncle Sam is a friendly old man, but he has a spine of steel.

The men and women who protect this country never do. But we improved pay, improved their standard of living, and we started saluting them again. And morale is higher than it's ever been, and reenlistments are up. And I'll tell you, whenever you happen to see one of those young men and women in uniform on the street, if you just maybe give them a smile and a hello and indicate that you know how proud they make us, I think you'd feel just great after you did it, and I know they'd feel great.

For that we must all be truly thankful, and I thank you so much for your wonderful hospitality. I go away from here feeling a little taller and, believe me, very proud, indeed. Thank you very much, and vaya con Dios. Thank you.

Prior to his remarks, the President went to the college's Dr. Cortez Allied Health Building, where he received a briefing on Project HOPE by Albert A. Besteiro, president of Texas Southernmost College, and Pat Hobbs, dean of the vocational technical division. While at the building, he also toured a medical technology laboratory.

The President. Thank you -- and back in Corpus Christi visiting you again. I've campaigned here on more than one occasion, and I always notice how proudly the flag waves in the south Texas wind. It sort of says to visitors that the people here take patriotism seriously.

Well, together we're going to make certain that our country always stands for freedom and our flag continues to wave proudly. There is a new spirit in America, and I'm pleased to call it the new patriotism. All over the country, Americans are casting away the pessimism and self-doubt of the last decade. We're coming together, people of every race, religion, and ethnic background, rejoicing in the freedom and the opportunity of this great land.

Four years ago when I was last here, I asked you for your support. I promised that if you so honored me, I would do my very best to help all of you to make America strong again, to rebuild her economy, strengthen her defenses, and to restore her confidence in the future. Well, it's been tough, but together we have, all of us and all of you, made a new beginning. We still have more to do, but I think we're headed in the right direction. And I think this election offers the clearest choice in 50 years -- a choice of whether we go forward together to build on our own progress, or whether we go back to the defeatism and despair of the unhappy past.

They want to keep moving forward to jobs and opportunity, forward to stable prices and economic expansion, forward to a safer and a stronger America. I think the American people are proud of the recovery they built and confident about making tomorrow even better.

You know, those who are running down this comeback story, who are trying to make us fear our future, are running down the talent and the courage of the American people. And I just have a hunch that come election day, they're going to be sorry they did.

Unhappily, there are those who still believe they can divide us against ourselves by appealing to envy, promising something for nothing, and the American people aren't buying that anymore. And something else no one's buying is any scheme for raising Federal taxes based on promises from fast-talking politicians that somebody else will pay the bill.

Raising taxes will not encourage people in Texas to work harder and be more productive; raising taxes will not stimulate investment; raising taxes will not give business the incentive to innovate and to make their companies more competitive. America doesn't need higher taxes. America doesn't need my opponent to rescue us from prosperity. America needs more growth.

Those who still need help will get help, and every American who wants a job will find a job as we keep on growing. The politicians and the economic gurus who gave us stagflation -- stagflation, that took some doing, you know, to produce both economic decline and inflation all at the same time. And those people claimed that our program wouldn't work. They said it wouldn't work before it had even been passed. And incidentally, when you meet somebody that maybe wonders why you're supporting Phil Gramm, you might remind him that one of the two names on the legislation that brought about the tax cuts and the economic progress and the reduction in government spending -- the names were Del Latta and Phil Gramm. It was their bill.

Those same people warned us that cutting tax rates would lead to super inflation. Well, now that our economy is strong and growing, they're a little stuck, so they tell us now, it won't last. Well, I think it's about time we quit listening to politicians and so-called economic experts who keep selling America short. Of course, when one is so tied to the politics of the past and focusing on the negative, it's hard to have a vision of a better future.

Well, 4 years ago we were not only suffering terrible economic difficulties, our country was being counted out as a world leader. Our friends and adversaries alike looked at us as a nation in decline. Advocates of weakness -- people who blamed the United States for all the troubles of the world -- they claimed a weaker America would be a safer America because no one would have anything to fear from us. Well, no one has anything to fear from us if they mind their own business.

You know, those dedicated individuals in our Armed Forces, they were being treated as if they were at fault for world tensions. Well, we've turned that situation around, too. Today we're safer and more secure because America is rebuilding its defensive strength. It is strength, not weakness, that will ensure a peaceful future.

You know, President Eisenhower knew this when he wrote, ``To be strong nationally is not a sin, it's a necessity.'' And a lot of our strength is based on the new pride in those who are serving in the Armed Forces. Morale's at a high point, and I'm told by their commanders that we've got the finest group of young people in the history of our country serving today. They're better educated.

They're more dedicated than ever before. And as long as I'm President, they will never doubt that to the depth of our national soul, we appreciate the job they're doing, and we're proud of each and every one of them.

You know, contrary to what the liberals would like us to believe, by restoring America's military strength, which the previous administration had permitted to erode, we're now in a better position to negotiate with any potential adversary. And just last week, I initiated a new effort to convince the Soviet Union to return to serious arms reduction negotiations.

I'm optimistic that if we remain firm, the Soviet Union will find it in its interest to join with us in reducing the number of weapons now threatening both our peoples. But we're not going to achieve this or anything else with self-doubt and unilateral concessions. I can assure you that we're trying our hardest to convince the Soviets to bargain realistically, to reach an agreement that is fair and verifiable.

And I think that Minister Gromyko has returned to the Soviet Union with a better understanding of what we are, who we are, and what we're looking forward to achieving in the way of peace in the world. It's incumbent for everyone to remember that it was not the United States that walked away from the negotiating table on arms reductions, it was the Soviet Union that walked away.

Now, in situations like this, we all stand together. A stronger America doesn't just mean better weapons; it means having the strength of character to meet our commitments. It means having the will and the political leadership to protect our national interests. And it means not shirking our responsibility to protect our children's future, even when it might be easier to ignore a potential threat.

When we got to Washington, the enemies of freedom were on the move. They were encouraged by what they saw as a lack of will in the previous administration. Central America was headed for a crisis. Well, I'm proud to say that we prevented a major catastrophe, something that might have endangered the security and the well-being of our country for many years to come. In the last 4 years, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression. And, in one case, with quick and decisive action, we protected hundreds of American medical students from a potential hostile situation and restored freedom to the people of Grenada.

As was true in our efforts to turn around the economy, our struggle to protect Central America from Communist aggression -- that effort was hampered by obstacles thrown in our path by some liberals in the Democratic Party. And please note I said ``some.'' They are out of step, and some of the leadership, out of step with the millions of patriotic Democrats in this land, the rank-and-file Democrats, and we're reaching out to all concerned Democrats and Independents, asking them to come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity and a secure America. I know they can no longer follow the advice of those who have taken this other course.

Now, it's important that we elect right-thinking men and women to the Congress. And that's why it's also vital for you to send Phil Gramm to the United States Senate, so Texas can have the same high quality representation that Senator John Tower has been providing you. We couldn't have accomplished what we've accomplished if we had not had a majority in the Senate. I need Phil Gramm. America needs Phil Gramm.

And I can't leave here without noticing something -- here on either side of us these bands, these young people, these high school people, so many of you young people here in the crowd. For the rest of us who aren't that young anymore -- [laughter] -- and my friends and fellow senior citizens down here from the Hill Haven Nursing Home, I'm delighted you're here -- what we know is that all I've been talking about up here and all that this election is about is what kind of country we're going to turn over to those wonderful young people of ours. So many of us started out in a country where we knew no matter how beset we were with poverty or what seemed to be lack of opportunity or anything, we knew that anything was possible in this country of ours. And we have a sacred obligation to see that every succeeding generation sees that same kind of an America where there's no ceiling on where they can go and what they can do.

So, on election day, get everybody out to the polls. Don't let anyone -- and listen, when I say polls, I mean those voting polls. [Laughter] Don't get get swept away with those public opinion polls. President Dewey told me not to look at the polls and get overconfident. [Laughter] So, just pretend we're one vote behind, and everyone has to get out there and vote.

I've covered a good deal of territory since we started this campaign year, and everywhere I go I see the same kind of spirit, confidence, and pride. America has left uncertainty behind, along with inflation, stagnation, and weakness. And on November 6th we're going to leave behind, once and for all, those politicians who gave us economic decline and national malaise.

In 1980 we promised the American people a new beginning. Our opponents and their economic gurus were saying that it couldn't be done even before we got started. And they were right. If we'd stuck to their policy, it couldn't have been done.

States in the form of block grants. Sixty-two categorical Federal grants have been put into 10 block grants. And that reduced our own administrative overhead for managing them from 3,000 employees to 600. And it also reduced the number of pages of regulations for all of them from 885 pages to 30 pages. Instead of smothering our most productive citizens with redtape, we've trimmed away useless and counterproductive regulations, as you can see.

Our aim has been to unleash the most productive power the world has ever known, the genius and energy of the American people. Our opponents, who had their chance to prove their stuff and failed miserably, placed their faith in Washington programs, high taxes, Federal bureaucracy, and government mandates. Well, we place our faith in the people. Our efforts are aimed not at harnessing the American people -- leaving the politicians holding the reins -- but, instead, on freeing them. And they haven't let us down.

There's a new spirit of teamwork alive in America. Management, labor, and State and local government have figured out that we're all on the same team, the American team. And isn't it good to see America, instead of punting on third down, scoring touchdowns again?

After several years of decline, productivity is rising again. Real weekly earnings in the last 2 years have increased by 3.2 percent. But in 1979 and '80, in just those 2 years, they actually fell by 8.8 percent, the worst drop since World War II. You tell me whose policies are more fair to the working people of America.

Small business opportunities are exploding, and a whole new class of entrepreneurs, representing a cross section of our people, is emerging. In what Europe is calling the American miracle, almost 7 million new jobs have been created. Auto sales are up, interest rates are on the way down, and growth is robust and inflation is low.

The President. Well, things are going so well, our opponents in this election don't seem to know what to talk about. So, they've decided to offer the voters a bold new idea. And what is this new proposal? Raise your taxes. [Laughter] Isn't that novel? [Laughter] Now, about the only difference between today and 12 years ago is that back then George McGovern's big idea was to give everybody a thousand dollars. [Laughter] Today they want to tax more than that away from you -- and then some.

In foreign policy, the differences are just as great. Both the political parties want to reach arms control agreements with the Soviet Union. The difference lies in the fact that we believe it's best to negotiate with America's adversaries from a position of strength, as you've been told. And our opponents, as Vice President Bush has observed, keep mistaking weakness for peace.

And having mentioned George -- and believe me, I am deeply grateful for what I've sat here and heard him say, but I'm grateful for more than that -- let me just tell you that Texas couldn't have given a President a better Vice President than George Bush. He is in every sense of the word an invaluable part of our administration, and we thank you for lending him to us.

You've loaned me another great Texan: Jim Baker. This local boy keeps things running smoothly at the White House, and I rely on him as Chief of Staff and my right-hand man. And of course, this is nothing new. Americans have been relying on Texans since about 1845.

All of us, like you, believe that we must be firm in our commitments and firm in our resolve to protect American interests. Almost a year ago, I was faced with a tough decision. Communist thugs had just murdered Maurice Bishop and other leaders of the Government of Grenada. The lives of numbers of American medical students were in jeopardy. The governments of nearby island democracies, with little military protection of their own, asked for our help. We took action, and yet it took weeks for certain would-be American leaders to decide whether our action had been justified or not.

Even after seeing the overwhelming display of gratitude from the people of Grenada, there were those who cast aspersions on what we did there, suggesting that it was in some way akin to what the Soviet Union was doing in Afghanistan. Well, I've had some time to reflect on what happened in Grenada, and I can tell you we have no apologies. Our military personnel acted in the finest tradition of our country. They are, truly, heroes -- every one of them.

Four years ago, our adversaries and even our friends were counting us out. Defeatism was the order of the day. Well, America is back, and we are rebuilding our defenses. And we have again assumed our role as the leading force for freedom in the world. We have a forceful and articulate individual, Jeane Kirkpatrick, representing us in the United Nations.

When we came to Washington, we faced a near crisis in Central America, a crisis that could, over time, have resulted in a direct threat to our southern border. Despite the roadblocks thrown in our way by some liberals in the House of Representatives, we've prevented what might have become or mushroomed into a major catastrophe in Central America. The danger isn't gone, but I'm proud to say not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression in the world in these last 3\1/2\ years.

It's vital that we make certain the voters understand how important it is to elect a Congress which will support our efforts to keep America growing and building, to keep America strong and proud. Now, there's some fine people running for the House here in Texas, and I know you're putting out the maximum effort to get them elected. I understand that your voter registration efforts have been tremendous. Senator Tower and so many others of you are doing a fantastic job.

Phil has proven himself a courageous representative of the values in which we so fervently believe. Never before, I believe, in our Governor's [government's]\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  history has someone decided, having just been elected to office, that he could no longer follow the dictates of the leadership of that party, and he changed. But he did more than that. He then resigned and returned to the voters who had sent him there as a member of one party and said, ``Look, you can register your approval or disapproval of what I've done; you'll have to vote on me again in a special election.'' And they sent him back to Washington, as they should.

Winston Churchill once said, when he changed parties in his country, he said, ``Some men change principle for party, and some men change party for principle.'' Phil has proven himself a courageous representative of -- in all of this, as I say, in what we fervently believe.

Democrats and Independents, asking them to come with us and walk down this new path of hope and opportunity. I know there are many here tonight. I'm very proud to know that you would come here. There was a certain sacrifice at the box office for you to do so. But to have you here -- and I just want to say to all of you, having been a Democrat most of my life myself and found that there came a day when I could no longer follow the policies of the leadership of that party, I know that throughout this country there are millions of rank-and-file, patriotic Democrats who love this country, who want the same things that we want for the country, and yet who find themselves unable to bless the decisions of the policymakers at the head of their own party today.

The great strength of our cause reflects our devotion to values that are so dear to the American people: respect for work; love of family, neighborhood, and country; and faith in God. And if all of us remain true to these values, nothing can hold America back.

And now -- if I can, now, let me just go back to those young men and women that I was telling you about. I know sometimes you're going to see them on the street in the uniform and so forth. If you haven't thought about it before, maybe you kind of smile and say hello and even shake their hands. You'll feel real good after you've done it. And I know how good they'll feel. They're what George Marshall said of their grandfathers. Back in World War II, when somebody asked George Marshall what was the secret of our success, what was our secret weapon, and General George Marshall said, ``The best damned kids in the world.'' And that's what we have again.

Local communities form the foundation of our Nation. Our Federal system of government is based on the determination of the people of the United States to govern themselves, to the extent possible, in small entities capable of responding quickly and effectively to particular community values and needs.

Throughout the United States, many communities have established programs to help citizens identify and discharge the responsibilities involved in leadership positions assumed in their own communities. These programs have produced thousands of talented and well-trained local leaders who are aware of the unique problems confronting their communities and are well-prepared to devise innovative solutions for those problems.

Each year an estimated nine million people in this country sustain injuries which require immediate medical attention. Two groups of dedicated Americans provide this kind of medical care: emergency department personnel, who provide care in trauma centers, and emergency medical technicians and paramedics, most of them volunteers, who provide prehospital emergency care.

These emergency medical personnel throughout our Nation are specialists trained to handle illnesses and injuries which threaten life or limb. They must be available daily on a 24-hour basis to all patients who need medical aid. The efforts of these trained men and women have saved thousands of lives.

Vast improvements in emergency medicine have been made in the past fifteen years, and emergency department personnel have completed extensive training and continuing education to keep up with these improvements. The Departments of Transportation and Health and Human Services, together with State and local governments, have provided radio communications systems, equipment, and training courses for emergency medical personnel. These advances make it possible to respond quickly to the needs of the injured and to transport them to appropriate hospital emergency medical facilities within the ``Gold Hour'' after the injury. This is the time when emergency medical care is most effective in saving lives.

We salute the Nation's emergency medical services personnel: those who staff the ambulances, those who provide medical control, and those physicians and nurses in the trauma centers whose daily efforts are devoted to emergency medicine. We all depend upon their skills and dedication.

The war spawned a new breed of warrior, the aviator, who engaged in single combat high above the conflict on the ground. The truly remarkable Americans who pioneered in this new form of military combat defended the skies of Europe with valor and distinction until the end of the war in 1918.

There are about sixty known surviving Aces of World War I. They meet periodically to share memories of a conflict familiar to many Americans only through history books. All Americans should express their gratitude and respect for these gallant air warriors for their extraordinary feats in defense of liberty.

Progress in medical science and the generally rising level of health care available from birth onwards have been among our Nation's greatest achievements in this century. As a result, more people are living to an old age than ever before.

The corollary to this achievement is an increase in the incidence of chronic illnesses affecting people as they age. Those who suffer these illnesses may require care over a long period of time, a fact which tests our Nation's ability to provide older Americans the kind of care that will allow them to continue to live independently in their communities.

The rapid growth of adult day care centers is a reflection of increasing community interest in developing long-term alternatives in community settings. Adult day care centers provide comprehensive personal, medical, and therapeutic help and also assist older people and the handicapped in achieving maximum levels of independence and social interaction. They provide much needed support for families as they care for their loved ones. Many adult day care centers throughout the country have recognized the vital needs of older people and the desire that many of them have to remain in their own homes as long as possible.

America as never before is the land of opportunity for all our children. But for some, that opportunity is denied by illness or disability. Although our health care system is the envy of the world, disease or accident can still deprive many of our children of this birthright of opportunity.

Today, we celebrate tremendous accomplishments in child health. The significant and steady decline in infant mortality, and the great strides in preventing such diseases as polio or measles, are proud examples of what can be accomplished by a free and vibrant medical care system.

Past achievements only suggest that greater things can be accomplished in the future. We must dedicate ourselves to making further progress in reducing infant mortality for our whole society, and we must also seek to reduce infant mortality in those areas where the level is higher than the national average.

There also are severely handicapped infants who require not only the love and support of their families but who also must have the help of many groups in their communities -- doctors, hospitals, health departments, providers of health care, and others -- if they are to thrive.

There are teenage mothers and teenagers who become involved with abuse of alcohol and other substances -- all these young people need our help and attention. During the coming year, it is my hope that we can continue to demonstrate what a free, energetic, and enlightened society can do cooperatively to protect and improve the health status of our Nation's most vital asset, our children.

This Nation has been blessed with a rich variety of wildlife, including more than fifty kinds of hawks, falcons, eagles, vultures, and owls. Known as birds of prey, these species possess extraordinary beauty, strength, and power of flight. Inhabiting virtually every territory, often coexisting with man, they are a vital part of many natural systems and contribute significantly to the quality of the human environment.

From time immemorial, the history of mankind has been intertwined with birds of prey. The silent flight of the owl, the breathtaking swoop of the falcon across a mountain cliff, the effortless soaring of vultures over the plains, and the often spectacular passage of hawks on migration have captured the imagination of Americans. Since 1782, the Bald Eagle has served as the National Emblem of the United States.

As our country continues to grow and develop, we must remember our natural heritage and the need to provide future generations with opportunities to experience the excitement of a majestic eagle, a plummeting falcon, or the haunting call of an owl at night. The prosperity of this Nation rests upon both our material wealth and those values that enrich the quality of life. The preservation and propagation of our magnificent birds of prey will mean that these noble creatures will continue to awe and inspire generations of Americans yet unborn.

The preservation and improvement of the residential, commercial, and other facilities in neighborhoods throughout our country are essential to the strength of America's families and businesses. These have been and will continue to be the goals of the Neighborhood Housing Services programs.

Neighborhood Housing Services programs are partnerships of local residents, business leaders, and government officials. They have generated over two billion dollars in reinvestment funds to revitalize and preserve our country's neighborhoods. The success of these programs depends largely on the spirit of cooperation and voluntarism that is a hallmark of American life.

Ms. Pryor is a writer and biologist. She is the author of three books and numerous articles on marine mammals and learning and behavior. From 1976 to 1982, she was an independent New York-based consultant on marine mammals, and on animal behavior and training to both private and government agencies, including the United States Tuna Foundation, the National Science Foundation, the National Zoological Park, and the National Geographic Society.

The Department of Agriculture has been reshaping its conservation programs using the 1980 appraisal and 1982 program as its blueprint. We look forward to steadily increasing gains in the fight against soil erosion and other resource problems in the years ahead.

Well, I'm glad that our team is all here together today to remember an important commitment that we made to America's future. Four years ago our country faced the gravest economic crisis since the Great Depression, and many in this town were ready to throw in the towel and count America out. But not the Republican Party, not our team.

We said there's nothing wrong with America that our people can't and won't make right if government just will stand aside and get out of the way. So, we reached out to the people. We asked them to join with us to rescue our beloved nation, make a new beginning, and help America become strong and successful again.

Specifically, we pledged to work for cuts in growth of spending, to reduce waste, fraud, and abuse to a minimum, and dampen the fires of inflation while protecting those in need; for an across-the-board individual income tax cut and increased incentives for saving, investment, and capital recovery to put America back on the road to prosperity; for more private investment and permanent jobs, especially in our inner cities; and for strengthened defenses so America could have a credible foreign policy again and assure peace through strength here at home and greater stability in the world.

Well, with the support of the people, all of us have made some important changes. Federal spending growth, which reached a 17-percent annual rate in 1980, has been cut by nearly two-thirds. Tax rates have been cut for every working American, with new incentives for business to modernize and for entrepreneurs to start up new businesses. Next year, tax brackets will be indexed because we believe government must never again profit from inflation at the people's expense.

Unlike 4 years ago, today we're building a defensive strength. And today we're giving those brave young men and women who put their lives on the line for us the moral support, the weapons, and the equipment they need to get the job done.

We've made a new beginning, and America today is a very different place than 4 years ago. It wasn't a coincidence in 1980 that the problems of inflation, interest rates, taxes, jobs, crime, and morale in the military were all getting worse, and our future looked bleak. And believe me, it's not a coincidence today that every one of those problems is being turned around, and our future looks bright again.

Jobs, investment, and growth are all up. The morale of our enlisted men and women is up, and their readiness and ability to protect freedom and preserve peace are better than ever before. Since 1980, not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression.

Today we're telling the people the Republican Party will not rest until every American who wants a job can find a job -- from Brownsville to Buffalo to San Francisco Bay. And that's why the choice in '84 is so clear.

American people must decide whether we will go forward with the courage, the common sense, and new spirit that are making America strong again, giving us new opportunities and offering the best hope for all. Or will we turn back to the policies of high taxing and spending that weakened our economy, reduced opportunities, and brought hardship to so many?

All of us together can build on the progress we've made. We can lower everybody's tax rates further and create more jobs, rising take-home pay, and greater opportunities for all. We can extend the full benefits of IRA's to spouses working in the home, pass enterprise zones to restore distressed areas and give hope to those who are left out.

Could enterprise zones -- couple those with a youth opportunity wage to help teenagers learn skills and escape dependency, start a new life, and go forward with initiatives to help public housing residents purchase their dwellings and assume responsibility for home ownership. We can push forward new frontiers in science, space, and technology. And we can strengthen the great grassroots movement we've helped lead to make America's educational system a great center of leadership for excellence.

Our opponent's policies would take us off the new path of an opportunity society, put us back on the old path of defeatism, decline, and despair. They propose a tax increase equivalent to more than $1,800 per household. That's more than $150 each and every month of the year. It's a ball and chain around the neck of America's families and America's future.

We're building a new party, a grassroots opportunity party that seeks genuine compassion through new opportunities, new ideas, and new solutions that will mean a better life for all. And come November 6th, Americans will choose between two different teams. They can vote for the tax increase team that kicked off its campaign with a plan to take the equivalent of more than $150 a month, as I've said, from each household, a plan that will destroy growth, jobs, and bring back inflation, or they can vote for the team that wants to lower personal income tax rates, give every family more hope, so all of us can go forward together to build a better future for America.

This has been typical of what has happened ever since we've been here. And you can lay this right on the majority party in the House of Representatives. Just once, just once it would be great to have a budget on time.

Today we are at a benchmark in the employment of men and women with disabilities. We have made more progress than we would have dared dream of a century ago. But this very progress underlines the pressing needs which have not yet been met.

We have made great gains because of better training and job preparation, greater public understanding of disability, and the willingness of employers to accommodate jobs to disabled workers. We have actively encouraged this progress through programs such as equal employment opportunity and targeted tax credits. Disabled people have been given expanded opportunities for jobs with futures, but obstacles to the effective utilization of such opportunities remain, and technological advances are still beyond the reach of many who need them.

Over the course of human history, men and women in every time and place have chosen the family as the best institution for the raising and nurturing of children. Today, there is a renewed appreciation of the crucial role the family plays in producing healthy and self-confident children, who will mature into adults capable of forming the bonds of love and affection which sustain society.

Children grow best in families supported by the love of parents who pass on to them the rich moral heritage of our civilization and help develop their sense of responsibility to the larger community. Children who are confident of their own worth within a family will bring confidence and strength to our society.

National Children's Week provides an opportunity for us to reaffirm our commitment to ensuring our children a firm foundation for physical, mental, and spiritual growth. As we embrace the younger generation, let us remember that we hold the future in our hands.

A commitment to excellence in manufacturing and services is essential to our Nation's long-term economic welfare. Quality in manufacturing and services will contribute to increased productivity, reduced costs, and consumer satisfaction.

Improving the quality of American goods and services depends upon each of us. Individual workers, business managers, labor leaders, and government officials must all work to promote a standard of excellence in the public and private sectors.

To provide for a greater awareness of the need to ensure that American goods and services are of the highest quality, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 304, has designated the month of October 1984 as ``National Quality Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this event.

U.S.C. 7422(c)), I wish to inform you of my decision to extend the period of maximum efficient rate production of the naval petroleum reserves for a period of three years from April 5, 1985, the expiration of the currently authorized period of production.

Throughout this century, the United States has been the world's leader in high technology innovation and development. Because the economy of this Nation closely is tied to technological advances, maintenance of this leadership is a national priority. Americans must build on our unmatched body of technical knowledge and on our entrepreneurial spirit to bring new and competitive products to the market.

Our youth are the key to maintaining this leadership. Young Americans must receive the educational opportunities necessary to grow and develop in a high technology environment. By providing these opportunities, our national commitment to high technology development will be translated into real progress benefitting future generations.

Spina bifida is among the most common birth defects. Between one and two of every 1,000 babies in the United States are born with this problem. Infants with spina bifida may have incompletely developed spinal cords and suffer varying degrees of muscle paralysis and spine and limb deformities. Most develop hydrocephalus -- a potentially dangerous buildup of fluid and pressure within the brain.

Thirty years ago the majority of children with spina bifida died. Today, thanks to Federal and private programs of biomedical research, medical and surgical management of spina bifida has advanced to the point that nearly all children survive. But some of these survivors face various potential problems, including lack of mobility, incontinence, and learning difficulties. Once again, research has provided answers: early surgical closure of spinal defects to reduce the development of infection and hydrocephalus; improved neurosurgical techniques for relieving pressure on the brain; better antibiotics for treating life-threatening infections; lighter braces to aid in mobility; and new techniques to control bladder function.

Further improvements may be expected to result from research supported by the Federal government's National Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke and the National Institute for Child Health and Human Development. Voluntary agencies including the Spina Bifida Association of America, the March of Dimes Birth Defects Foundation, and the National Easter Seal Society are also involved.

For the many investigators supported by these organizations, the greatest challenge is to find the cause of this crippling birth defect and develop ways to prevent it. Scientists working toward these goals are studying the formation of the spinal cord and factors that might influence its abnormal development.

In order to focus attention on the needs of spina bifida children for long-term care and on the emotional and financial difficulties faced by their parents, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 275, has designated October 1984 as ``National Spina Bifida Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of the month.

Good afternoon. I'm glad to see all of you. Let me first assure our guests that we haven't gathered for a public hanging. [Laughter] We're here to recognize these outspoken and creative Defense Department employees who challenged the way that things were done in the past and who offer us a better, less expensive way of doing them in the future.

The 12 men and women here today didn't just complain about a problem; they did something about it. One challenged the price of an aircraft lighting kit, and that challenge resulted in the drop in price from $50 to $8 for every kit we buy. Another is an alert auditor who found some suspicious labor charges and kept looking until he gathered enough evidence to convict a dishonest contractor and obtain $450,000 in fines and recoveries.

But whether the savings was $200 or $2 million, each of these fine Defense employees standing here is proof of the energy, the competence, and the can-do spirit that we're finding throughout the ranks of the Pentagon today.

I think we should also take a minute to recognize their bosses, for if their supervisors had not provided an opportunity for creativity and innovation, then we would not be celebrating these savings and successes. I'm proud of the management reforms that Cap Weinberger has brought to the Pentagon. And I'm encouraged that he has a hotline that any employee -- any American -- can use to call in a complaint or suggestion. And, in fact, the toll-free number is 1 - 800 - 424 - 9098.

Now, there are two reasons why this ceremony here in the Rose Garden is so important: Four years ago, the American people gave us a mandate both to root out waste and fraud in the Federal Government and to rebuild our defenses which had suffered from a decade of neglect. We've been working hard to achieve both these objectives, and I think we can say that our hard work is paying off. We're tackling the tough problems that have plagued Defense management for so many years, and today we're safer, more secure than we were 4 years ago.

And this afternoon, we recognize that it's because of the dedication and achievement of the 12 people we honor here today and to the many other dedicated Defense employees they represent that America is once again able to fill its leadership role in the world.

We have ceremonies to honor the brave servicemen who fight in our wars. Today, we gather to honor the unsung heroes of peace. And so, to each of you, on behalf of the American people, thank you, keep up the good work, and God bless you.

This week my opponent unveiled with great fanfare his plan to combat dangerous drugs, a plan comprising what he called ``four new initiatives.'' Well, forgive me, but his so-called new initiatives aren't new. Every one of them is by now an old initiative, begun by us more than 2\1/2\ years ago, when we first started the South Florida Task Force. Then, a year later, following the success of the task force, we extended these initiatives nationwide and set up the National Narcotics Border Interdiction System, known as NNBIS.

Consider my opponent's first new initiative: ``Create a high-level drug coordinator.'' Well, perhaps he hasn't heard, but we already have drug interdiction coordination at the highest possible level of government. The Vice President has been in charge of the South Florida Task Force and NNBIS from the start. And under his direction, nearly two dozen Federal agencies have been brought into the war on drugs; many, including the Army, Navy, Air Force, and Marines, are more involved in fighting drugs than ever before. Working with the Coast Guard and civilian law enforcement agencies, the military has contributed directly to the interdiction and seizure of major quantities of marijuana and cocaine in the past 2 years.

The Vice President has worked closely with the Attorney General, who has created 13 new organized crime and drug enforcement task forces. And those task forces are bringing record numbers of indictments against the leaders of drug trafficking.

His second new initiative undertakes ``broad international initiatives.'' Well, we're already working with other governments as no administration before has to stop the flow of drugs into our country. Bolivia and Peru recently began coca plant control programs. Pakistan has reduced its apium -- or opium, I should say, poppy cultivation more than 90 percent. And Burma continues to expand its opium eradication effort. Colombia has begun spraying its marijuana crops and in the last year has located and destroyed major cocaine factories.

This past summer the Vice President met with the Presidents of five Latin American countries to discuss further efforts. And, as you saw this past week, expert cooperation between our Justice Department and the Italian Government led to arrests of Mafia leaders in the United States.

Apparently, he hasn't heard about the increase in radar balloons and Navy and Air Force surveillance flights to track planes attempting to slip across the Gulf of Mexico and the Mexican border, not to mention the Coast Guard, which is moving forward with its improved detection and surveillance program.

Finally, his fourth new initiative: ``More State and local support.'' State and local officials are involved in the drug war as never before. Forty-seven States are now eradicating domestic marijuana. State and local law enforcement officials have expressed their satisfaction with the new high level of information sharing and cooperative efforts with the Federal Government.

At home and abroad we've seen record drug busts and convictions, and we've seen that in each of the last 2 years serious crime has dropped -- the first time that's happened in consecutive years since the FBI began keeping statistics.

Let me mention something else, because for all the so-called new initiatives my opponent is proposing -- that we've already begun -- he did omit one very important one. We're not just increasing our efforts to limit the supply of drugs; we're also trying to limit the demand for drugs.

And we can all be proud of the way our young people have responded. In 1979 one in nine high school seniors used marijuana on a daily basis. By 1983 the number had dropped to 1 in 18 -- still too high, but a great improvement.

Just as Americans have pulled together to turn around so many other problems we inherited 4 years ago -- inflation, record interest rates, taxes, no growth, falling test scores in school, and low morale in our military -- so, too, we're coming together as a nation to tackle the drug problem.

The President. Will we go forward with the faith and courage to make America stronger, to offer hope and opportunity to all our people, including those who still are not back on their feet, as we heard so many times tonight? Or will we go back to the policies of soaring taxation and spending that weakened our economy, snuffed out so many opportunities, and threw so many millions into the cold embrace of genuine hardship?

The President. Well, we've already seen what happens when we follow the policies that our opponents have so faithfully promised to restore -- the failed policies of tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend. We saw this once proud nation of ours, a few years ago, staggered by a steady erosion of economic growth. And I don't care what was said tonight or out on the road in the campaign trail, this country was in an economic mess of enormous proportions in 1980.

They talk about fairness, but what could be more unfair than that punishing inflation that could take people down through the brackets of poverty simply by raising the prices of things and lowering the value of the money that they had?

We saw those interest rates, as I mentioned in the debate -- 21\1/2\ percent. And that closed down the housing industry, that closed down the automobile industry, both of which are dependent on credit buying, mortgage buying.

Well, you know, there was a cartoon back when we first started the rebuilding of the military that said it all for me. It was a picture of a couple of Russian generals talking to each other, and one of them said, ``I liked it better when we were the only ones in the arms race.'' [Laughter] We're going to get them back to the table to talk disarmament. I don't mean arms limitations.

You know, some of the previous treaties that we've had I know were in good faith and all that, but all they did was set the rules for the continued arms race. When I got there, found out that SALT II, from the time that it was signed until I arrived in Washington -- an expert in the field gave me the information that under the signing of SALT II, without breaking the treaty, the Soviet Union had added to their nuclear arsenal the equivalent of the bomb we dropped on Hiroshima. They had added that every 11 minutes in the years since the treaty had been signed.

Well, that isn't what we want. And I had the pleasure of telling Mr. Gromyko the other day that any time they're ready -- [applause]. We're the only two that can destroy the world. Our two nations are the only two that can save it. And I told him that I'd like to start down the road with them, not to just arms limitation, but to the total elimination of all nuclear weapons in the world.

But I have a feeling, looking at all of you, that you agree with me about something else that's happened in these last few years, and that is that there's a whole different appreciation for the family in America -- the bedrock values of our neighborhoods, the fact that our crime rates are coming down, the fact that now our schools in this last year have suddenly turned a corner and for the first time in 20 years we see the college entrance exams -- the scores going up, instead of the steady decline that we knew. And it didn't come from any multibillion-dollar Federal program.

The things that were going on before we got here -- and they talk about fairness. Well, I have to say, at least that I can say for the things that they were doing -- they were fair. They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable. Now, since we're not going to raise the taxes, I didn't get a chance to give the figures tonight, but we have cost out what his proposed tax increase would do. It would raise the tax for every household in the United States by more than $1,800 a year, about $157 a month, and I just don't think we ought to let him do that to America.

The President. So, we'll keep him reminded of that. We'll keep the people reminded of it. And you know, I can't help but think about this America here and what it's doing. We all watched the Olympics, and we saw our athletes go for the gold. Well, there are two teams in America today.

And come November, the American people are going to decide which team is America's team and, come November, I just can't help but believe the American people are going to tell ``Coach Tax Hike'' and the whole tax increase team to head for the showers.

Well, tonight I had a chance to talk a little bit about my past as a Democrat. And I can't help but believe that in this particular place, there must be many of you here who either were or still are, but you're here because you have found it difficult to follow the leadership of your party and the course that it's been taking since those days back there in the days of the Harry Trumans and so forth.

Well, to all of you, you who knew the part of F.D.R. and Harry Truman and J.F.K. and that tradition, let us say to you -- and I do know how you feel, because I was there myself once -- walk with us down this new path of opportunity, and we'll save this country in a bipartisan way.

There are some of us here who are old enough to remember an America in which there was no ceiling. Any individual -- you were free to fly as high and as far as your own ability and energy and determination would take you, without being penalized for the effort. And then we came to a period of years in which government started encroaching on everyone. And the last 4 years before we got here, they were telling us that we suffered from a malaise, that it was our fault, that we had to give up the idea of having some of the things we used to have, that there were eras of limits. Don't you believe it.

You young people, this is what it's all about. We're going to keep on going the path -- he kept saying he didn't know what we were going to do. We're going to keep on doing what we've been doing for the last 4 years. And then you, you young people are going to start out life in the same kind of an America that we knew and that we started out life in. That's what it's all about.

The President. I don't have anything else other than to say one last thing that I just -- I like to mention once in awhile. And that is, that if there's one thing that I'm really proud of in these 4 years, it has been those young men and women of ours who wear our uniforms -- our soldiers.

You know, last night we had a little sparring in the political arena. But whether I won them or not, I know now that I have won the fruits of victory, because I get to be with all of you. And I can truthfully say, nothing could be finer than to be in Carolina in the morning.

But this contest is being waged for the soul of our country and the will of its people. And it's good to know where you stand, and I'm proud to stand with you. I'm a great admirer of your State -- not just because the sky is Carolina blue -- I was a little worried that I might not be able to say that if the clouds didn't clear, but they did; the soil is fertile; your mountains are majestic; and it's not also because I feel a special affinity for one of your main industries -- you cure tobacco and I'm trying to cure economics -- [laughter] -- but I admire your State because I admire your people. You were the first to vote for independence. And not too many years ago, when some people were burning our flag, you were waving it. Well, like the rest of the country, I'm impressed by your independence, and because of it, I truly treasure your support.

Here in Charlotte, construction is up; take-home pay is up; sales are up. In other words, I'm in a city that I would characterize as part of the national renewal. My opponents, of course, would say it's a pocket of despair. Well, I don't know about them. They go around insisting the economy is in a shambles and people are worse off than they ever were, and they've got to come back and raise our taxes to get things good again.

The President. Well, now, I understand their attempts to convince you that things aren't better -- that's what opponents do. And faced with the irrefutable fact of our national renewal, it hasn't been very easy for them. But let's stop for a moment and remember the mess they left us and what all of us have done -- all of us -- to turn our nation around.

But look at the record. Two-thirds of the income tax was being paid by two-thirds of the people, those under $50,000 a year. And two-thirds of the tax cut went to those same people. A typical family of four will have paid about $2,000 less in total income taxes during our administration.

People on fixed incomes saw double-digit inflation kill their purchasing power. Families saw inflation make a joke out of their savings. And the truly needy who depend on government aid saw their benefits eroded by the destructive force of inflation. As a matter of fact, there were three increases during their time in the Aid for Dependent Children grant, and they still couldn't keep up. After the three increases, the people were worse off by several hundred dollars than they had been before.

The President. Well, we cut inflation, and I'll tell you what it means: that 8.8 percent weekly -- or decline in weekly earnings -- within the last 2 years, weekly earnings have increased by 3.2 percent. Four years ago the weekly food bill for a family of four was almost $87. If my opponents' inflation rates had continued, that food bill would now be almost $128. Well, instead, we've kept the family's food bill down to $98.50, roughly one-fourth the rise that their inflation would have created.

And as we freed up the economy to grow, we created over 6 million new jobs in the last 21 months. More people are working this year than ever before in our history, and a job is the surest escape from poverty.

I want to stop for just a moment and say one of the things that makes us different from our opponents. We understand the need for jobs, real jobs, not make-work jobs. We don't want to keep people on welfare, keep them in bondage as wards of the state. We know that people want to work. They want to contribute. They want to be a part of society. And we don't patronize them with handouts. We give them a chance through economic growth. And that's why I will fight his tax increase proposals, and I will fight to bring everybody's tax rates further down, not up. And I'll fight so that every American who wants a job can find a job, from the Carolina shore to San Francisco Bay.

They favor busing that takes innocent children out of the neighborhood school and makes them pawns in a social experiment that nobody wants. We've found out it failed. I don't call that compassion. My opponent helped impose a grain embargo that punished the American farmer for his administration's foreign policy defeats. And I don't call that compassion. The other side continued heavy estate taxes on the family farm. And that is not compassion. Well, we have practically eliminated that tax so that you can keep the farm in the family, and we have eliminated the inheritance tax for a surviving spouse. And that is compassion.

We're making quiet progress toward arms control, because we've not been mislead by empty talk and false promises. We've put America in a position of sufficient strength to achieve real and meaningful reductions in nuclear arms. And we did this knowing, as Teddy Roosevelt did, that the cry of the weakling counts for a little in the move toward peace, but the call of the just man, armed, is potent.

But there's another peace, the peace of the family, the peace that we're given through faith, through tradition, through fidelity to ideals. Our administration has tried these past few years to softly encourage the values by which our nation has flourished. And that's why we've tried to restore the right of voluntary prayer to our schoolchildren, to give tuition tax credits for parents who want to send their children to independent schools, and to foster legislation that recognizes that the family is the prime generator of the good things young people bring to this society as a whole.

We haven't always succeeded, but we'll never stop trying. And the truth is we have a philosophy and a spirit of renewal whose time has come. The columnists and pundits say that in 1980 the American voters took a turn to the right. Well, I think they missed the point. The fact is that quietly, unseen, and unheard, from Maine to California, a new understanding of the word ``freedom'' has swept this continent -- freedom from heavy taxation, freedom from the Big Brother mentality that says that Big Brother knows best how to run your lives, that you're not bright enough to run your own lives.

In 4 weeks we must all take part in the simplest but most essential of the democratic acts -- we must make time and get to the polling place and vote. A vote is an expression of will, and the leaders of the opposition have got to start to understand the breadth and depth of the will of the people.

And so I say to all of you who see things as we do, don't take this election for granted. Don't pay any attention to the polls. Get out there and vote and see that your neighbor and your friend on either side votes.

Democrats, the welcome mat is out. I know that in a crowd, in this place, of this size, there have to be many Democrats who are here because they no longer can look with approval upon the way their leaders, the leaders of their party, have been taking them and this country. Well, I was one of you. I, too, was a Democrat for much of my adult life and, let me tell you, the welcome mat is out. We hope that you can join us this year because we need you, we want your help, and we know that we can do the things we're trying to do in a bipartisan way, together, as Americans, not just members of one party or the other.

The President. [Laughing] -- but if our great renewal is to take root, I'll need the help and support of good men and women in the Congress, and that's why we need people like Senator Jesse Helms. I wonder if you appreciate how hard he works for your State. He's one of my greatest supporters, too, and we need him back in Washington. What do you say? Will you send Jess back to help us? [Applause] All right. All right.

Charlotte. And he said that sometimes he found his job difficult, but what inspired him was the encouragement he got from the people in places like this. And he said, looking out at you, the people of Charlotte, ``. . . the heart of America is always sound, and America's judgment . . . is always correct.'' And if a President knows that, he said, and hews to the wisdom of the people, then he can be certain that in the long run he will have done his job well.

Well, I look at all of you, and I feel the same way Ike did. And I thank you for continuing your traditions of inspiring Presidents, and thank you for your warmth and your kindness. And I particularly thank the young people of Matthews Elementary School who came here. They'd invited me to go there, and the schedule wouldn't permit that, so they came here. And I'm glad they did, and it's wonderful to see them.

The President. They are what this election is all about. Something happened in the years between when I was that age and where I am now. And some of what we had prided in -- taken pride in having in America seemed to disappear, and that was the opportunity, the freedom, the belief that we the people are the most powerful element in our country, not any level of government. And there became in recent years a feeling that, well, there wasn't opportunity, that we had to resign ourselves to a lesser standard of life than we had known in the past.

Americans of Italian descent have given a great deal to this country. Their contribution began 492 years ago when Christopher Columbus, the son of a Genoa weaver, set forth on a voyage of discovery that changed the world. The ideals which many successive Italian immigrants brought with them are at the very heart of America. I'm speaking of hard work, love of family, patriotism, and respect for God. [Applause] Thank you.

Columbus challenged the unknown when he sailed westward in 1492. He was a man of vision who saw an opportunity, set down a plan, and then worked diligently to carry it forth. Contrary to what you may have heard in the last 24 hours, I do have a plan. I'd like to think that we're continuing on that initial course of discovery that he set for us so many years ago. We turned a vast wilderness, the most undeveloped land imaginable, into an economic dynamo, because we encouraged individuals with dreams to make those dreams come alive.

Looking out over the Inner Harbor, all that you've accomplished here in recent years, I know that's the kind of spirit that you have in Baltimore. You haven't been afraid to aim high, to chart a new course, and to change the future. You weren't satisfied to sit and wait or to be put off by those who kept discouraging you with all the reasons why you shouldn't go forward. With an eye for excellence, your architects and landscape designers, your contractors and working people have set out to create a place of commerce and beauty. Well, I think all of you can be proud of what you've accomplished.

The optimism I sense here, this optimism is something I've felt all over this country. America has quit listening to the gloom-and-doomers. We've left self-doubt and pessimism aside. We've reclaimed our heritage, personified by individuals like Christopher Columbus.

America has always been a vision of opportunity, a place where an individual could, with hard work, go as far as his own talents or her own talents would take them. And a few years ago, there were those who said that this vision of opportunity and freedom was dead, that we were a nation in decline, that we should lower our expectations. Murderous inflation and economic stagnation were the order of the day.

Well, last night I thought back to another night 4 years ago when I came to Baltimore for the first debate of the fall campaign. Well, as demonstrated in yesterday's debate, the central issue in this election is whether we're going to keep moving forward or go back.

America, like Baltimore, has made a new beginning, and we aren't going back. The American people are enjoying the fruits of economic expansion and low inflation. They put this country back together and have a right to feel good about what they've accomplished.

The President. We need a tax policy that offers incentives for people to work, save, and invest -- all the things that will keep our economy growing and improve our well-being. We need a basic tax reform that will permit us to bring everybody's tax rates down.

And if we're to have progress, we must be willing to break from the past and use forward-looking, innovative ideas. One such idea is designating depressed areas of our country as enterprise zones -- to encourage investment and to channel the strength of our free enterprise system to those areas and to those people who need it most.

Baltimore's Mayor Schaefer, who took me on a tour of your renewal areas 2 years ago, has been a strong supporter of this concept. For more than 2 years, we've been trying to get Federal enterprise zone legislation enacted, but the liberals who control the House of Representatives have bottled it up. Instead of focusing on raising taxes, I hope those who keep trying to impress us all with their use of the word ``compassion'' would help us free up the enterprise zone bill that is now tied up in the House.

Well, in our new program, overall costs have been reduced, and 70 percent of the money goes directly to training. And working with the private sector, we've provided tens of thousands of the hardcore unemployed with the skills they need to find and keep a job. And during the first 6 months of this program, which ended in March, 70 percent of those enrolled found jobs. The way to a better life for the less fortunate is not found in raising taxes and increasing spending. I say the best program to help those struggling to improve their lot is a meaningful, productive job.

Europe they called it the ``American miracle.'' Well, it's no miracle. It's not due to an uncontrollable cycle. It's due to our return to sensible and responsible Federal tax and spending policies, policies that encourage economic growth.

I know there is an issue which the people of Baltimore are particularly concerned about, and it's a concern that I share. We've taken steps, with the strong support of your Senator Mac Mathias, to make certain that the new -- or the next generation has a healthy and thriving Chesapeake Bay.

Helen Bentley, a former Chairman of the Federal Maritime Commission, has been very supportive of our efforts. She's also been in the forefront of the fight to see to it that Baltimore's Harbor is dredged. Well, Helen, thanks to you for all that you've done.

When Columbus discovered America, he set in force a motion mightier than the world had ever known. People came here from every corner of the planet to be free and to improve their lot and that of their family. Well, we got off course a few years ago, but now we've set the good ship Columbia back sailing in the right direction. And I thank you for letting me be here to help you honor the man who started it all, Christopher Columbus.

I am sympathetic to the plight of hundreds of thousands of individuals who have fled the tyranny of communist rule imposed after World War II upon countries of eastern Europe and whose property has been confiscated by those governments. The United States government over the years has been successful in providing some measure of relief to some of these individuals by providing for the adjudication of these claims by the Foreign Claims Settlement Commission of the United States and by the negotiation of agreements with the offending governments to obtain funds for at least partial payment for such losses. The most recent example is the claims settlement agreement reached with the Government of Czechoslovakia by this Administration which has provided substantial although not full restitution for American citizens with valid claims against Czechoslovakia under international law. Such agreements have been possible only through adherence by the United States to the rule of international law that a government may only espouse such claims against a foreign government where American-owned property has been expropriated.

In 1958 the Foreign Claims Settlement Commission of the United States was authorized to determine the validity and amount of claims by United States citizens against the Government of Czechoslovakia caused by the confiscation of property owned at the time by United States nationals. Joseph Karel Hasek along with over 4,000 other claimants submitted claims to the Commission. After careful consideration the Commission was required to deny his claim due to the failure of Mr. Hasek to establish that any property owned by him was expropriated at a time when it was owned by a United States national. Mr. Hasek's claim was one of many denied on similar grounds. The Commission completed this program, and in 1962 all of its decisions became final and not subject to further review.

This bill directs that Mr. Hasek's claim be considered as valid despite the fact that it is not a valid claim for the United States to espouse under international law and the longstanding policy of the United States government. It seeks to provide special relief for one individual while ignoring the many thousands of United States citizens of Polish, Czechoslovakian, Yugoslavian, Bulgarian, Romanian, Hungarian, and German heritage who have suffered like losses but have been denied relief in a number of claim programs because their property was not expropriated at a time when it was owned by a United States national.

Finally, the bill would require payment to Mr. Hasek, who did not qualify for compensation, through the transfer to him of funds expressly obtained and set aside to compensate those American citizens who were claimants and did establish meritorious claims against Czechoslovakia for the confiscation of American-owned property. These claimants will therefore receive even less by way of restitution for their losses.

This result fails the elemental test of fairness and equity to thousands of American citizens who have suffered losses as egregious as those suffered by Mr. Hasek. I therefore have withheld my approval from H.R. 1362.

If relief is warranted in the case of Mr. Hasek, it centers on the beneficiary's claim that new evidence is available that was not available prior to the statutory expiration of the Czechoslovakian claims review in 1962. Accordingly, I would be willing to consider alternative relief legislation which would afford Mr. Hasek another review of the available evidence. I have directed my Administration to work with the Congress to consider such alternatives.

In the past decade, the United States has entered a new era of hope for its developmentally disabled citizens. This new age of enlightened understanding recognizes that developmentally disabled persons have a great potential for achieving and overcoming handicaps. Down's syndrome, a condition once thought to be without hope of positive change, is one of the best symbols of this changing attitude.

Progress is evident on several fronts. Research has uncovered the genetic basis for the condition and points the way to its ultimate prevention. Advances in medical treatment can minimize defects associated with the condition and have extended the life-span of those who have it. School doors have been unlocked to Down's syndrome children, and special education classes within mainstream school programs have been developed. Vocational training in preparation for gainful employment and independent living has become available.

These advances have not occurred by chance. They are the result of the collective effort of concerned physicians, scientific investigators, teachers and other professionals, parent groups such as the National Down's Syndrome Congress, and government. But the task remains unfinished.

It is encouraging to note that, due to the increase in public fire education efforts and use of smoke detectors, there has been a leveling off of fire deaths in recent years. Many homes, however, are still without these safety devices, and I urge community leaders to encourage their use and emphasize the need to keep them in good working order.

Removing the threat of fire from our families and businesses is a national priority. New initiatives are needed to educate the public concerning fire safety and to advise them how they may prevent or survive fire situations. More and more private sector and volunteer organizations are joining the efforts to reduce the Nation's fire loss and this is commendable.

Special recognition is due the efforts of over a million men and women, both volunteer and career, of our Nation's fire services who daily risk their lives to protect others. It is appropriate that we take time to thank them for their unselfish dedication to the principle of helping others in desperate need. Americans should also appreciate the work of all organizations concerned with fire prevention and control efforts -- in particular those which are members of the Joint Council of National Fire Service Organizations.

Mental illnesses are among the most misunderstood disorders. As a result, many of our citizens experience unnecessary pain. Stigma -- a by-product of fear and misunderstanding -- places an unwarranted burden on those with mental disorders and their families. It is of particular concern that the stigma associated with these problems often discourages people from seeking the help they need.

The cost of mental illnesses to this Nation is in excess of $50 billion annually in health care and lost productivity. The cost in human suffering is beyond reckoning; however, the promise of relief is becoming a reality for many.

Research during recent decades has led to new and more effective drug, behavioral, and psychosocial treatments. For many, the pain of depression can be eased, suicide prevented, hallucinations and delusions assuaged, and crippling anxieties eliminated. Many children vulnerable to serious developmental and psychological problems can be protected by early diagnosis and intervention.

In recognition of the unparalleled growth in scientific knowledge about mental illnesses and the need to increase awareness of such knowledge, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 322, has designated the week beginning October 7, 1984 as ``Mental Illness Awareness Week'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this week.

The President. We've just completed an intensive round of discussions with Prime Minister Peres and Foreign Minister Shamir. And may I say that our discussions reconfirm the close friendship, the mutual respect, and the shared values that bind our countries. Our ties remain unbreakable, continue to grow stronger.

It's been a particular pleasure for me to welcome Mr. Peres to the White House in his new capacity as Prime Minister. Mr. Shamir, of course, has been a frequent visitor to Washington, and I'm very pleased that we were able to meet with him again.

Minister Shamir. Both have shown courage and determination to put aside partisan politics and join together in a government of national unity in order to deal with Israel's most pressing problems. This demonstration of unity reminds us of democracy's great strength and the hope it offers for all the people of the world.

Peres and his partners in the new unity government for revitalizing the Israeli economy and putting it on the road to sustained recovery. And I'm impressed by the bold and wide-ranging steps the Prime Minister and his Cabinet colleagues are planning.

I know from our own experience how difficult the problem of economic readjustment is, yet how vitally important a strong economy is to national security. We've made clear our willingness to continue our dialog and to cooperate with Israel in the best way we can as Israel proceeds with its plans.

The new Government of Israel has already taken some steps to reduce inflation and increase economic growth and is working to develop additional steps. The economic support funds and other funds that the Congress has appropriated for Israel come at an opportune time, for they will enable Israel to develop its programs without having to divert undue attention to balance-of-payments problems. Should such problems arise, the U.S. Government will work closely with the Israeli Government to avert them.

Looking ahead, Prime Minister Peres has described a bright vision of Israel's economic future as a dynamic competitor in world markets. We have agreed to explore with Israel ways to enhance its growth and development prospects through structural adjustment, increased trade and investment, as well as American aid.

And Prime Minister Peres and I have decided to establish a joint economic development group of economic officials from our two governments and private economists to discuss Israel's economic recovery and development program. And this group will be an important forum for exchanging views on the full range of economic issues and examining ways to help support Israel's efforts.

Israel's economic future and to the United States. This will be the first such agreement that we've entered into with another nation. Prime Minister Peres and I have instructed our delegations to conclude negotiations within 30 days. I'm confident that this unprecedented agreement, by expanding Israel's export markets to the United States, will be important in helping Israel on the way to economic recovery, and it will also boost U.S. exports to Israel.

We also discussed the situation in Lebanon. The Prime Minister made clear the firm Israeli determination to withdraw fully from Lebanon as soon as security arrangements can be put in place to ensure the safety of Israel's northern border. I reassured him that the United States stands ready to help, provided the parties concerned want us to play this role and are committed to finding answers to the difficult issues involved. We agreed to stay in close touch on this subject in the days ahead.

And finally, I reaffirmed our fundamental commitment to Israel's national security. I'm pleased that we've agreed to consult in a systematic way on the U.S.-Israel security assistance program, a way that contributes most effectively to Israel's overall national security and the maintenance of its qualitative edge. Secretary Weinberger will be discussing this process and other security matters when he visits Israel next week.

I made clear to the Prime Minister and his colleagues our firm commitment to the goal of a just and lasting peace between Israel and all its Arab neighbors. Outstanding steps in that direction are United States Security Council Resolution 242, the Camp David accords on the historic Egyptian-Israeli peace treaty.

I reaffirmed today my initiative of September 1, 1982. At that time I set forth U.S. positions designed to bring the parties to the negotiating table, presumably with their own positions. The Prime Minister stressed that his government is also determined to move the peace process forward, and I join him in this great and common objective. In partnership, Israel and the United States will continue to work toward a common vision of peace, security, and economic well-being.

I want to thank the President of the United States for his understanding, his friendship, his hospitality, and may I say, Mr. President, that in our meetings the relations between the United States and America have reached a new level of harmony and understanding, which I am very grateful for.

President, Vice President, the Secretary of State, the Secretary of Defense, and their colleagues. I found in the White House a true friend of Israel and I understand -- who understand our problems and dilemmas, aware of our difficulties, and closely follows our efforts to face them.

I'm grateful to the President for his warm and detailed statement and consider it an important contribution to the process of rebuilding the Israeli economy. Equally significant is my hope that the United States will continue to play an important role in reducing tension in our region and revitalizing the peace process.

Despite the differences between the policies of this government, we are all united in our thankfulness and confidence in the United States of America. We are all united in our desire for peace. We are all united in the desire to bring our boys back from Lebanon, provided that the security of the northern part of Israel will be guaranteed. We are determined to tackle our economic difficulties head on.

Mr. President, our land is not a land for skeptics, but a cradle for believers, and this is more important than any passing economic difficulty. While we certainly build a primary responsibility for dealing with these problems and we have demonstrated our resolve with regard to each, nevertheless, the support of the President, the United States Government, and the American people is a source of strength and inspiration to all of us.

But now, before I say anything else, please let me thank all those in the Congress who worked so hard on behalf of this important legislation. Our senior citizens want and deserve to be full participants in American life. They want and deserve independence, quality health care, and economic security. The legislation that I'm about to sign will help older Americans achieve these worthy goals.

This legislation will continue a program which has provided essential services for older Americans since 1965 -- nutritious meals, information and referral services, transportation, and other types of assistance which make it easier to find self-fulfillment and rewarding involvement in community life. These important programs serve an estimated 13 million older Americans each year.

Alzheimer's disease and their families. As you know, Alzheimer's disease is the most common cause of intellectual impairment in older Americans. Until recently, this indiscriminate killer of mind and life had gone virtually undetected with the families of its victims virtually helpless. This legislation means more help is on the way.

But in signing this important piece of legislation, I must note my strong constitutional reservations regarding the provisions that give the President pro tem of the Senate and Speaker of the House the power to appoint two-thirds of the members of the Federal Council on the Aging. Under this legislation, the Council clearly remains within the executive branch. Under the Constitution, therefore, members of the Council should not be appointed by officers of the Congress. And, accordingly, I strongly urge the Congress to enact legislation to repeal these new appointment provisions before June 5th, 1985.

When I took office on January 20, 1981, my administration inherited the task of implementing the continuing disability reviews required by the 1980 Disability Amendments which had been enacted and signed into law during the previous administration. Soon after the Department of Health and Human Services began the mandatory reviews, we found that trying to implement the new law's requirements within the framework of the old, paper-oriented review process was causing hardships for beneficiaries. Accordingly, back in 1982, the Department began a long series of administrative reforms designed to make the disability review process more humane and people-oriented. These reforms included providing face-to-face meetings between beneficiaries and Social Security Administration (SSA) claims representatives at the very start of the review process.

Another provision in H.R. 3755 would extend temporarily the ability of a Social Security disability beneficiary who has decided to appeal a decision that his disability has ended to have benefits continued up to the decision of an administrative law judge. This will prevent undue hardship to beneficiaries who are found on appeal to be still disabled while the new law is being put in place.

In addition, the legislation places a desirable moratorium on reviews to determine whether individuals with mental impairments are still disabled until revised criteria for evaluating these impairments are published. The Department of Health and Human Services has been working with mental health experts on these criteria.

I have asked Secretary Heckler to implement the provisions of this legislation as speedily and as fairly as possible. The Department of Health and Human Services will act promptly in reviewing individual cases so that no disabled beneficiary has to wait any longer than necessary for the proper decision on his or her case.

The President. I think if someone would go with the transcript and look at the fact that the figures and the facts that I gave were true, and were never rebutted in that debate, and that he kept repeating facts that I had rebutted because they were inaccurate, as a matter of fact, they had no basis in fact at all.

The President. Well, that was not on my mind, that I was separating that out. I guess that's just the way the answer came out, that I wouldn't. But, no, I meant that, that I've said over and over again. We're never going to take away from those people who are dependent on Social Security, now or in the future.

The President. Well, because I am terribly concerned that this demogoguery about Social Security is frightening senior citizens. And there is just no fairness and no rightness at all in leaving these people uncertain as to what their situation is going to be when they have particularly no place else to turn but Social Security. And we're not going to let them down, and I've been saying that since before I was President.

The President. Let me say that from reports of many of the people that were part of that same administration, when President Carter in his last 2 years felt that he should start redressing the military imbalance, Mondale advised against it.

The President. Well, thank you all very much for a most heartwarming reception. I feel like I'm playing in theater of the round in here. [Laughter] It's good to be back in Michigan and great to be in Redford Township with the St. Agatha Aggies.

Now, I understand that you're in the midst of ``Spirit Week,'' and I know you're looking forward to a great homecoming football victory. But I have an idea that your spirit isn't just for a week, but for always.

You know, really, in getting around the country as I have, your generation is really terrific, and I thank you for helping turn our country around in that regard. We've come here because you're what America is all about. You're America's future, and the future rests in the hopes and the dreams that you have inside your hearts. And helping you make those hopes and dreams come true is what this job of mine is all about.

Now, I've often been accused of being an optimist, and I hope so. All my life I've seen that when people have freedom and a vision, when they have the courage and opportunity to work hard, and when people believe in the power of faith and hope, they can accomplish great things. And today, right here in Michigan and all across America, in your factories and farms, and out at Tiger Stadium, we're meeting the challenge and accomplishing great things.

And I know how excited you are about the Tigers; they're a great team. And I can't take a side on the series now, what with a California team and with the Tigers -- [laughter]. And having been a sports announcer and broadcasting major league baseball some years ago, I kept saying, well, maybe I could cheer for one and pray for the other. [Laughter] And then I realized that wouldn't work either, and I found myself being reminded of something -- if you wouldn't mind a personal story -- reminded of something that has to do with praying and athletics.

It was in a chalk talk in college. I was a freshman, and the lightest man on the line. And there that evening we were in a classroom, and the coach was diagramming plays on the board. And I don't know how it happened, but the coach evidently started it. It got around to prayer with regard to football. Well, I'd never gone in a game in my life in high school or college that I hadn't prayed before that game. But being a freshman, and all those big ``hollegers'' around me, I would have been the last person in the world to admit it. But as the talk went on, suddenly I was discovering that everybody on the team did the same thing -- went into a game, but only after praying.

So, that's why if I'm praying at all for the World Series games, I'll just be praying that the best team wins and that no one gets hurt and that we can all be happy when it's over. So, I hope you don't mind my sharing that with you.

I'm going to continue to get our -- or in our efforts to get passed in the Congress the tuition tax credit bill. This bill would help hard-working parents who -- like yours -- who pay to send you to this school and to other independent schools throughout the country, and yet who are also paying their full share of taxes to support the public schools. And I think that only fairness dictates that there should be credit given taxwise for this double burden.

We've been working for excellence at all levels of our society, and the victories are those that all of us have achieved -- our strong economy, our return to the values of faith, family, and neighborhood, and our determination to stay strong and be prepared for peace. These aren't just victories of an administration in Washington, they're victories of the people of this country. You made them possible.

I told Foreign Soviet Minister Gromyko just 12 days ago that we remain ready to reduce nuclear arms -- hopefully to eliminate them altogether -- ready to negotiate a fair deal, and ready to meet them halfway.

You know, each day the world turns completely, and so each day the world is reborn. Possibilities that yesterday didn't exist emerge to startle us. With your help and support we're going to keep on the path to a lasting peace. And with your help and support we're going to keep on getting victories for all the people. As long as we remember that the difference between having faith in people and faith in big government is the difference between success and failure, we're going to be able to reach for the stars. As long as we concentrate on hard work and high tech, not on hard times and high taxes, we can have the future of our dreams.

More than 208 years ago a small band of patriots began one of history's greatest adventures -- something called America. These brave men and women laid everything on the line for freedom, independence, opportunity, and peace. And ever since, our country has been an inspiration to freedom-loving people everywhere and a magnet to millions of immigrants seeking the miracle that is America.

And let me tell you that I was very happy to be at the ceremony just 10 days ago when two of your classmates, those who led us in the Pledge of Allegiance -- Sheila Della and Jennifer -- became new American citizens.

That's proof that America's adventure isn't over yet; it never should be. Your generation will be ready to meet the challenges before you, so be confident, aim high, work hard, stick to your values, and you'll never go wrong. The future is yours, and it's going to be terrific. And it's going to be better than anything that any of the rest of us ever knew because that's what America's been doing generation after generation.

The President. Yes. [Laughter] I had some experience. You know, I was Governor of California for 8 years, which is the most populous State in the Union. It's about 10 percent of the whole country in numbers of people. And, so, I found that there's a great similarity between that experience, being the chief executive officer of a State, and of the Federal Government. So, there weren't too many surprises.

Presidency is an institution over which you have temporary custody. And I'll just tell you one little incident to illustrate what I mean. Every place I went -- and those marines at the helicopter -- they were throwing those salutes. Well, I was an officer in World War II, and I'm not in uniform, and so I knew I wasn't supposed to salute, or felt that I wasn't, and yet it bothered me. I'd try to nod and speak, and they'd still hold that salute.

The President. Oh, well, I think what's taken place in space already, with Sally Ride and her mission up there and now the two of them up on this present mission -- I think it is just further proof and evidence that probably the last and worst era of discrimination that we've known has come to an end.

The President. I majored in extracurricular activities. [Laughter] In addition to athletics, I was in the drama club, and I wound up as president of the student body. And I'd been in the student senate before that. And it continued that way through college in which, then, I added a Greek letter fraternity to the list of things that I belonged to. I never dreamed when I was in the drama club that I might wind up making my living that way, but -- [laughter] -- I did.

But I believe -- seriously, let me answer your question, Robert -- that I believe that the extracurricular activities are just as important as every other part of education, that there is teaching and learning in all of those things. It brings more out of you. And I like the idea, however, that all of those things are based on retaining a level of grade for eligibility that shows that you are not neglecting studies in order to participate in them.

The President. I feel as strongly as she does, and that's really saying something because she is really wrapped up in this. Alcohol is just another form of drug, and all of them -- there's just no place for them. You're growing up now, and you're laying, among other things, the physical foundation for the rest of your life. And it's just like buying a used car and then finding out the various places where it breaks down because somebody abused it in its younger days.

You only get this piece of machinery once. Take care of it. Really take care of it. And I'm prepared to tell you from personal experience that there'll come a place down the road when you'll really be happy that you did, because I've been 39 years old now for about 31-odd years.

The President. Socialized medicine? No. Today, if you have to get sick any place in the world, get sick here in this country. We have the greatest medical care of any country in the world. And those countries that are practicing socialized medicine, the quality of the care has declined, the waiting list is forever, and the cost is far greater than it is here. In spite of the recent escalation in medical practice charges, the cost is greater.

I believe that -- provide medicine and medical care for those people who cannot afford it for themselves, as we're doing. But the rest of it should be right out there in private enterprise, the same as we do everything else.

I believe that our relations now with other countries are better than they have been within my memory -- our alliances with our friends and allies in NATO, the recent trip to China and what we accomplished there, and even with this recent visit with Mr. Gromyko. I think that he understands us a little better. I was rather frank with him, and I told him that we didn't like his system, but we weren't trying to change it for them, and they better not try to change ours.

And I think the frustrations are less. It is complicated. It is very touchy. The most frustrating thing today is the whole new thing in recent years of terrorism that's all over the world -- these cowardly acts such as we've seen in the tragedies in Beirut, and all. That, and trying to establish whether there is some government, actual government that is inspiring this and supporting these terrorist movements, that is frustrating.

The President. Well, it goes with the job, goes with the territory. And I have to tell you, I've had enough traveling by now in my life that I'm not crazy about it. But I must say, it does pay off, it does cement relationships: our recent trip to England for the summit conference -- our allies there, the seven nations, the seven of us that are there together in dealing with our problems of trade, commerce, and so forth; our trip to Japan with Prime Minister Nakasone. He is, I think, an excellent man and dedicated to improving the relations with us. And so you come home, usually, with quite a feeling of accomplishment.

The President. Yes. It isn't easy. You do know that you live in a fishbowl. But when you get up and through that gate at Camp David for weekends now and then, you certainly have a degree of privacy. We do, when we can, get to California to our ranch. And then there's a private life at home and within the walls of the White House. You don't always have a state dinner or things of that kind going on. So again, I think that I was probably more prepared for it by virtue of my experience as Governor than some people who, for the first time, find themselves in that fishbowl.

The understandable security precautions that have to be taken in the world the way it is today are frustrating, such as your friends and neighbors and parents and all who are outside here in crowds when we came in. And you'd love to be able to go over and say hello, and you can't do it.

Well, I appreciate this chance to break bread with you. This center represents something special about America. We Americans came from many lands; we represent just about every race, religion, and ethnic group that's found on this planet. We take pride in our family heritage, passing it on to our children, just like you're doing here. Yet, what keeps us together, what cements our national unity, is our abiding love of freedom. And I think that's what America is all about.

And that's what this hall is all about, and I'm proud to be with you here today. I have always believed -- and seeing these wonderful young people today and that entertainment, representing so many backgrounds -- I just, I've always believed that somehow, Divine Providence put this continent here between the oceans to be found by people from every corner of the Earth, but who had that special love for freedom in their heart that would make them pick up, leave friends and family, and move to this at-one-time strange and completely undeveloped land. And we are so unique, there is no place on Earth quite like us.

If America is to remain the free and vibrant country that we want her to be, and if she's to be the great land of opportunity, we can't lose sight of those principles laid down by our Founding Fathers. And we must have the same courage and dedication as those brave souls who built America to do what is necessary to keep our country prosperous and to keep her secure from the threat of foreign tyrants and authoritarian ideologies.

A few years ago, we had great cause for concern. The economy was in a shambles. Murderous inflation, economic stagnation, oppressive taxation, and sky-high interest rates were all sapping the strength of our people. Instead of providing leadership, many elected officials joined a chorus of pessimists, bemoaning everything that was wrong with America.

Our people are enjoying the fruits of low inflation and high growth. Productivity is up. Real take-home pay is up. Business incorporations hit a record high last year -- 600,000 in that single year. Over 6 million new jobs have been created since the beginning of the recovery. Our European friends call it the American miracle.

Well, it isn't a miracle. It's just that the American people built this recovery. Our administration, with the help of good Congressmen like Bill Broomfield, just eliminated the roadblocks which took the form of irresponsible tax and spending policies, overregulation, and too much power centralized in Washington. Once we got the Government out of the way, the American people, just like they always have, got on with the job of making this a better country for all of us.

And I know that you've done so much as individuals and as a community to help those newcomers to our shores build a new life, through organizations like the Ukrainian Congress Committee, the Ukrainian American Relief Committee, and the indigent fund of the Ukrainian National Women's League of America.

But instead of raising your taxes, we need to simplify the tax system, make it easier to understand, and make it easier for us to bring down your tax rates, not let them go up. Our opponents see an America in which every day is April 15th, tax day. [Laughter] Well, we see an America in which every day is the Fourth of July. Instead of raising your taxes, we'll promote policies that bring economic growth and increase opportunity. I think the best social program for the less fortunate who are trying to better their lot is a good job.

What we want is a strong and a prosperous America, an America that'll be entering the next century with confidence and optimism. Those wedded to the failed policies of the past, or tied too closely to special interest groups, may be unable to see the great potential that lies ahead.

Today we're trying to make up for short-sighted decisions of the last decade. That's especially true in regard to our national security. Between 1970 and 1980, when the rest of the budget was skyrocketing out of sight, real spending for defense fell by over 20 percent. By the end of the decade, our Navy had dropped from over a thousand ships to under 500. Our Air Force was flying bombers that were, in some cases, older than the pilots.

One of our top priorities since coming to Washington has been rebuilding our defensive strength, and I make no apologies for that. I pledge to you that as long as I'm President, I will never shortchange the security needs of the United States of America.

We take our responsibilities very seriously. We are, for example, absolutely committed to root out waste and fraud and make certain that every defense dollar is used wisely. And those that you've heard lately talking about $500 hammers and $9,000 wrenches don't add, when they say that, that that's been going on for a long time. And when we got here, we started cleaning it up. We're the ones that brought those figures to light, made them public, and we are cleaning it up.

And there have been millions and millions of dollars in rebates returned to the Government as a result. And we, just a few days ago in the White House, the Rose Garden, recognized 12 -- some in uniform and some Defense Department civilian employees -- who individually had tracked down and found some of these things that had resulted in millions of dollars of savings for us.

But let's not kid ourselves. Even when we root out the waste, providing adequate defense is still an expensive proposition, especially when you're playing catchup. Now, those who are complaining the loudest about the cost are, for the most part, the same architects of a decade of neglecting America's security needs.

Well, I don't think America's listening to those voices anymore. New voices are being heard now, strong voices that advocate the cause of freedom, voices not ashamed to defend America's interests. There is one such advocate of whom I'm particularly proud. She's our Ambassador to the United Nations, Jeane Kirkpatrick. She represents a new realism in foreign policy. No longer do we apologize to tyrants about the American way of life, or apologize to those domestic critics who always blame America first.

We're building up the Voice of America so your message, our message, gets through to captive people everywhere. We seek no conflict with anyone. We've gone the extra mile and will continue to do so to reach arms reduction agreements. But from now on, when America negotiates, we'll negotiate from a position of strength.

Now, there's another group of Americans we should be thanking. During the previous administration, as preparedness sank, so did morale in our Armed Forces. And today, because they know how much we appreciate them, we've attracted the finest young men and women to the service who have ever served this country. But freedom, our freedom, is really in their hands. And their commanders tell me that we've got every reason to be confident and proud. And I hope if you see one of those young people now and then on the street in uniform somewhere, you'll tell him or her how grateful we are for the job they're doing.

There is a new spirit in America -- well, it's not really new. We just recaptured some of that optimism and grit, that love of liberty and zest for life that have always been so much a part of America. And you represent the dream of America more than most. I know that many of you came here with little or no resources. With your hard work and the will to get ahead, you've built a good and decent life for your families, and that's what America is all about.

Community College. We were looking for a good place to speak to the people of Warren, and I said Macomb was my first choice. It's wonderful to be back in Michigan, and I can say that because I was here just 10 days ago. I've been here four times since I've been President, and always for the same reason: I love your State.

I love your Michigan spirit. I'm inspired by it. And I am impressed by your Michigan football, and believe me, I speak from experience, because some years ago I was a sports announcer. I was broadcasting, as a matter of fact, an Iowa-Michigan game here in Michigan, and down on the field one of the fellows in the line for Michigan -- his name was, I think, was Jerry Ford.

Well, we're enjoying the strongest economic expansion in 30 years. We've created more than 6 million new jobs in the last 22 months. And 600,000 new businesses were incorporated last year alone. And here in your State, in Michigan, brave technologies for men and women are putting forward advanced technologies, modernizing our world and our older industries, working to create new hopes, new jobs, and new dreams. And with labor and management pulling together with renewed confidence and spirit, our competitors are about to learn that once Americans put our minds to it, once we're provided the proper tools and equipment, we can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anybody, anytime, anywhere in the world.

The President. Now, it's tempting to figure, when you hear that, that it's the other fellow's taxes that'll be raised. But let me tell you, they've been getting away with that for years. It's yours that will be raised.

The President. Now, the red ink was barely dry on his massive $85 billion tax increase proposal before he revealed that part of his plan was for a second round of new tax increases. And these plans would leave a bottomless hole in the pockets of every working man and woman in this country.

The President. Now, I think you understand that indexing is the reform that we passed to protect you from the cruelest tax -- the hidden tax caused by government using inflation to force you into higher and higher tax brackets. As you get a cost-of-living increase you move up. You're not any better off, you just kept pace with inflation. But suddenly you're in a higher percentage of tax bracket.

And, now, you may not like the sound of that. But wait, it gets worse. The greatest hardship in his repeal of indexing would fall on those who can least afford it: everybody below the $25,000 earning line, everybody. The people that he claimed he would protect -- the heaviest proportional burden falls on those least able to pay. In fact, it gets so bad as you go down the line that people earning $10,000 or less would have to pay about $200 a year more in taxes.

Well, it's nice that my opponent was willing to explain his two-part tax plan: raise taxes and raise them again. But it's the height of unfairness to make hard-working people pay even more taxes just to finance excessive campaign promises.

Now, believe me, this is one issue that affects every family in Michigan, every family in this country. One way or another my opponent's tax increases would not only stop the economy dead in its tracks; they would put a new and ever-increasing burden on you and your neighbors and your children. And he would turn us back to the old days where the politicians dance and you pay the piper.

The last thing we need now is a return to the policies of tax and tax and spend and spend. Those policies stifled creativity and growth. What we do need is a tax policy that offers incentives for people to work, save, and invest -- all the things that'll keep the economy growing.

You know, it's hard sometimes to put recent events in historical perspective. We get caught up in everyday things. Sometimes we forget that we're part of a long continuum that stretches back two centuries to a little gathering in Philadelphia.

And those who gathered there envisioned and created a totally new thing in history: a splendid union of States headed by a Federal Government whose members would be elected by the people and who would serve at the sufferance of the people. It was made clear from the beginning that the citizenry would allow the government certain rights -- rights would not flow from the government to the people; it would be the other way around.

And some decided that it was the state from which all blessings flow. So, we started some years ago to send more money and more power to the Federal Government in the hopes that it would give us better lives. But by the 1970's, it was clear that we had created chaos, disorder in the economy, wild inflation, government programs that tore up the fabric of the family and trampled on tradition.

Now, not all of what government has done has been bad. But in recent years, much of it was. And the worse things got, the more the Government took to blaming it on the people. Do you remember a few years ago, where they said the fault was ours? We had a malaise -- that we were never going to have things as good again, and we might as well get used to it.

Well, in 1980 the American people declared their independence once again. We recognized, once and for all, that a government big enough to give you everything you want is big enough to take away everything you've got. And we recognize that after all this time, Henry David Thoreau was right: that government is best which governs least.

Now, we need government, of course. But when you go from government to big government -- to government as the neighborhood bully -- it's time for a change, and change we made. We started putting our house in order. When we cut tax rates 25 percent, we said, Washington, you've had enough. And when we cut inflation by two-thirds, we said, Economic chaos, your time is past. And we didn't do this for some of the people -- we didn't do it especially for blacks or whites, or men and women, or old and young; we did it together, and we did it for everybody.

Now, the other side thinks of America as little more than a collection of special interest groups competing against each other, but they ought to wake up to what a united America accomplished while they were busy trying to manipulate this group and that.

I believe that we have returned to a proper understanding of who the American people are. We're the people who crossed the plains, scaled the mountains, won the West. We're the people who came up with the inventions that lit the world and filled it with sound and laughter. We're the people who twice in this century have fought in Europe and stood up for decency for all mankind.

In the past few weeks, I've gone throughout this country, and I've talked to Americans, and I've taken questions from them. And one of the things that I've tried to talk about is how the revolution of 1980 is open to and eager for the help of the rank-and-file members of the Democratic Party. I hope that there are many present here today -- I was one myself once. And whenever I talk about Franklin Delano Roosevelt or Harry Truman or John F. Kennedy, my opponents start tearing their hair out. They just can't stand it. Well, of course they can't, because it highlights how far they, the leadership today of the Democratic Party, has strayed from the strength of the democratic political tradition.

The good and decent Democrats of the rank and file, patriotic Democrats by the millions, they haven't changed. Like their former leaders, they're clear-eyed about the world. They have few illusions, and they consider themselves to be Americans first, and not members of a special interest group.

When John Kennedy was President, he didn't push a program of dreary mediocrity with endless tax increases on those who dream of better days. He challenged Americans, just as we're challenging you today, to make America grow and to make America great by pushing for lower personal income tax rates for all the working people of America. And there was a great similarity between his tax cut program and the one that we implemented in 1981.

But the leaders of the present Democratic Party, as I've said, have gone so far left, they've left the mainstream. They no longer stand for what their great party always stood for. And that's a sad change; and I don't welcome it, because it's not good for this country. We see things as they are, and that's why I ask Democrats to listen to us, to give us a chance, to consider whether or not we don't, in fact, stand for the justice and decency that you've always cared about. We welcome you.

Finally, I want to talk about the bright future I anticipate if we continue on the path that we've begun. We're going to continue to force personal income tax rates down, not up. We're going to continue curbing government's appetite. And that's going to keep the economy blooming. It is going to continue to grow. It's going to create millions of more jobs and new worlds of opportunity for all of us -- all of us together. And with that new economic freedom, we'll have more time and more opportunity to explore the things of the soul. We'll be a nation even greater in art and learning and scientific inquiry; a nation great in observance and worship and love for the God who made us.

The President.  All right. Let me tell you something right now. We couldn't have done the things that we've done if we hadn't had a majority in the United States Senate. And we need the help of Jack Lousma, who was a great astronaut, who will make a great U.S. Senator.

Let me just add one thing here. One of the reasons that I wanted to be on a campus -- because I figured that there might, as a result, be a lot of young people present, and there are. You're what this election and this campaign are all about.

Those people, a few years ago, were telling you to lower your expectations and hopes and be prepared for something that was kind of mundane and no longer like the America that you've heard about from your parents and grandparents in the past. Let me tell you something. No, our duty -- when I say, ``our,'' I mean people of my age and some younger -- our duty is to make sure, and we're going to, that you have the same America of opportunity and hope and dreams and future that we had when we were your age.

The President.  Thank you very much. Thank you also for your time this afternoon, for your support, for your commitment, and for your faith that America's best days are still to come. And God bless you all.

I congratulate President Duarte for his great courage and foresight. His offer Monday to sit down next week with the guerrillas without preconditions and without arms to discuss their participation in the democratic system in El Salvador is an act of statesmanship. I applaud his leadership and support his decision. It appears as though the guerrillas have accepted President Duarte's offer. If only the commandantes in Nicaragua would make the same offer to the resistance forces there, we would all be much closer to true peace in Central America.

When I forwarded a report from my Administration to the Congress on Soviet Noncompliance with Arms Control Agreements on January 23, 1984, I said, ``If the concept of arms control is to have meaning and credibility as a contribution to global or regional stability, it is essential that all parties to agreements comply with them.'' I continue to believe that compliance with arms control agreements is fundamental to the arms control process.

The General Advisory Committee's report to me resulted from a year-long analysis, by this bipartisan independent body, of Soviet practices with regard to arms control treaties, other agreements, unilateral political commitments, and statements of policy. Neither the methodology of analysis nor the conclusions reached in this report have been formally reviewed or approved by any agencies of the U.S. Government. The report reflects the General Advisory Committee's attempt to assemble as complete as possible an historical record of Soviet behavior and to identify long-term patterns of Soviet compliance practices.

For its part, the Administration continues to be seriously concerned about Soviet behavior with regard to compliance with arms control obligations and commitments. We are actively pursuing several such issues in confidential discussions with the Soviet Union and are seeking explanations, clarifications, and corrective actions. Issues of concern continue to be intensively studied by appropriate agencies, and I intend to keep the Congress informed on this important matter in the future.

Increased understanding of compliance issues and a solid Congressional consensus on the importance of compliance to achieving effective arms control will strengthen our efforts to negotiate equitable and verifiable agreements and will assist as we seek the resolution of important unresolved compliance issues. I look forward to continued close consultation with the Congress as we seek to make progress in resolving compliance issues relating to existing arms control agreements and in negotiating sound arms control agreements.

White House. And today, as part of Minority Development Week, we pay tribute to the minority business owners of our nation. And in a few minutes it'll be my great pleasure here to participate in the remainder of the ceremony with regard to them. I know they've -- Mac has just presented them to you.

Not too long ago, I was asked to explain the difference between a small businessman and a big business man or woman. And my answer was, ``Well, a big one is what a small one would be if the Government would get out of the way and leave him alone.'' [Laughter] Well, that's what we're trying hard to do -- to help you all make it big. And the last thing you need is to climb aboard the economic train, and after a long, tough fight, to buy a ticket and then see the train come to a screeching, grinding halt.

Less than 4 years ago, the heavy freight of double-digit inflation, high taxes, record interest rates, and overregulation had stopped the economic train dead in its tracks. Well, that's all been changed. And today a strong and a vibrant America is settling in. Inflation has plummeted by nearly two-thirds, and it's staying down. Purchasing power is back in the hands of the consumers.

And that's great news for America's business community. Productivity is rising, and economic growth is solid. And the best news of all is over 6 million more Americans have jobs than just 21 months ago, jobs that you are helping provide.

America is to be strengthened, we mustn't waste the genius of one mind or the strength of one body or the spirit of one soul. We must use every capability we have. And the surest way to do that is to mobilize the power of private enterprise and let you work your magic.

I believe that when it comes to making sure that all Americans, from every walk of life, every color, creed, and religion have the chance to make it big, there's no better way than to keep the economy sparkling and the opportunities expanding for you and for all our citizens.

We know that given opportunities, minority firms can prevail in fair and open competition. You are a dynamic force in the marketplace. You're bringing hundreds of thousands of jobs to hard-working Americans, providing innovative products, needed services, and ideas and opportunities for the future. The only thing I want to see is your success grow and your numbers increase. And that's why we'll keep supporting, at every level of government, a broad range of programs to reach out to disadvantaged sectors of the community.

We're seeing the same results in our objective to procure some $15 billion in minority business goods and services for the Federal Government through fiscal year 1985. And what this means is that your firms will receive nearly $3 billion more in Federal contracting in 3 years than was provided in all the 12 years during the last three administrations.

Now, we're determined to increase opportunities for minority businesses to participate in Federal procurement. And I might mention that these figures do not include procurement by recipients of Federal grants and cooperative agreements. And that adds an additional $6 billion to $7 billion to the total.

We want to see your business community continue to grow and grow. We're working hard to be sensitive to your concerns and to build on the beginning that we've made together. And I'm delighted to be able to take part in this celebration today. Minority Enterprise Development Week provides an excellent opportunity to salute some of America's most successful entrepreneurs, the men and women who are the real heroes behind America's success.

God bless you for what you're doing, and we're going to continue to try and help in any way we can. The business men and women here today represent industries as diverse as steel, automobile, and computers. And they're all pioneers in America's continuing frontier of opportunity -- the free market system.

And now for the most pleasant job that I've had all week, and I'm sure happy that it wasn't up to me to pick the winners. [Laughter] As far as I'm concerned, you're all winners, and we're very proud of what you're doing.

And our next small business minority winner of the year, Mr. President, is somebody you probably heard of a few years ago. He used to play a little basketball around Detroit. He turned into a steel all-star now -- Dave Bing, Mr. President.

The President. No. And I still say that if you read the transcript, you'll find that none of the facts that I presented were refuted. And my refuting of the misstatements of fact on the other side -- there was no response to them.

Q. Do you feel as though you might want to do something a little differently to prepare for the next debate? Is there something you might do that you didn't do last time or cut out something that you did?

Our forests and grasslands constitute a major renewable natural resource of the Nation. As such, they must be carefully nurtured and protected if we are to pass on their precious legacy of use and enjoyment to future generations of Americans.

The importance of forests and grasslands to the stability of our environment in terms of air quality, water, wildlife, range, timber, and recreation is beyond calculation. Furthermore, the list of products from these lands that enhance our lives is extensive.

Service, the Advertising Council, and the National Association of State Foresters. On this occasion, it is appropriate to acknowledge the success of this unique public service campaign to promote public concern for prevention of forest fires and wise stewardship of our forests.

General Casimir Pulaski fell at the Battle of Savannah 205 years ago, but his memory is still fresh among all those who prize freedom and value independence. General Pulaski was a patriot for two countries. The United States and Poland share the noble legacy of a hero who gave his life so that the torch of freedom would never be extinguished. In his native Poland, he struggled to oppose foreign occupation; in his adopted land, America, he fought to the death for the independence of the thirteen colonies.

Pulaski's shining example and his spirit of self-sacrifice, have made great cultural, economic, and political contributions to American life. Without their achievements, the United States would be a very different and a far poorer country.

Polish Americans join with all of their fellow citizens in noting that the struggle for freedom and human rights continues. It is important to take this occasion to recommit ourselves to the support of the cause of genuine national reconciliation for Poland.

It's a pleasure to be here tonight with Effi Barry, who chaired this dinner, and with so many friends and supporters of the UNCF. Nancy and I consider it a high privilege to serve as your honorary chairpersons, and I know that she would have been with me here tonight, except they've got her down in San Antonio, Texas. Politics may make strange bedfellows -- they're kind of breaking some up now and then. [Laughter] Especially in campaign years.

But Vice President Bush has other things on his mind, as you can well imagine -- [laughter] -- but he asked me to give you his regards tonight. The United Negro College Fund has meant a great deal to George ever since he became an organizer for the Fund during his student days at Yale.

Frederick Douglass and Booker T. Washington grew up at a time when, in many parts of the country, it was actually against the law to teach black children to read and write. Yet, they overcame these injustices to become among the greatest educators our nation has ever seen.

In our own time, no less a figure than Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., stressed the importance to black Americans of good education. Dr. King said, ``We must forever conduct our struggle on the high plane of dignity and discipline.'' And he understood that no activity requires more discipline or confers greater dignity than the training of young minds.

And throughout those hard years, millions of black Americans saw education as a shining hope for advancement. And it was the colleges you worked so hard to sustain -- Tuskegee, Spelman, Fisk, and so many others -- that turned that burning hope into a blazing reality.

I remember how, during the war, I narrated a film -- I was in the Air Force myself, but they kept track of what my occupation had been before -- I narrated a film about black pilots being trained at Tuskegee Institute. They were brave young men. And one of them would go on to become a great general, a great patriot, and a national hero -- Chappie James.

I'll never forget how impressed I was by their esteem for Tuskegee and by their deep love of learning. And I slip in here a little bit and tell you that I'm extremely proud that just recently they made me an honorary member of the Tuskegee Flyers. Now, that's quite a step for a former lieutenant of horse cavalry.

For many years, you in the United Negro College Fund have served these colleges and universities with just that, true loyalty and devotion. You've provided these schools and their students with millions of dollars in crucial funds. You've played a vital role in enabling their enrollment to grow by some 10 percent in the last 15 years. And each year there are 45,000 students on campus who are either receiving support directly from you or attending colleges that you help to maintain.

Just as significant, my Executive order also called on the Federal Government to encourage the private sector to give these vitally important schools still more support. The self-reliance and opportunity that we want for America's black colleges and universities are just what we want for all our black citizens -- indeed, for all Americans. We're working to create enterprise zones to help disadvantaged Americans, especially those in our inner cities, to get off welfare and onto the economic ladder. We're supporting the youth employment opportunity wage to help teenagers find jobs. And across the board, we're striving to create vigorous, long-term economic growth.

We believe that opportunity builds prosperity, and that prosperity means a better life for individuals, for families, and for the institutions, like black colleges and universities, that Americans cherish.

Negro College Fund is all about. Just think, the black colleges that you support have awarded degrees to half of all black business executives and 85 percent of all black physicians. And your support has been vital to nearly half of these institutions.

No, we can't walk alone. So much of our country's future lies in the dreams of students who depend on the United Negro College Fund. They're dreams of opportunity and prosperity; they're dreams of becoming doctors, lawyers, and statesmen; they're dreams of breaking new ground on the limitless frontiers of science, technology, and space. Together, let us walk into a bright future where all these precious dreams can and will come true.

The President. Well, maybe I talked too much to him about how little time I spent on sitting and thinking and how much time I was, myself, woodshedding, to make sure that everything was fresh in my mind about all that we've done.

The President. I can't remember the context in which I said that. I was! I'm trying to remember what the context was in which I used that, but it was to get in a reference to the fact that I was there by way of the horse cavalry.

The President. Thank you very much. And thank you, your good former Governor and my good friend, Jim Rhodes; the Members of the Congress that you have met already here -- and please, send them back in this election, we need them in Washington -- and all of you ladies and gentlemen.

It's great to be in Ohio again, and especially good to be in Dayton. I happen to like Ohio so much, that I decided to spend the day here. Now, as Jim told you and I'm sure you all know, we're about to embark on a train trip through your State. And of all the things we've done in this campaign, there's nothing I've looked forward to more.

We're taking the whistlestop tour of '84 to demonstrate that our government is once again on the right track, and our national renewal is not going to be derailed. I'll be traveling on the same train that Harry Truman used in the 1948 campaign. And all of us who remember what he said know that he spoke some very blunt truths, and that's what I hope to do today.

Sometime back I made a rather big statement. I said that this election is the most significant in half a century. And I said it because the issues of this campaign are so clear cut and the differences in philosophy and approach to government are so great, that this year America will either ratify the great turn that we made in 1980 or decide to go back to the old days and the old ways.

Well, in some ways I think we're like the pioneers who won the West -- we can stick together, stand together, and move on together, or we can retreat in small groups from the challenges of a great new world. I think we'll decide as the pioneers did.

You know, like the pioneers, we might remember for a few minutes the desert we had to go through to get here. We've come a long way in less than 4 years. And together, we've put all of that old tired talk about malaise and the age of limits behind us. We have, together, disproved two major myths, fairy tales, about America: that her best days were behind her and that the people were powerless to solve problems. Do you remember when they were telling us that and that we were going to have to get along with less? [Applause] Well, we have restored hope and confidence, faith and courage, and returned them as the birthright of every American.

In the economy, as you have been told, we reduced inflation by two-thirds, down to 4.2 percent for the last year. We got the prime interest rate -- which by 1980 was the highest since the Civil War -- we got that down by 40 percent. It's now down by 9 points. We cut unneeded Federal regulations, and this alone will save consumers and businesses about $150 billion over the next 10 years. Do you know that with a task force cutting back on regulations, we have eliminated your paperwork -- government-required paperwork -- by 300 million man-hours a year?

In education, we shifted the emphasis from how much government spends to how much students learn. And the result is a renewed commitment to excellence and scholastic aptitude test scores that are going up again for the first time in 20 years. In fact, this year they jumped 4 points, and that doesn't sound like much, but it is the biggest increase in 20 years.

We've made America less dependent on foreign oil. We deregulated the oil prices. And, oh my, they said that gasoline would go to $2 a gallon. Well, gasoline prices are nearly a dime less than they were since we took office.

We saved the Social Security system from collapse while benefits continued to rise. And this is one -- let me just pause and say here -- this attack, so falsely based, that it's frightening so many senior citizens unnecessarily, I'm going to repeat what I said on a certain Sunday night recently.

And there's one more item I'll mention. We cut tax rates by 25 percent for every taxpayer in the country. Now, I want to talk about that, about taxes, because taxation is an issue with profound economic consequences. We cut personal tax rates for every taxpayer in the country to stimulate economic growth and boost economic expansion. And to the surprise of some people, but not to us, it worked. With lower taxes, the economy created over 6 million jobs in the last 21 months alone. With lower taxes, nearly 900,000 businesses were incorporated in the 17-month period that ended in May of this year. Now, that's good for all of us. But it's especially good for those who, through no fault of their own, have been unemployed. You know, when you create just one job, when you release just one man or woman from the prison of unemployment, then you've changed their lives forever. And that's the moral element of taxation, letting the economy bloom so that the poor and the disadvantaged can have a chance.

I believe that the American people will resoundingly reject his call for heavy new taxes, because, unlike him, they've learned from experience. They've learned that high tax rates discourage effort, investment, production, and enterprise. But low tax rates stimulate those things, and that creates jobs, and jobs are exactly what Ohio and every other State needs more of.

Now, let's talk about what the tax increases he'll need to pay for all his promises will do to you personally. If my opponent is to keep all the promises that he has made in this campaign -- and we've priced them out -- he would have to increase taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 per household. That's more than $150 a month for every household.

Mondale mortgage is a mortgage on your future, to pay for his campaign promises. And let me tell you about that mortgage. The payments will get bigger and bigger and bigger. As he puts more heavy taxes on the people and on their businesses, the economy will slow down and slow down and slow down. And after that kills the recovery, he'll want to raise your taxes again and again to make up for it. Do you want to pay for his mistakes?

The President. Well, my opponent says the deficit is the central issue; we say growth is the central issue. Now, he says higher taxes are the answer; we say higher taxes are the problem, because they kill growth, kill creativity, and kill productivity.

We want to simplify the entire tax system so we can bring yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up. And that's why this election is about the future, because it's about growth and opportunity for all Americans. We're talking about the kind of America we'll create for our children. And I think this is why -- this, being able to imagine a better future for our young people and work toward it -- that's why so many of the young people of the country support our philosophy, and I'm pleased to see so many of them here today.

The President. Okay. All right. All right. All right, if anyone doubts the great renewal in this country, let them look at the bright and shining optimism of our young people -- our high school students, college students, and our young working people. They are a new nation unto themselves. And it seems to me that they understand and support our philosophy, because they are idealists.

They believe in people. They believe that people deserve a chance, and that they can create miracles when given a chance. I'll tell you, there have been moving moments and heartening moments in this campaign, but nothing, nothing that I've seen has surpassed seeing the young people of our country give us their support.

Let's talk a little more about that reign, because our opponent's mistakes aren't limited to tax policy. Do you remember the grain embargo in which the American farmers paid for our opponent's foreign policy failures? [Applause] Now there's an example both of an unfair policy and of an artful attempt to get around it. My opponent says he always opposed it. Now that's funny, because in fact he supported it publicly, explicitly, and enthusiastically. He even questioned the patriotism of a Senator in his own party for calling it what it was -- a dumb idea. But it's funny that he's having this little memory lapse. [Laughter] As you know, the symbol of our party is an elephant, and elephants have long memories.

Your State, Ohio, would be helped by Federal enterprise zones in which the rundown parts of a city get special help from tax incentives aimed at getting business men and women in there to open shops and run companies. Dayton, itself, has two State enterprise zones. They were created just more than a year ago, and they've already attracted more than a dozen new businesses into the area. Now that, too, would create jobs and growth and economic revitalization for troubled areas. But the Federal enterprise zone bill has been held hostage by the liberal Democratic leadership in the House of Representatives, the same people who want to work with my opponent to raise your taxes.

I think now I hear the train whistle. [Laughter] You know, that train is the old U.S. One. And as I said, Harry Truman spoke from the back of that train, and Franklin Roosevelt and Dwight Eisenhower also spoke from it. Well, I speak from it because we mean to continue their tradition of a strong and vital America, and I speak from it because I think all of us this year will stay together and move forward with the force of a locomotive. We're on the right track, America's best days are ahead, and nothing can stop us because this train is bound for glory.

You know, there is a mother out there with a tiny baby on her shoulders. And I can't help but say, seeing that baby, that's really -- there's another one! -- [laughter] -- that's what it's really all about, that those little babies when they begin to grow up will find the same golden-dream America that we found when we were babies and growing up in this country.

The President. Hello, Cripp? These phone calls between us seem to occur more and more frequently. We're going to start calling you the Nation's senior shuttle system -- citizen, I should say -- [laughing]. Now that you've spent nearly 400 hours on board the space shuttle, I think that could be your title.

The President. Well, as you may know, today's call to you and the crew is a bit different. I happen to be on board a train right now in Dayton, Ohio. [Applause] And I hope you could hear that cheer from the crowd that's outside the train here.

And Dayton is where Wilbur and Orville Wright developed and built their early gliders and airplanes. I'm told that the Wrights spent about 7 years and a thousand dollars in development costs to build their early aircraft, the one that flew in 1903. Well, since the Challenger flies a little bit farther and maybe a little faster than the original Wright fliers, I suppose we can justify the slightly higher development costs that we have.

The President. Well, listen, to all of you, let me say congratulations and tell you how proud we are of what you're doing. I guess as you circle the Earth several more times, I'll be traveling by train across Ohio. So, you have a safe landing tomorrow, and God bless all of you.

Since 1946, the National School Lunch Program has made it possible for our Nation's children to enjoy nutritious, well-balanced, low-cost lunches. Now in its 38th year, the National School Lunch Program stands as an outstanding example of a successful partnership between Federal and State governments and local communities to make food and technical assistance available in an effort to provide a more nutritious diet for students.

The young people of our Nation are our greatest resource. The School Lunch Program demonstrates our commitment to the promotion of the health and well-being of our youth. Under its auspices, over 23 million lunches are served daily in nearly 90,000 schools throughout the country. The success of this effort is largely due to resourceful and creative food service managers and staff working in cooperation with government personnel, parents, teachers, and members of civic groups.

The provision of a decent home and a suitable living environment for every American family continues to be a national housing goal. Homeownership and decent housing instill pride in our citizens and contribute to the vitality of communities throughout America. This year, a vibrant housing industry continues to provide jobs for thousands of our citizens and to play a major role in our Nation's economic recovery.

Housing comes in an almost infinite variety of forms from single-family detached dwellings to large urban skyscrapers. It is available for purchase or rent. It includes lovingly restored older buildings and prefabricated new ones. But whatever form it takes, good housing remains an essential part of the American Dream. The efficiency and success of free enterprise in responding to the great variety of market demands for housing deserve special notice and commendation.

As increasing numbers of blind and visually handicapped people enter the American mainstream to live and work among sighted people, the public should be alerted to the significance of the white cane. The white cane is more than a guide for its users and a signal to others. Through the aid of a white cane and an informed and empathetic public, many blind and visually handicapped people can now enjoy the fullness of American life.

As we become sensitive to the needs of the blind and the visually handicapped, we remove shared burdens. As our visually handicapped citizens become more self-sufficient, the lives of those they touch are enriched by the example of their courage. Patronizing or pitying attitudes -- barriers much worse than physical ones -- will surely diminish as there is more interaction among us.

Sighted people should be aware that many white cane users lead independent lives and that others are well on their way to doing so. We should always provide them the kind of assistance that they need and appreciate.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) Pursuant to Section 204 of the Act, the Commission shall study existing and proposed United States space activities; formulate an agenda for the United States civilian space program; and identify long range goals, opportunities, and policy options for civilian space activity for the next twenty years.

Sec. 3. Administration. (a) The heads of Executive departments, agencies and independent instrumentalities shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the Commission, upon request, such information as it may require for purposes of carrying out its functions.

The 1984 campaign is in full swing. And no matter who you are -- student, construction worker, farmer, nurse, or high-tech entrepreneur -- this election offers you the clearest choice for your future in many years.

The central economic issue in this campaign is growth. Will we have policies that give each of you opportunities to climb higher and push America to challenge the limits of growth, policies like those that in the 22 months have given this nation the strongest economic expansion in 30 years, or will we go back to those failed policies of the Carter-Mondale administration that inflicted unprecedented hardship on our people?

Our vision of strong economic growth is not a pipedream; it's a living accomplishment. And it can continue to get better, offering new hope for everyone, including all of you who have not yet recovered from the Carter-Mondale past.

We came to Washington with a pledge to make a new beginning by putting more power, earnings, and decisions back in your hands. That's why we passed the first tax rate reduction for everyone since President John Kennedy's program 20 years ago. And it's no coincidence that once those tax cuts took hold, the American economy woke up with a roar from years of economic slumber.

Think about this success, because you're the ones who made it happen and who can and must keep it going. Twenty-two straight months of economic expansion and yet inflation is only one-third what it was when my opponent was in office. Six hundred thousand new business incorporations last year -- an all-time record. Over 6 million new jobs created; in fact, more jobs created on average each month than were created in all the Common Market countries combined during the last 10 years.

But we can't and won't be satisfied until every American who wants a job can find a job, until inflation is down to 0.0 and interest rates have been brought down more, until the farm community has fully recovered from the legacy of record interest rates, inflation, and the grain embargo -- and until we modernize and make our older industries more competitive with new technologies. In other words, all of us have made great progress, but even greater challenges lie ahead.

We want to go forward with exciting new opportunities to help America challenge the limits of growth -- for example, an historic simplification of our tax system, making the entire system more fair and easier to understand so we can bring yours and everybody's personal tax rates further down, not up.

My opponent has a very different vision -- a gloomy vision of weakness that doesn't look to you with confidence or challenge you to dream great dreams and make America grow, but that places its trust in bigger government. We must ask ourselves one question: What has he ever done or said to suggest, let alone convince us, that his vision can do anything but fail?

The record is clear. In his administration, the only things that went up were inflation, interest rates, and taxes, while everything else -- investment, productivity, earnings, savings, confidence, optimism, and growth -- all fell apart.

That was just before inflation dropped dramatically. He said there was no hope of recovery. Then economic recovery began. He said recovery would be anemic at best. That was before the strongest economic expansion in 30 years. Now he says the deficit cannot be brought down without new tax increases. And at this very moment, the deficit is coming down without new tax increases.

We trust in you, and that spells success through economic growth. Nor has he learned from his mistakes. He has proposed to raise taxes by $85 billion. In fact, he would have to raise taxes the equivalent of $1,890 per household to pay for his promises.

And just this past week he began to reveal the rest of his plan. He said he would repeal indexing, the reform we passed to keep you from being taxed when inflation pushes you into higher and higher tax brackets. Now he says he goofed. Well -- whatever. We do know he has a basic two-part plan: raise you taxes, and then raise them again.

Asking you to buy his failed policies is a little like someone expecting you to go to a used-car lot to buy back the lemon you got rid of 4 years ago. But you don't have to. You can stick with leadership that's working; leadership that trusts in you and offers growth and opportunity so all of us can go forward together to build a better American future.

You know, when I left the White House this morning, it was kind of good to say, ``I'm Alabamie bound.'' But it is wonderful to be here at the University of Alabama, the home of the Crimson Tide. And, incidentally, I might say to the members of your football squad, and also to all of you who are such obvious supporters -- I know you have a fine team and I know that you've been a little disappointed in part of the opening of the season. But then came last Saturday, and you became Lion tamers.

Well, I know also that your campus is one of the most beautiful in the country. I know this because I've been reminded of it by a valued member of my staff, Margaret Tutwiler, [Special Assistant to the President] who hails from Alabama and who graduated from UA.

She told me of the discovery last month of the original foundation of the university rotunda that was built before the Civil War and how it was once the centerpiece of this campus. And now it's turned up and still solid. And I got to thinking about how after all this time that foundation is still there and standing strong. And I'm involved in a campaign for reelection -- or didn't you know?

The centerpiece of our administration is one word: freedom. The foundation has been a program aimed at lowering tax rates, revitalizing the economy, and creating opportunity so that every American gets a chance at a good life.

The present has benefited from our program, but it's the future that we're building. Inflation was over 12 percent when we came into office, and now it's down around 4. And that means the poor and the people on fixed incomes are finding it easier to get by.

Over the past 3 years, we cut personal tax rates for all Americans by 25 percent. You know, when we spend our own money, businesses and entrepreneurs profit, expand, and create jobs. And it has the force of a rolling tide. When we put our tax savings in the bank, that capital is available for all kinds of expansion, which creates growth and opportunity and more jobs. And when you cut personal tax rates, you create an incentive that frees up all the boldness and creativity within us. And that too has the force of a rolling tide. Take away incentive and give up your dreams. All of us should be able to keep as much of the fruits of our labor as possible.

Now, the other night my opponent suggested that when I am reelected I intend to raise your taxes. Well, I agree with half of that statement -- the part about being reelected. But as I said then -- and I'll say again -- my goal is to get personal tax rates further down, not up. And this is where he and I definitely differ. To pay for all the promises he's made, he would have to raise taxes the equivalent of $1,890 per household. That's more than $150 a month. I know that you and your parents have other things to do -- or that you'd like to spend that money on -- like tuition.

But we're talking about more than personal hardship here. If we go back to the old days of raising taxes and raising spending, we'll kill the prosperity that we're now enjoying. People will have less money, spend less money, save less money. No new jobs will be created, and many jobs will be lost. I don't think you want economic policies that will send you from the graduation line to the unemployment line.

The President. You've been spending years receiving a fine education, and all of you have a great deal to contribute to make this world a better place. And you deserve wide open opportunities for your talents when you get out of school.

I think my opponent's economic policies and programs are about as bad as they can be. And when he comes down here and says his ideas are best for the South, he's handing you the ultimate Mason-Dixon Line. [Laughter] You know, buying his economic policies is like going to a used-car lot to buy back the lemon you sold them 4 years ago.

Now, prosperity at home is only part of what we're trying to achieve. We've been moving quickly these last 3\1/2\ years or so toward peace through strength. We know it's America's role in the world to stand for something.

We need to be a reliable friend to our allies and a good neighbor to our friends nearby, and you can't be any of those things without strength. We always want everyone in the world to understand that Uncle Sam is a friendly old man, but he has a spine of steel.

If I could just interject an aside here right now -- today a momentous event will be taking place in the cause of peace in Central America, as President Duarte of El Salvador meets with the leaders of the Salvadoran guerrillas. President Duarte is participating at great personal risk, but it's a risk worth taking in the cause of peace, and the President has our prayers for success in this historic endeavor.

America is at peace, and the economy is in one piece. And I think if we all stick together, we'll move on together, and we'll recreate a country rich in opportunity and enterprise, growth, and creativity; a country even greater in areas of art and learning and scientific inquiry -- even greater in worship and belief.

Now, I have to leave soon, but I can't go without talking a minute about a great man that I was proud to call friend -- Bear Bryant. He was sort of the essential American. And, you know, a few years back, I set a kind of a record here at the University of Alabama. I was here to go to a formal dinner where I was to be the after dinner speaker. And Bear invited me to come out and visit practice out here -- football practice.

He was a leader, patriotic to the core, devoted to his players, and inspired by a winning spirit that wouldn't quit. And that's how he made legends out of ordinary people. He was a true American hero, and he was Alabama's own.

The greatness of America and the solution to her problems begins with the people -- with all of you. You know that dreams, drive, courage, and creativity make all the difference. You know, better than anyone, that it's in the hearts of the people that the tide begins to roll.

I'm most grateful to you for asking me here. But now I'm going to quit having a monolog, because I understand we've got a little time that we can have a dialog, and some of you have some questions. Mondale says I don't do this.

Residence Hall Association, the Afro-American Association, IFC-Pan Hellenic, the CW, our campus newspaper, and the student government. He asked that each of us prepare a question for you that would be representative of our respective groups. In addition, Mr. President, before you arrived this morning, a number of other students were drawn -- from a lottery drawing -- to ask you another question.

Speaking for my fellow students, I think it is important to point out to the media present that these are our questions. They represent the thoughts and concerns of the students of the University of Alabama.

Q. Mr. President, many college students fear that the Social Security program will be defunct and no longer in existence 40 years from now when we are at the age to draw its benefits. Obviously, Mr. President, some structural changes must be made in the program to ensure its continued existence. I would like to know exactly what impact any changes that you plan to make in the program will have on college students as we begin our careers? And, also, what is the best piece of advice that you can give a graduating senior of this institution?

Let me just explain something. Social Security started out to be a plan -- $3,000 -- or I mean 3 percent of $3,000 of earnings. That was back before inflation had started to take hold and come up to where it is. There were also some demographic errors -- or projections that were made with regard to the ratio of worker to recipient so that under the previous administration -- 1977 -- they were faced with such a problem in Social Security, such imminent bankruptcy that they passed the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history -- a Social Security tax that in several phases would be phased in between then and 1990. At the same time, they reduced by 25 percent the benefits for everyone born after 1916. And the first of those began to come onto Social Security in 1981.

When we came into office, we found out that the imminent bankruptcy was still there, and we set the time at about July of 1983. I tried to persuade the Democratic leadership of the Congress to join us in a bipartisan commission with the most expert advice, to sit down and find out how. But I said there must be one constraint: We must not pull the rug out from under people who are dependent on Social Security. They must be guaranteed they're going to get the checks that they're getting.

They would not in any way discuss it. So, we finally proposed a plan that made some changes with regard to fringe benefits and so forth, facing this imminent bankruptcy. They, then, in the 1982 congressional campaign went all over the country saying there was no threat, that there was no imminent bankruptcy, and that I just was an enemy and wanted to destroy Social Security.

And then they agreed that they would join us in a bipartisan commission. And we did put together a bipartisan commission. And I can tell you that I think for far more than 50 years, we can now look down to the future and see that for that long, at least, the program is on a sound financial basis, and you won't have to worry about it.

Alabama, and I'm a sophomore prelaw student in the school of arts and sciences here at the university. And I was wondering, considering the much-debated issue in the past about the school prayer to be fully reinstated -- would you, if you were elected for a second term, strive to rekindle the spark of interest, to make it your aim to turn this dream into a reality, thereby proclaiming this nation one nation under God? And if so, what steps would you take to do this?

We didn't ask, as my opponent says, for some planned prayer that politicians would write. I went to six different elementary schools -- my father traveled around a lot when I was a kid -- and in those times, as for 180 years, we had the right to pray in schools. I don't ever remember any organized prayer or anything of that kind.

All we asked for was to recognize that the Constitution, with that wall of separation between church and state, is interfering with the private individual's right to the practice of religion when it says you cannot pray if you want to, voluntarily, in a school. And we want that changed so that you can.

And I'll tell you how we're going to try to get it. It depends a lot on you and people like you, and you letting the representatives in Washington that have been sent there know how you feel. And it isn't necessary that you make them see the light; just make them feel the heat. We have some allies on our side.

Q. Mr. President, my name is LeeAnne Parker, and I'm from Huntsville, Alabama, and I represent the Greek community by serving as Pan Hellenic president. And I would like to ask you what you feel the Federal Government's role should be in helping college students finance their education, and, as President, will you support more or less government financial aid for students? And I would also like to know why you chose to come to speak here at the university today.

The President. Well, they told me I was invited. [Laughter] But I will tell you also why I like it so much, and that is -- all over this country, for a time -- I grew up in a time when you didn't see young people attending political gatherings of any kind. But all over this country, I have seen your generation at rallies and at political gatherings and all, and I am so pleased with that, because you're what the election is all about. It's your America that we're feeling.

The President. Well, let me say also when we arrived and knew that we had to do something about the continued deficit spending of government, and started looking at a lot of programs, we found that some of the college loan programs -- there was no limit on the income of the family that could also get these government-subsidized loans for their young people to go to college. We felt that the aid should be directed at those with real need. So, we've set a limit at about 130 percent of the poverty level.

I'm representing the Crimson White -- that's the campus newspaper. And so, our question for you is concerning the legislation that you signed into law that requires States to raise their legal drinking ages to 21. Why is this action not a contradiction of prior stances you've had against Federal intrusion in the State matters? And if it's a justifiable contradiction, does that now mean that the ends justify the means?

The President. I have to tell you that you're absolutely right, that my concern was over -- having been a Governor for 8 years -- this intrusion that I've been trying to eliminate since I've been President of the Federal Government. But in this particular instance, there was a tangled question with regard to State borders -- and interstate type of thing where some States with one drinking law, and the others not -- and then you had the traveling across the State line to where it was available, and then driving back, sometimes intoxicated -- and the great loss of life that the accidents that we're having because of that.

And I had to say finally that in this instance and with the kind of gray area that was there, I had to say that the -- when we saw the difference in areas where the drinking age had been increased and the difference in the accident rate, that I just thought that your lives were worth it.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Simeon Spencer, and I'm a junior from Tuscaloosa, Alabama. And on behalf of the Residents Hall Association and the residential community of this campus, I'd like to extend to you our greeting and tell you that we're very glad to have you here. And as a resident of Tuscaloosa, my question is as follows: You are a strong believer in federalism and have made it clear that you'd like to see the bulk of programs from municipalities be implemented by the local governments. Studies have shown that they are unable at this present time to take this responsibility. If you were reelected, how do you plan to change this within the next 4 years?

The President. Well, we intend to help local and State governments in this transition. We're just not going to throw something at someone and say, ``Here, it's all yours.'' And, certainly, there are standards that must be set as to what must be achieved in these programs.

Government lays a categorical grant out here, as it's called, and either provides it to the State or the local government, it is so surrounded with regulations and redtape that the Federal Government has the highest rate of overhead, of giving a dollar's worth of service to the people of any level of government or any private agency in the country. So, right now, we have taken 62 categorical grants, and we funneled them into what we call 10 block grants. And we've turned these 10 block grants over.

Now, let me just give you an example of what happens when you do that. When you recognize that at the local and State level -- their priorities can't be determined by Washington. Washington doesn't know what is the priority in Tuscaloosa and can claim that it's the same as in Indianapolis.

They vary, and local leaders should have some leeway, making these things work. What happened to the Federal Government in just these 62 grants? The administrative overhead -- their personnel for manning the -- supervising the 62 grants at the Federal level dropped from 3,000 employees to 600. At the local and State level, the regulations went from 885 pages down to 30. And we think that we can do a better job back here.

Now, let me add just one thing. If, however, any level of government -- I don't anticipate trouble of this kind, but suppose at any level of government someone really violates the trust and starts pulling back and not doing what they're supposed to do with those block grants. If this is a violation of the constitutional rights of any citizen, then I contend that the Federal Government has a responsibility to go anywhere where even one citizen's constitutional rights are being violated, and to see that those rights are restored.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Frank Comenski, and I'm a junior in mining engineering, and I'm from here in Tuscaloosa. My question is: Mr. President, we in Alabama are concerned with the development of our most abundant resource, coal, as a leading energy source. What do you see for the future of coal as compared to other major energy sources such as oil, gas, and nuclear energy?

We've done a number of them regarding smokestack scrubbers and that sort of thing. There is no way that this country can ignore the great source of energy -- the greatest source of energy as to quantity that we have -- and that is coal. It is a great export of ours also, and there must be use.

What we must continue doing also is research in finding out the best ways to utilize it at the lowest rate of pollution. And I believe in it very definitely, that we can't just turn that off and ignore it and say that we won't use it anymore.

Going back to the issue of financial aid, we know that the income of middle-class families has increased, but now most middle-class families make too much money for their children to receive any substantial amount of financial aid. And yet their income is not enough to adequately meet the needs of the family and to educate their children. If reelected, what do you plan to do to help those who are being squeezed in the system at present?

The President. Well, I know right now that our Department of Education is looking at this problem to make sure that we do not penalize people who actually need and deserve help and cannot get it otherwise. On the other hand, we've also turned to the private sector and -- with something we call the private initiative. And we have an office in the White House, but we had literally thousands of people from all over the country as volunteers in finding all the ways and the things that could be done. And education is one of those, also, in which private sources -- when I said earlier that I had to borrow money -- there weren't any such things as government loans; they were private foundations that you borrowed from, and paid back after you were out of school and back earning again.

So, between these two things, I hope that we can eliminate any hardship that we might have created for people that are close to that dividing line, and then just a little above it -- it means no school. I think one of the things we should look at also is the work-study program, which I think could be probably expanded up to a higher level than we have. But we don't want to shut people out.

We did find -- the thing we were trying to resolve is -- I have to tell you, we found some people, with the interest rates so high, other than on those subsidized loans, that there were people that were borrowing the college loans -- could well afford to send their sons and daughters to college -- and borrowing the college loans and then buying government paper with them, investing in government paper to make a profit on the difference in interest from the same government that made the loan to them in the first place. And we didn't think that that was what the taxpayer wanted to work for.

You remind me that only one thing can surpass the warmth of southern sunshine, and that's the warmth of a southern welcome. And now that I'm here, I don't mind letting you in on a little something -- do you mind if I say, I got Georgia on my mind.

But every time I return here, I'm struck anew by the quiet beauty of this good land and the courage of her people. You who pledge your loyalty and stand by the eternal values, who, during those dark days when so many were burning our flag, you never stopped waving it. You make it so easy to say it's good to be back in the heart of Dixie.

The South is a never ending spring of America's spirit, a living devotion to those good things that bind us as a people -- family, neighborhood, hard work, love of country, freedom, and, yes, faith in a just and merciful God.

Mayor Israel, a city where the local property tax has been cut by almost 25 percent; where crime rates have dropped dramatically; where, for decades, citizens have worked shoulder to shoulder with the fine personnel of Robins Air Force Base; where growth is strong and employment is up by 6,500; where graduation requirements in schools have been raised and students test scores are climbing -- a town that accomplishes all this must have some pretty special people. And they must have a mayor who's one of America's best.

The President. But it's good to see you here and to be here with you. Your generation, you young people have really touched my heart. You're a very big part of the great renewal of spirit that's putting America back on top. And I just want you to know that working to create a future filled with hope and opportunity is what I happen to think this job of mine is all about.

We've made a new beginning. We've said goodbye to that philosophy of government -- or that philosophy, I should say, of government knows best that was dragging America down. And we've restored the one driving idea that made America great -- here the people rule; here in America we're a government of, by, and for the people, and not the other way around.

I know you're proud of a long, excellent tradition in this State -- Georgia football. And I hope you're as proud as I am of the change that we've been seeing across this nation. Four years ago, when Washington was calling the plays, all they did was fumble. Today, you're back in charge, and America's scoring touchdowns again.

But you young people must be confident that prices will be stable, and older Americans must never again live through the nightmare of seeing their savings wiped out. And that's why I support a constitutional amendment, mandating the Federal Government to stop spending more than it takes in. And that's why I support the line-item veto. Do you know that that was favored by a leader named Jefferson Davis, to permit a President to veto items of wasteful spending within an appropriations bill. When I had that as a Governor of California, I used it more than 900 times, and they never overrode the veto once. And that's why we'll continue to claw and struggle until we get inflation down to 0.0, and keep it there.

And we're doing this not only for some special groups -- not for whites or blacks or men or women or old or young; we're doing it together, and we're doing it for everybody. And we won't rest until everybody who wants a job can find a job, from the coast of Georgia to San Francisco Bay.

Today, Americans are working again, and America is working again. And to make sure that good things keep leading to better things -- investment, jobs, and growth all going up and the deficit continuing to come down -- we want to simplify the entire tax structure so we can bring yours and everybody's personal income tax rate further down, not up.

Now, my opponent's been working for a much different philosophy -- bigger government. And I must say, in doing this, he's been a real leader. No question about that. [Laughter] Sixteen times as a Senator he helped lead the way and voted for new tax increases. And as Vice President, he helped push through the biggest tax increase in our peacetime history in 1977. There are still two phases of that tax to go into effect between now and 1989.

But I must say, there was one thing that was fair about his policies of compassion. They didn't discriminate; they made everybody miserable. But I don't want to be unfair. Maybe he's learned from his mistakes.

Now, he claims his tax increases would only hurt a certain group of people. Well, he's right about that. They would only hurt Americans who want to buy something or save something or invest in something. They wouldn't hurt anybody else. He wants to impose higher taxes on working people.

Now, that's the reform we passed to keep Washington politicians from using inflation to pull you into higher and higher tax brackets. And for the younger people who might not have thought about this at first -- what it means is that when you get a cost-of-living pay raise, it's only supposed to make you keep even with inflation, so that you don't lose any purchasing power.

But then in the last few days, he said he goofed. He said that he didn't really mean to say that -- that he was going to repeal indexing. Well, the only thing we know for sure is, he has a basic two-part plan: raise your taxes, and then raise them again. But I've got news for him. The American people don't want his tax increase.

He sat by while scholastic aptitude tests went down and crime rates went up. But we've worked with you to strengthen our schools and neighborhoods, and now test scores are going back up, and crime rates are coming down.

And while he spent 4 years watching inflation get strong and our defenses grow weak, we've made inflation weaker and defenses stronger. And I am so proud to be able to say that during these last 4 years, not 1 inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression.

The United States is more secure today than we were. And all of us are truly blessed to have the finest group of young men and women in military uniform that America has ever had. For the sake of all who risk their lives to keep us free, we must not fail to provide them the moral support, the weapons, and the equipment they need.

You know, I believe that the Democratic leadership today has abandoned the good and decent and responsible Democrats who believe in the principles that made our country great. I know there are many of you here who are Democrats or who were Democrats and did as I did. And I know that you're here -- because I've met them all across this country -- millions of patriotic Democrats who find they can no longer follow the leadership of their party down the path it's taking us.

Whenever I talk about F.D.R. or Harry Truman or John F. Kennedy, my opponents start tearing their hair out. They just can't stand it. And, of course, they can't, because it highlights how far they themselves have strayed from the strength of the Democratic political tradition. The good and decent Democrats of the rank and file haven't changed. Like their former leaders, they're clear eyed about the world. They have few illusions, and they consider themselves to be Americans first and not members of some special interest group.

When John F. Kennedy was President, he understood the Soviets. He understood Castro. He won passage of a law calling on the United States to prevent Cuba from extending its aggressive or subversive activities to any part of this hemisphere. Were he alive today, I believe he would be ashamed of those in the liberal Democratic leadership who would weaken our defenses, endanger our security, and sell out the cause of freedom in Latin America.

The leaders of the Democratic Party today have gone so far left they've left the mainstream. But come November 6th, I believe they're going to get the shock of their lives. The South will rise again. And you will help lead this nation to a new, golden age of growth and opportunity.

We're not going back to a failed past; we're going forward to a glorious future. And we're going to build it together. And we're going to make it possible for you wonderful young people to reach for the stars. And when that day arrives, when you become tomorrow's leaders, we want to hand you a nation so strong, so united that your America will be a great shining light for progress and peace for generations to come.

Thank you all for always remembering what Faulkner called the old, living verities and truths of the heart -- love and honor, pity and pride, and compassion and sacrifice. I thank you for remembering what America is and must always be -- a willingness of the heart.

And, again, just one last word to these young people here and young people all over America. My generation and a few generations in between mine and yours, we knew an America and grew up in America, when we were your age, in which we just took it for granted that there was no ceiling on the opportunity for us, that it was up to us how far and how high we would fly, and we wouldn't be penalized for our effort. And then we went into a period in which some of that seemed to disappear, and people thought that we could regulate and regiment things and order society around.

Well, our job -- those few other generations I mentioned and my own -- our job is to see that we turn over to you the same kind of country that our parents turned over to us, in which the sky is the limit.

Under its provisions, the Central Intelligence Agency will avoid timeconsuming review of certain operational files, which must in any case remain classified to protect intelligence sources and methods, and will devote its resources to expedited review of other information requests.

This represents a small but important first step, accomplished in large part because of bipartisan cooperation in both houses. We are especially indebted to the leadership of Senators Goldwater and Moynihan and Representatives Boland and Robinson. I anticipate that in the future such relief will be expanded in scope. And I expect that it will become available to other agencies involved in intelligence, who also must protect their sources and methods and who likewise wish to avoid unnecessary and expensive paperwork.

Corporal Staniszewski, who had immigrated to Brockton, MA, acted as an American when he willingly served the United States in a place of peril. He made the supreme sacrifice under our nation's colors and for our country. Today we simply confirm what Corporal Staniszewski earned on July 7, 1967.

It is my intention to submit to the 99th Congress legislation which will provide United States citizenship for all noncitizens killed in action in Vietnam while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States.

The President. Oh, I think it's all important. I think what we're seeing here is the same type of thing that earlier in our time made us the great industrial power we were. We gave our workers the advantage of tools, and with their ability and the tools, we became the great industrial power and outcompeted most of the world.

Well, the world has moved on. And I think it's this -- just what we've seen here -- that, well, I will say again, as in my remarks out there: You give Americans the tools they need and the opportunity of this kind, and they'll outcompete anyone in the world. And I think we're going to see that.

They have certain targets that they think it's all right to cut and reduce, and yet they will turn right around and add to the spending that we have not asked for, because we believe that it wasn't as -- or isn't as important. And this is about all that I can tell you.

The President. Well, just what I've been seeing here, and what I've seen in some other plants -- not schools, but plants where some of this is actually -- or things of this kind are in operation -- is, it's going to put us back in competition. When I see something here doing what it's doing, and I'm told how many times faster that is, and more accurate than the previous operation under older tools, and not computerized tools, then that -- the per unit cost of the item -- is going to put us back there in the marketplace and, as I say, outcompeting the others. And I have been in a few plants recently to see examples of what this is.

One, recently, was a steel plant. They are building it; it isn't finished yet. The investment that they're risking is equal to about two-thirds of the total capital assets of the company. But they know that with this, timewise and costwise, they will be able to be competitive with that particular steel from any part of the world.

The President. Well, I think that it is changing and reshaping our whole industrial pattern and our society, for that matter. I know right now that because of an educational institution like this, industries are being attracted to your area because your graduates will be there as an available skilled force. I've seen this also happen in one of the cities in Texas which has become quite a competitor with places like Silicon Valley in California and because of the educational institutions in the area that have guaranteed that skilled labor force.

And this was certainly not true for a time. So then, when you add to the salubrious climate and the other advantages that have made people in the past decide they'd like to live -- [laughing] -- here, you add to that the opportunity for jobs and technical training and so forth down here, I think you're going to see further population shifts, and you're going to see maybe a change that -- with all due respect to some of the other Southern attributes, King Cotton, and so forth -- I think you might find yourself with another attraction that changes the whole nature of your work, your opportunities, and your industry here.

Q. Mr. President, I work for Amco Lycoming Greer Division. And my question to you is, due to religious convictions and my responsibility to provide the best education possible, I've placed my children in a private Christian elementary school, and their tuition amounts to about 15 percent of my gross yearly income. And I'd like to know, will there be any legislation in the future that would give me a tax break on this tuition without it coming in the form of what the Federal Government would consider a subsidy, thereby giving the Government the right to regulate the school rules and school protocol?

Federal Government being a senior partner. When, a little while ago in the briefing, we were talking about partnerships and participation, I almost wanted to add and say, ``Yes, that's fine, we're very proud to be able to help in something of this kind; we don't want to be a senior partner.'' Now, that wasn't always true. There are other people who think government should be the senior partner.

But I have to say, with regard to what you were talking about and the tuition problem, I think the answer to that is very simple and it's very fair. We've tried to get it, and we've been unable to get it through the Congress, and that is that parents -- education is compulsory in our country -- and parents are entitled to have a choice of whether they want to utilize the public school system or do as you're doing and use an independent school system for their education.

But you have to pay your full share in taxes for the support of public education without you using or benefiting from that education at all. And then, in addition, you, for wanting to put them in another kind of school, you're penalized in having to pay the double expense.

I think that we should have a program of tuition tax credits in which fairness is reinstituted for parents who choose not to utilize the pubic schools. It isn't going to hurt the public schools any. It is going to aid the independent schools because they are now more competitive. And what's wrong with education being competitive? What's wrong with having school systems in which they have to shape up and turn out educated graduates or they're not going to get the support? So, we're going to continue fighting for tuition tax credits for the people like yourself.

I appreciate this chance to be with you today and to see firsthand your innovative and creative method of building a better future. I've just been in there and been treated to some of the wonders that are to be found in these buildings here.

President Dwight Eisenhower once wrote, ``The future will not belong -- or will belong not to the faint-hearted, but to those who believe in it and prepare for it.'' And that's what this campus is all about.

All over America, people like you are making investments in new technology and precision training. And as Americans, working together as never before, we are seeing to it that the United States will not come in second.

I think our competitors in the world are in for an unpleasant surprise. Given the proper training, the tools and equipment, we can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell the pants off anyone, anytime, anywhere in the world.

I'm aware of the extraordinary cooperation among the various levels of government and between the public and private sectors. What you're doing is part of the new spirit of enterprise that's sweeping this country. And it's in stark contrast to the pessimism and stagflation of just 4 years ago.

The American people rejected the politics of doom and gloom. In 1980 they voted for a fundamental change of direction, and that's exactly what we've given them. Instead of centralizing more and more power in Washington and taking an increasingly bigger tax bite out of working people's paychecks, we've returned to the people control of their own destinies. We've reversed the power flow.

And the difference between us and our opponents is a very basic one. When it comes down to a choice between expanding the power of government or keeping that power in the hands of the people, you side with government -- or they side with government, but we will always side with you, the people.

And you haven't let us down. You built an economic recovery that's astounded the experts, especially those so-called experts quoted by my opponent. All we did was get the Government out of your way. They were wrong when they said it wouldn't work. We have high growth and low inflation now. Over 6 million new jobs have been created in the last 21 months. And even more important than the good economic news of today, we're laying the foundation of a happier and more prosperous tomorrow.

The President. His insistence on higher tax rates is like playing Russian roulette with our economic security, only in the game the way he plays it, every chamber in the gun would be loaded. [Laughter] His program of high taxes sugarcoated with compassionate rhetoric is a disaster in disguise that will destroy our economic expansion, increase unemployment, and reignite inflation.

Now, he talked about me and taxes and what he says I'm going to do. Well, I'll tell you what we want to do. We want to simplify the tax system, make it more fair and easier to understand. When you hear that Albert Einstein said that he couldn't understand the Form 1040, you know our tax system is a little complicated. So, we want to do this to bring down yours and everybody's income tax rates further down, not up.

But my opponent even wants to eliminate indexing. That means that he wants you to be pushed by inflation into higher and higher tax brackets, to have less and less take-home pay. Now, we passed indexing -- it goes into effect on January 1st -- and the idea of it, of course, was to prevent a cost-of-living pay raise, in the days of inflation, that's supposed to make you keep even with inflation -- to keep that from pushing you into a higher tax bracket where you pay a higher percentage of tax, and thus you're worse off, you haven't kept even at all. And it's a nice way, of course, in which the Congress can have a continuing tax increase without having to go through the unhappiness of introducing one for legislation and voting on it.

Supporters of economy-killing tax increases claim they're necessary to decrease the deficit. But at the same time, they're poised and ready to turn on the Federal spending spigot, which we've spent so much time turning off. With the strong support of individuals like your own Congressman Carroll Campbell, we have cut the rate of growth in Federal spending by over 60 percent. When we came here it was 17 percent a year. That was the increase. It's now down to 6.1 percent.

But Carroll is a strong voice for responsible government, and I hope you're doing everything you can to send him back to Washington. And while we're talking about responsible government, let's make certain that South Carolina reelects a man who's a giant in that cause -- Senator Strom Thurmond. We need elected officials like Congressmen Campbell, Hartnett, and Spence, who have the vision and leadership to offer better options to the American people than simply raising taxes.

There are those so entangled in their promises to special interest groups they can't see a better future, much less plan for it. Well, this was never more clear than when my opponent strenuously opposed the space shuttle program. He led the opposition in the Senate in trying to kill us from having such a program. And then, just up until Saturday, we had those young people -- men and women -- those heroes, up there going around this country of ours. While I was going across Ohio on a train, they were going around the world about six or seven times. And the things that are coming out of that have made it worth every penny that it has cost -- the additions, the improvements for our health, the medicines, the materials that are being developed.

How many of you have seen one of those shuttles blast off into space or glide in for a smooth landing? I'm sure on television you've seen it, if not in reality. It is a magnificent sight, and it's a tribute to America's technological greatness. It's been worth, as I say, every cent.

Now, today there is a phenomenon that many of the pollsters can't understand, and I see it everywhere I go, and I see it here today. Young people from every background have rejected the politics of pessimism and are foursquare behind a strong, vibrant, and growing America.

And I want to thank all of you young people who are here with us today. We're working to see that when you get out of school, you have the same opportunity that Americans have always had in this country.

You know, a few years ago there were people around that were telling you, no, you know, we had to accept limits, that we weren't ever going to have things as good as they had been in the past. Well, they were blowing smoke. I have told, wherever I've gone -- because all over the country today, at gatherings like this, I have seen so many young people. And I'm so proud and happy to see them there because I like telling you that my generation and a few generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- there were those of us that knew, just took for granted when we were your age that there was no limit to how high we could go, no limit on what we could do if we were willing to reach for it and go for it.

And what I'm determined this election is all about is to make sure that we hand you, when it comes your turn, the same kind of America that our parents handed us. We want you to have the same opportunity. We want you to have a real job when you finish your schooling, not just make-work or some temporary government job, but solid employment. We want to make certain that you have enough take-home pay and that prices and interest rates are reasonable enough so that someday, when you're ready, you'll be able to buy or build your own home.

Due to runaway inflation and the dramatic jump in interest rates under the last administration, millions of Americans found home ownership beyond their reach, and other millions found that the installment paying, the interest in buying a car was too high. And so, two great industries, housing and the automobile industry, ground to a halt.

Americans in reach of buying their own homes. Now, I don't think it's selfish of you to want a good job or to own a home or to have a decent standard of living. You deserve that kind of future, and we aren't going to let our opponents tax it away.

I know the great importance of one particular industry to this area -- textiles. And we have been working, and we are going to continue to work, with your elected Representatives, your Senator, your Members of the House in Washington. We've done some things; we'll continue to do more to see that we help you resolve the problems that have beset that industry.

But now we're on a two-track course. And the other track is we've gone the extra mile to reach arms reduction agreements with the Soviet Union, and we'll continue to do so. But from now on, the United States will be negotiating from a position of strength.

The commanders of our military forces tell me that we have the finest and most dedicated group of young men and women serving in uniform in our Armed Forces than we've ever had in our history. You know, during the last administration, morale sank to a new low point. And many of those serving our country got the feeling that sacrifice, their sacrifice, was being taken for granted. I can promise you this: Those brave people in our Armed Forces will never doubt our unending gratitude for the job that they're doing.

And, you know, I like to suggest this: I hope if you, and especially you students, if you see your counterparts, those young people that are in uniform, down on the street sometime, that you'll maybe just go up and stick out your hand and tell them how proud we are and how thankful we are for their service to America. You'll feel real great after you've done it, and I know how they'll feel. They'll be walking about 3 or 4 inches taller than they were.

As America heads into a new age of technology we have every reason to be confident that it will be an era of opportunity and freedom. The heart of America still burns bright with those values that made this a blessed land of liberty, the greatest and freest nation in our history. And with all of us together, we're going to keep it that way.

Today the United States is the leader of the world in so many ways. A great cleric, Pope Paul -- or Pius XII, after World War II, made a statement when so much of the world was devastated and the future looked so bleak for everyone, and then he said a profound truth. He said, ``The American people have a great genius for great and unselfish deeds. Into the hands of America God has placed an afflicted mankind.'' I don't think there's anyone in America that would turn their backs on that challenge and that opportunity to serve mankind.

A journalist by profession, Mr. Marchenko had already served 8 years in prison -- an ordeal which he barely survived. Nonetheless, this past March he was sentenced to an additional 10 years of imprisonment and 5 years of internal exile because he had written articles criticizing the harshness of Soviet labor camps and the violations of human and national rights in the Ukraine. It is reported that an appeal by his family for amelioration of his conditions, based on his precarious health, was refused by the Soviet authorities.

We are deeply saddened and enraged by Mr. Marchenko's needless death. His brave struggle for individual liberties is an inspiration to all of us. And his death brings home the tragedy of the deteriorating human rights situation in the Soviet Union, a situation which all Americans deeply deplore.

For most of us, combing our hair or crossing the room to turn on the light are simple, routine tasks. But for more than 100,000 Americans who suffer from myasthenia gravis, these everyday activities are enough to exhaust them for hours.

Myasthenia gravis is a serious neuromuscular disease whose cause is not yet known. It can strike anyone at any time, draining people of their vitality, producing muscle weakness and abnormally rapid fatigue.

Though there is still much to be learned, scientists now know that myasthenia gravis depletes its victim of an essential chemical -- without which nerve cells cannot tell muscles to work. Based on this knowledge, scientists have made important progress in managing this disorder. Today, several new forms of treatment are available, and myasthenia gravis patients can expect to lead nearly normal lives.

Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke remain dedicated to this crucial research effort. These investigators are inspired by the courage and tenacity shown by myasthenia gravis patients and their families.

The President. Well, listen, I just want to tell you I think this is very exciting. And I know that you've come along in a world where maybe these things don't seem as astounding as they do to someone that's been around as long as I have. We are coming into a revolution that, I think, is every bit as great as the Industrial Revolution of the last century that shaped our world into the way we've known it. And there's just no limit to the heights that we can go and to the opportunities that are available to you. And this is so exciting to see, you having this opportunity.

I have been privileged recently to be in some industrial plants where already they are using some of what you, right here, are learning about the computerization of machinery, and former -- just assembly lines as we once knew them, with human hands doing a number of things.

Now, I'm not going to go on any longer than this because they told me that -- you see, I would be afraid to start asking you some questions because I'd reveal that I really don't know enough about this to ask the right questions -- but it was suggested to me that maybe you might have a few questions for me. I know we don't have much time, but if you do, fire away.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Gary Scanlon. And my first question I'd like to ask you is, do you feel that your age would have any effect on you upholding another term in the office if you were reelected?

The President. This must be with regard to some of the things about my health and age and so forth. No, I feel fine; matter of fact, I've never felt better in my life. And, yes, I'm looking forward to 4 more years because we've just started, I think, what is necessary to complement the type of thing that's going on here with regard to our free enterprise system. And I want to see it come closer to being finished.

The President. Well, I could say the economy and the recovery that we've made, and I suppose that would sum it up entirely. And yet, there is another one that I'm awfully proud of, and that is the change of spirit in this land of ours. There was an era of pessimism and a feeling that things were never going to be as good again as they had been in the past. All of that's gone, and every place I go in the country I find the American people are gung ho and going forward.

And the interest rates now -- well, just the other day they took another little dip. The prime rate isn't 21\1/2\ anymore; it's now 13\1/4\. I'm trying to think whether I want to go into the unemployment yet or talk about the taxes. As long as I'm talking interest rates, maybe I'd better talk about the taxes -- the fact that we've been able to reduce the rate of increase of government spending from 17 percent a year down to around 6 percent a year.

The President. Not at all. And if there's one thing that makes me angry in this campaign it is that pure political demagoguery for whatever advantage he thinks he can get out of saying those things. And he's not alone. Others have been saying them, too.

No, we were faced, when we came into office, with a Social Security system that in spite of the biggest tax increase in -- single tax increase in history in the Social Security payroll tax -- it was passed in '77 by the previous administration and the previous Congress -- that Social Security was facing bankruptcy. And we started trying to talk to the opposition about -- that we had to head it off, as -- by November of 1982, they wouldn't, they wouldn't discuss with us anything about it.

And by 1982, we had to borrow $17 billion to keep Social Security checks from bouncing. Then when the '82 election was over, finally they agreed to sit down, join with us in bipartisan commission, and find a solution to the financial problems of Social Security. And we did.

Social Security is on a solid footing. But all through all of that discussion I made it plain that I would never hold still for any change in Social Security that pulled the rug out from the people that were depending on it or from those who are looking forward in the next several years to going on Social Security.

The President. Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], I'm familiar with the problem, and as yet they have not -- a problem similar, not quite as extreme yet, but similar to the Social Security problem. That fund, the Medicare fund, in the next several years, unless some adjustments are made, is going to -- well, we're going to have to do something to correct it, because that fund is being drained as the Social Security fund had been drained.

The President. Thank you very much. I just thought I should point out to you today that I didn't come here alone. Standing over here is your Governor and your United States Senator and your Congressman from this area.

Well, what I've seen here in the brief time that's been allowed -- and I know I only have a minute or two now and we have to move on -- but I've seen more than just a school. It is career training, and it is opportunity. And we are having a technological revolution that is every bit as great and probably even greater, than the Industrial Revolution of more than a century ago that led to this great industrial power that we are.

It's a great promise here that you have of unlimited opportunities as you go forward with what you're learning here and what you're preparing to do at WILCO. You are looking ahead. You're getting sensible training that matches the needs of your community. And I'm very proud that our government could be, even in a limited way, a partner in what is going on here, because this is what America's all about. It is a partnership between the public sector and the private sector, and it has a record -- I know that part of this is our own job-training program, the Federal Government -- and you lead the Nation.

That program, nationwide, has an average rate of placement in jobs of 70 percent of the people that go through the training program. Well, you're topping that sizably; your job placement rate here is 85 percent. And I think you can all be proud that WILCO is a winner.

This career center proves something else, I think, also. And that is what I mentioned a moment ago: That when we all work together -- whether government, the private sector, the people themselves -- we can really get things done. And that's been the secret of this nation of ours for these more than 200 years that we've been here.

All right. Let me just say to you on behalf of these gentlemen that are with me here, and myself, today, it is such a thrill, certainly for me, to see you, of your generation, you young people, and the course that you have set yourselves on, because not too many years ago there were people in this country that were trying to tell us that, well, things would never again be as good as they once were.

Well, all I know is that -- I think I probably top anyone in age in this room -- [laughter] -- but I want you to know that I was born into an America where as you grew up, you knew that there was no limit to what you could accomplish, that there was opportunity out there for anyone that wanted to go after it. And that's the kind of America we have again today, and that's the kind of America that we're determined that you're going to have -- the same thing that we knew.

And back in 1935, I was broadcasting the Cubs when the only way they could win the pennant was to win the last 21 games of the season -- [laughter] -- and they did it! So, I'm supposed to be nonpartisan now and on everybody's side, but I was kind of upset there in front of the TV set when they didn't go all the way. But it was a great accomplishment.

The President. Thank you, Governor Jim Thompson, for that most gracious and -- I'm very greatly honored by that introduction. And distinguished Members of the Congress, the officials of your school, and you, I thank you all for that heartwarming reception. It's great to be back in Illinois, and it's great to be back in the proud town of Bolingbrook.

And today, we have just 3 weeks before election day. And our choice is, as the Governor said, as clear as any has ever been before us. Should we go forward with new optimism, prosperity, and strength, or should we go back to the policies of soaring taxation and spending that weakened our economy, snuffed out so many opportunities and threw away so many -- or threw so many, not away, but millions of people into hardship?

Since the aim of education is to prepare America's youth for the future, it was only natural that when our leaders lost faith in that future many of our principals, teachers, and students felt robbed of their sense of purpose. Scholastic aptitude test scores underwent a virtually unbroken decline for 20 years, and science achievement scores showed a similar drop. School discipline began to break down, and we found out that many of our 17-year-olds were functionally illiterate.

When our administration came into office we put education at the top of the national agenda, and we worked to return States, local governments and, yes, your parents to their rightful place in education. And what do you know? We're seeing results. From Maine to Illinois to California, your parents, teachers, school administrators, and all of you have begun to make our schools stronger and better. Your achievement is up. And this year's scholastic aptitude test scores rose 4 points, and that was the largest increase in over 20 years.

Now, much as we'd like to, our administration would like to take credit, but we can't. It belongs to you. All we did was something that every President from Washington to Lincoln did: trust the people.

And when our opponents look at America -- well, my opponent seems to only see big government and little people. And he has only one program to offer: raise our taxes, and then raise them again, so that government can be even bigger. His tax hike would be the equivalent of $1,890 per year per household in the United States. That's more than $150 each and every month. Do you think we should sit back and let that happen to America?

Team and the American Opportunity Team. And now, making the economy bear the burden of our opponent's tax hike would be like having a coach tell an Olympic swimmer that he had to swim down that pool carrying an anvil, or a runner to sprint with a ball and chain around his ankle. But that's just what Coach Tax Hike and his Tax Increase Team want to do.

And they kicked off their fall campaign with a call for $85 billion in new taxes. I said it was a kickoff. There are those who believe it was a punt -- [laughter] -- and we mean to turn it into a blocked kick.

We on the American Opportunity Team want to bring everybody's personal tax rates further down, not up. We want to create opportunity so that all Americans can go forward together with nobody left behind. And come November, the American people will decide which team is America's team.

White House or who will sit in the Congress, it'll determine the kind of America that we pass on to all of you, as the Governor said. And if our opponents have their way, too many of you students would have to go from the graduation line straight to the unemployment line, and that's not good enough for America.

If we win, we're going to build a future together that will enable every one of you to reach for the stars, and you'll know what it is to enter the work force or go to college in a land of prosperity, pride, and hope.

Well, we've already made a good beginning. But a big job awaits us to keep improving our schools, to lead the world toward new frontiers of science, technology, and space, and, yes, to bring the personal tax rates further down so we can create more jobs and more opportunity for a better future.

Now, I'm going to stop with the monolog. I know that our time is limited, and we probably only have a few minutes left. But I understand that there are a few of you that could have some questions here, and I'd like to take those questions. I wish I could do more of that, but the time is limited. So, which microphone?

Q. My name is Biz Hanson, and as a young adult, I'm personally concerned about the possible threat of nuclear war in the future. What efforts are being made by your administration to negotiate with the Soviet Union?

We felt that the only way we could really get real arms reduction -- and this is what I campaigned on -- we had a SALT II treaty signed with the Soviet Union. But all that was was legitimizing a continuation of the arms race. Since that treaty was signed, they've added 3,800 more warheads to their arsenal, nuclear warheads.

Now, we set out not only to restore our economy, as we have, but also to restore our defenses, because we believe that the only way we can persuade the Soviet Union to sit down and negotiate a limit on nuclear arms or a reduction of them is if they see that the United States is willing to go as far as it has to go to see that they don't stay ahead of us in weapons, that we're as strong as they are.

The President. I had the pleasure of telling Mr. Gromyko just days ago that if they feel as we do and if they want peace as much as we do, then they'll join us in not just reducing the number of those nuclear weapons, but in eliminating them entirely from the world.

Q. Mr. President, my name is Lori Rafter, and as a prospective recipient of Social Security, I'm concerned about my future. Exactly what benefits in your Social Security program are you planning on changing when you are reelected?

When we took office, Social Security was nearly bankrupt. There'd been -- well, there had been inflation, for one thing. There had been mistakes in projecting the ratio of workers paying into the fund to the people that are taking the benefits out. And I tried to persuade the leadership of the opposing party, the leadership of the Congress, to try, or to sit down with us and work out a plan that would put Social Security back on a sound footing at the same time it would not pull the rug out from under those people dependent on Social Security.

They refused to talk about it. In fact, they stood up publicly and denied that it was true when I said that Social Security could not, without a change, get past July of 1983; it would be bankrupt by then. And you know something? When they said that that wasn't true, they were right -- it went broke in November of 1982. [Laughter] We had to borrow $17 billion to cover the checks we were sending out.

Well, then, with the 1982 congressional election over, then they agreed to sit down. And we put together a bipartisan commission, and we have fixed for as far as we can see into the future the fiscal situation of Social Security. And I can guarantee you, we're not going to pull the rug out from not only those who are getting it, but from those who are one day going to get it, and we are going to keep the program fiscally sound.

The President. Thank you very much for asking that. [Laughter] Again, some misstatements -- in fact, yes. And we have been doing a very fine job with regard to our environment. When we came here our national parks had been allowed to deteriorate to the point that they represented, through filth and dirt, actually a health hazard, and there were accident risks. In other words, there were safety risks to visitors going to the parks.

We're continuing research with regard to acid rain, because what we've learned so far has just revealed to us how little we actually know about the cause of acid rain. So, we've doubled the money for researching on that.

And I can assure you that we are dedicated to environmental protection, because that, again -- in addition to what the Governor told you -- that, again, is something we want to turn over to you, and that is the beauty of this land of ours, the natural advantages that it has, and all of the pluses that it has with regard to fish, fowl, and mammals and woods and wilderness areas and recreational areas. And I'm very proud of our record.

The President. Well, we have more money today going to student aid programs than was going to them when we came here 4 years ago. One out of two college students in the United States is receiving some form of Federal aid. It consists of three types: the low-interest college loans for students, the outright grants, and what's known as the work-study program, where we underwrite and make available on the campus jobs, so the students that are working their way through can have that help.

And as I say, there is more of that being done than has been done in the past. And we're not reducing it. As a matter of fact, we're discussing right now with the Education Department increasing the amount -- not the total amount -- increasing the amount of each grant to keep pace with some of the rising costs of education. And believe me, I'm heart and soul in sympathy with that problem of a student, because I had to work my way through Eureka College right here in Illinois, and did work it through, and also had some loans before I got out.

And we have also -- working with the private sector -- we've done a thing that has turned on the private sector in this country as they haven't been turned on for years in doing things from the private sector: foundations put together; programs subscribed to by individual givers, like United Fund and so forth -- doing more today than has been done in decades to help meet some of these same problems without having everything dependent on government.

But I can't resist telling you that in working my way through school, there were no government programs at that time. You had to get your loans from foundations, charitable groups and so forth, which I did. But also, if you have to work your way through school, I can tell you you won't regret it ever. And you might be as lucky as I was. One of the best jobs I've ever had was a job I had working my way through school -- I was washing dishes in the girls' dormitory.

Thank you. All right. All right. I know I have to run for it now. We keep getting behind on these schedules. I don't know whether they don't -- maybe I run over, or maybe they don't schedule enough time to get from one place to the other, but I have another group waiting for me at another place here.

The President. Thank you all very much, and I thank Jim Thompson for that very wonderful and glowing introduction. And, Edna Duty, you and I know something that all of them must learn, and that is that age is what you'll have 15 years from where you are presently.

Yesterday, I was down at the University of Alabama, and the architecture there is beautiful, with all the charm of the Old South. But here, in your buildings and sculpture, we see the sharp, clear lines of the future, and it's a very striking campus, indeed.

And it's great to be in Illinois. Your support has always been very important to me. And I want to express my admiration for your Governor, Big Jim Thompson, and all the fine members of your congressional delegation that are here today. And I'm pleased to be here with my friend Chuck Percy, whom we need back in the Senate.

Governor Thompson gave you about how my opponent would increase taxes, I think you'd better pay attention to the fact that Chuck Percy's opponent has made it plain that if he was elected, he would strive for twice as much in increased taxes as Mr. Mondale is talking about. So, we don't need him in Washington. There's nothing I'd like more than to see all your fine candidates of our party in the Congress in Washington.

Illinois has a special significance for all of us. Abe Lincoln came to adulthood and practiced law here. The political party that lifted him to his greatness is the party that I represent, these others represent in the election of 1984. And, so, Illinois is a fitting place for my statement to you today.

Abe Lincoln said, we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. Well, 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn; we got out from under the thrall of a government which we'd hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us.

Four years ago, we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom; common sense was our constellation. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the Government. And so, we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent.

We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, was stealing our savings, and the highest interest rates since the Civil War were making it impossible for people to own a home or start a business or enterprise.

The President. But what has already come of our efforts? A great renewal. America is back, a giant reemergent on the scene -- powerful in its economy, powerful in the world economy, powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace.

But, listen, 4 years after our efforts began, small voices in the night are scurrying about, sounding the call to go back, to go backward to the days of confusion and drift, the days of torpor, timidity, and taxes.

To begin with, his grasp of economics is well demonstrated by his economic predictions. Just before we took office, my opponent said that our economic program was obviously, murderously inflationary. And that was just before we lowered the inflation rates from 12.4 percent to 4.2 percent.

So, then we got our tax cuts. And right after we got those and started implementing them, he said the most that he could see was an anemic recovery. And that was right before the revitalized economy created more than 6 million jobs in 22 months. And it was right before 900,000 businesses were incorporated in a 17-month period -- 900,000 new businesses.

Now, my opponent has said that our policies would deliver a misery index the likes of which we haven't seen in a long time. And you know, something? There was some truth in that, because we've got the misery index down to 11.6, and under them it was over 20.

But I'm not finished here. There's so much more to say about my opponent. His grasp of foreign affairs is demonstrated by his understanding of world events. Sometime back, he said, ``The old days of a Soviet strategy of suppression by force are over.'' And that was just before the Soviet Union invaded Czechoslovakia. And after they invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets, these last few years, have behaved as they have.'' [Laughter] Doesn't he know it's their nature? But then, there's so much that baffles him.

My opponent said that control of oil prices would cost American consumers more than $36 billion a year. Well, we decontrolled oil prices. It was one of the first things I did. And the price of gas went down 8 cents a gallon.

Now, you know, all of these things I just told you -- I was thinking about all this the other day, and it just occurred to me that maybe all we need to do to get the economy in absolutely perfect shape is to get my opponent to predict absolute disaster.

He says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts -- and I quote again -- ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increased taxes on my own constituents.'' Now, he's proud of that, no doubt; proud of the fact that he voted 16 times -- he voted 16 times in the United States Senate to raise the taxes of all Americans. But this time he's outdone himself.

He wants to raise everyone's taxes so he'll have more money to spend on all his campaign promises. I want to lower yours and everybody's tax rates so your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

You know, I look out at all you wonderful young people, and I want you to know nothing has warmed my heart like seeing so many of you at our rallies and our meetings like this. Believe me, working to give you a future filled with hope and opportunity is what this job of mine is all about.

My opponent supported the grain embargo, spoke out for it often. He even questioned the patriotism of a Senator from his own party when that Senator called the embargo unfair and unworkable. But, now, there's a new Mondale out there, and he seems to have changed his tune.

After the Sandinista revolution in Nicaragua, my opponent said the ``winds of democratic progress are stirring where they have long been stifled.'' And that was right before the Sandinistas slaughtered the Miskito Indians, abused and deported church leaders, slandered the Holy Father, and moved to kill freedom of speech.

Or I could call his economic program ``a collection of old and tired ideas held together by paralyzing commitments to special interests and constituent groups.'' But Senator Gary Hart of Colorado, a Democrat, has already said that.

Now, if on political issues my opponent dares to be wrong, on domestic policy issues he has the courage to be cautious. A line-item veto to help control wild government spending? No, he says, that's not part of his liberal agenda.

I had that as a Governor of California -- line-item veto, to be able to veto out one of those porkbarrel items that had been smuggled into an otherwise good bill. I used that veto as Governor over 900 times, and it was never overridden once.

But last Sunday night he said he's for them. Well, if he's for them, why didn't he ask Tip O'Neill to stop blocking the enterprise zone bill that he's had buried in the House committee ever since we introduced it?

Last week an American woman walked in space -- Kathy Sullivan. Kathryn Sullivan made history, and she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made and are being made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there. Advances in technology and communication. This is a tremendous challenge for us, and especially you young people who will be assuming leadership of our nation.

The President. I was afraid you'd say that. But the point is, we were right when we made our great turn in 1980. We were right to disenthrall ourselves with the past. We were right when we rejected the old days of tax and tax and spend and spend. We were right to take command of the ship, stop its aimless drift, and get moving again. And we're not going back to the old leadership and the old ideas that left us in so much trouble.

The President. Listen, our best days are ahead of us. There are new worlds on the horizon. We're not going to stop until we all get there together. And I want to take up something that Governor Big Jim Thompson said up here just a little while ago. Seeing all you young people here in this crowd -- seeing all of you is wonderful, but to see you young people especially. I just want to say the reason is that you're what this election and this campaign are all about.

When my generation was back where you were, we just took it for granted that America was a place where whatever you wanted to do hard enough and bad enough and whatever you set out to do, you could do. And there was no limit, no penalizing of efficiency or ability in this country.

And then we went into a period where some people began telling us that it was an era of limits, that somehow we were never going to be able to go back to living at the same level that we had once before, that things had changed, gone down for all of us.

The United States has a long tradition of sharing its rich agricultural abundance and technical expertise with those in need, and of leading the worldwide effort to eliminate hunger. All nations are not equally endowed with food potential, and the struggle against hunger continually presents us with challenges which sometimes appear overwhelming. However, we will not be diverted from our intention to achieve victory over world hunger.

The United States is dedicated to the proposition that real progress in eliminating hunger will be realized when more nations are able to produce or purchase enough food for their own people. It is heartening that the resurging economy of the United States is helping other nations toward new economic expansion, with lower rates of inflation and rising output in many countries.

This Nation -- indeed, all nations -- should move forward with domestic policies that encourage growth. At the same time we must vigorously resist policies which inhibit growth or discourage free and equitable international trade in food products.

Since the enactment of the Eisenhower Food for Peace Program in 1954, the American people have provided more than $33 billion in food aid to 164 nations. Thousands of technical experts have been sent to Africa, Asia, Latin America, and the Middle East to assist in the development of agricultural projects. We have trained tens of thousands of agriculturalists from developing nations to help them in building a sound economic foundation in their countries.

Consumption of calories per capita has increased 7.5 percent since 1963. Unfortunately, Africa's progress in food production or the consumption of calories per capita have not shown equally encouraging results.

United Nations to recognize the role of women in agricultural development in the Third World. In some less developed countries, women and children constitute 80 percent or more of the agricultural work force -- yet, rarely aided by modern agricultural technology, research or adequate training. We strongly support efforts to improve the efficiency of their agricultural techniques.

On behalf of all Americans, I wish to congratulate you for the bold step you have taken for peace in El Salvador. Despite great personal risk to yourself and your advisers, you went to La Palma armed only with the support of the Salvadoran people and your fervent desire for peace and democracy.

Your ``offer of peace'' for the armed left to rejoin El Salvador's political process, together with amnesty and an effort to assist those harmed by the war, is both historic and generous. I share your hope that the Salvadoran people will achieve their heartfelt desire for peace, pluralistic democracy and social justice. You have our hopes and prayers that this courageous initiative is the first step in a process that will bring a lasting peace through democracy to your nation.

The legislation is intended to eliminate a problem that this administration and the Congress have acted upon forthrightly to resolve; namely, the severe economic distress that much of the forest products industry in the Pacific Northwest finds itself in as a result of high timber prices and inflation in 1979 - 1980. This legislation provides broader relief to purchasers of timber from these Federal lands than those measures already taken by the administration under the authority of existing law. Many holders of these contracts, most of which were bid in the period 1977 - 1980 and are now held at contract rates significantly higher than the current market, face the unavoidability of defaulting the contracts and perhaps being forced into bankruptcy if they are required to pay damages for the default. It was to avoid serious economic disruption to the industry and the resulting adverse impact to communities dependent upon a strong forest products industry that in July 1983 I authorized administrative relief in the form of 5-year extensions of those contracts with no interest payment requirement. We expected that under this program most purchasers would be able to work their way out of financial difficulty. We viewed this program as the most equitable form of relief to all purchasers of Federal timber.

It now appears that our successful efforts to control inflation mean that market prices for wood products will not rise enough to prevent severe economic hardship to many forest-dependent communities unless the provisions of this new law are implemented. This legislation requires timber purchasers who will utilize its provisions to pay a charge in return for the relief provided.

We agree with President Chernenko that there is no sound alternative to constructive development in relations between our two countries. We are pleased to see the emphasis he puts on positive possibilities for U.S.-Soviet relations. We will be studying his remarks carefully, and as was agreed during Deputy Prime Minister Gromyko's recent meeting with President Reagan, we will be pursuing our dialog with the Soviet Union and exploring the possibilities for progress through diplomatic channels.

Union. In April 1981, he sent a handwritten letter to President Brezhnev describing his feelings about the issue of war and peace, and to ask President Brezhnev to join him in removing the obstacles to peace. Since then, the United States has made practical proposals for forward movement in all areas of the relationship, including arms control.

Over the past year, for instance, the United States and its allies have put forward new proposals for limits on strategic weapons, on intermediate-range nuclear weapons, on chemical weapons, and on coventional forces. On June 4 in Dublin, President Reagan stated our willingness to discuss the Soviet proposal for a mutual non-use-of-force commitment, if this would lead to serious negotiation on the Western proposals for practical steps to enhance confidence and reduce the risk of surprise attack in Europe. This summer we accepted a Soviet proposal to begin space arms control negotiations in Vienna without preconditions. At the United Nations last month President Reagan reiterated his desire to move forward in these fields and put forward a number of concrete new proposals for U.S.-Soviet cooperation. In his subsequent meeting with Deputy Prime Minister Gromyko, the President emphasized our strong desire to move to a more productive dialog across the board and put forward specific suggestions as to how we might do so.

We cannot agree with President Chernenko's version of recent history. It is the Soviet Union which has broken off negotiations on nuclear arms and backed away from its own proposal to begin space arms control talks. The United States stands ready to negotiate on these and other issues, but we cannot concur in the apparent Soviet view that it is incumbent upon the United States to pay a price so that the Soviet Union will come back to the nuclear negotiating table.

President Chernenko has stated that improvements in the U.S.-Soviet relationship depend on deeds, not words. We agree. When the Soviet Union is prepared to move from public exchanges to private negotiations and concrete agreements, they will find us ready.

We're here today to launch the Young Astronauts Program, as you know, an exciting new project sure to inspire our young people, lift their spirit of adventure, and help prepare them for the challenges and opportunities ahead in space and on the ground.

But first, I want to congratulate the 17 members of NASA's astronaut class of 1984. I'm pleased that you're here today and able to take part in this ceremony. By accepting the challenge of space, you're carrying forward the same courage and spirit of all who have worn the NASA emblem, an emblem recognized the world over as a mark of unmatched professionalism, technology, and achievement.

I'm happy to see David Low here as a member of the class. And, David, we will never forget your father's life-long efforts as NASA Deputy Administrator, manager of the Apollo program, and a leader in planning the shuttle program. And Dr. George Low and the whole NASA team raised our sights and our hopes. And with the enthusiastic support of the American people, we touched the Moon and opportunity and progress.

Last Saturday we watched the perfect touchdown of the 13th shuttle mission. I couldn't help thinking that the Challenger crew was the same size as our original astronaut corps. Back then it was the Mercury 7, then the Gemini 9 -- all former test pilots and all men -- and now, 90 astronauts, women and men, pilots, engineers, and scientists, and soon a teacher and representatives of other countries. And the opportunities will just keep on growing.

Well, that's not the reason. When the shuttle lifts off, all of America will be reminded of the crucial role teachers and education play in the life of our nation and of the importance of space to our future. I can't think of a better lesson for our children and our country.

Space Institute, with help from the National Science Teachers Association and other educational and aerospace groups, have designed an outstanding curriculum. You'll find incentives to pursue science and math and the chance to take part in exciting space-related activities. The end product will be knowledge, our greatest resource for meeting tomorrow's challenges with optimism and success.

And that's the driving force behind the Young Astronauts Program. This private sector program will be directed by the Young Astronauts Council here in Washington, under the leadership of Jack Anderson, Hugh Downs, and Harold Burson. And I want to thank Jack for his help in getting the program started. And I want to thank all of you for your support.

Let me say a word now to the young people who are here today. These grounds have seen some very proud moments, welcomed some very important people. But none have been more important than you, because you are America's future. In the years to come, it's going to be up to you to point the way and to keep America moving forward, and I believe you will succeed beyond what we can even imagine.

America's history has not been one of accepting what is, of knowing limits, but of striving and working to build what can be. And there's nothing we can't do if we set our minds to it. There's nothing we can't achieve. And that's the way it's always been in America. From the time that that first covered wagon with the pioneers headed west, to when our astronauts put the first American footprints on the Moon, we've proved that there is no problem so big that it can stop progress.

The sky's not the limit, because the opportunities of space are unlimited. Already, satellites let us communicate with each other at a moment's notice virtually anywhere on the globe. We can anticipate tomorrow's weather and prepare for it. We've used the technology developed for our space program to make our own lives safer and much better, from the computers in your classrooms to the cordless powertools in your Dad's workshop. Thanks to space technology doctors can now use sound waves to monitor babies before they're born, ensuring safer pregnancy and delivery for the mother and better health for the newborn. Firemen now have new life-saving vests as a result of experiments conducted on the shuttle program. And sick people have new hope, with wonderful advances in medicine.

There's no doubt you're growing up in one of the most exciting times in our history, a time filled with extraordinary opportunity. There's a dazzling new world before us, and you have good reason to look forward to it.

The astronauts with us today work very hard to be ready for the future. And for them, the future is now. They'll guide the shuttle to even greater achievements, and they'll help build our space station. And maybe one day, one of you young astronauts can follow in their footsteps. But you must be ready. And that means mastering science, math, and computers -- the wonderful world of high tech.

Now, there's one final thought: The shuttle program gives us a glimpse of the incredible possibilities that await us. And they're all the result of commitments we've made over the past 25 years, commitments that we've honored.

We'll rise to the challenge of those words. We won't be held back. We'll keep battling for the future, for new jobs and markets, for discovery, and for knowledge. We have a commitment to keep to our young people, our young astronauts, and we won't let them down.

York for a second round beginning in mid-October. We understand the talks produced a clearer understanding of the respective positions of the parties and that in the second round the Secretary General will attempt to secure agreement to an outline of general points for eventual direct discussion between the parties.

Secretary General's initiative and have foregone actions that might damage the process. We will continue to strive for an environment conducive to serious discussions between the Cypriot parties and the Secretary General, away from the glare of publicity. We remain convinced that quiet diplomacy and a mutual spirit of compromise represent the best means of eventually achieving a reunited Cyprus in which all Cypriots can live in peace and security.

Act of 1984. This legislation amends the Housing and Urban-Rural Recovery Act of 1983 to correct certain defects in the Department of Housing and Urban Development's community development block grant and assisted housing programs. It also contains provisions affecting the Department of Agriculture's rural housing programs and miscellaneous amendments to certain banking laws.

In signing this legislation, however, I must express my strong concerns regarding its provisions prohibiting the transfer of rural housing loan authority to other programs administered by the Farmers Home Administration. There have been several instances in recent years in which such a transfer has been used to provide vital and urgent funding to other, equally important sectors of the farm economy. I do not want this legislation to serve as a precedent for obstructing the interchange authority between Farmers Home Administration programs.

Community for $107,759.58 in tribal funds expended under applicable law for the construction of irrigation projects on the Fort Belknap Indian Reservation from 1895 to 1913. In addition, interest would be paid at 4 percent from the date of expenditure of the tribal funds until the date of payment of the principal pursuant to the bill.

The fair and impartial administration of justice and the protection of public resources from meritless special appropriations both require that those who have availed themselves of judicial remedies in asserting claims against the United States, and have had their claims fully and fairly adjudicated under our Constitution and laws, receive no more or less than that to which they have been adjudged to be entitled. Twenty-two years after the claims of these two tribes were dismissed by an impartial tribunal established by the Congress specifically to adjudicate such claims, this bill would authorize and appropriate to them all that they were previously found not to be entitled to.

Under the circumstances, the enactment of the bill would set aside established principles of justice and thereby encourage other and future efforts to obtain by legislation that which has been denied by a just adjudication.

Presidential Awards for Excellence in Science and Mathematics Teaching. The first awards in the program were made in 1983 as a way of acknowledging the contribution of outstanding teachers and to provide models of excellence and encouragement to their colleagues and students.

The awards carry with them $5,000 grants from the National Science Foundation to the teachers' schools for use in science or mathematics instructional programs, and also stimulate additional support from participating private sector organizations. Teachers are selected by a group of professional teaching societies, coordinated by the National Council of Teachers of Mathematics and the National Science Teachers Association.

Associates from 1978 until 1982 in Sacramento, CA, where he advised local government clients on budget and finance issues. Previously he had been an originating partner of the Bristol Merchant Trading Co. where his responsibilities included international market development.

The United States Government has historically approved support to people and small countries resisting subversion or totalitarian oppression. Where such assistance is required, it is important that such support be consistent with American values and carried out so as to win and increase the loyalty and confidence of the civilian population. The administration has not advocated or condoned political assassination or any other attacks on civilians, nor will we. That is the clear policy of this administration as expressed in the President's Executive Order 12333 of December 4, 1981.

Intelligence Agency in regard to the publication of a manual for the Nicaraguan democratic resistance forces. This investigation will determine whether there were any violations of law or policy and whether there were any managerial deficiencies. All available information is being gathered, and the Director of Central Intelligence will be prepared to brief the congressional oversight committees promptly on the facts when they are determined.

Americans are with us here in spirit tonight: Al Smith, of course, the Happy Warrior, whom time and respect and affectionate memory have elevated beyond partisanship; the beloved Francis Cardinal Spellman, whose remarkable works of charity so notably include his establishment of this Al Smith Dinner 38 years ago; the great Jewish philanthropist, Charles Silver. He was enlisted by Cardinal Spellman as chairman of these dinners and raised millions for hospitals serving all faiths; and finally, Terence Cardinal Cooke, that gentle soul whom I, for one, shall never forget.

Here we are, then, at the height of a season marked by differences of opinion, and yet, all this striving and all these contesting issues fade to insignificance in the clear light of example that these four men set for us, each one in his own unique way: Al Smith, in his lifelong struggles for the working man and woman; Cardinal Spellman, as a prince and builder of the church; Charles Silver, as a friend and colleague in ecumenical service to humanity; and Cardinal Cooke, whom I knew best in circumstances of dire spiritual need.

And so it was only natural that Nancy and I should have been so profoundly grief-stricken upon learning in August of last year that the Cardinal was dying. Together, we telephoned our dear friend in New York to tell him of our heartfelt prayers for him and to thank him once again for all he had done to comfort and reassure us in our hour of need. Our prayerful concern for the Cardinal, I assured him, was shared by millions of other Americans grateful for all that he had done on behalf of his country.

Nancy and I will always be grateful that we were able to visit him in New York and, as it turned out, only days before his death. We were told when we arrived that he had been in great pain for the previous 48 hours, so much so that they'd feared he wouldn't be able to receive us. But when we arrived, he was so much like his old self, it was hard to believe that he was desperately ill.

Being Terence Cooke, he couldn't resist doing a little lobbying in behalf of a cause that concerned him: ``As a nation known for its compassion,'' he said, ``the United States has accomplished so much through the years in advancing the cause of international justice and peace through its programs of economic assistance to the less fortunate peoples of the world.'' And then he acknowledged the appropriation that I had approved for help to sub-Saharan African nations.

He paused, and then, with something of an abashed or self-deprecatory smile, very simply he added, ``Maybe I'm being a little presumptuous in assuming I'll be with the Lord.'' Well, 11 days later he left us, and none of us have any doubt that he joined the Lord.

I have presumed to share this personal experience with you tonight because it says so much about our gentle friend, Terence Cooke. It says much also about Al Smith and Cardinal Spellman and Charlie Silver, for, linked in charity, linked in service, linked in humanity, they are linked by this occasion.

Archbishop O'Connor, I know that you're profoundly aware of the great tradition in which you now pursue God's work. And in this you have my every good wish and, I know, those also of a grateful nation. And if you wouldn't think that I was invading your field, could I just say, in addition to a heartfelt thank you to all of you, God bless you.

Prior to the dinner, the President attended a reception for dinner guests at the hotel. The President also greeted additional guests in the Empire Room and the Hilton Room before addressing the guests in the Grand Ballroom. Following the dinner, the President returned to Washington, DC.

Each of these grim statistics represents a person whose bright future was suddenly and tragically altered. Added to each victim's suffering is the emotional and financial burden the family must bear. The total cost to the Nation for special care and lost productivity is enormous.

Health care professionals and educators throughout our Nation are helping those with head injuries to live as normally as possible. Through rehabilitation therapy and vocational counseling, many head injury patients are learning to lead productive lives in our society. Such efforts have been promoted by two voluntary health agencies: the National Head Injury Foundation and the Family Survivial Project for Brain-Damaged Adults.

Institute of Neurological and Communicative Disorders and Stroke are acquiring new information about what happens to the brain as a result of head injury. Leads from these studies will help scientists develop effective treatments to limit or prevent brain damage. With the combined support of voluntary health agencies and the Federal Government, the tragedy of head injury can be substantially reduced.

To encourage public recognition of and compassion for the complex problems caused by head injury, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 638, has designated the month of October 1984 as ``National Head Injury Awareness Month'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Aside from an industrious and imaginative people, no single natural resource has contributed more to the economic and social growth of this mighty Nation than its forests. Without forests to provide the renewable raw materials for our Nation, American history would have been written quite differently. Without the amazing power of forests to give birth to our great rivers and hold our soil in place, the United States would be much less productive. Without their great diversity as habitat and food source for wildlife, our rich array of fish, birds, and wildlife could not exist.

The foresight we have shown in wise protection and use of forests ensures that they will continue to contribute to a bright future. Although a third of the United States -- some 737 million acres -- is forested, such continued abundance was in doubt at the beginning of this century. Forests were disappearing at an alarming rate, and timber famine was predicted. The forest conservation leadership of such people as President Theodore Roosevelt and the Nation's first trained forester, Gifford Pinchot, reversed that trend, leaving a legacy for which present and future generations can be deeply thankful.

The conservation legacy demonstrates that forests can be protected, while also being used for the economic and social benefit of mankind. Wood for our Nation's products is harvested from the vast forests but, like our food crops, new trees must be planted for the next generation. This simple, but critical, principle has proved its enduring worth beyond the dreams of the conservation pioneers. Each year we enjoy an abundance of harvest timber and, as a result, jobs for millions of workers in related industries.

In recent years, the outlook for lupus patients has improved due to extensive and vigorous research. Positive results have emerged from studies uncovering several diverse defects of the immune system and from research on genetic and environmental factors influencing the disease.

I am honored indeed to bring to the Nation's attention the remarkable contributions of women veterans. During World War I, the service of women on active duty as nurses, shipyard personnel, and battlefield telephone operators was indispensable. In World War II, women served in support and operational capacities around the world. Since World War II, women have been fully integrated into the military services. Today there are more than 1.2 million women veterans.

Our laws grant equal rights, privileges, and benefits to women veterans; and my Administration will continue to ensure that women veterans are afforded the benefits and services to which they are entitled. I know that all Americans join me in saluting these patriotic and dedicated women and in expressing the Nation's appreciation for their service.

I have today signed into law H.R. 6311, the 1984 Act To Combat International Terrorism. This act will provide resources and authorities essential in countering the insidious threat terrorism poses to those who cherish freedom and democracy. International terrorism is a growing problem for all of us in the Western World -- not just the United States. While we in the Western democracies are most often the targets, terrorist attacks are becoming increasingly violent and indiscriminate. Since the first of September, there have been 41 separate terrorist attacks by no fewer than 14 terrorist groups against the citizens and property of 21 nations. Sixteen of these were attacks against individual citizens and 18 of these were bombings or attempted bombings in which innocent third parties were victimized.

I am grateful that the Congress has responded swiftly to my request for these authorities and resources. This act is an important step in our multiyear effort to counter the pervasive threat international terrorism poses to our diplomatic personnel and facilities overseas. The act complements other actions now under review and separate measures taken with our allies aimed at significantly improving our ability to thwart this menace to mankind. While none of these steps guarantee that terrorist acts will not occur again, we can be certain that the measures made possible by this act will make such attacks more difficult in the future.

Please accept my congratulations and those of the American people on being named the 1984 recipient of the Nobel Peace Prize in recognition of your efforts on behalf of peaceful change in South Africa. All Americans join me in recognizing your labors in seeking to promote nonviolent change away from apartheid, toward a form of government based on consent of the governed and toward a society that offers equal rights and opportunities to all its citizens, without regard to race. The United States has heard the appeal for justice voiced by South Africans who suffer under apartheid rule. We continue to urge the South African Government to engage in a meaningful dialogue with all its citizens aimed at accomplishing a peaceful transition away from apartheid. We applaud you in being selected for this honor, and assure you that we share in these goals.

Terrorism poses an insidious challenge to the principles of freedom cherished by peace-loving peoples everywhere. Despicable acts such as the recent attack on Prime Minister Thatcher in England, the bombings of our Marine Amphibious Unit Headquarters, and of our Embassy facilities in Beirut, Lebanon, represent an attempt to strike at the very heart of Western democratic values. In the month of September, 37 attacks were carried out by 13 different terrorist groups affecting the people of 20 nations.

As a world power, the United States bears global responsibilities from which we must not shrink in the face of cowardly attempts at intimidation. Instead, we must strive to carry forward the heroic legacy of those brave people who, in the search for peace and justice, have lost their lives to international terrorism. Because terrorism poses such a pervasive and insidious threat to all free peoples and claims so many innocent victims in its indiscriminate brutality, we of the Western democracies have embarked on a course of improved cooperation to counter this scourge against humanity. To this end, it is appropriate that we reflect on the tragic loss of life that senseless terror leaves in its wake throughout the world. We do this not out of fear or trepidation, but to show our resolve that the free people of this world will not be deterred from our purpose by threats of terrorism.

I further call upon and authorize all departments and agencies of the United States and interested organizations, groups, and individuals to fly United States flags at half-staff on October 23 in the hope that the desire for peace and freedom will take firm root in every person and every nation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this nineteenth day of October, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The founding of the United Nations 39 years ago offered new hope that international political, economic, social and technical cooperation could be achieved in a more peaceful world. That hope remains, though we are aware of the difficulties in turning it into reality. The deeply rooted political conflicts that divide nations have at times prevented the proper use of the United Nations for the practical expression of the principles embodied in its Charter. We have been particularly disappointed with some of the actions taken at the United Nations in recent years, actions which fall far short of the high ideals on which that organization was founded.

The United States nonetheless continues to place considerable importance on the United Nations as the body designed to afford all nations opportunities for the peaceful settlement of disputes and for the promotion of technical cooperation in such areas as aviation, shipping, telecommunications, postal services and agriculture. It is the hope of the United States that the UN will live up to its founding principles and create the conditions which will encourage nations to cooperate for the furtherance of their common interests. It is vital that all member nations do their part in pursuit of this goal, that the principle of universality be upheld in UN actions, and that with respect to human rights all states be held to a single standard of justice.

United Nations and watch closely what happens there. We take seriously the content of the speeches made in the United Nations, and we take careful note of the votes cast by member countries. We are keenly conscious of the importance of the United Nations to the world community. With the experience gained from the past 39 years, we will work with other member nations to maintain international peace and security, to develop friendly relations among nations based on mutual respect, to find solutions to the problems that divide us, and to promote respect for the human rights of every individual.

Veterans Day has become a significant part of our national heritage as we recognize the important contributions of millions of our citizens whose military service has had a profound effect on history. More than 39 million in number, they fought and died from Bunker Hill to Bastogne, from the Marianas to the Mekong Valley in Vietnam. By preserving our freedom, they also made it possible for us to continue our search for a world at peace. That search remains the highest priority of my Administration. It is a debt we owe to the soldiers, sailors, and airmen who put their lives at risk so that their children and grandchildren would never need to know the horrors of war.

Eighty-five percent of the 28 million veterans alive today served during our country's wars. Just as they did not disappoint us in battle, they have not disappointed us in our present search for peace.

I believe we should all seek ways to express our collective appreciation for their service and sacrifice. I invite all Americans to join me in observing Veterans Day -- through appropriate ceremonies, activities and private thoughts on November 11.

This year we can be especially thankful that real gratitude to God is inscribed, not in proclamations of government, but in the hearts of all our people who come from every race, culture, and creed on the face of the Earth. And as we pause to give thanks for our many gifts, let us be tempered by humility and by compassion for those in need, and let us reaffirm through prayer and action our determination to share our bounty with those less fortunate.

This legislation establishes the National Archives and Records Administration -- currently part of the General Services Administration -- as an independent agency within the executive branch. The agency will be headed by the Archivist of the United States, who will be appointed by the President, with the advice and consent of the Senate.

The principal purpose of S. 905 is to extend independence to an agency that many believe has suffered as a result of its placement within the General Services Administration in 1949. I concur in this assessment, and my administration has supported independence for the Archives.

The public papers and other materials that the Archives safeguards are precious and irreplaceable national treasures, and the agency that looks after the historical records of the Federal Government should be accorded a status that is commensurate with its important responsibilities.

Independence for the Archives this year, in which we are commemorating the 50th anniversary of its creation, is a particularly fitting step, both practical and symbolic, in achieving that important goal.

Maritime Safety Act adopts new safety regulations for vessels subject to its coverage. By adding new requirements to the Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries Act of 1972, the Marine Sanctuaries Amendments set forth specific standards that the Secretary of Commerce must consider when designating a marine sanctuary.

Although I believe many of the amendments made by the Marine Sanctuaries Amendments will improve the procedures for designating marine sanctuaries, I have been advised by the Department of Justice that the method Congress has chosen in this title for preparing proposed regulations governing fishing within the United States Fishery Conservation Zone will raise fundamental constitutional questions unless the act is given a careful narrowing construction.

Council prepares a draft regulation, the Secretary of Commerce is directed to issue it as a proposed regulation ``unless [he] finds the Council's action fails to fulfill the purposes and policies of this title and the goals and objectives of the proposed designation.'' See sec. 304(a)(5) of the Marine Protection, Research, and Sanctuaries Act of 1972, as enacted by the bill. The Department of Justice has advised me that the promulgation of regulations by persons, such as Council members, who are not appointed by the President, would violate the appointments clause, Art. II, sec. 2, cl. 2, of the Constitution. See Buckley v. Valeo, 424 U.S. 1, 126 (1976). For this reason, I am signing this legislation based on my understanding that the Councils will only make recommendations with respect to proposed regulations. It is the Secretary, not the Councils who must make the final decisions on the appropriate final action to be taken in response to recommendations transmitted by the Councils.

Today I am signing into law S. 2048, the National Organ Transplant Act. This legislation covers an area in which I have been personally involved: promoting the donation of organs, especially liver transplants for children. I am pleased that the Congress worked with the administration to produce a bill that will enhance this effort.

This bipartisan legislation provides a framework that should help increase the overall supply of much needed organs and improve our ability to match donor organs with individuals in need of transplants. Over the last 3 years, I have urged the American people to remember that many lives could be saved through generous donations of life-saving organs. I have been encouraged by the response of the media and the public to this compassionate cause. This act will serve to support this ongoing work.

A 25-member task force is created by the act to examine and report on a wide range of important issues in the field of organ transplantation. The task force will also report on medical and economic issues related to immunosuppressive drugs, which are used to prevent organ rejection.

I believe that this act strikes a proper balance between private and public sector efforts to promote organ transplantation, which should encourage families with loved ones who are awaiting a suitable organ. I am pleased to sign the National Organ Transplant Act that will support this humanitarian effort.

Act. This legislation represents an added step in our efforts to combat the illegal flow of drugs into this nation, recognizing and building on the Federal Aviation Administration's critical air safety role without prescribing a law enforcement role.

An individual whose pilot certificate is revoked by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) for carrying illegal drugs will now have to wait 5 years, rather than 1, before being able to appeal the denial of a new license by the FAA. For the first time, the FAA will also be able to revoke the registration certificate of an aircraft used in transporting illegal drugs. Other new provisions make it a crime for a person whose certificate has been revoked by the FAA, or who does not hold the proper certificate, to serve as an airman in connection with an aircraft transporting illegal drugs.

These provisions will not only provide an important deterrent to carrying illegal drugs by air but will also contribute to safer skies, since those who transport drugs by air typically show little regard for the safety of others whether in the air or on the ground.

H.R. 6206 ratifies a series of agreements negotiated by officials of the Department of the Interior with the affected parties over the past 2 years. It settles the outstanding water claims of the Ak-Chin Indian community, provides a permanent water supply to be delivered through the Central Arizona Project facilities, provides funds for water conservation, and provides that water not needed to satisfy the Ak-Chin entitlement will be available for allocation to other water users in central Arizona.

In 1978 the Congress and the previous administration enacted an Ak-Chin water settlement act which required the Federal Government to provide an interim supply of water beginning in 1984 and permanent water no later than 2003. H.R. 6206 more clearly fulfills the intent of the earlier act by providing a permanent water supply beginning in 1988 at less than half the cost of the previous temporary plan.

The Ak-Chin settlement embodies three policies of this administration: first, that Indian tribal governments can and should decide what is best for their people; second, that the complex issue of Indian water rights is better handled through negotiation rather than litigation; third, that we will fulfill our commitments in a fiscally responsible fashion. H.R. 6206 exemplifies how all parties can benefit from a negotiated settlement.

Finally, I would like to congratulate those people whose hard work and dedication to this process contributed greatly to the final enactment of this legislation. They include Senator Barry Goldwater, Congressmen Morris Udall and John McCain, the leadership of the Ak-Chin community, and Interior Secretary William Clark.

Judgeship Act of 1984 to make technical corrections with respect to the retirement of certain bankruptcy judges. This legislation will allow all of the bankruptcy judges who otherwise are eligible to retire to receive the enhanced retirement benefits promised in the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978. These men and women continued to serve the Nation's bankruptcy system throughout the 2-year crisis between the Supreme Court's decision invalidating the bankruptcy courts' jurisdiction and the enactment of legislation creating a new, constitutional bankruptcy court structure.

When I signed that bankruptcy court legislation this past summer, however, I noted particular objection to two provisions that sought to continue the bankruptcy judges in office after Congress had allowed their terms to lapse. It is inconsistent with the Constitution for the Congress to make such appointments, and I urged that the Congress immediately repeal those provisions.

In this act, which provides retirement benefits for the bankruptcy judges, the Congress failed to address this continuing constitutional concern. Therefore, although I am approving H.R. 6216, I must express my disappointment that the Congress has left in place the one remaining uncertainty surrounding the operation of the new bankruptcy court system.

I am today signing S. 2496, the Education Amendments of 1984, which extends various education programs assisting groups such as students with limited English proficiency, Indian students, women, and adults in need of acquiring basic literacy skills.

My administration is committed to helping assure that educational opportunities are available to these groups and proposed to the Congress legislation to continue the Adult Education Act, the Bilingual Education Act, and the Indian Education Act. S. 2496 does reauthorize these laws.

I am especially pleased that the amendments to the Bilingual Education Act allow some flexibility for local school districts to use Federal funds for the many proven alternatives to the traditional methods in bilingual education that they believe are better suited to helping their limited English speaking students learn English. In the future I hope to work with the Congress to further expand this much needed flexibility.

These provisions would establish cumbersome and inflexible administrative procedures, initiate wasteful and duplicative practices, allow the Federal Government to intrude needlessly into tribal government processes, and undermine the management authority of the Secretary of the Interior.

They are contrary to sound management principles and would not promote the delivery of quality education to Indian children. Fortunately, their implementation is being delayed by the Bureau of Indian Affairs 1985 appropriations language, and we will therefore have an opportunity to seek corrective amendments next year.

I greatly regret the bill would also revive, for 4 more years, Impact Aid ``b'' payments to school districts for children whose parents either work or live on Federal property, reversing the decision by the Congress in 1981 to end such payments after 1984. These children impose virtually no financial burden on most local school districts; yet the potential cost of the payments for them over the next 4 years would be nearly $2 billion. The congressional decision in 1981 to discontinue these payments was correct and should stand. If item veto authority were available to me, I would eliminate this portion of the bill. On the whole, however, I have determined that the bill's positive aspects warrant my approval.

The Department of Defense Authorization Act, 1985, that I am signing today, H.R. 5167, continues our previous efforts to rebuild America's defenses. Although the funding is substantially below my original request and even below my request submitted as part of our deficit reduction package last May, it is the most we could expect from the 98th Congress. And it allows us to continue our efforts, at a reduced pace, to preserve the peace and guarantee our freedom.

I am pleased that the major elements of our program continue to receive bipartisan congressional support. Our strategic deterrent posture is being strengthened, and the B - 1B and ICBM modernization programs are right on schedule. Congress has provided the funds necessary to enable the Peacekeeper to become operational within 2 years, and we are working hard on a new small missile. This program is important to our national security and to the achievement of real arms control, and I am confident that the Congress will keep the program on track.

Since the dawn of the nuclear age, we have sought to reduce the risk of war by maintaining a strong deterrent and by seeking genuine arms control. Our dialog with the Soviets on arms control will also continue. We remain ready to reduce nuclear arms, ready to negotiate a fair deal, and ready to meet the Soviet Union half-way. With continued support from the American people and bipartisan support from the Congress, I am confident that we will see progress.

This bill also continues our efforts to improve the basic readiness and staying power of our conventional forces. Our men and women in uniform at last are getting the modern equipment and training they need to do their jobs. The job of rebuilding is not yet finished, but we have made a lot of progress in the past 3 years, and today our military forces are better equipped, better trained, and better led than ever before.

Once again, young Americans wear their uniforms and serve their flag with pride. We must not return to the days when our military people suffered low morale and when they had to wonder from day to day if they could make ends meet. And the administration is committed to the supplemental funding necessary to carry out the education program contained in this bill.

Much credit for passage of this bill goes to the congressional leadership. Howard Baker worked closely with Tip O'Neill on the broad outlines of the compromise, and leaders like Mel Price, Sam Nunn, and Bill Dickinson accomplished the tough bargaining to achieve the final result.

But as much as these fine legislators contributed to this bill and our security, there is one Senator whose contribution to our nation's defense over the years has been unique and enduring -- that Senator is John Tower. The final passage of this Defense Authorization Act marks one of the last milestones in a legislative career spanning nearly 24 years in the Senate. His lasting contributions, and especially those during his outstanding service as chairman of the Committee on Armed Services, bear the mark of a true statesman and an extraordinary American. We can only hope that he will not consider his retirement from the Senate to be a retirement from public life. Thank you, John.

I have signed H.R. 5618, the Veterans' Health Care Act of 1984. In signing the act, I must note my concern over sec. 101, which amends present law with respect to law enforcement powers of Veterans Administration personnel. This authority involves the most potentially intrusive of all government power, yet its utilization is critical to the preservation of ordered liberty. A responsible government must assure that it is granted cautiously and monitored closely. It is important that the Attorney General, as the Nation's chief law enforcement officer, play a key role in the coordination and use of such authority. Accordingly, I am instructing the Administrator of the Veterans Administration to coordinate and consult closely with the Attorney General on all aspects regarding law enforcement in this legislation, including any regulations promulgated thereunder.

I also note my concern over sec. 301, which will modify a reverter interest of the United States on some 35 acres of land in Los Angeles. In 1948, this land was transferred to UCLA on condition that UCLA would use the land for medical and research purposes only. This restriction was imposed because the property was originally part of a Veterans Hospital. Now, this section will direct the Veterans Administration to broaden the terms of the reverter. The value of the taxpayers' interest in this property has been placed at $100 million. I am concerned that this provision ignores both the justification for the original transfer in 1948 and the taxpayers' interest.

This legislation would generally enhance the penalties under existing law applicable to a felon who has been convicted three times in a United States or State court of robbery or burglary and who receives, possesses, or transports firearms.

S. 1097 also contains, however, a number of undesirable provisions that would unduly effect the ability of the Department of Commerce to manage its programs responsibly and effectively. The provisions in title VI concerning the closings and consolidations of National Weather Service offices are particularly onerous and would have the effect of virtually precluding the consolidation or closing of such offices, even when such closings or consolidations are fully justified.

In addition, S. 1097 contains other highly objectionable provisions concerning the Department's activities. Section 205 of S. 1097 would result in excessive and unjustifiable delays in Department contracting-out activities, even when such contracting would be in the clear interest of the Nation's taxpayers. And, Section 202(b), which concerns the weather satellite program, is objectionable because it would lessen the Secretary of Commerce's discretion in managing that program, as well as require the inefficient use of a government asset.

This Act represents an unwarranted intrusion by Congress into matters normally and properly within the management discretion of the Executive branch. In the interest of efficient and economical conduct of government activities, therefore, I am constrained to withhold my approval of S. 1097.

Although I fully support the intent and objectives of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act, I believe this bill is seriously deficient in fulfilling those goals. My disapproval of the bill will in no way affect the continued delivery of health care services to our country's Indian population.

First, a provision that I find totally unacceptable would actually reduce access to health services for Indians. That provision would have the effect of making Indians residing in Montana ineligible for certain benefits of State and locally supported health programs until and unless the availability of such benefits from the Indian Health Service has been exhausted. In my view, this provision for Indian citizens of Montana would set a precedent for potentially changing the fundamental relationship of the Indian Health Service to State and local entities, as well as depriving eligible Indians of benefits that should be due them by virtue of their citizenship in the State. As a matter of both principle and precedent, I cannot accept this provision.

Indian Health Service from the Health Resources and Services Administration (HRSA) is unconstitutional and can have no legal effect. The Department of Justice has advised me that the Congress may not constitutionally delegate to a congressionally appointed body, such as the Commission on the Organizational Placement of the Indian Health Service established by this bill, the legislative authority to determine when legislation will take effect. Because section 602(d) does not comply with the clear requirements of the Constitution, I cannot give my approval to this bill.

The bill would allocate a significant portion of funding for various peripheral projects, such as unnecessary reports, interagency agreements, and regulations development. This would lead either to an unacceptable increase in total funding or to underfunding of the most critical area -- provision of clinical health services to reservation Indians. The Administration has, on the other hand, proposed using most Indian health funds for this purpose, so that resources can be most effectively spent where the need is the greatest.

Public broadcasting has an important role to play in assuring that a wide variety of information and entertainment choices are made available to American viewers and listeners. Under S. 607, however, the authorizations for Federal subsidies to public broadcasting would increase dramatically. When all of the demands on the Federal budget are taken into account, I cannot endorse the levels of spending on public broadcasting contemplated by this legislation. They are incompatible with the clear and urgent need to reduce Federal spending.

The Oxley amendment would have resulted in a generous and barely affordable increase of 15 percent, to $200 million. S. 607 goes much further and raises first-year funding by 29 percent to $225 million for the two programs. By the third year under S. 607, combined funding would be $290 million, a 67 percent increase from the current budget year. Under present fiscal conditions, unrestrained increases of this magnitude -- no matter how worthy the programs -- are unacceptable.

Legislation that provides for Federal support of public broadcasting at realistic and reasonable levels and that provides public broadcasters with the means and incentives to explore alternative revenue sources would be both appropriate and welcome. If, however, we are to succeed in reducing Federal spending -- as we must -- the levels of spending contemplated by S. 607 cannot be justified.

I vetoed an earlier version of this legislation on August 29, 1984, for precisely the same reasons that I am withholding my approval of S. 607. I will continue to oppose and reject bills of this nature until and unless Congress presents me with a bill that is consistent with sound budget policy. This one is certainly not, and I decline to approve it.

In speaking about his economic policies, I've said my opponent is a man of the past whose administration's domestic policies failed and made America weak. Well, that goes for foreign policy as well. Mr. Mondale as a Senator, later as understudy to Jimmy Carter, and still today has seemed possessed with one simple but very wrong idea: American strength is a threat to world peace. And he's devoted a political career to opposing our strength, exposing us to dangerous, unnecessary risks.

As a Senator, he voted time and again against American strength, against technological advances meant to better protect our security. He voted against the cruise missile, the B - 1 bomber, the Trident submarine, and against salary increases for the military. Yes, he did vote for certain things. He voted for cutting U.S. troops in Europe, for cutting our military manpower, and for cutting our defense budgets.

How could a politician even face the young people who protect our freedom after he's voted to deny them the equipment and protection they need? My opponent's Senate voting record on defense was so weak, he ranked right next to George McGovern.

The Carter-Mondale administration echoed this defeatist spirit. By the late 1970's, the policies of unilateral concession were giving the Soviet Union military advantages over the United States and the West. The Soviets installed missiles that created new vulnerabilities in Europe and put new strains on the NATO alliance. During those years, the Soviet Union expanded its influence in Africa, Asia, the Middle East, and here in our own hemisphere. They overturned or took control of a new country every year.

Meanwhile, the Carter-Mondale administration negotiated an arms agreement so weak they couldn't get it approved in a Senate controlled by their own party. My opponent talks about the Carter-Mondale years as a period of relaxed tension. Well, it's true they relaxed -- but the Soviets didn't.

What troubles me most is how little he seems to have learned about the dangers of weakness and naive thinking. I don't question his patriotism; I do question his judgment. In 1968 he said that the days of Soviet suppression by force were over. Then, the Soviets invaded Czechoslovakia. But he didn't learn. He voted against American military strength during the 1970's, even as the Soviets were embarking upon the most massive military buildup in history.

Well, in the past 3\1/2\ years, our administration has demonstrated the true relationship between strength and confidence and democracy and peace. We've restored our economy and begun to restore our military strength. This is the true foundation for a future that is more peaceful and free.

We've made America and our alliances stronger and the world safer. We've discouraged Soviet expansion by helping countries help themselves, and new democracies have emerged in El Salvador, Honduras, Grenada, Panama, and Argentina. We have maintained peace and begun a new dialog with the Soviets. We're ready to go back to the table to discuss arms control and other problems with the Soviet leaders.

The evening's festivities will soon begin, and I look forward to this debate. I relish the chance to talk about what divides our view of the world from my opponent's. We do see the world differently. He represents a school of thought that sees things in terms of limits and endless accommodation. He loves big government and trusts it more than he trusts the people. In his America, America is the victim, flinching under the blows of history. Well, that's his vision, and we'll leave him to it.

The President. Thank you. All right. He has in his background some statements that he's made, showing his attitude with regard to the people, but we stand for the America of the people. And we have an honest faith in individuals. Our bias is toward the people and away from government.

We see an America of pride and power: powerful at home, powerful in the councils of the world, powerful in our ability to maintain the peace. Almost 4 years after we took office, our country is strong again.

The President. Yes, yes -- our aircraft fly again, and our ships can leave port. We stand for something. And this is good for the world, it's good for the people, and it's good for the prospects of peace.

Now, my opponent says that he cares about arms control, and I share his concern. I share his concern, but what he may not know is that you can't treat an adversary like a special interest group. And you can't just give them everything they want, get a kiss, and call it peace. You have to be strong if you are to successfully negotiate mutually beneficial agreements.

Now, my opponent says he cares about freedom, and I believe him. But then, he should be rejoicing that under our administration, not one square inch of soil has fallen to the Communist control in these 4 years.

Communist thugs. You know that exactly 1 year ago tonight, I directed our Armed Forces to proceed with planning to send our troops into Grenada. And they had 48 hours to put the plan together, and you know the result. I think that we are really ready. And so, we can celebrate tonight as -- well, an evening for a celebration of freedom.

The American people believe in freedom and in the strength it takes to protect it. And so, we go to our work this evening knowing that all is not perfect in the world, but after almost 4 years of new leadership, much has improved.

First of all, I want you to realize that our men and women in uniform -- and God bless them, I think they're the best we've ever had -- these young people, they are the peacekeepers. That's their mission -- to keep peace, not to make war.

The President. I've been doing as much of that as I can. I've been doing spot ads for them, things of that kind. And I'm going to continue doing all that I can, because, again, I think that -- I think it's only fair that you ask the people -- if you're asking the people to support the things that you advocate, then you ought to be asking them all to send you a team to help you do it.

Q. Now, you know we're all going to play that submarine thing. We're going to play that tape from that '82 press conference about recalling submarine missiles. And we're going to compare your words with what you say you said.

The President. All right. I was talking about the submarines and the airplanes, that they could be called back, in contrast to the inadvertent possibility of someone putting his thumb on the button and then finding out it was a mistake and no way to recall an attack -- that you can call the submarines and the planes back before the launching point of a missile. And, also, the fact that those more conventional-type weapons, they're not as destabilizing in people's minds, because we know from previous wars they can be intercepted and knocked down or sunk. But never -- how could anyone think that any reasonable -- [inaudible] -- would believe that you could turn a nuclear missile around and bring it home? I think that that shows a lack of intelligence on their part to believe that.

The President. No, it was taken out of context. And I realize that all of you are on the record of having repeated this so often, but, now, try to to find your way back off the end of the limb. I won't cut it off on you.

The President. But the thing is -- I don't know what Mr. Mondale would do about this -- but we're not going to hunker down and pull all of our representation of the world out in the face of terrorist acts. That's what they would like us to do.

We're entering the home stretch of the campaign -- or didn't you know that? [Laughter] We've set our sights on victory. And I believe the election of 1984 will be a victory for us all -- for the future over the past, for progress over failure, for hope over despair, and, yes, for strength over weakness.

Let me congratulate Sam Iacobellis, the men and women of Rockwell, the subcontractors around the country, and the whole aerospace industry. You are doing a magnificent job. And I know there could be no better group of people working together than you -- the men and women of our aerospace team here in southern California.

The readiness, the capability and resolve of our Armed Forces are the greatest guarantees we have that our young people will never again see the ugly face of war. There have been four wars in my lifetime. None of them started because America was too strong.

Earlier this year, on Memorial Day, America laid to rest the Unknown Soldier of Vietnam. A grateful nation opened its heart in gratitude for the sacrifices of those who have served. And a week later, on Omaha Beach, on the 40th anniversary of D-day, I spoke of Private First Class Robert Zanatta of the 37th Engineers, who was on the first assault wave to hit that beach. And on a nearby lonely, windswept point, we met the boys of Pointe du Hoc, the American Rangers, who more than 40 years ago took the cliffs and helped to end a war. And, you know, it gives me great joy to tell you that one of the men I met -- one of those one-time boys of Pointe du Hoc -- 63 years old, on the day before I got there, with today's present Rangers, he climbed those cliffs again in 7 minutes just to see if he could do it.

But I made a pledge that day to always remember, to always be proud, and to always be prepared, so we may always be free. And I have no higher responsibility than to honor that pledge. No one, absolutely no one, should ever ask the sons and daughters of America to protect this land with less than the best equipment that we can provide.

If our sons and daughters can put their lives on the line to keep us free, then I believe it's immoral to give them anything less than all the tools, all the training and the equipment to do the job right.

And it's up to us in this election to choose, and choose wisely, between a strong, safe America -- an America at peace -- or to slide back to the failed and dangerous policies of the past. There's no clearer issue in this campaign.

I don't question my opponent's patriotism and love of country. I only question his philosophy. He voted to delay or kill virtually every new strategic system -- the B - 1 bomber, the Trident submarine and Trident missile, the cruise missile, our ABM system, and the modernization of our ICBM force. And when it came to our conventional forces, the record was just as frightening, with votes to reduce U.S. ground forces overseas by 40 percent and to withdraw half of our military from Europe. When it came to aircraft, he voted to terminate the Navy's F - 14 program, the Marines' Harrier, the A - 7 for the Air National Guard, and to cut funds for the C - 5 transport.

If it were up to my opponent, I'm afraid Rockwell might still be building the B - 25 -- that is, if you were building anything at all. The truth is, if all his votes had prevailed, America would barely have any defense, any real means to protect the peace, any chance to preserve freedom. And we can't afford that kind of protection.

Senator Glenn, a Democrat, summed it up pretty well: ``The Mondale record goes far beyond a simple disagreement over specific weapons programs. I think it reveals a fundamental lack of support for an adequate national defense.'' I couldn't agree more. Mr. Mondale made a career out of weakening America's Armed Forces. Well, as long as I'm in this job, we will not shortchange the security needs of America.

This hostility to a strong, secure America -- an America at the leading edge of technology -- was also demonstrated in his opposition to the space shuttle. He called it a horrible waste, a space extravaganza. My opponent was the acknowledged leader of the fraternity of pessimists in the Senate, voting time and again to delete funds for the shuttle and to reduce overall NASA funding.

Well, I believe there's never a time when we should stop dreaming and striving and moving forward. The footprints on the Moon reawakened us to mankind's boundless horizon and showed us that America's future can be determined by our dreams and by our visions. Together, we've opened new doors to discovery, opportunity, and progress.

The era of Apollo spawned communications, weather, navigation, and Earth resource satellites, and many new industries. America built a technological base second to none, and all the while, served the down-to-Earth needs of our people. And today, thanks to the work that you're doing here with the shuttle, we're pushing the frontiers of space back even farther, and we're going to keep on pushing.

As long as it's my watch -- if a horse cavalryman of the past can speak in naval terms -- we'll accept the challenge of space and keep battling for the future, for discovery, for new jobs and markets, and for knowledge. We have a promise to keep -- to ourselves and to our young. And let me say of our young people, they are a shining generation.

Traveling across the country and seeing our high school and college students has been a wonderful experience, as well as seeing those who have already taken their first steps out here into the working world. They're bright. They're creative. They're idealistic. They have faith in themselves, faith in the future, and faith in America. And we must do all we can to see that the world they inherit from us is a world full of decency and daring as the world in which we were born.

You know, last night I got shut off because I ran out of time on my 4-minute finale. And I'm so delighted to see these young people who are here because what I wanted to say is that between my generation and theirs -- there were a few of you in other generations in between -- but all of us of those generations, our responsibility -- we grew up in an America where we took it for granted that you could dream and make your dreams come true, if you set out to do that. And what we owe these young people -- and they are very special -- George Bush and I, as I said last night, have seen them all across this country -- what we owe them is to see that we turn over to them the same kind of America of hope and opportunity that our parents turned over to us. And that's what we're going to do.

In 1981 we went to work repairing the damage caused by wrong-headed thinking. And besides working to restore the strategic balance, we started to rebuild our conventional forces. And today every major commander in the field agrees that America's military forces have better people, who are better armed, better trained, better motivated, with better support behind them.

If we were to stop now in midstream, we'd send a signal of decline, lessened will, and weakness to friends and adversaries alike. If we were to return to the time when we modernized our defenses in fits and starts, each time losing the security we gained earlier, then we would never be certain of our security. We'd never be able to convince the Soviet leadership that it is in their interest to sit down and negotiate equitable arms reductions. And the American people know it.

It's always easy to argue for reductions in defense spending, just as it's easy to pretend that one can call the Soviet leaders, as my opponent has proposed, and persuade them in a moment to alter the course they've followed for decades. It's also nonsense, and the American people know it.

There is no quick, easy way. The solution is firmness and patience. The only sensible and safe route is to make sure that we're prepared to defend freedom and prepared for peace. And the American people know that, too.

Now, my opponents can't stand it when I start talking about Harry Truman or J.F.K. -- I need to remind them that Harry Truman was the last Democrat I voted and campaigned for -- but of course they can't, because it just shows them how far the leadership today of the Democratic Party has strayed from the great strengths of the Democratic political tradition. And nowhere is the drift more evident than in their unwillingness to keep us prepared for peace. And I think the American people know that.

And in view of some of the things that were said last night -- to those of you that saw that -- you hear about the bad relations that we now have between ourselves and the Soviet Union. Last year we sold them 23 million tons of grain, and our farmers benefited accordingly. And in the 4 years that we've been here, they haven't advanced by 1 square inch of territory anyplace in the world.

I know that I've been talking partisan politics, and I know that in a crowd like this there must be thousands of people who are Democrats. And I'm delighted, having been one for most of my life, because I know that all across this country there are millions of patriotic, dedicated Democrats who know they can no longer follow in the path of the leadership of their party, which has taken us down such strange paths, so foreign to what the leadership of the Democratic Party once believed.

I've come to San Diego asking for your support in every campaign that I've ever been in. And I'm here today to ask this last one time. [Applause] Well, I was going to ask if I could count on you, and you've already answered that. And thank you very much.

I see something here I've been noticing all over the country -- the large number of young people. I know you're putting yourselves squarely on the side of a strong and a growing America. People of every age, race, and background are flocking to a banner of opportunity. And nowhere is that more clear than in California. Disadvantaged Americans are waking up to the failure of bureaucratic programs to bring them the economic opportunity they need to make real progress.

I'm especially pleased that Hispanic-Americans, who are so important to our California heritage, are joining us in increasing numbers. And here in California, we also see our coalition bolstered by Asian-Americans, many of them recent immigrants who have come here like our own forefathers and mothers for freedom and to improve their well-being.

Congressmen Bill Lowery, Duncan Hunter, and Ron Packard. I've got a favor to ask: On election day make sure that you send them back to Washington; because if you're going to send me back there, I don't know what I'd do without them. You and all these fine candidates are part of a new spirit that's spreading across America.

You know -- I assume that maybe some of you saw the debate last night. Well, the format for the debate is sometimes frustrating. When the other fellow's making a lot of misstatements, you don't have time always to challenge them. So, last night I told the people, for example, that Mr.

It's a choice between two fundamentally different ways of governing and two distinct ways of looking at America. My opponent, Mr. Mondale, offers a government of pessimism, fear, and limits compared to ours of hope, confidence, and growth. He sees government as an end in itself.

And we see government as something belonging to the people and only a junior partner in our lives. They see people merely as members of groups, special interests to be coddled and catered to. We look at them as individuals to be fulfilled through their own freedom and creativity.

Mr. Carter himself said, ``There wasn't a single decision I made during 4 years in the White House that Fritz Mondale wasn't involved in.'' In those years, they took the strongest economy in the world and pushed it to the brink of collapse. They created a calamity of such proportions that we're still suffering the consequences of those economic time bombs. What they left on our doorstep in January 1981 was a snarling economic wolf with sharp teeth.

The suffering of America, the deep and painful recession, and the outrageous and frightening inflation -- these things didn't start by spontaneous combustion. They came about through the concerted mismanagement of which Mr. Mondale was a part, and his liberal friends who controlled the Congress.

They gave us five -- count them -- five different anti-inflation plans and managed to give us the worst 4-year record of inflation in nearly 40 years. While it took them five economic plans to nearly triple inflation, it's taken us only one to cut it by about two-thirds.

Senior citizens were driven into panic by higher rents, exhorbitant fuel costs, dramatically increasing food prices, and Federal health care costs, which went up a massive 87 percent. And they called that fairness.

Now, as Senator Wilson was telling you, on defense, too, he has a record of weakness, confusion, and failure. Before the invasion of Czechoslovakia, he announced that the days of Soviet suppression by force were over. And after the invasion of Afghanistan, he said just what you were told -- that he was baffled. There's so much that seems to baffle him.

But we know now that those disastrous consequences didn't come about by accident; they came through the implementation of the very policies of out-of-control spending, unfair taxation, and worship of big government that my opponent still supports.

And then Mr. Mondale reversed himself and said he'd made a mistake. Well, that's something he seems to do quite a lot. [Laughter] But the truth is, that several times between 1982 and now he has expressly proposed the repeal of indexing. In politics they call this a flip-flop. In this case, you'll forgive me if I call it a Fritz-flop.

Yesterday he wanted to give you a $200 tax break to every family dependent. And today he wants to raise taxes the equivalent of almost $2,000 a household. You know, for some time, over the last several weeks at least, he was talking about a new Reagan and an old Reagan. Now, that had nothing to do with my age. The old Reagan was the earlier one, the first one -- the new Reagan is now. And when he said that, well, he inspired me to do a little of that old and new business.

But this new Mondale says there's too much religion in politics. The old Mondale called the space shuttle a ``horrible waste,'' a ``space extravaganza.'' And he personally led the fight in the United States Senate to kill the shuttle program before it even started.

We see America's best days ahead of us. We see ourselves in a springtime of hope, ready to fire up our courage and determination to reach high and achieve all the best. We see a life where our children can enjoy at last prosperity without inflation. We see a life where they can enjoy the highest of creativity and go for the stars and not have their hopes and dreams crushed or taxed away by greedy governmentalists.

Today we've returned to a proper understanding of who the American people are. We're the people who crossed the plains, scaled the mountains, won the West. We're the people who came up with the inventions that lit the world and filled it with sound and laughter. We're the people who twice in this century have fought in Europe and stood for decency for all mankind.

We're a people, in short, who don't need the supervision of government sophisticates to tell us what is right and good. And now the American people are walking into tomorrow unashamed and unafraid. They're ready for this great, new era of opportunity.

What I had already said is that all across this country in high schools, in schools on college and university campuses, and among younger people who have finished education and started out into life -- seen them all across this country -- and, believe me, to the rest of you, or of those other generations, these young people today are very special. Yes, you are. And you know what? The responsibility -- and this is what I was going to say last night -- the responsibility of my generation and those generations between mine and yours, our responsibility is to see that you grow up in the same kind of country that we grew up in, a country of hope and opportunity. And our job is to hand you an America that is free in a country -- or a world that is at peace.

The President. Thank you, Governor Atiyeh, ladies and gentlemen here on the dais, and all of you out there, thank you for a most heartwarming reception. It's great to be back in the beautiful State of Oregon, and it's great to be back in the proud town of Medford.

You know, there's something healthy about this part of the country where so many live so close to the land, growing fruit and farming, mining, lumbering. It's a life that produces qualities like character and self-reliance. Indeed, I can think of a few liberal Democrats that I wish, could come here to see it, and then stay. No, no -- now wait a minute, you're right -- that wouldn't be fair to the people of this good town.

Recently, these fine Members of the Congress played a central role in passing a vital piece of legislation -- the timber relief bill. The timber industry here in the Pacific Northwest has seen more than its share of hard times. And this legislation will enable the industry to gain the full benefits of our economic expansion. For thousands, this bill will mean more jobs, more opportunity, and renewed hope. And I'm happy to tell you that just a few days ago, last week, I signed that timber bill into law.

You know, Abe Lincoln said that we must disenthrall ourselves with the past, and then we'll save our country. Well, 4 years ago that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we'd hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us. The power of the Federal Government had, over the decades, created great chaos -- economic chaos, social chaos, international chaos. Our leaders were adrift, rudderless, without a compass.

Four years ago we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom, and common sense were our constellations. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the Government, and so we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent. We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, was stealing our savings. And the highest interest rates since the Civil War were making it impossible for people to own a home or start an enterprise. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we decided to rebuild and be strong again. And this, we knew, would enhance the prospects for peace in the world. It was a second American revolution -- and it's only just begun.

But what already has come of our efforts? A great renewal. America is back -- a giant, reemergent on the scene -- powerful in its renewed spirits, powerful in its economy, powerful in the world economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace.

And just after our tax cuts, he said the most he could see was an anemic recovery. That was before our economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months, and just before nearly 900,000 businesses were incorporated in less than a year and a half.

My opponent said that our policies would deliver a misery index the likes of which we haven't seen in a long time. And there was some truth in that. You know, you get the misery index by adding the rate of unemployment to the rate of inflation, and they invented that for the 1976 campaign. And they said that Jerry Ford had no right to seek reelection because his misery index was all of 12.6. Now, they didn't mention the misery index in the 1980 election because it had gone up to more than 20. And they aren't talking too much about it in this campaign, because it's down to 11.

No, he's no doubt proud of the fact that he voted 16 times as a United States Senator to raise your taxes. And this year he's outdone himself. He's already promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he is to keep all the promises he's made to this group and that, we will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household. That's more than $150 a month. It's like having a second mortgage. And after the Mondale mortgage, we'd be sure to see more than a few foreclosures.

But I'm not finished here. I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years, not one square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago. I know they were complaining because they thought maybe I was speaking too harshly to the Russians, but on the other hand, maybe we got their attention.

One year ago we liberated Grenada from Communist thugs who had taken that country over in a coup. And my opponent called what we did a violation of international law that erodes our moral authority to criticize the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan.

My opponent supported the grain embargo and spoke out for it often. He even questioned the patriotism of a Senator from his own party when that Senator called that embargo just what it was -- unworkable and unfair. Now he seems to have changed his tune. He says he privately opposed the embargo -- very privately. [Laughter] As a matter of fact, he has, in the last several months, claimed that he opposed a number of the administration's policies when he was Vice President.

After the Sandinista revolution in Nicaragua, Mr. Mondale praised it, saying, ``Winds of democratic progress are stirring where they have long been stifled.'' But we know that the Sandinistas immediately began to persecute the genuine believers in democracy and to export terror. They went on to slaughter the Miskito Indians, abuse and deport church leaders, slander the Pope, and move to kill free speech. So, why isn't my opponent speaking out now about those winds of democracy?

The President. I could say of his economic program that he will either have to break his promises or break the bank. But I won't say it, because Senator John Glenn, a Democrat, already has said it. I could call his economic program a collection of old and tired ideas held together by paralyzing commitments to special interest groups. But I won't, because Senator Gary Hart, a Democrat, has already said that. I could predict that he will create deficits more than twice what they are now. But I won't, because Senator Fritz Hollings, a Democrat, has already said that.

He's long opposed enterprise zones to help the most economically troubled neighborhoods in the country. But then a few weeks ago, he said he's for them. Well, if he's for them, why doesn't he ask his friend, Tip O'Neill, to stop blocking the enterprise zone bill which is buried in a committee of the House of which he is the Speaker?

This month an American woman walked in space -- the first to do so. Kathryn Sullivan made history. And she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future are being made and will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there; advances in technology and communication. And that's why I support the space shuttle. But my opponent personally led the fight against it and called it a horrible waste and tried to keep it from even being put into effect.

The President.  --  -- but the point is, the point is we made a great turn in the road in 1980. And we were right to take command of the ship, stop its aimless drift, and get moving again. And we were right when we stopped sending out S.O.S. and started saying U.S.A. again.

And let me say here that the 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once, for a great part of my life. And I always respected that party. But in those days, its leaders weren't in the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for the one and they damned the other.

To all the good Democrats who respect that tradition, I say, ``You are not alone; you're not without a home.'' We're putting out our hands, and we're asking you -- and I hope there are many in the crowd -- come walk with us down this new path of hope and opportunity and, in a bipartisan way, we'll save this country.

I didn't get a chance to say it last night, but my next line was going to be: Your generation is something special. You're truly something new on the scene. Your idealism and your love of country are unsurpassed. And I consider it our highest duty to make certain that you have an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, confidence, and dreams as we had when we were your age.

It's wonderful to be in Oregon, and it's wonderful to be in the City of Roses. And it's especially good to be at the University of Portland, home of the mighty Pilots. This unique, new center is a tribute to the great spirit of voluntarism that's exemplified by the Chiles Foundation.

Mark Hatfield and Bob Packwood, Congressmen Bob Smith and Denny Smith, who is with us here. They've all helped us so much, and we're hoping that they'll stay in Washington for a long time. And they need company, so we hope that you will send your fine candidates there to be with them. And may I say, you have one of the best Governors in the country in Vic Atiyeh.

Abe Lincoln gave us some enduring advice. Abe Lincoln said, we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. Well, 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us.

The President. Our leaders were adrift, rudderless, without a compass. And 4 years ago, we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom, and common sense was our constellation.

We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, so we decided to rebuild and be strong again. And this we knew would enhance the prospects for peace in the world. It was a second American revolution, and it's only just begun.

But what already has come of our efforts? A great renewal. America is back, a giant reemergent on the scene -- powerful in its renewed spirits, powerful in its economy, powerful in the world economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace.

Then, just after our tax cuts, he said the most that he could see was an anemic recovery; and that was right before our economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months and just before a record nearly 900,000 businesses were incorporated in less than a year and a half.

Now, my opponent said that our policies would deliver a misery index the likes of which we haven't seen for a long time. Well, now, there was some truth in that. You know, you get the misery index by adding up the unemployment rate and the inflation rate. Now, they invented that for the 1976 campaign. And they said that Jerry Ford had no right to seek reelection, because his misery index was 12.6. Now, they didn't mention the misery index in the 1980 campaign, because it had gone up to more than 20 percent. And they aren't talking too much about it in this campaign, because it's down around 11.

Now, you know, it's just occurred to me that maybe all we have to do to get the economy absolutely in perfect shape is to get my opponent to predict absolute disaster. I must say, though, he's learned some things. My opponent is concerned now about the deficit. But back during the Jerry Ford years, he proposed that the deficit should be doubled because a deficit would stimulate the economy.

Now, he says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation time after time which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Now, doesn't that make you just want to be a constitutent of his? [Laughter] Now, he's no doubt proud of the fact that he voted 16 times as a United States Senator to increase taxes.

This year he's outdone himself. He's already promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he's to keep all the promises that he's made to this group and that, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

The President.  His economic plan has two basic parts: to raise your taxes and then raise them again. [Laughter] But I've got news for him. The American people don't want his tax increases, and he isn't going to get his tax increases.

But he sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th. We see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. What we want, and what we're trying to plan to do, is to lower yours and everybody's taxes so that your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

Yet there's so much more to say about my opponent. His grasp of foreign affairs is demonstrated by the following: Sometime back, he said the old days of a Soviet strategy of suppression by force are over -- that was just before the Soviets invaded Czechoslovakia. And after they invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' But then there's so much that baffles him.

One year ago we liberated Grenada from Communist thugs, and my opponent called what we did a violation of international law that erodes our moral authority to criticize the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan. Well, I will say this: His administration did mete out some strong punishment after Afghanistan. Unfortunately, they didn't punish the Soviets; they punished the American farmers.

And after the Sandinista revolution in Nicaragua, he praised it, saying, ``Winds of democratic progress are stirring where they have long been stifled.'' But we know that the Sandinistas immediately began to persecute the genuine believers in democracy and to export terror. They went on to slaughter the Miskito Indians, abuse and deport church leaders, slander the Pope, practice anti-Semitism, and move to kill free speech. So, why isn't my opponent speaking out now?

Now, I could call his economic program a collection of old and tired ideas held together by paralyzing commitments to special interest groups. But I won't say that, because Senator Gary Hart, a Democrat, has already said that. Now, I could predict that he will create deficits more than twice what they are now. But I won't say that, because Fritz Hollings, a Democrat, has already said that.

He has long opposed enterprise zones. This was a program we introduced to help the most economically troubled neighborhoods like some in our great inner cities. It was to use tax incentives and to stimulate the economy in those areas. And he's opposed that. But then a few weeks ago, he said that now he's for them. Well, if he's for them, why doesn't he ask Tip O'Neill to get out of the way and loosen the program that's been buried in a committee in the House for over a year?

Changed signals a little bit -- this month an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. And then she returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Already we're learning that it's possible -- or it looks possible -- that we're going to have cures for diabetes and heart disease -- that are to be able to develop them up there in the shuttle -- advances in technology and communication. That's why I support the space shuttle. But my opponent personally led the fight in the Senate against having the shuttle program at all. And he called it a horrible waste.

The President. All right. Now, let me say here that the 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once, for the better part of my life, for a long tim. And I also respected that party. But in those days its leaders weren't the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of our times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for the one and damned the other.

To all the good Democrats, and I know -- well, I hope, certainly, and I'm sure I know there are many among you -- you are not alone and not without a hope. We're putting out our hands, and we're asking you to come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity.

We, together, in a bipartisan move can go forward with what has been started in this country. And to all of you young people, I want to tell you that all across this country, nothing has touched me more than your support, your enthusiasm, your patriotism. You are what this election is all about, and it's your future that we care so much about. And I've seen enough to know that your generation is really something special.

I consider it our highest duty -- and when I say that, I'm talking about my generation, my generation and a few generations in between mine and yours -- it is our duty to make certain that you have an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope and confidence and dreams as we had when we were born into this America and when we grew up taking for granted that this country was a place of hope and opportunity, a place where you could dream and then make your dreams come true. And we must see, all of us together, that that is what America is going to continue to be, and that's the America we will turn over to you when it is your turn.

But thank you, John, very much for that introduction. I'm thrilled to be here in Seattle, home of the Huskies. I'm glad to be here with Congressman Rod Chandler and your fine Republican candidates. Bill Ruckelshaus is here, as you've just -- he's been introduced to you, but he didn't really need any introduction out here, and Governor John Spellman, who's brought this State through difficult times and will keep it going strong.

I have to tell you, John was most helpful with regard to that timber bill. He's worked with us on the creation of jobs, and he knows very well, and we all know, what Washington State's role is in creating a strong national defense. I know that one western Governor knows a good Governor when he sees one, and John is another one, and I think he should be there for 4 more years.

I know that the Space Needle is a symbol of your city, and it stands for a city of pride and progress, a city and a country that is upward bound. And that Space Needle also symbolizes the great contest that's now going on in this crucial election, because it stands for the future. And my opponent seems to have a grudge against the future.

Abraham Lincoln said we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. And 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us. The power of the Federal Government had, over the decades, created great chaos -- economic chaos, social chaos, international chaos.

Our leaders in the past have been adrift, rudderless, and without a compass. Four years ago we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom; our constellation was common sense.

Government, and so we cut personal income taxes by 25 percent. We knew that inflation, the quiet thief, was stealing our savings. And we had the highest interest rates since the Civil War, and they were making it impossible for people to own a home or start an endeavor, an enterprise of any kind. We knew that our national military defense had been weakened, and we decided to rebuild and be strong again.

But our efforts have brought about a great renewal. America is back, a giant re-emergence on the scene. Our country is powerful in its renewed spirit, powerful in its economy, powerful in the world economy, and powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace.

He says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts, and I quote, he says, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents?

The President. Now, he's no doubt proud of the fact that as a United States Senator he voted 16 times to increase taxes. But this year he's outdone himself. He's already promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he's to keep all the promises he's made to this group and that, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

His economic plan has two basic parts: raise your taxes and raise them again. But I've got news for him: The American people don't want his tax increases, and the American people aren't going to get his tax increases.

He sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th. We see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. What we want is to lower everybody's income tax rates so your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

But I'm not finished here. I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years -- on another subject -- not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression, and the United States is more secure than we were 4 years ago.

The President.  But I will say this, though. The administration that he was a part of did mete out strong punishment -- not to the Soviet Union, to the American farmers. The American farmers, they paid. Unfortunately, he supported the grain embargo, and he spoke out on it often. He even questioned the patriotism of a Senator from his own party when that Senator called that embargo just what it was -- unworkable and unfair. But now he seems to have changed his tune. He says he privately opposed the embargo -- very privately. As a matter of fact, in the last several months he's claimed that he opposed a number of the administration policies when he was Vice President.

The President. You know, I could say of his economic program that he will either have to break his promises or break the bank. But I won't say it, because Senator John Glenn, a Democrat, has already said it. I could call his economic program a collection of old and tired ideas held together by paralyzing commitments to special interest groups. But I won't, because Senator Gary Hart, a Democrat, has already said that. I could predict that he will create deficits more than double what they are now. But I won't, because Senator Fritz Hollings, a Democrat, has already said that.

And now, if on political issues my opponent dares to be wrong, on domestic policy issues he has the courage to be cautious. A line-item veto to help control wild government spending -- I had that when I was Governor of California. I don't know whether you're one of the 42 other States?

He has long opposed, also, enterprise zones, to help the most economically troubled neighborhoods in the country to use tax incentives to go in to stimulate industry and business there to provide jobs for people. But then, a few weeks ago, he was a -- deathbed confession -- he said he's for them. Well, if he's for them, then why doesn't he ask Tip O'Neill to let our enterprise zone bill get out of the committee where it's buried in the House of Representatives?

This month an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. And then she returned to that space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made, and are being made now. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there; advances in technology and communications. That's why I support the space shuttle, as I know all of you do. But my opponent, as a Senator, led, personally, the fight in the Senate to try and kill the entire shuttle program. He called it a horrible waste.

Let me say here that the 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once -- in fact, for a greater part of my life. And I always respected that party. But in these days, its leaders -- or in those days -- weren't the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all of their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

But here in this State, we can't discuss those who have led the Democratic Party without talking about Washington's great son, the late Senator Henry ``Scoop'' Jackson. When we talk about Scoop Jackson we're reminded that, above all, politics is about principles, and Senator Jackson had among the strongest principles of anyone I've known. The first of those principles was that politics stopped at the water's edge. Time and again he provided the key leadership essential to preserving our nation's interests.

The President. You know, in all the years that I negotiated union contracts -- and I did; I was president of my union several times -- I never heard of giving up your strongest negotiating leverage without getting something in return. Moreover, Mr. Mondale has never, to my knowledge, created -- or criticized, I should say -- his runningmate's support for a congressional proposal to slash our defense budget by more than $200 billion over the next 3 years, completely eliminating several new and essential systems and substantially reducing U.S. conventional presence abroad.

My friends, Scoop Jackson left a legacy to America that rests on a timeless principle, the principle that's nurtured our beloved nation for two centuries: Peace and freedom flow from the same well, and that is the well of strength and preparedness.

America is the most generous and peaceful nation in the world. But our reserve must never be confused with our resolve. It's our resolve that will preserve the peace and keep our freedoms forever, and you have a sign in your State that exemplifies this. It's a sign which stands over the entrance to the Fairchild Air Force Base here in Washington, and it reads, Peace is our profession.

And now -- I'm always so happy when I see an auditorium like this for a rally with so many young people. I started out to say something the other night in the debate and ran out of time. I'm going to finish it here.

To the young people of America, of our country, let me say, nothing, nothing has touched our hearts more than your wonderful support. You are what this election is all about. It is your future that we care so much about. Your generation is something special. You are truly something new on the scene. Your idealism and your love of country are unsurpassed. I consider it our highest duty to make certain that you have an America that is every bit as full of opportunity and hope and confidence and dreams as we had when we were your age.

The President.  --  -- and your hard work. And that's what our obligation is to you -- those of us of those other generations -- to make sure we hand you that kind of an America, an America that is free and in a world that is at peace.

And I was hired to broadcast some Big Ten football games at WOC. And that went well. I played football for 8 years. But when the season ended, then they put me on as a staff announcer which, as you know, meant long hours of playing records and reading commercials and cutting in and out of network programs.

The mortuary was not amused. [Laughter] And I was informed that I would be replaced. Well, I learned my lesson, and so things turned out that I stayed on. And I haven't had to face removal since -- a record that I hope to continue this year.

Local radio and television stations are growing in influence, but they're still providing a valuable training ground for young journalists and broadcasters. This is where they learn how to do their jobs.

But I'm happy to be here with all of you, anyway. I know that many of the facts of broadcasting are changing. This is a time of movement and change in your industry. The advent of cable has changed the realities, and deregulation is affecting your industry.

Beyond that, I think I sense this year something new on the scene. It seemed to me that local radio and TV stations covered this year's national political convention with an intensity beyond anything they've done in the past. Stations throughout the country were sending their own teams of reporters and producers and camera men and women. And they were competing with the networks for the story. And I see this as a good sign. It's not only an indication of the growing importance of local news coverage, it also, I think, promises greater variety in terms of what stories get covered and from what point of view. And it's my hope that this trend will turn out to be in the public interest.

We've lost an awful lot of daily newspapers in this country in the past few decades. And if it turns out with time that local TV and radio fill the gap in terms of offering alternative news outlets, well, then that'll be a very good thing, indeed.

We at the White House have noted, by the way, that local broadcasters are much more visible than they once were. In the last 5 years, Washington bureaus representing local stations have increased from about 15 to around 50. And we have at the White House a Media Relations Office to serve the needs of local stations and help them in whatever way we can, in various ways.

As your importance grows as disseminators of information, so the responsibility in all of you grows to be fair and balanced in your coverage. I know that all of you put a premium on fairness, and I urge you as you're bringing young people up through the ranks to be as stern with them about impartiality as you are with yourselves. The public -- your ultimate clients -- recognizes fairness and balance and respects it. I have great admiration for how local broadcasters do their jobs. I know you're in a very tough and demanding profession. I certainly found it so.

You know, visiting you here makes me especially happy because it's very much like being at home. I'm from the Midwest, and I've always felt that the Midwest, States like this one, are kind of the heartland of America. Here there is steadiness of purpose, an appetite for good, honest work, and love of country. And Ohio is definitely a part of America's heartland.

But let me just say, we got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better but which wound up living our lives for us. The power the Federal Government had over the decades created great chaos -- economic, social, and international. Our leaders were adrift, rudderless without a compass.

Four years ago we began to navigate by some fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom, and common sense was our constellation. We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's earnings to the Government. And so, we cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent.

My opponent said decontrol of oil prices would cost American consumers more than $36 billion a year. Well, one of the first things we did was decontrol the oil prices, and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

Now, I think I have it all figured out. If we can get him -- well, we can get the economy in absolutely perfect shape if we can get him to predict absolute disaster. He says he cares about the middle class. But he boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you just want to be one of his constituents? Now, he's no doubt proud of the fact that he voted 16 times as a United States Senator to raise your taxes.

The President.  But this year he's outdone himself. He's already promised, of course, that he's going to raise your taxes. But if he is to keep all the promises he's made to this group and that, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

The President.  All right. He'd bring the economic recovery to a roaring halt. But I'll tell you, his ideas did give me an idea. If I could find a way to dress up in his tax program, I could scare the devil out of people on Halloween.

But there's so much more to say about my opponent. His grasp of foreign affairs is demonstrated by the following: Sometime back, he said the old days of a Soviet strategy of suppression by force are over. That was just before the Soviets invaded Czechoslovakia. And after they invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' But then there's so much that baffles him.

The President. No, you know, I said that he supported the grain embargo. He even questioned the patriotism of a Senator from his own party when that Senator said the embargo was unworkable and unfair. But now, in this campaign, he seems to have changed his mind. He says he privately opposed the embargo -- very privately.

He's long opposed enterprise zones. Now, this is a program that was to use tax incentives to develop industry and jobs in depressed zones, particularly in our inner cities throughout the country. He has long opposed that. But now, a few weeks ago he said he's for them. Well, if he is for them, why doesn't he ask Tip O'Neill to get out of the way and let the bill out of the committee where it's been buried for more than a year?

The President. You know, my opponent's view of the mess in 1980 is not quite the same as yours and mine. That was apparent last Sunday when rhetoric collided with the record. Mr. Mondale claimed he would keep America strong. But for 6 straight years, the American Security Council gave him a flat zero in his support of a strong national defense. It was a tie for the worst record of the United States Senate. On 37 out of 38 issues, he voted down the line with George McGovern.

The President. Now, Sunday night he said he would increase European conventional strength. But as Senator, he voted to cut U.S. troops in Europe by more than half, and twice again voted to reduce drastically U.S. forces overseas. He said he would offer no unilateral concessions to the Soviets, but he's already announced that he would end the B - 1 and the MX programs without asking for anything in return.

Back in April, Mr. Mondale said every nuclear weapons system would be subject to a freeze, even though his runningmate now admits they couldn't verify Soviet violations in the form of stockpiling warheads. And that's the record, and not rhetoric.

The President. Let me just say something about the controversial nuclear freeze. I don't think there's any one of us that wouldn't like that. But the only sensible way to have a nuclear freeze is when we have persauded the Soviets in joining us in the reduction of nuclear weapons down to an equal and verifiable level and then freeze.

Mr. Mondale said of a possible attack on this country, ``Pick a President that you know will know, if that tragic moment ever comes, what he must know, because there'll be no time for staffing or committees or advisers.'' Well, it took him 11 months to decide that rescuing our sons and daughters in Grenada was a good thing. And, believe me, that's the record, and not rhetoric.

Here in Ohio, just yesterday, he was telling your citizens that even though the steel industry suffered far too much under the Carter administration, he wanted you to forget the past. But he intends to take America back to the past of high taxes and high inflation, and his string of promises will send government spending out of control.

His approach to national defense is so like the previous administration that millions of Americans have decided we simply can't afford to go down that path again. So, when he asks us to forget the past, here with 2 weeks till election day, let's strike a bargain with him. We'll forget the past if he'll just quit trying to bring it back.

You know, this 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat for a good share of my life. And in those days, its leaders weren't the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for the one and they damned the other.

And to all the good Democrats who respect that tradition -- and I hope there are many present, because, as I said, I was one myself -- I would like to say, you're not alone. We're asking you to come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity.

Now, something that I couldn't quite finish on Sunday night. They shut me off. To the young people of our country, let me say that you are what this election is all about. I've been on a number of campuses, and I'm here now. And I want to tell you all, your generation is something special. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. And it's our highest duty to make sure that you have an America every bit as full of opportunity, hope, and confidence in dreams as we had when we were your age.

My generation, and a few generations between mine and yours -- we were born into an America where we grew up just taking it for granted that you could dream and make your dreams come true, that there was nothing to stop you if you had the will and the desire to go after them. Now all of us together are part of a great revolution, and it's only just begun. America will never give up its special mission in the world.

White House this impressive delegation of American students who were on Grenada at the time of the rescue mission last year. I know many of you came to see us last year, also, and I am especially happy to have you here with us again. And I also want to welcome Ambassador Xavier of Grenada and our other distinguished guests.

Together we celebrate today, with joy, an anniversary of honor for America -- your rescue and the liberation of our neighbor, Grenada, from the grip of oppression and tyranny. Just 1 year ago, Grenada's Governor General Paul Scoon and members of the Organization of Eastern Caribbean States called for our help.

Side by side, with forces from neighboring Caribbean democracies, the brave young soldiers, sailors, marines, and airmen accomplished their mission. They went to Grenada not to conquer, but to liberate, and they did. They saved the people, they captured tons of Soviet military equipment, and they averted a hostage crisis before it happened. And then those combat troops left the island so the Grenadian people could start a new life and give peace, freedom, and democracy, and self-determination a chance.

But today over 100,000 Soviet troops are still ravaging Afghanistan. There is a fundamental moral distinction between the Grenada rescue mission and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan -- a brutal and bloody conquest that aims to destroy freedom, democracy, and self-determination. It's the difference between totalitarianism and democracy, between tyranny and freedom. And it gives all of us hope for the future to know that you see the difference that others should have seen from the very beginning.

During the latter part of the 1970's, America passed through a period of self-doubt and national confusion. We talked and acted like a nation in decline, and the world believed us. Many questioned our will to continue as a leader of the Western alliance and to remain a force for good in the world. But I believe this period of self-doubt is over. History will record that one of the turning points came on a small island in the Caribbean where America went to take care of her own and to rescue a neighboring nation from a growing tyranny.

Our brave military personnel displayed the same love of liberty and personal courage which has made our nation great and kept her free. And this courage and love of country is also what we saw in Beirut at virtually the same time. And we will always honor those brave Americans. Let no one doubt that those brave men were heroes every bit as much in their peacekeeping mission as were our men in the rescue mission in Grenada.

Korea, on the NATO lines in Europe, at bases from Diego Garcia to Guam, and on our ships at sea, young Americans are proudly wearing the uniform of our country and serving with the same distinction as those who came before.

Cicero once said, ``Courage is that virtue which champions the cause of the right.'' Well, with us today is a small contingent of military personnel, a few of the heroes who took part in the rescue mission -- two each, from the Army, Navy, Air Force, and Marines. And four of these brave young Americans are here with me on the podium, and the other four are sitting among the students that they rescued. So, I thank them for joining us today, and thank all of you. We're very grateful to all of you.

So, let us honor him as he would have wished, by keeping faith with the policy of peace and deterrence that assures the survival of our freedom, keeps alive the hope of freedom for all the peoples of the world. This is the meaning of peace through strength. And let us always remember that America is the land of the free, because we're the home of the brave.

Mr. Geller. President Reagan, distinguished members of the military, honored guests: It was a year ago that I stood at this podium and spoke about the Grenada evacuation. I spoke about how proud we were when the U.S. Army Rangers and other members of the military rescued us on the island of Grenada. I spoke about how happy we were to realize that America had not forgotten us and how proud we were to be Americans.

The decision to invade Grenada was a tough one. It was a decision that called for quick and decisive action by a true leader. I want to thank you, Mr. President, once again for making that decision. Yes, it's been a year now since we left Grenada, and hardly a day goes by when I don't think about what went on there.

America believes, as well. I want to tell America and all the students in America that the lessons we have learned in Grenada shall not be forgotten, that the Americans that died in Grenada did not die in vain. We, the students of St. George's University, have returned to become teachers for 2 days, to remind the citizens of America that we cannot forget that lesson, that freedom is just too precious, too valuable, to be taken for granted, and that we must stand up and protect that right whenever and wherever necessary.

President Reagan, you came to our aid when our freedom was in jeopardy. You made us proud to be Americans. On behalf of the students assembled here today, I'd like to thank you and all four branches of the Armed Forces for being there when we needed you. Thank you.

Grenada are now a part of history, but our feelings will always remain alive inside of us. I can never forget the feeling of intense fear and the sense of relief when I first saw our Americans. I hope I never forget the feelings of pride and admiration for the finest military on the face of the Earth -- the American military -- and also my gratitude to their Commander in Chief, who made a most courageous decision. And, finally, I hope I never forget to say how proud I am to be an American.

Dr. Modica. Mr. President, as you know, I was probably the first person to voice reservations about your decision to go ahead with the rescue mission in Grenada last year. I know I certainly was the most publicized. During my State Department briefing the following day, I realized there were factors unknown to me which required that you make a tough and immediate decision. I then felt it my duty to publicly acknowledge the necessity of the mission, and I did so upon leaving the State Department that very day. I have realized over the past year that you have taken the greatest risk of your political career when you made the decision to act, rather than to ignore the plight of our students and the call for help from six Caribbean nations.

You had little to gain in taking military action, as the people of our nation have become increasingly unsupportive of such actions over the past decade. Had the mission failed in any way, you would have shouldered the entire blame. Recently we've been hearing a lot about leadership and strong leadership in recent weeks. The very definition of strong leadership is exemplified by your decisive action in Grenada. No wonder our renewed national pride has emerged from your ability to take action when necessary.

I know you will want to remember those brave men who gave their lives in the Grenada rescue mission. This replica of the memorial that will be unveiled on our Grenada campus October 29th bears the names of each of those fine young men who gave their lives. On behalf of its cosponsors, St. George's University, and the parents network of St. George's University, I am proud and honored to present it to you as our Commander in Chief.

I just have to tell you a little story about Grenada here, and then I will get back to the office and go to work. This young lieutenant marine, flying a Cobra helicopter, was at Grenada and then went on to Beirut. And from Beirut he wrote back to the Pentagon to the Armed Forces Journal, and he said that there was one thing in all the news stories about Grenada that was so consistent and so repeated that he decided it was a code, and he was going to break the code.

That line was that Grenada produces more nutmeg than any other spot on Earth. [Laughter] So, he said, in breaking the code, number one, that is true -- they produce more nutmeg than any other spot on Earth. He said, number two, the Soviets and the Cubans are trying to take Grenada.

Valley Indian Tribe, and others interested in environmental quality. A fishery restoration program for the river has been an objective for over 10 years, and enactment of this bill is a major environmental achievement. Indeed, I first proposed a similar effort during my tenure as Governor of California, so I am especially pleased to see that early effort finally bear fruit.

The plan also demonstrates our continued commitment to fiscal responsibility. Where the prior administration unsuccessfully promoted a program of 100-percent Federal financing, H.R. 1438 incorporates a cost sharing arrangement under which local beneficiaries put up 50 percent, the Federal Government contributes 35 percent, and the State of California contributes 15 percent of the costs. Consequently, the bill ensures an improved environment at less cost to the Nation's taxpayers.

The legislation has enjoyed overwhelming support both in the House and the Senate. I would like to congratulate those responsible for this accord. I believe H.R. 1438 demonstrates this administration's commitment to the protection and enhancement of our natural resources in a fiscally responsible manner. In this way we are all winners.

Compensation Standards Act. This bill represents the culmination of nearly 2 years of work between the administration and the Congress on the best way to handle the claims of veterans who believe they may have been injured by their exposure to Agent Orange in Vietnam or to low-level ionizing radiation from their participation in the atomic weapons atmospheric testing program in the 1950's and early 1960's or from the occupation of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. H.R.

Over the past few years, questions have arisen regarding the long-term health effects resulting from Agent Orange exposure. We now know that the Agent Orange used in Vietnam was contaminated with trace amounts of dioxin. There is, however, substantial scientific uncertainty on whether this exposure to Agent Orange causes any long-term adverse health effects.

Two recent studies -- the Ranch Hand morbidity and mortality study of the Air Force personnel who were involved in spraying Agent Orange, and the birth defects study by the Centers for Disease Control -- concluded that there is no significant evidence of such adverse health effects.

Nevertheless, the administration is firmly committed to continuing research on the health effects of Agent Orange exposure, and the Centers for Disease Control is now in the process of conducting a major epidemiological study to provide further information on this important question.

The bill also addresses the claims of those veterans who were exposed to low levels of ionizing radiation from the atomic weapons atmospheric testing program or from the occupation of Hiroshima and Nagasaki. While radiation indisputably has serious adverse health effects at high dose levels, there is scientific uncertainty about its adverse health effects at the very low levels underlying these claims.

This bill requires the Administrator of Veterans Affairs to publish regulations assuring the fair and consistent adjudication of these exposure claims. In doing so, the Administrator will have the assistance of a specially created advisory committee of scientists to evaluate the evidence and make appropriate recommendations. With the benefit of these recommendations, the Administrator will promulgate regulations grounded on the best available scientific and medical evidence.

Even though the available evidence does not suggest the existence of adverse long-term health effects from Agent Orange or low-level ionizing radiation exposure, because there is some uncertainty on this point, the Veterans Administration has for several years been providing free, comprehensive health care for any veteran who believes that he or she may have an illness traceable to either exposure. To date, there have been over 1 million instances of such care.

Veterans deserve to know the truth about the consequences of their exposure to Agent Orange or to low-level radiation, and they should not live in fear if that fear is unjustified. This bill will facilitate the search for that truth, and I am therefore pleased to sign it.

Our nation provides compensation and other monetary benefits to service-disabled veterans and dependency and indemnity compensation (DIC) benefits to the survivors of those who died for our country. The administration has recommended increases in these monetary benefits each year so they will keep up with changes in the cost of living. The ``Veterans' Benefits Improvement Act of 1984,'' which I am approving today, provides a 3.2-percent increase in compensation and DIC benefits effective December 1, 1984.

The bill before me also responds to the administration's recommendation for increases in GI bill educational benefits, which will help Vietnam-era veterans taking advantage of this opportunity, and other recommendations for needed increases in veterans' benefits.

Further, I am pleased to endorse the extension in the bill of the Federal Government's authority to make veterans' readjustment appointments (VRA's) to the civil service. The VRA authority helps service-disabled veterans obtain employment in the Federal Government.

This bill provides much needed and timely relief for our cities, towns, school districts, sanitary districts, and other similar local governmental bodies from the threat of massive treble damages in the antitrust cases that are being brought with increasing frequency against them. While the antitrust laws serve very important purposes, they were never intended to threaten public treasuries and the taxpayers' pocketbooks, or to disrupt the good faith functioning of local units of governments. The administration has been a strong supporter of this legislation, and I commend the efforts of the local officials and those in the Senate and House of Representatives who worked so hard for its enactment during the 98th Congress.

S. 864 would allow the expansion of the volunteer program in the National Park Service and permit such a program to be established in the Bureau of Land Management; require the National Park Service to implement a complex maintenance management system; and impose new requirements for congressional approval of contracts of the National Park Service, Bureau of Land Management, and Fish and Wildlife Service pursuant to Office of Management and Budget Circular A - 76.

Park Service and creation of a similar volunteer program in the Bureau of Land Management of the Department of the Interior. The National Park Service program has been very successful, as highly motivated individuals have volunteered valuable services to the visitors to our national parks and to other National Park Service activities. By creating additional opportunities for Americans to provide volunteer services that advance the enjoyment and management of our parks and public lands, these precious resources that we all cherish can be fully utilized and protected. I am gratified that the Congress responded positively to the administration's proposals to enhance the preservation of our parks through the services of volunteers.

Although I have signed S. 864, I must note my reservations about it. Language was added to the bill that impairs the ability of the Department of the Interior to make sound management decisions on the most cost-effective way to provide support services. The Department is prohibited, in the National Park Service, Fish and Wildlife Service, and Bureau of Land Management, from cost-effective contracting for services, such as road maintenance, now performed by Government employees. For large activities, the Government is hampered from contracting even when productivity studies show clear and substantial savings can be made, without a loss of service, by relying on the private sector. This represents an unwarranted intrusion by the Congress into matters normally within the management discretion of the executive branch and shows a serious disregard for providing cost-effective services to the public and the taxpayer.

Interior to proceed with efficiency studies to effect productivity improvements in all areas. We will work with the Congress next year for their reconsideration of these and other intrusions into the efficient operations and management of the Federal Government.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is hereby established a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

I thought I'd like to ask you today, in a relaxed way, looking ahead to the next 4 years, what do you think will be your main priorities in your second term? And secondly, do you anticipate making any changes in the Cabinet in your second term?

Economically, we're going to continue trying the same overall things that were part of our program to begin with, and that is to continue trying to reduce the share that the government is taking from the private sector, from the gross national product, because I think that government can be, and was, a drag on the economy -- still is.

Because the real, only real way to raise government's revenues are not through tax increases, which further increase the drag in the economy; they're from growth in the economy. And we're going to continue trying, also, to make government less of a burden on business and private individuals with excessive regulations.

To show you what can happen with just even a minor element in government: We lumped together 62 categorical grant programs into 10 block grants to local and State governments. That not only eliminated 3,000 people who had been administering the 62 grants at the Federal level, but it changed the regulations out there at the local and State level, which had taken 885 pages, reduced them down to 30. And it's this type of thing -- much of this is what's contained in the recommendations of the commission that we had, and we're studying those 2,480 recommendations.

We're going to proceed, as I say, with all of that -- with tax reform, hoping to simplify it and make it possible for rates to come down again at the same time we broaden the base and, hopefully, can get some of that $100 billion that is now not coming in because of the underground economy; and in the international scene, to continue our two-track policy. One of them is, of course, the building of our own defensive capability. But at the same time, the other track is to try and get the Soviet Union to join us in realistic arms reduction talks. The overall goal is peace, and this is what we'll continue.

Now, with regard to any Cabinet changes, I would be just satisfied if there were none at all. But I do know that while no one has said anything, other than the resignation we know about of the Attorney General who has to return, or feels he must return to his private practice, the -- I know that when you ask, whenever I ask people to serve, whether on the staff or there, I made it plain that I'd take them for whatever time they could come. And if they then felt they had to leave, why I'd go out and find somebody else. No one has made any suggestions about that, but there possibly would be some that might want to get back to their own private lives. And if so, I would understand. But I have no intention of -- in other words, I'm not unhappy with anyone.

Sandinistas in Nicaragua. And not only have they taken supplies down there, but they have engaged in training. And two men were shot down and slain in the past few months. Since those two men were killed, hundreds more citizens have joined this group known as the CMA. I'm wondering about your attitude, how you feel personally, about private citizens getting engaged in this way in what is happening in Central America.

And as I ask this question, there are 30 Memphians who are getting ready, who are prepared to fly to Honduras this weekend to work with groups, they say, are in that country who want to overthrow the Sandinistas. So, is there an ever-growing number of people in our country who want to do something on their own to, as they put it, stop communism before it gets to our borders, and how do you feel about it?

The President. Well, I have to say it's quite in line with what has been a pretty well established tradition in our country. Nothing was done legally about the formation of a brigade, a Communist brigade of Americans in the Spanish Civil War. In World War II, we had pilots being recruited to go to the Flying Tigers. I recall, if I'm correct, there were some people, even one very prominent actor from Hollywood who became an ambulance driver in the French Army in World War II.

So, I don't know. I'm not a lawyer, so I never asked about what is the actual legality of anything of that kind. But at the same time, as I say, it's been a tradition, and Americans have always done this. And I would be inclined to not want to interfere with them.

Q. Weren't the examples that you raised people who went to fight for governments who were fighting other governments' tyranny? In this case, we have Americans who are going to Central America to help rebels. They call them ``freedom fighters.'' Do you see a difference there?

The President. Well, as I say, ``I'm not so wise as those lawyer guys,'' as Mr. Service said in his poem. I haven't really gotten into that. I was giving you -- my own personal reaction to it was it seemed to be a long and honorable tradition. And in a sense, our own interest in Nicaragua has to do with their overt support of guerrillas, themselves, who are trying to overthrow a duly elected government of a neighboring country -- El Salvador. So, no one has raised the issue before of these individual Americans.

Q. If it would not be illegal, would there be anything wrong with it in your mind, in any other way? Morally? Or can they get in the way of our government in trying to do something about the problems in Central America?

The President. Well, if you get into the moral issue of it, we were certainly tested with regard to that Spanish Civil War I mentioned, because I would say that the individuals that went there were, in the opinion of most Americans, fighting on the wrong side.

Mr. President, you took office 4 years ago, determined to drastically cut what you said were overly generous welfare programs. And in February of '81, just 1 month after taking office, you introduced 84 proposals to reduce or eliminate Federal programs that obviously took fat from the domestic side of the budget. Among those reductions was a 17.4-percent decrease in unemployment insurance, a 14.3-percent decrease in Aid to [Families with] Dependent Children, a 13.8-percent decrease in food stamps, a 28-percent reduction in child nutrition, a 6.8-percent decrease in Medicare, and a 2.8 in Medicaid.

Obviously, a great number of American people have agreed with you that some cuts were necessary. But the Urban Institute cites that the poverty level grew faster in the first 3 years of your Presidency than any other period since the fifties. The Congressional Budget Office in July reported that budget reductions alone -- taking unemployment as an aside -- but the budget reductions alone had pushed 560,000 people below the poverty line -- 325,000 of them children alone.

Mr. President, what further cuts in welfare spending will be necessary in the next Reagan administration? And secondly, how do you answer your opponents who say that you are practicing social Darwinism?

The President. Well, I answer them -- first of all, I challenge the Urban Institute's figures. And I don't think that they can be substantiated at all, because we are spending more money today and helping more people than at any time in our nation's history. With regard to food, the increase in food programs is up 37 percent over what it was.

But in many of these figures, for example in food stamps, some of the so-called savings in food stamps -- we're, incidentally, giving more food stamps to more people than we've ever done before in history. There are something like, oh, I think somewhere around 3 million more people are getting them than were getting them in 1980. But here we found, for example, that in food stamps, someone applied for food stamps, let's say it's 3 days before the end of the month, they were given the whole month's food stamps for the preceding month, for just those few days of the month left. Now, come the first of the month, they were due, again, a quota for the coming month. And we started giving them food stamps as of the day they asked for them, not retroactively for weeks before they'd put in the request. And that amounted to quite a percentage, in a reduction.

We also, in many of these programs, found that there were people who were above an income level as to where they should be eligible for these programs, and what we did was redirect the attention down. And we've set for ourselves a standard of 130 percent of poverty -- that that was the limit. Above that, it would have to be an exceptional case. But if they're below 130 percent of poverty, they were helped. So, the result was, for example, in school lunches there was a big increase for those people that were truly below the poverty line.

What we did do was reduce somewhat the subsidy for the people up above that line. I think in one instance it prorated out -- like the subsidy increased -- these are people that pay something for the lunches, but not the full cost -- I think one of those cuts meant that their personal payment was increased 3 cents per lunch.

But this is true of most of the figures. And I haven't really studied the ones I've seen -- just sketchily -- the Urban Institute's figures. But I don't see how they can claim those figures when we can show that in every instance and in every program we are spending more money and helping more people than ever before in our history.

So, we intend to preserve the safety net. There's never been any intention to do away with that or to eliminate it. But things, such as I suggested earlier in these 2,470 or 80 recommendations of that commission that we had of some 2,000 business people in this country, looking at areas where modern business practices could be put to work.

The Federal Government has a substantially higher overhead cost for delivering $1 of services to the people than any other level of government in this country. And I don't see why it should necessarily be higher for us than it is for them.

So, I think a lot of these figures to try and point out that we somehow have been trying to balance the budget on the backs of the needy is just not true. The needy are being cared for. And I'll have to get some of our people to go to work on that set of figures.

The President. Yes. Well, the one that they're presently saying the most about is the Superfund and the cleanup of the toxic waste dumps. Well, the Superfund was passed before we got here, and there had been very little time for this -- for inventorying these dumps and where they may be in the country. And so, it's on our watch that we have found out, so far, that there are probably 1,400 or more such dumps that do represent the potential for being a toxic waste threat.

What we had to do -- now many of these, they take some study to find out if they truly are a threat -- and what we're doing are rating them as to what are the most imminent threats, the most dangerous, and going at those as fast as we can. We're going to support, of course, the renewal of the Superfund next year when it's due, to continue on that.

But that's just one facet. We found that the parks were a threat healthwise, from a safety factor, and just simply from a point of pollution and cleanliness. The maintenance had been so poor over a number of years. So, we stopped for a time buying additional land for the parks and set aside a billion dollars for a 5-year cleanup plan of the national parks. That is just about completed now, a year ahead of schedule. And the parks are restored with regard to cleanliness and safety features that were being violated. And we now have budgeted for going back to purchasing land for parks.

The pure air and pure water act, which were in place before we got here, are implemented to the point that we have the cleanest air and water that we've had since 1970 -- I mean it's been cleaned up since that time.

And the doubling of the research for acid rain was because we discovered that the more we had learned about acid rain, the more we found out we needed to know. And the truth of the matter is the cleanup would represent over $100 billion if you just simply said we must eliminate all the rest of sulfur dioxide from the air that industry is putting there. And yet we had to say -- from the research that had been done so far -- there was no assurance that that cleanup would solve the acid rain problem. We found, as we continued researching, a lot of things we'd never known before.

But I don't know what other elements of it -- you know, being the villain of the environmental piece is kind of strange for me, because we started the whole thing in California when I was Governor. And the Federal Government sent people out to see us because they said we were so far ahead of anything that they were doing.

Q. You mentioned Social Security. I asked our readers in advance of this trip what questions they would like to ask of the President, and my mail showed an overwhelming concern in our community for Social Security. There is a real fear that in a second term that you would cut benefits. How can you answer those people?

But, no, there would be no reason for us to change it. The program has been placed on a sound financial basis. And I just think if you ladies and gentlemen of the press would go out of the way a little bit to tell these frightened senior citizens that they're going to continue to get their payments, and no one is going to take anything away from them -- in that regard, good Lord, I volunteered that if we got inflation below 3 percent, the law said we didn't have to give them a cost-of-living increase, and I said we would, anyway, because we had delayed them for 6 months during this new program of ours -- that they'd gone without getting their raise for an extra 6 months before it was instituted. And I thought it was only fair that the first year that we did get this below the figure of the law, that we'd go ahead and give it to them anyway.

The point is -- and you can, with a clear conscience, reassure them -- Social Security is not a part of the deficit or the deficit problem. Social Security is entirely funded by a payroll tax. And if you reduced Social Security, that money wouldn't go into the general fund to pay back that; it would go back into the trust fund of Social Security.

Q. Harry Moskos, Knoxville News-Sentinel. The antinuclear atmosphere intimidates private industry, making it skeptical about committing to long-term, long-scale energy demonstration projects. If the Government doesn't fund these projects, research vital to the Nation's energy future could be killed or hopelessly delayed. What is the administration's position?

The President. Well, I think there's an area in which you can say that you can't, just because someone is afraid to move forward on something, that the government, then, ought to finance that. I believe in nuclear power, and I think that the fear that's been generated of it is almost superstitious and unwarranted completely.

When you stop to think that here is a power source that we've had now in operation for quite some number of years, and there has never been a nuclear fatality in that industry, and then you compare that to coal mining and a few other things, you wonder why and how this fear is justified. I know that there's a thing that people think that a nuclear powerplant's something that can turn into a nuclear bomb and blow up. Well, that's impossible, and it can't.

I don't think it's a case of us funding this. I think it's a case of, between all of us -- one thing that government can do, and I've asked our people to do -- and that is to see if we can't shortcut some of the requirements that we make. For example, when I was Governor of California, I discovered that someone that wanted to build a nuclear powerplant, they had to get 65 environmental clearances, and there was no one-window stop. They couldn't go to one place and get cleared.

Now, they could spend millions of dollars going down through this with the knowledge that when they got to the 65th, that one could cancel out all the progress that they'd made, and they still wouldn't be able to, even after they'd spent all those millions of dollars. It seems to me what we need is a kind of a, as I say, a one-window stop.

And, of course, this isn't all Federal Government. A lot of these requirements are at different levels of government. But this is one of the things that is -- when you see a company that's spent billions of dollars and they still, then, can't get a clearance to operate -- we've got to do something about that.

Q. Mr. President -- [inaudible] -- granted what you say is true about Social Security, that it is now in a position where it can be funded adequately, what about Medicare? That's a problem coming up in your administration.

The President. Well, I did mention that earlier, but I didn't explain. It isn't as imminent; it's got several more years before it would find that. But it has a fund with its trust fund, the Medicare fund. And what we're suggesting right now, and are talking about, are some things, actually, rather than aiming them at the recipients, we're aiming at the providers.

I was going to say. And I've been saying it on these college campuses the last few days that I've been out there, that I was going to say that we had the responsibility, all of us, as I put it, my generation and a few generations between mine and theirs, to see that they were turned over, by us -- or we turned over to them -- a nation that was free in a world that was at peace. And that was the gist of it.

But I have to tell you, I was telling the truth, and I ad-libbed that whole thing in the 1976 convention when Jerry Ford asked me to come down to the platform and say a few words. And that was the first -- well, the only time up until now that I had ever voiced this. But what had happened, the idea was, what our people a hundred years from now are going to say about us, and did we do right by them or wrong by them?

But the thing was that I truly was riding down the coast -- I said ``driving.'' Actually, I was riding, and somebody else was driving, and I was trying to put down some notes. But when I was looking around and thinking, that is when it struck me, ``Wait a minute, I'm talking about a letter as if I'm writing to some people that don't know about us.'' And I realized that I had a much harder problem than I had thought, that that letter -- how do you write to somebody that's read all about us in the history books, knows all our problems and what we did? And I wrote the letter then with that idea in mind: that what I could be telling them about they might not know was how we approached what we thought about in these things, and what were the controversies and so forth in the thinking.

The President. Well, you know, everyone had told me wrong. I was afraid that -- I knew what I was going to say in that closing statement and had it all planned -- but I was afraid it might be a little over 4 minutes. But our people gave me the wrong steer. They said because I was going last, that it didn't matter then anymore. I didn't know Mr. Newman was going to be so -- [laughter] -- gung ho, and he shut me off.

Q. This is a light question. Doonesbury's back in the papers in the country, and a lot of editors are getting a lot of heat from readers who think he's unfairly criticizing you. Some think it's a parody of your critics. Do you ever have occasion to read Doonesbury? And what do you think of it?

I've covered a bit of territory since this campaign began. What's heartened me most is the new spirit that I have found around this country, a spirit of optimism and confidence, of pride and patriotism, that has been brought forth by a great American renewal.

America's greatest gift has always been freedom and equality of opportunity -- the idea that no matter who you are, no matter where you came from, you can climb as high as your own God-given talents will take you. But a few years ago we were being told that this vision was no more, that America was in decline, and all of us had to lower our expectations.

I think you remember the disasters that defeatist spirit led to: the first back-to-back years of double-digit inflation since World War I, a 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate, record taxation, declining growth, savings, investment, income, and confidence in our future -- not to mention growing problems of crime and drugs and in education. Overseas, we had lost the respect of friends and foe alike. Our determination had grown weak, undermining commitments to even our closest friends like Israel. We talked and acted like a nation in decline, and the world believed us.

Well, in 1981 the American people set out on an entirely new course. And working together, we have cast aside the pessimism, along with high inflation, stagnation, and weakness, in a wonderful rebirth of freedom, prosperity, and hope. And today we're seeing not humiliation and defeatism, but pride in ourselves, in our accomplishments, and in our country.

From New York Harbor to San Diego Bay, a strong economic expansion with low inflation is leading the rest of the world into recovery. America is back. America is on its feet. And America is back on the map. But we cannot and we will not rest until every American who wants a job can find a job.

A nation's greatness is measured not just by its gross national product or military power, but by the strength of its devotion to the principles and values that bind its people and define their character. Our civil rights: on that subject, we are enforcing the law with new determination.

Since we took office, the Justice Department has filed more criminal charges on civil rights violations, brought more violators to trial, and achieved more civil rights convictions than any one before us. I've said this before, and I'll say it again: As President, I will continue to enforce civil rights to the fullest extent of the law.

Pendleton and Morris Abram and Staff Director Linda Chavez. They recognize that you cannot cure discrimination with more discrimination. I'm proud that they're serving on the Commission, and I intend to keep them there. And as long as I'm President, we'll have a Justice Department which argues for the rights of individuals to be treated as individuals, whether the case involves hiring, promotions, layoffs, or any other matter subject to the law.

And we're also remembering the guiding light of our Judeo-Christian tradition. All of us here today are descendants of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, sons and daughters of the same God. I believe we are bound by faith in our God, by our love for family and neighborhood, by our deep desire for a more peaceful world, and by our commitment to protect the freedom which is our legacy as Americans. These values have given a renewed sense of worth to our lives. They are infusing America with confidence and optimism that many thought we had lost.

You know, when you talk about human life, I think that means seeing that the immeasurable pain of the Holocaust is never dehumanized, seeing that its meaning is never lost on this generation or any future generation, and, yes, seeing that those who take our place understand: never again.

Now, perhaps that message should again be impressed on those who question why we went on a peacekeeping mission to Lebanon. Indeed, anyone who remembers the lesson of the Holocaust must understand that we have a fundamental moral obligation to assure: never again.

Memorial Commission as a means of commemorating the Holocaust. And it will be a museum of the Jewish people in the Diaspora. It will serve to remind our children and our children's children the tragic consequences of bigotry and intolerance.

We in the United States, above all, must remember that lesson, for we were founded as a nation of openness to people of all beliefs. And so we must remain. Our very unity has been strengthened by our pluralism. We establish no religion in this country, we command no worship, we mandate no belief, nor will we ever. Church and state are, and must remain, separate. All are free to believe or not believe, all are free to practice a faith or not, and those who believe are free, and should be free, to speak of and act on their belief.

At the same time that our Constitution prohibits state establishment of religion, it protects the free exercise of all religions. And walking this fine line requires government to be strictly neutral. And government should not make it more difficult for Christians, Jews, Muslims, or other believing people to practice their faith. And that's why, when the Connecticut Supreme Court struck down a statute -- and you may not have heard about this; it was a statute protecting employees who observed the Sabbath. Well, our administration is now urging the United States Supreme Court to overturn the Connecticut Court decision. This is what I mean by freedom of religion, and that's what we feel the Constitution intends.

What has happened to them? Why, after the issue became so prominent during the primaries, did the Democratic leadership alk away from their convention without a resolution condemning this insidious cancer? Why didn't they turn their backs on special interests and stand shoulder to shoulder with us in support of tolerance and in unequivocal opposition to prejudice and bigotry?

We must never remain silent in the face of bigotry. We must condemn those who seek to divide us. In all quarters and at all times, we must teach tolerance and denounce racism, anti-Semitism, and all ethnic or religious bigotry wherever they exist as unacceptable evils. We have no place for haters in America -- none, whatsoever.

We have a tremendous watchdog on this, Jeane Kirkpatrick. She is one very forceful and determined woman. And she has defended Israel with persistence and courage, and America is very proud of Jeane Kirkpatrick. Contrast her performance with that sad moment on March 1st, 1980, when the American delegate to the United Nations actually voted in favor of a resolution that repeatedly condemned Israel. And why did my opponent remain silent? I ask you again, what has happened to the party of Harry Truman and Scoop Jackson?

I was once a member of that party, and for a great part of my life, myself. And I don't believe that what we've seen and what I've been talking about is true of the millions of rank-and-file, patriotic Americans; it is only true of an element of leadership that somehow seems to have lacked the courage to stand for what is right.

I think we've come quite a long way together, at home and abroad. Gone are the days when we abandoned principle and common sense. Gone are the days when we meekly tolerated obvious threats to peace and security. I can tell you today from my heart, America is prepared for peace.

And because we're stronger than before, because we've regained our respect, and because our allies and friends know once again that we can be counted on, we're in a position to secure a future of peace -- not peace at any price, but a true, meaningful, lasting peace supported by freedom and human dignity.

Now, make no mistake, if ever we were to heed those who would cripple America's defense-building program, we would undermine our own security and the security of our closest friends, like Israel. And as long as I'm President, that's not going to happen. Israel and the United States are bound together by the ties of family, friendship, shared ideals, and mutual interests.

In partnership, Israel and the United States will continue to work toward a common vision of peace, security, and economic well-being. Our friendship is closer and stronger today, yes, than ever before. And we intend to keep it that way.

Let me leave you with one final thought. I know that many of you here today have your political roots in the Democratic Party. And I just want to say to all of you, to repeat what I said a moment ago, that I was a Democrat most of my life, and I know what it's like when you find yourself unable to support the decisions of the leadership of that party. But to you and to the millions of rank-and-file Democrats who love America and want a better life for your children, who share our determination to build a stronger America at home and abroad, I can only say: Come walk with us down this new path of hope and opportunity, and in a bipartisan way, we will keep this nation strong and free.

The spiritual values which the Jewish community represent are now being seen by the American public on a television series, ``Heritage, Civilization, And The Jews.'' These are values we want and need in the Republican Party. We stand with you, working for an America that works for everyone, an America strong and successful, inspired and united for opportunity. We stand with you, committed and determined to help you protect the traditions and ethics that you hold dear.

We stand with you in condemning any and all who preach or countenance bigotry, hatred, or anti-Semitism. And we stand with you in supporting the rights of Soviet Jewry and other believers. We will never be silent in the fight for human rights. We stand with you in support of our friend and democratic ally in the Middle East, the State of Israel. And together, we can build an even better future for our children and for America. And together, we will.

There are many things that are special about New Jersey. One of them is the caliber of the people that you send to the Congress. All of the successes we've had these past 4 years we owe to people like Congresswoman Marge Roukema, Congressman Jim Courter, and we need more people like Marge and Jim in Washington. And that's why I'm asking you to make Neil Romano a Congressman, and to make Mary Mochary a Senator, New Jersey's first woman Senator. We need them all in Washington.

Hackensack -- that you're not only growing up; you're growing out. You're rebuilding the inner city. You're attracting new businesses and new homeowners. So, you're very much a part of the great renewal that we've been trying to lead in Washington, but which has really been made possible by you, the people of this community, and you, the people of this State and this country.

That renewal began 4 years ago when America changed course, and we were guided in what we set out to do by the advice of a very great President. Abraham Lincoln said we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. Well, 4 years ago that's what we did.

The power of the Federal Government, the power it had over the decades created great chaos -- economic, social, and international. Our leaders were adrift. They were rudderless, without a compass. Four years ago, we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. And our North Star was freedom, and common sense were our constellations.

We knew a few years ago that our military defense had been weakened. So, we decided to rebuild and be strong again. And this, we knew, would enhance the chances for world peace. It was a second American revolution, and it's only just begun.

And just after our tax cuts, he said that the most that he could see was an anemic recovery, and that was right before the United States economy created more than 6 million new jobs in 21 months, and 900,000 new businesses were incorporated in the last 18.

My opponent said that if we decontrolled oil prices, it would cost the American consumers more than $36 billion a year. Well, we did decontrol oil prices, one of the first things we did, and the price of gasoline went down by 8 cents a gallon.

The President. He's no doubt proud of the fact that as a United States Senator he voted 16 times to increase taxes. But this year, he's outdone himself. He's already promised to raise taxes. But if he's to keep all the other promises he made to this group and that, he will have to raise the taxes a prorated amount of about $1,890 for every household in the United States.

You know, if my opponent's economic program were a television show, it would be ``Let's Make a Deal.'' [Laughter] You know, that's when you'd give up your prosperity in order for whatever surprise he had hidden behind the curtain. [Laughter] Now, if his campaign were a Broadway show, it would be ``Promises, Promises.'' And if it were a book, the administration were a book that he served in, you'd have to read it from the back to the front to get a happy ending.

You know, he sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th. We see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. Seriously, we want to lower your taxes, yours and everybody's in this country, so your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

I'm proud to say that during these last 4 years, not 1 square inch of territory in the world was lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than it was 4 years ago. And yet my opponent sees a different world.

The President. You're right. There is nothing immoral about rescuing American students whose lives are in danger. But by the time my opponent decided that action was justified, the students were long since home.

The President. But let me try to put this in perspective. The 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once. In fact, for the greater part of my life I was a Democrat. But in those days, the leaders of the Democratic Party weren't in the ``blame America first'' gang. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of the times. They didn't reserve all of their indignation for America. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

To all the good Democrats -- and I hope there are many present here today -- who respect that tradition of those previous leaders, I would like to tell you you're not alone. We're asking you to come and walk with us down this new path of hope and opportunity. We need you. And believe me, we can then say the salvation of this country is a bipartisan operation.

This month an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. But after that walk in space, she went back to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communication. But my opponent as a Senator personally led the battle in the Senate against having the shuttle program at all. He called it a horrible waste.

The President. You're right. We support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge, because what we're going to do next is build a permanently manned space station, and we're going to do it within a decade.

If we can lead a revolution in technology and push back the frontiers of space, then we can provide our workers -- in industries old and new -- all that they need, because if you give American workers the tools they need, they'll outproduce, outcompete, and outsell anyone, anyplace in the world.

If our grassroots drive to restore excellence in education could reverse a 20-year decline in the scholastic aptitude test scores, then we can keep raising those scores and restore American academic excellence second to none.

If our crackdown on crime could produce the sharpest drop ever in the crime index -- as it did last year -- then we can keep cracking down until our families and friends can walk our streets again without being afraid.

If we could reverse the decline in our military defenses and restore respect for America, as we have, then we can make sure this nation remains strong, strong enough to protect freedom and peace for us, for our children, and for our children's children. And we're going to do that.

To the young people of our country -- and I'm so pleased to see so many here as I've seen in meetings like this all around the country -- let me say to you now -- you young people -- you are what this election is all about, you and your future. Your generation is something special. I've seen that from coast to coast.

You know, this is what I was starting to say at the end of the debate last Sunday night when I ran out of time, so I'm going to say it here. It is our highest duty to make certain that you have an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, and confidence and dreams as we had when we were your age.

My generation -- and then there were a few generations between mine and yours -- those generations, we came into an America and grew up taking it for granted that you could dream and make your dreams come true, that there was no limit on what you could accomplish if you set out to do it and went after it. And I want to tell you that those generations I've just talked about that are above yours -- our sacred responsibility is to hand you when it's your turn and you take over -- we must hand you an America that is free in a world that is at peace.

The President. All right. All of us together, all of us are part of a great revolution, and it's only just begun. America will never give up its special mission in the world, ever. There are new worlds on our horizon, and we're not going to stop until we all get there together. America's best years are yet to come.

When I was asked recently what's been the greatest highlight of our campaign, I said the tremendous number of young people at our rallies and the tremendous outpouring of their spirit for America and our future.

To all of them, I just have to say: Your generation really sparkles. In my travels I have met you by the thousands, and I've seen enthusiasm and patriotism in your eyes that convince me you get high on America. Historians may look back at the strength of your spirit and common sense as key to the great American renewal in the 1980's.

Our generations are separated by more years than I care to admit; yet I feel a special bond of kinship with you. I think we share not only a great love for America but also an appreciation for the secret of America's success -- opportunity.

America works best when we unite for opportunity, reaching for the stars and challenging the limits of our potential. And America's greatest progress for everyone -- whites, blacks, young, and old -- begins not in Washington, but in our homes, neighborhoods, workplaces, and voluntary groups across this land.

We weren't meant to be a nation divided; we weren't meant to be a nation second-best. We were meant to be, as our Olympic athletes showed last summer, a people with faith in each other, courage to dream great dreams, opportunities to climb higher, and determination to go for the gold.

Providing opportunities for all of us to make this great, free nation greater and freer still is what we've been trying to do since we made a great sea change in 1981 -- a change to reverse the flow of power to Washington and begin restoring sovereignty to the people.

We knew that inflation and the highest interest rates since the Civil War were making it impossible for people to buy homes, start up businesses or, for that matter, even find jobs. So, we reduced spending growth and cut tax rates for everyone. We knew that our defenses had become dangerously weak. So, we started rebuilding to be strong again.

We've only begun to clear away the debris from decades of bad policies. Many people still need help. Nevertheless, America already has made a great comeback. Inflation, taxes, interest rates, and crime are down, but confidence, jobs, investment, growth, and achievement in our schools are up. And unlike 4 years ago when the Soviets were gaining influence and spreading instability throughout the world, since 1981 not 1 square inch of territory has been lost to Communist aggression. That's what makes the world a safer place.

Today our nation is at peace and our economy is in one piece. We're poised to meet great challenges for the future. We can reduce personal tax rates further, creating new jobs and opportunities for every American with nobody left behind. We can pass initiatives like enterprise zones to rebuild the distressed areas of our country and push on toward much greater progress in education, science, technology, and space.

This month an American woman, Kathryn Sullivan, made history walking in space, then returned to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. That's why we support the space shuttle and why we've committed America to build a permanently manned space station within a decade.

But before we do anything, you must choose: Will we keep moving forward on a new path toward a better future, or will we turn back to my opponent's philosophy -- weaker defenses, inflationary spending, and huge tax increases?

The difference between us is that we look at a problem and see opportunity, and he looks at opportunity and sees a problem. We seek a tax system that rewards work and investment and stimulates growth. Mr. Mondale would bring back the very policies that destroy incentives, destroy opportunity, and destroy economic growth -- policies that would cause enormous hardship and send many of you from the graduation line to the unemployment line.

We can do better, much better. We want you to have an America every bit as full of hope, confidence, and dreams as our parents left us. Come November 6th, I hope millions of you will make history by voting for your future -- voting for opportunity, voting for leadership that trusts in you and the power of your dreams. If you do, we'll bring this nation together with new strength and unity. We'll make sure America's best days are yet to come.

As we approach this 1984 election -- and it's just over the hill -- it's more than fitting that we meet here in a cradle -- one of the cradles of American democracy. You are a peace-loving people. But the citizens of Lancaster have always been in the front ranks of liberty. You were the arsenal of the colonies, and your men were some of the first volunteers to fill the ranks of Washington's army.

Now you've carried on that tradition by sending to Washington a representative who stands foursquare for a strong, free, and prosperous America -- Congressman Bob Walker. So, I've come here bearing an important message and request. We need Bob Walker in the Congress to keep the pressure on Tip O'Neill. So, you send him back up there.

Now, I know that your Senators are not up for reelection this time around, but just let me thank you for giving us Senator Heinz and Senator Specter. They both reflect the kind of leadership one would expect from Pennsylvania. And considering the fine individuals I just mentioned, my good friend also, Drew Lewis, and your outstanding, and I truly mean nationally outstanding Governor, Dick Thornburgh. You folks are batting a thousand.

Abe Lincoln said that we must disenthrall ourselves with the past -- and then we will save our country. Well, 4 years ago that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us.

The power of the Federal Government had over the decades, created great chaos -- economic, social, and international. Our leaders were adrift, rudderless, without a compass. Four years ago we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom, and common sense was our constellation.

We knew that our national military defense had been weakened. So, we decided to rebuild and be strong again. And this, we knew, would enhance the prospects for peace in the world. It was a second American Revolution, but it's only just begun.

Still, America is back, a giant. It's powerful in its renewed spirit, its growing economy, powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace, and powerful in its ability to build a better future. And you know something? What I said is not debatable.

Now, then, my opponent said that our policies would deliver a misery index the likes of which we haven't seen for a long time. Now, there was some truth in that. Now, you know what the misery index was, they added up the rate of unemployment and the rate of inflation. And that was done; they invented that for the 1976 campaign. And then they said that Jerry Ford didn't have a right to seek reelection, because his misery index was 12.6. Now, they didn't mention the misery index in the 1980 campaign, probably because it was over 20. And they haven't been mentioning it in this campaign, because it's down around 11.

My opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost American consumers more than $36 billion a year. Well, we decontrolled oil prices -- one of the first things we did -- and the price of gas went down 8 cents a gallon.

Now, he says he cares about the middle class, but he boasts -- and I quote -- ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents?

And I'm even more concerned now, because just last week my opponent used another familiar phrase from the past. ``Trust me,'' he said. Well, the last time we trusted his administration, they took five -- count 'em -- five economic plans and nearly tripled inflation. Now, by contrast, we trusted the people, and with just one economic program, we cut inflation by two-thirds.

So, you can see that when we analyze what he has said in this campaign, our biggest concern is not whether he will forget the past, but whether he's going to bring it back. And when we see all the promises he's dangled before so many special interests, and recall that while in the Senate, he never once voted to sustain the veto of any spending bill, then we have much to worry about.

American wallet again. High taxes, explosive inflation, and spending without limits might well have been the way out of the past. But if we do the right thing next week, we'll make sure they do not become the wave of the future.

Sometime back my opponent said the old days of a Soviet strategy of suppression by force are over. That was just before the Soviets invaded Czechoslovakia. And after they invaded Afghanistan, he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' [Laughter] But then there's so much that baffles him.

The President. Let me put this in perspective. The 1980 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat for the bigger half of my life. But in those days, its leaders weren't part of the ``blame America first'' gang. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of our times. They didn't deserve -- or reserve all their indignation for the United States. They knew the difference between freedom and tyranny, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

I've been saying this all over the country -- you are not alone. We're asking you to come and walk with us down that new path of hope and opportunity. And if you do, it will be that kind of bipartisan act for which this country is renowned and which will salvage and keep a great and powerful U.S.A.

This month, an American woman walked in space -- Kathryn Sullivan made history. And she returned to a space shuttle, in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communication. But my opponent, in the Senate, led the fight against the entire shuttle program and called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station and to do so within a decade.

I've seen a sign in the back that says, ``Nuclear War is No Joke.'' Well, that's a sign -- I don't know whether it's meant hostilely or friendly -- but I'll tell you something, I take it friendly for this reason: I've had the opportunity to tell parliaments in a number of countries around the world, a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

And now, a week ago Sunday I kind of got cut off in something that I was saying. I ran out of time on the debate. So, I'm going to say it here. To the young people of this country, let me say that you are what this election is all about, you and your future. Your generation is something special. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. I've seen you all across this country now in this campaign. And it's our highest duty to make certain that you have an America that is every bit as full of opportunity, hope, and confidence and dreams as we had when we were your age.

The President. Thank you. I must tell you, speaking directly to you young people -- my generation and a few other generations between mine and yours -- [laughter] -- we came into an America, we grew up in a land where we took it for granted that we could dream and make our dreams come true, and there was no limit to how high and far we could fly on the basis of our own ability and determination to do so. And what I was going to say on that Sunday night was -- those other generations I've just mentioned, my own included, we have a sacred obligation to turn over to you when it is your time to take over -- to turn over to you an America that is free in a world that is at peace.

All of us together are part of a great revolution, and it's only just begun. America will never give up its special mission, never. There are new worlds on the horizon, and we're not going to stop until we all get there together. And America's best days are yet to come.

But it depends -- we're coming down to the wire, and I tell you, stop reading the polls. Don't let anything keep you, on November 6th, from getting out there and doing what we must do, and seeing that your neighbors get out there and get to the polls.

And when I mentioned your good Congressman, Bob Walker, and sending him back there -- do you know that it has been 29 years, for 29 straight years, opponents of Republican Presidents and other Presidents -- well, they weren't opponents of the Democratic Presidents -- but for that many years, the Speaker of the House of Representatives in Washington, the chairman of every committee, they were all opponents of what we believe in and what we're trying to accomplish.

Whittlesey, was a county council member here, and worked in this courthouse. Well, we're keeping her working in the White House. And it's good to have your fine Governor and my good friend, Dick Thornburgh, here with us. He's a great Governor. And, another good friend of mine is here -- Pennsylvania's Drew Lewis.

But I want all of you to know how much we appreciate your great representatives in Washington, led by Senators John Heinz and Arlen Specter. The Republican members of Pennsylvania's delegation to the House and the Senate are, in my view, among the very best in the country.

You know, I hope to win a second term, but I just want to tell you something. I'll tell you quite frankly that if a gypsy looked into a crystal ball and said, ``You can win this election with a lot of votes, or win by just a few votes, but get a sympathetic Congress'' -- I would choose the latter, the sympathetic Congress, because if we're to solidify the gains this country has made and continue to move onward with new opportunities for our future, we'll need a Congress that will help us do the job. So, please, help spread the word and get out the vote. And if you can, well, win those races for the Gipper.

But now I want to talk a little bit about the great renewal that's been taking place throughout our country these past few years. It's a renewal that was grounded in the wise advice of a wise old President.

Now, 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up living our lives for us.

The power the Federal Government had over the decades created great chaos -- economic, social, and international. Our leaders were adrift, rudderless, without a compass. Four years ago we began to navigate by certain fixed principles. Our North Star was freedom, common sense our constellations.

We knew that economic freedom meant paying less of the American family's income and earnings to the government. And so, we cut our personal income tax rates by 25 percent. And contrary to what my opponent says, that was across the board, from top to bottom, and not just for one section of the public.

The President. But this year, he's undone -- outdone himself. Well, he's maybe undone himself, too. [Laughter] He's already promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he is to keep all the promises that he made to this group and that, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

And I'm even more concerned because now, last week, my opponent used another familiar phrase from the past. ``Trust me,'' he said. [Laughter] Well, the last time we trusted his administration, they took five -- count 'em -- five economic plans and nearly tripled inflation. Well, by contrast, we trusted the people -- you. And with just one economic program, we've cut inflation by two-thirds.

He sees an America in which every day is tax day, April 15th. And we see an America in which every day is Independence Day, the Fourth of July. We want to lower your taxes, and everybody's tax rates, so that your families will be stronger, our economy will be stronger, and America will be stronger.

Sometime back, he said the old days of a Soviet strategy of suppression by force are over. That was just before the Soviets invaded Czechoslovakia. And after they invaded Afghanistan he said, ``It just baffles me why the Soviets, these last few years, have behaved as they have.'' But then, there's so much that baffles him.

After the Sandinista revolution down there in Nicaragua, he praised it by saying, ``Winds of democratic progress are stirring where they have long been stifled.'' But we know that the Sandinistas immediately began to persecute the genuine believers in democracy and to export terror. They went on to slaughter the Miskito Indians by the thousands, abuse and deport church leaders, slander the Pope, and move to kill free speech, and practiced anti-Semitism. Don't you think it's time for my opponent to stand up, speak out, and condemn the Sandinista crimes?

The President. And let me try to put this in perspective. The 1984 election isn't just a partisan contest. I was a Democrat once, and for a very long time, for a great share of my life. But in those days, Democratic leaders weren't the ``blame America first'' crowd. Its leaders were men like Harry Truman, men who understood the challenges of their times. They didn't reserve all their indignation for America. They knew the difference between tyranny and freedom, and they stood up for one and damned the other.

To all the good Democrats -- and I hope there are many present -- who respect that tradition, I say, you are not alone. We're asking you -- those of you who have found out as I found out for myself, that I could no longer follow the leadership that had taken over that party -- we're asking you, come walk with us down the new path of hope and opportunity. And in a truly bipartisan way, we will preserve the salvation of this country.

Now, Kathryn Sullivan made history. An American woman walked in space. She returned to a space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there, advances in technology and communication. But, again, my opponent in the Senate personally led the fight against the entire shuttle program and called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge, to build a permanently manned space station and to do it within a decade.

Every once in a while in a crowd like this, I see some signs I assume are unfriendly that refer to nuclear weapons and so forth. Well, let me tell you something: I have said to a number of legislatures, to parliaments in countries around the world, in Asia and in Europe, I've spoken to them and every time I addressed them, I have said a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.

And if we can strengthen our economy, strengthen our security, and strengthen the values that bind us, then America will become a nation even greater in arts and learning and greater in the love and worship of the God who made us and who has blessed us as no other people on this Earth have ever been blessed.

But right now, I want to tell you something I've seen all across the country, and I see it here again today. To the young people of our country, let me say that you are what this election is all about.

You know, I got cut off, ran out of time, in the debate a week ago Sunday. So, I'm going to say here what I was going to say there. And that is, to the young people here today, your generation is something special. Your idealism, your love of country are unsurpassed. It is our highest duty to make certain that you have an America every bit as full of opportunity and hope and confidence and dreams as we had when we were your age.

Let me just speak to some others here. My generation -- and then there are a few other generations between mine and yours, you young people -- well, we in those generations, we grew up in an America where we took it for granted that this was the place where you could dream, and if you had the will and the desire and the energy, you could make your dreams come true.

You could rise as high and far as your own strength would take you. And this is the responsibility of all those several generations I mentioned, other than yours, the younger generation. We have a sacred responsibility that when the time comes for us to turn the reins over to you, we hand you an America that is free in a world that is at peace.

All of us together are a part of a great revolution, and it's only just begun. America must never give up its special mission in the world, never. There are new worlds on the horizon, and we're not going to stop until we all get there together. America's best days are yet to come.

I mentioned all those other candidates, those Members of Congress that are seeking reelection in this election year, and urged you to see that they return to Washington, and send them some more company and make Tip O'Neill unhappy. But, also, I've been trying very hard not to read the polls. And don't you read them. President Dewey told me we must never become overconfident.

But then I want to just ask you something else. You have honored me beyond anything I ever dreamed in my life, honored me by allowing me to serve you for these last 4 years. I ask you support. I ask for your votes and your help for 4 more years. [Applause] All right.

Q. Mr. President, Mondale said that the big themes of this last week are going to be that you don't care about the poor and the disadvantaged in this country and that you're going to get us nearer a nuclear war.

The President. Well, you know, some people in your profession rushed up to him, quoted something that possibly -- not correctly or out of context -- and he responded to that, but not to what was in the speech.

Well, a warm welcome to your mayor, Pat Pappas. Greetings to my good friend and your once and your future very great Governor, Arch Moore. I'd like nothing more than to work with Arch so we can see to it that West Virginia shares in the prosperity that is sweeping across America.

Republican opportunity team could do a lot for West Virginia. I ask you a favor for myself and for the people of West Virginia -- on election day, vote against high taxes; vote for creative jobs programs. Vote for growth and opportunity by sending John Raese to the United States Senate.

You know, the Senate is one key to continuing what we've begun. West Virginia has a fine tradition for rising above partisanship when the national interest calls, a tradition that's well represented by your retiring Senator, Jennings Randolph. John Raese has the qualities of leadership necessary to continue that tradition and to do what's best and what's right for America.

You know, I'm always happy when I visit this part of the country because -- maybe because you make me feel so much at home. You in West Virginia have always given our country more than your share of greatness and courage. Here is the steadiness of purpose, the fidelity to ideals, the love of country. And I want you to know that George Bush and I not only believe West Virginia is worth visiting and worth listening to; we believe West Virginia is worth fighting for.

Well, 4 years ago, that's what we did. We made a great turn. We got out from under the thrall of a government which we had hoped would make our lives better, but which wound up trying to live our lives for us.

But America is back. America is a giant once again, powerful in its renewed spirit, its growing economy, powerful in its ability to defend itself and secure the peace, and powerful in its ability to build a better future. And you know something? That's not debatable.

Yet 4 years after our efforts began, small voices in the night are sounding the call to go back. Go back to the days of drift, the days of torpor, timidity, and taxes. My opponent this year is known to you, but perhaps we can gain a greater insight into the world he would take us back to if we take a look at his record.

You know, my opponent said that decontrol of oil prices would cost American consumers more than $36 billion a year. Well, one of the first things we did was decontrol oil prices, and the price of gasoline went down 8 cents a gallon.

He says he cares about the middle class. But he boasts, ``I have consistently supported legislation, time after time, which increases taxes on my own constituents.'' Doesn't that make you want to be one of his constituents? [Laughter] He's no doubt proud of the fact that as a United States Senator, he voted 16 times to increase your taxes.

Now, this year, he's outdone himself. He's already promised, of course, to raise your taxes. But if he is to keep all the promises that he has made during this campaign, he will have to raise taxes by the equivalent of $1,890 for every household in the United States.

His basic plan has two parts: one, raise your taxes and the second, raise them again. But, you know, I've got news for him. The American people don't want his tax increases, and they're not going to get his tax increases.

Well, the last time we trusted the administration of which he was a part, they took five -- you can count them -- five different economic plans and nearly tripled inflation. And by contrast, we trusted the people -- you. And with just one economic program, we've cut inflation by two-thirds.

And I'm proud to say -- on another subject -- that during these last 4 years, not 1 square inch of territory in the world has been lost to Communist aggression. And the United States is more secure than it was 4 years ago.

But my opponent called what we did a violation of international law that erodes our moral authority to criticize the Soviets. Well, there's nothing immoral about rescuing American students whose lives are in danger. By the time my opponent decided that action was justified, the students were home a long time.

And then she returned, after that walk, to the space shuttle in which some of the great scientific and medical advances of the future will be made. Cures for diabetes and heart disease may be possible up there -- steps have already been taken to find that out -- experiments in technology and communication. But my opponent led the fight in the United States Senate against the entire shuttle program -- didn't want it even to begin, and called it a horrible waste. Well, we support the space shuttle, and we've committed America to meet a great challenge -- to build a permanently manned space station, and to do it within a decade.

I've been interested in some of the scare tactics that my opponent has been using. I've had the privilege in these 4 years of addressing the parliaments in several countries, both in Asia and in the United States. And in every instance, I took the opportunity to tell them that a nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought. And, yes, a nuclear freeze makes strength if it follows negotiations that reduce the weapons in the world down to a verifiable and equal level on both sides.

To you, the young people of this country, let me say that you -- you and your future are what this election is all about. Your generation is something special. Your idealism and your love of country are unsurpassed. I have seen this in meetings of this kind all across the country in this campaign. It's our highest duty to make certain that you have an America every bit as full of opportunity, hope, confidence, and dreams as we had when we were your age.

And that is, when the time comes to turn the reins over to you young people out there, we're going to turn over to you an America that is free in a world that is at peace. And your dreams can come true.

But I have been honored greatly by all of you in your allowing me to serve you for these past 4 years. And I ask for your vote. I ask for your support. I want to keep on with the job we started 4 years ago with that new beginning. I want it more than anything I've ever wanted.

You in our savings and loan industry, who do so much to help American families buy homes and cars, serve as pillars of your communities, and you certainly can all be very proud. And on behalf of the American people, I thank and commend you.

You know, just 4 years ago, we saw our nation staggered by a steady erosion of economic growth, punishing inflation and interest rates, a record peacetime tax burden, and rising unemployment. Retirement savings were devastated. In 1979 and '80 working Americans' weekly earnings declined in real terms by 8.8 percent. That was the worst drop since World War II. I know how hard your own savings and loan industry was hit with the housing market falling into disarray.

In 1980 the American people voted for a change, and when we took office, we made restoring our economy number one. Experts warned it would take 10 years to bring inflation down to the level of the 1960's. Well, we did it in just 2 years. It wasn't easy. And industries like your own faced hard times as we put a stop to economic chaos and laid the groundwork for a vigorous recovery. But today we've cut inflation by nearly two-thirds, all the way from 12.4 to 4.2 percent.

Interest rates have fallen by more than one-third. That's still not enough. A few months ago I went out on a limb with a prediction that we'd see interest rates drop again before the end of the warm weather. Well, we've had a beautiful Indian summer. And last Friday, the temperature here in town hit 75 degrees and the prime fell to 12 percent.

I don't want to make any more weather forecasts; but I do believe the financial markets are beginning to understand the depth of our commitment to the fight against inflation. This means interest rates should drop still further in the days ahead. And all those interest-rate sensitive activities like homebuilding and car buying will pick up and gather new strength.

From strength in autos and construction to renewed leadership in high technology, from a rebirth in productivity and surging investment to the creation of 6 million new jobs, America is in the midst of the best economic expansion in over 30 years. And your support has helped to make this possible. And I know that with your continued support during the next 4 years, we'll keep surging ahead.

I think our meeting today reflects what could be the beginnings of a new phenomenon observers have been noticing -- that is, if everything turns our right -- an historic electoral realignment. And to the degree that's happening around the country, much of the credit goes to people of courage and leadership, like all of you.

For longer than any of us can remember, the Democratic Party has held the allegiance of a large number of Americans who were not well-served by the policies of that party. Yet voting habits are hard to change. I know; I was a Democrat myself for most of my adult life.

I've been all over the country in these last few months, and I'd like to make a little prediction for you today. I believe that next Tuesday we'll see a large number of voters joining our Republican ranks for the first time.

Now this is no mere political cycle, nor has it anything to do with the personalities of the candidates. We're attracting the support of people who have never voted with us before not because they're deserting the Democratic Party, but because the Democratic Party has deserted them.

For far too long now, the other party has taken for granted many of those who have faithfully given their support. Big city machines kept in power by organized voting groups were key to Democratic victories over the years; yet did these people find their lives improved by their unquestioned loyalty to the party? It's no mere coincidence that the most blighted areas of the country, places of desperation, are areas that have been political strongholds of the other party for many years.

The leadership of the other party gave us economic decline and high inflation. We've cut inflation by nearly two-thirds and have set in motion an economic expansion that will make everyone better off. Over 6 million new jobs have been created and nearly 900,000 new businesses have been incorporated -- this latter figure in just the last 18 months.

And we offer innovative approaches to help the less fortunate. We've done our best to enact enterprise zone legislation which would channel resources and the creative energy of the private sector to those depressed areas that need it the most. The same politicians who so frequently use the word ``compassion'' have fought this idea and bottled it up in the House of Representatives.

Asia, or from Europe -- in my case, I guess it's Europe, Ireland and England -- we hold dear those ideas that brought our forebears here. We're bound together by a love of family and neighborhood and a respect for God. We believe in hard work and peace through strength. And these are not Republican values, these are American.

Our opponents don't seem to see things this way. They view our country not as people of varied backgrounds who share common values and aspirations; instead, they see us as warring factions and interest groups. They try to divide us, using envy, and playing people off against each other by telling us we're competing for a piece of a pie that is ever getting smaller. Well, that's not our way. We don't see people as members of this group or that; we see them as Americans, with all the rights and opportunities that go with being American.

We still believe in the dream that brought people here from every corner of the Earth. Today we're reaching out as never before to people from every background to draw them into our coalition for progress. Our message to America is clear and direct: The Grand Old Party now stands for the Great Opportunity Party. And there's plenty of room for everyone. We aren't writing any group off or taking any group for granted. We're asking all of you to come walk with us down a path of hope and opportunity.

Audience member. You deserve a noble praise, even though you are -- [inaudible] -- because all economists said that you were wrong. They must give you noble praise for making the economy look so better.

Mr. Rollins. Mr. President, we have some great Americans who are former professional athletes -- who've been part of the Athletes for Reagan-Bush and who've been traveling this country on your behalf -- to present you a little award this morning.

Good morning, and welcome to the White House for the signing of this bill that Bill has been telling you about -- the Trade and Tariff Act of 1984, a crucial piece of legislation and a triumph not just for freer and fairer trade, but for the legislative process itself.

Brock, our United States Trade Representative, rolled up their sleeves and went to work. In the words of an editorial in the Washington Post, ``Most of the bad stuff in the bill got thrown out, and all of the good stuff stayed in.'' And the result is a fine piece of legislation that stands foursquare behind free and fair trade.

We know that if America wants more jobs, greater prosperity, and a dynamic, competitive economy, the answer is more world trade, not less. And this fine legislation builds on the Trade Act of 1974 that was signed into law by President Ford. That act promoted world trade by authorizing the President to liberalize trade with poorer nations, to engage in trade with negotiations, and to defend American interests in world markets.

The legislation before us today advances each of those efforts. To name some of the central provisions: This bill will extend the generalized system of preferences into a new decade. By encouraging 140 of the world's poorer countries to build their economies through trade, this program will give them a chance to help their people benefit from America's powerful economic expansion. In turn, it will help American industry by ensuring that less developed countries accept increased responsibility in areas like the protection of patents and trademarks in the international trading system.

While promoting free trade, this new act insists on something just as important -- fair trade. A section of the bill originally known as Senator Danforth's reciprocity proposal gives the President new leverage to lower foreign barriers to trade, especially in the dynamic and rapidly growing areas of services, investment, and high technology.

With regard to our steel industry, this bill gives the President new authority to enforce agreements we may enter into with our trading partners as part of the steel policy that I announced on September 18th, 1984. This legislation will enable us to enforce steel export restraints, guard against unfair import surges into the American market, and help keep the United States from becoming the world's steel dump. And that means that we'll be better able to help our steelworkers get the fair shake they've always deserved.

To strengthen relations with one of our closest allies, the bill contains a bold new initative authorizing the establishment of a free trade area agreement with Israel. When concluded, this agreement will completely eliminate the trade barriers between our two countries, allowing the duty-free entry of Israeli products into the United States while making the Israeli market wide open to American goods. Over the past 5 years, our trade with Israel has been growing at an average annual rate of some 10 percent. This bill will enable that vital economic partnership to grow even faster in years to come.

The act also opens the door to discussions with -- or on mutual trade liberalization agreements with other countries. Fully consistent with our obligations on the general agreement on tariffs and trade, free trade agreements allow the free enterprise system to operate as it should -- openly and vigorously. And these agreements will encourage American and foreign producers and workers to become as efficient and competitive as possible, and they will foster increased trade in services and greater investment both abroad and here at home.

The bill that I will be signing also makes refinements in our trade laws designed to help America's producers and workers deal with unfair trade practices. On balance, these refinements should go far to strengthen American trade laws and make them more effective and fair. We'll make certain that they're used not for protectionism, but for the promotion of free world trade.

This Trade and Tariff Act of 1984 signals to the world that America does not fear free trade because the American people can produce and compete on a par with anybody in the world. The big winners today are dynamic new American industries, like telecommunications and high technology, American importers and manufacturers, and the American people themselves. Each of you has my heartfelt thanks and, more important, the gratitude of the Nation.

Friday, and talked by telephone to Mother Teresa, who has requested U.S. assistance for projects she has undertaken there. The President asked Administrator McPherson to call Mother Teresa and offer additional assistance which he did.

The pressing short-term constraint is the distribution of food supplies now in country. Limiting factors include the shortage of trucks, poor roads, the insurgency, and the lack of support by the Ethiopian Government. To deal with some of these problems we have in recent days been providing gasoline for some Ethiopian Government planes to move food in country and are working with some private groups to augment that effort. In our meetings with Ethiopian officials this week, we will ask for more trucks to be made available, for priority access to port facilities, and for assurances that food can reach victims in rebel areas.

For the medium term, Western food aid commitments will keep the pipeline of emergency food full to capacity. Between now and the end of the year, approximately 200,000 metric tons will be arriving. For the longer term, we are developing with private agencies plans for the distribution of an additional 200,000 metric tons, along with medicines, blankets, and other supplies. However, assessments of the need continue to rise, and the medium- and long-term requirements may increase substantially.

Basic to this whole effort is a more cooperative attitude from the Ethiopian Government and the dedication of more of their own resources. They reportedly spent a substantial amount for their Independence Day celebration, but have paid little attention to this problem. There are more than 6,000 trucks under government control for example, but only a few hundred are now available for emergency food shipments. However, we do sense some greater interest from them and we hope our negotiations this week with them will be productive.

I have nevertheless approved S. 771 because section 8 does not constitute an integral element of it. I strongly urge Congress to amend section 8 in such a manner that the Council will be reconstituted either as a governmental agency, the members of which will be appointed in a manner which conforms with Art. II, section 2, cl. 2 of the Constitution, or as a private, nongovernmental organization whose members do not have significant duties pursuant to a public law. Pending the enactment of such remedial legislation, I shall, pursuant to section 684, title 2, United States Code, defer any budget authority that might provide for any grants to the Council.

Executive Branch officials . . .,'' through procedures that bypass the constitutional requirements for valid legislative action. This important constitutional principle applies regardless whether the grant of such authority is intended to check or, as here, to facilitate, executive action. Because section 102(c)(2) of this act would authorize committees of the Congress, without participation by both Houses of the Congress and the President, to allow the Nuclear Regulatory Commission to implement proposed reallocations prior to expiration of the otherwise required waiting period, it does not conform to the requirements for legislative action articulated in Chadha. I strongly urge the Congress to discontinue the inclusion of such devices in legislation, because doing so serves no constructive purpose after Chadha beyond introducing confusion and ambiguity into the process by which the executive's obligations are discharged.

I am pleased to sign into law today S. 2217, the Tandem Truck Safety Act of 1984, which deals with commercial motor vehicle safety. My administration has consistently placed a high priority on safety in all forms of transportation. Since Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Dole's first day on the job, she has forcefully and effectively espoused the cause of motor vehicle safety.

Far too many lives are needlessly sacrificed annually on our nation's highways. We have taken dramatic steps to lower this terrible toll. For example, I recently signed legislation to encourage the States to enact the age-21 drinking laws to address the serious national problem of drinking and driving among our young people.

Today we turn our attention to another area that can result in great safety benefits -- the commercial motor vehicle industry. The continual changes the trucking industry makes to meet the Nation's diverse transportation needs present new challenges to maintain and enhance the industry's positive safety record. The trend toward larger commercial vehicles and smaller automobiles necessitates renewed attention to their operation on our highways. Two years ago we initiated the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program. This cooperative effort combines Federal and State resources to assist States to build and maintain strong and effective commercial motor vehicle safety programs.

The truck safety bill I sign today is an important piece of legislation that builds on this cooperative grant program. This bill will go a long way toward ensuring that our increasingly productive trucking and bus industries remain safe and become safer still. It also promotes uniform safety regulation of commercial motor vehicles by the States, thus reducing undesirable impediments to interstate commerce, and will assist in regulating the entry and ensuring the safety of foreign motor carriers. I believe this bill will give Secretary Dole and the Department of Transportation the tools needed to continue to improve safety on our nation's highways.

There is one provision in the bill that deserves clarification. I am signing S. 2217 with the understanding that section 209 of this bill does not purport to deny the Secretary of Transportation the ultimate responsibility for the selection and appointment of the members of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Regulatory Review Panel established by this bill. That ultimate responsibility must include the power to refuse to appoint any person submitted to the Secretary on a list by the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation or the House Committee on Public Works and Transportation, and to request the submission of additional lists if none of the persons appears suitable for appointment to the Secretary.

I express my appreciation to all the Members of the Congress, Secretary Dole, concerned representatives of the motor carrier industry, State officials, and all others whose cooperative efforts have led to enactment of this bill.

Space represents a challenging opportunity for the United States and for all of mankind -- a challenge that, I am determined, we will meet. We stand today on the threshold of a great adventure. Beyond are vast opportunities -- for the production of new materials, new medicines, and the expansion of our knowledge of the universe and of ourselves.

This must be a cooperative effort. We have worked with many other nations in our own space program, and this cooperation will strengthen and grow. Many countries have taken part in the successful Spacelab program, and I have invited other nations to take part in the development of a space station.

However, I have stated several times our desire to increase contacts with the Soviet Union, and we are prepared to work with the Soviets on cooperation in space in programs which are mutually beneficial and productive. As part of this effort, the United States has offered to carry out with the Soviet Union a joint simulated space rescue mission. We believe this and similar cooperative programs offer practical benefits for all mankind. It is in that spirit that I today sign this joint resolution.

I am pleased to sign into law H.R. 3942, the Commercial Space Launch Act. One of the important objectives of my administration has been, and will continue to be, the encouragement of the private sector in commercial space endeavors. Fragmentation and shared authority had unnecessarily complicated the process of approving activities in space. Enactment of this legislation is a milestone in our efforts to address the need of private companies interested in launching payloads to have ready access to space.

This administration views facilitation of the commercial development of expendable launch vehicles as an important component of America's space transportation program. We expect that a healthy ELV industry, as a complement to the Government's space transportation system, will produce a stronger, more efficient launch capability for the United States that will contribute to continued American leadership in space.

In developing the administration's approach toward encouraging this emerging industry, I have been guided by the belief that the procedures a company must comply with before being permitted to launch a launch vehicle or a payload were duplicative and should be streamlined and otherwise made efficient. H.R. 3942 has translated this objective into a comprehensive licensing mechanism enabling launch operators to comply quickly and efficiently with existing Federal regulations. This in turn will act as a signal to private launch operators that this administration stands behind their efforts to open up this new area of space exploration.

House Science and Technology Committee, and their staffs for their dedication and hard work in this accomplishment. Additionally, I want to thank Secretary of Transportation Dole and Jennifer Dorn, Director of the Office of Commercial Space Transportation, for the enormous amount of work they have already done to prepare for the responsibilities they will have under this historic legislation.

This Administration has a record of strong commitment to the support and conduct of biomedical research by the NIH. Each year since taking office, I have requested increases for biomedical research. In 1985, the NIH will receive its largest increase in appropriated funds in history. This increase will ensure the continued operation of the NIH for the coming year and will continue to assist in improving medical practice and the health of the American people.

Advisory Committee Act and Office of Management and Budget oversight. This represents an unwarranted interference with internal Executive branch management over the largest number of advisory groups for any Federal agency.

Moreover, S. 2574 would continue to increase obsolete Federal subsidies to health professions students and would maintain the static and rigid categorical framework to deliver such aid. The ability of medical schools to supply our society with health professionals has changed dramatically in the last 20 years. Today, our medical schools are producing nearly 16,000 new doctors each year. Although there may be some shortages of physicians and nurses in particular areas of the country, the Nation as a whole is facing a future surplus -- not shortage -- of physicians and nurses. Under these circumstances, S. 2574, a bill which continues excessive taxpayer subsidies to health professionals and maintains a rigid unworkable categorical framework, cannot be justified.

Administration's proposal for a single, omnibus reauthorization of all health professions authorities, which would permit maximum program flexibility to address current needs, the bill not only reauthorizes the existing plethora of narrow, categorical authorities, but also creates new programs. This approach to health professions training is outdated and fails to respond to the rapidly changing health care environment.

A more appropriate approach would recognize that the surplus of physicians has reduced the need for Federal financial assistance and would improve incentives for health professionals to locate in areas of the country where shortages exist. The Administration's health professions proposals would help meet these objectives.

S. 2574 would also repeal the Primary Care Block Grant authority -- a key reform proposed by the Administration and enacted by the Congress in 1981 designed to restore State control, strengthen administrative efficiencies, and improve the delivery of health services. Thus, this bill would reverse a successful trend of increased State acceptance of health care responsibility that the Administration initiated. The block grant programs for preventive health and health services and alcohol and drug abuse have been successful. The primary care block grant was made optional by the Congress, and States have been hesitant to accept it. However, to close out the option at a time when States should be willing to consider another step toward greater autonomy is counterproductive and unacceptable.

This bill contains numerous other provisions that are either unnecessary or unacceptable, including authorization for new Federal National Health Service Corps scholarships that are not needed, since the number of scholarship recipients already bound to subsidized medical practice in rural areas is adequate.

The purpose of the bill is to allow the Hartmanns to file an action against the United States, notwithstanding any other provision of law or order of any court or administrative body, with respect to damage suffered by them due to the rise in the water level of Avon Lake, Iowa, allegedly caused by the negligent design, construction, and operation of the Red Rock Reservoir and related levees.

Lakes. The geology of the area was reexamined and water levels were monitored. A casual relationship between the Federal project and the fluctuations in water elevation levels at the private lakes has not been established.

Second, over fifty years ago, when it was embarking on a major program to build flood control projects, the Congress established Federal immunity (33 U.S.C. 702(c)) against claims for incidental or periodic flood damages that might be associated with such projects in recognition that these projects yield broad and substantial societal and economic benefits for the country.

Over the years, the Executive branch and the Congress have viewed this immunity as essential to continued Federal involvement in the area of flood control. Contrary to this long-standing national policy, H.R. 452 would establish an undesirable precedent and grant preferential treatment to the Hartmanns over residents of the area who may have similarly suffered flood damages. The circumstances of this case clearly do not warrant special treatment for the Hartmanns.

Postal Service worker. I sympathize with Mrs. Christopher. The on-the-job injury to her resulting from an attack by a dog was severe, but I believe that enactment of this bill would set an undesirable and potentially costly precedent and would discriminate unfairly against the thousands of other postal workers and Federal employees who also incur job-related injuries.

Mrs. Christopher has received the benefits allowed to Federal workers injured on the job as provided by the Federal Employees' Compensation Act (FECA). The bill would waive the subrogation provisions of FECA, thus enabling Mrs. Christopher to receive and retain FECA benefits in addition to money recovered by her as the result of her private settlement with the owner of the dog. This would undermine the primary purpose of the subrogation provisions of the Act, which is to place the cost of compensation on the person or persons responsible for the injury and to relieve the taxpaying public of this expense.

The ACC, however, would be based on the discredited approach to youth unemployment that relies on artificial public sector employment, just as did the Public Service Employment program operated under the Comprehensive Employment and Training Act until it was terminated by Congress in 1981.

Government currently spends over $4 billion annually on land management. This amount is adequate to fund all activities needed to ensure the preservation of these precious resources for this and future generations of Americans. Any conservation project that could be performed by the ACC could be done better and for less money under existing programs, because of less overhead for residential centers and the greater productivity of existing workers who are already well trained. In addition, I have recently signed S. 864, which would expand the National Park Service's volunteer program, and allow such a program to be established in the Bureau of Land Management. Under these worthwhile programs, including those administered by the Forest Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service, citizens offer valuable volunteer services to assist the Departments of Agriculture and the Interior in the management of Federal lands.

Finally, while the three year, $225 million ACC authorization is itself unwarranted, it would almost certainly grow. The Youth Conservation Corps began in 1971 as a $1 million pilot program, and was subsequently given a permanent authorization of $60 million annually, notwithstanding its inability to provide enduring, meaningful benefits for the trainees or the public.

I believe that America's unemployed youth would be better served by reducing Federal spending so that more resources are available to the private sector of our economy to fuel a continuation of the current economic expansion that has added 6 million new jobs to the workforce over the last two years. If given the opportunity, the private sector is much more likely to offer young people promising career opportunities than temporary make-work Federal job programs such as the American Conservation Corps.

Title III of H.R. 5172 would establish a new program providing Federal financial support for a variety of research, development, education, and training activities, whose purported purpose would be to improve manufacturing technologies, including robotics and automation. These activities would total $250 million during fiscal years 1985 - 1988, and represent an unwarranted role for the Federal government. The decisions on how to allocate investments for research on manufacturing technologies are best left to American industry. It is highly doubtful that this Act and resulting Federal expenditures would improve the competitiveness of U.S. manufacturing.

The new role for the Federal government contemplated by Title III could also serve as the basis for a Federal industrial policy to influence our Nation's technological development. This Administration has steadfastly opposed such a role for the Federal government.

My Administration has fostered the development of a robust and improving economy, which will do more than anything to improve the growth and productivity of the industrial sector. We will continue our efforts to improve the general economy, the regulatory environment, and tax policies that are essential if U.S. industry is to remain competitive. I cannot, however, approve legislation that would result in significant Federal expenditures with little or no assurance that there are any benefits to be gained.

Absent a compelling showing that a substantial injustice would result from adherence to procedural norms, the limitations of the Indian Claims Act and the procedures adopted for the adjudication of claims under the Act should not be frustrated by special legislation, such as that contained in title II of H.R. 5760. No such showing has been made here.

Title II would interfere with the fair and orderly adjudication of the claims of the Navajo Tribe and would constitute an affront to established rules, procedures, and principles for the resolution of Indian claims. It could serve to encourage other and future efforts to obtain by legislation that which has been unattainable through adjudication.

We have here a representation of Hearst Washington personnel and a representation of our editors from around the country. Unfortunately, time and room would not accommodate all, but we appreciate the group that is here.

As a first question, Mr. President, I know that you are very carefully avoiding talking about a very major victory despite the fact that I'm sure you're confident of one. But my question has to do with, assuming that election and assuming it to be of significant proportions, what is your number one priority for a new administration?

The President. If there is, I want to continue with what we called a new beginning back when we started this last 4 years -- the economic recovery that we've had. And I want to continue on the road that we started in the international scene, which is aimed at peace. And that is the dual track.

Everyone seems to have overlooked in this campaign the fact that when we set out to rebuild our defenses, we said there was a second track of equal importance, and that was to engage the Soviet Union in legitimate talks to reduce weapons, particularly the strategic weapons. And while they've walked away from the table at this time, I can't believe they're going to stay away. I think its in their own interest to join us at that table again.

But the program that we started, which was based on the tax cuts to provide an incentive to get the economy growing again, the reducing of, first, the increase in Federal spending, which was at a rate of about 17 percent and is down around 6 percent now, to continue getting that down. And we have almost 2,500 recommendations by the Grace commission that we have a task force working on -- we've implemented some already that we've been able to do administratively; others would require legislation -- but to put those in place.

State was in a situation akin to what the present government of the United States has been. And we found that the advice that we got and the program that was put forward by all those volunteers -- leaders, business leaders throughout the State -- well, the same thing has happened here, only we've had 10 times as many at the Federal level, which is fitting, because California is only about one-tenth the population of the Nation -- recommendations that are simply based on putting modern business practices to work for government. And they worked. So, this is what we are going to do.

But for 50 years, the group and the philosophy that has dominated our government for most of that time has continued to tell us it doesn't mean anything and that -- well, my opponent right now in the campaign, if you look at his past, he upheld the deficits when he was a part of government.

But I believe that you get at that deficit by bringing government, as I say, back into government's proper functions and running it in an efficient manner so that it isn't running away out there beyond your revenues, and at the same time, practicing things like the tax policies that have brought about the growth.

Now, the deficit this year is down about $20 billion less than it was last year. And we look at that and how did it happen. And it has come about partly, some, because we never did get all we wanted in cuts, but mainly in the growth of the economy, the improved receipts, even with the cut in the tax rate, the amount of revenues are up. And we just -- we have to continue on that path and do more of it so it comes down faster than 20 billion a year.

The President. I would have to say -- and, of course, you know, I always get in trouble with this, because no matter how I try to hedge it and say I'm talking about if -- a real hypothetical ``if'' and a thing that I don't believe is going to happen. It would have to be the last resort, entirely.

But I don't see anything where tax rates, increasing tax rates and the threat they are to economic growth -- where that can be looked at as a legitimate solution. In the 5 years before we came here, taxes doubled in this country, and we had $318 billion worth of deficits.

So, I think that there were two things about the sudden increase in the level of deficits. Part was structural. It's been built-in over these 50 years in the Government, where the Congress would sit there and didn't have to increase the amount. It was already in law that it would increase. The second half of it was the recession that we went into.

Well, that had started in 1979. And when you hit bottom in that, you've got unemployed to take care of, and that increases government expenses. And you've lost the revenues that government was once getting from those people when they were employed.

Q. Mr. President, you have a vision of the future in which the American people could be defended against offensive nuclear weapons. Critics contend that if we develop an antimissile system, the Soviets will strive to catch up, and there'll be another costly arms race. To avoid that, to relieve the concern of our allies that the superpowers may control the skies, would you be willing to consider having all of the existing nuclear weapons powers -- that is, our allies, China, and Russia -- participate with us in joint research and development of a defense system that could conceivably save mankind from a nuclear holocaust?

The President. Well, I haven't suggested such a thing as that, but I know that it was my decision here and around this table with the Joint Chiefs of Staff -- the nuclear missile is the only weapon in the history of man that has never automatically created a defensive weapon against it. And I said, certainly, there must be a better answer than a deterrent, which is all we have now -- granted, it's worked for 40 years -- in which we say, if you do it to us, our strike against you will be more than you can afford.

But it seems to me much more practical if you could find something that kills weapons instead of kills people. In other words, we're sitting here -- if you really analyze it, we're saying that someday, if the Soviets attacked -- and we always say that, because I don't think there's anyone in America or there's ever been an administration in this country that has ever contemplated that we would make war -- start a war, make war on them.

We look -- and I told this to Mr. Gromyko -- that we look at them as the threat to us. And we think in terms of deterrence. But that deterrence is based on that someone would sit here where I'm now sitting and have to give the order that slaughtered millions of people on the other side. If they did, that's the only defense.

So, we were all in agreement that it was worth us starting out to find if we could find a weapon that could intercept those missiles, and intercept them thoroughly enough, not just like having antiaircraft guns. Some of the bombers always get through. No, to really stop them.

Q. Mr. President, the Kissinger commission, as you know, on Central America, said there were two basic underpinnings of the permanent state of unrest in that part of the world and that the Communists are sure to exploit. And one of these was the high population growth rate, which it said -- triple population in something like 30 years. And the other one was the decline in commodity prices and the continuing instability of commodity prices. Beyond trying to put into place such free-market elements as can be put into place in the region to address those questions, what specifically would your administration in the next 4 years do to address both problems; namely, the high growth of population in Central America, and the instability in commodity prices?

The President. Yes. Well, here again, I believe that that bipartisan Kissinger commission gave us a very workable program. Three-fourths of that program was aimed at the social reforms and economic reforms that are needed in so many parts of Latin America, particularly now, in this instance in Central America; and one-fourth to help them with their security so that -- such as El Salvador, where they're trying as desperately as they are to have a democracy, and to have an improved living for their people. You've got to protect them from the guerrilla forces, or provide them with the means of protecting themselves, is what we're doing, while they institute these reforms.

But it's akin to our Caribbean initiative. What we have to do is not just go there with aid -- which has been too much of our practice in the past. What we have to do is restore their economies, or restore -- I don't think they've ever had good ones -- give them a basic economy in which they can become self-sustaining and where they can, by their own efforts, begin to improve the quality of living for their people.

Yes, the poverty down there is what makes them subject to subversion from outside -- the kind that Cuba exports and the Soviet Union. And most of their revolutions in the past have simply exchanged one set of rulers for another set of rulers.

So, we're very serious about that plan, and we want to proceed with it. But it will be aimed at helping them. In the Caribbean plan, it grew out of a thing that we just started kind of, you might say, ad hoc, with the Caribbean, and that was -- I called some people in New York who've always been willing to participate in public affairs, and people of means in industry and so-forth, about looking at the Caribbean for investment -- to meet some of their problems by private investment in those areas. And they did a great deal of this. And from that we then came forth with the Caribbean initiative plan.

But I think this is the answer -- they've got to -- and then, well, the other adjunct to that, the birth rate -- we've been helping all over the world with information on family planning and so forth, trying to help other countries where they have this problem, which, once again, they can do it themselves.

Q. Mr. President, I have a question about your age. We've heard rumors about various problems that you have based on your age. We heard some very clever one-liners during the debate that I thought were some of the high points of the debate, as a matter of fact; but without resorting to one-liners, do you see age as an issue? Do you think age should be an issue? And are you willing, at any point in the next 4 years, to undergo any kind of competency testing or anything like that?

America. Even your harshest critics, at this date, going into the election, are conceding that your policy in Central America is working. Mr. Duarte has turned out to be a courageous leader for pluralism. Even in Nicaragua, where Commandante Ortega will undoubtedly be reelected, there is a resurgence of interest on the part of the people that is notable, through the efforts of Arturo Cruz and others, toward pluralism. And the atmosphere seems to be shifting dramatically, in large, due to your efforts. Would you envision -- or do you envision circumstances, therefore, in your second term, where it might be possible that you might open negotiations and seek for a renewal of friendship with Cuba? Might Cuba be to you what China was to Richard Nixon?

No, we won't close the door to that -- just as in Central America now, with Nicaragua. We've had a man meeting the Nicaraguan Government representatives and talking what is needed -- we're not -- this whole thing -- let's make it plain, and this involves the contras, too -- it isn't overthrow of a government. It is getting that revolutionary government to return to the principles of revolution that it enunciated when it was fighting the revolution, which was democracy, human rights, free press, free labor unions, and so forth.

But, yes, I don't know, when they're that indoctrinated and they don't change or give up very easily, I think that what we're seeing is a government very similar to that of the Soviet Union, where they're not about to make any changes that are going to eliminate their hold on all the power.

But you have to keep trying. And one thing out of this election -- the very fact that men like Cruz will not run, I think, has brought out into the open how much dissatisfaction there is among the people of Nicaragua with the present regime.

Q. Mr. President, the last couple of days Mr. Mondale has been advocating that something he would do would quickly move towards direct sea and airlift to relieve the starvation situation in northern Africa. Do you see any opportunity whereby the U.S. will be able to -- despite the Marxist regime there -- that we can do something about aiding more directly in that situation?

The President. We have been the single biggest contributor to Ethiopia -- $19 billion [million] last year, but we've upped that to $45 billion [million] this year. We've -- the total for Africa is about $173 billion [million] dollars. The problem I don't think has to do with -- that they're Marxists so much, as just the inability of their bureaucracy to function. Much of the food that we've sent there is still sitting on the docks. And we are working all the time, and holding meetings -- our people with theirs -- on trying to get them to assign more vehicles for transportation of this food and to get it moving better.

She has four locations where her nuns are there -- in Ethiopia -- and talks of the people that are coming there, and they just can't get the food. And I have called our aid group here and put them in touch with her about the location of those, and where -- how we can do this.

But we're working every minute trying to break this logjam. We've provided gasoline for their planes; we've done things of that kind. So, that is what has to be broken -- is just -- they don't have the infrastructure; they're not distributing what they're getting.

The President. Well now, I -- first of all, from the standpoint of a woman being a candidate -- high time. Fine. I wonder, though, if it can't be called a great breaking point, because if you look at -- well, in our own administration, here, the positions, the gains that have been made in our country.

I think the problem was here that in the selection, it was someone who had not gone out and -- well, for example, suppose there had been a woman candidate for the Presidency in their primaries and contesting, and then would be a logical choice, having presented herself before the whole electorate for the nominee as the Presidency -- to say that's who I want to be my running mate.

The other way it would be -- say, here's a woman that came up to the place where she's accepted in the eyes of the people as being under consideration for the top spot. And sure, she's a logical choice. And I wish it had been that way. You can't look at a Margaret Thatcher and a Golda Meir and, for that matter, an Indira Gandhi and say, why should we be so different.

But we've made such gains. I think part of them -- the Supreme Court now -- I think the Cabinet members that we have here. I think right now there are an awful lot of people in this country that would be ready to mark the ballot if Jeane Kirkpatrick ran for anything. She has become so respected and so popular throughout the country.

First of all, it wasn't that big a move. It was -- to an extent, it was a logical thing that is going to happen and -- whether this was the time or not. I guess what I'm saying is that that movement must be based not just purely on the sex of the candidate, but must be based, also, on the qualifications of the candidate.

Q. Mr. President, we've had a long tradition in this country of diplomats not getting involved in politics. And yet more than 20 Ambassadors appointed by you, including personal friends, have come out for Senator Helms, not for Senator Percy or not for other Republicans. Doesn't that bother you?

The President. Well, I'm not going to let myself be bothered by it. I was as surprised as anyone. I didn't know anything like that was going on or how it came about. Traditionally, I don't know whether -- I've never looked it up to see whether there was any politically appointed Ambassador before that ever participated in a campaign or not. We know that traditionally the Secretary of State doesn't, and the Secretary of Defense and the Attorney General. Other Cabinet members have always been accepted as legitimate campaigners.

Q. All right. If we're going to do one final, Mr. President, we've all been judging you and your opponent as the campaign has gone. Why don't you take a moment and judge us? What issues, if any, have not been articulated clearly to the American public during this campaign?

The President. I will tell you one. I said it in the debate the other night. I never said, and I never ever thought, and I would have thought anybody was crazy who did think that you could turn a nuclear missile around and call it back. I was talking about the submarines and the airplanes. And the funny thing is, since my opponent rushed forth with a quote from the press conference where that subject was discussed, I have had more people -- and I've seen more letters to the editor in papers on campaigning around the country that are saying, well, it's perfectly apparent seeing that he was talking about the submarines and the airplanes, not the nuclear missiles.

No, several days later, one fellow wrote a column and said I was so stupid that I believed that you can turn nuclear missiles around. And then it caught on. And I've heard them casually mention it on the air in talk shows over the weekend, members of the press saying the same thing. And, of course, Mr. Mondale picked it up and was off in full cry.

Emphysema and chronic bronchitis afflict ten million Americans. Asthma affects another seven million people, two million of whom are children. Before the end of this decade, lung cancer will have surpassed breast cancer as the leading cause of cancer deaths among American women.

The American Lung Association (ALA), through its community lung associations, continues the tradition started in 1904 of leading the effort to control and prevent pulmonary diseases. The ALA is this Nation's first voluntary, nonprofit public health organization. Formed originally to combat tuberculosis, the ALA, together with its medical/scientific arm -- the American Thoracic Society -- now has widened its scope to include all forms of lung diseases and its causes, including smoking, air pollution, and occupational hazards.

To help pioneer and develop health education and research programs aimed at better treatment and prevention of lung diseases, the ALA relies on the sale of Christmas Seals. The Association has used Christmas Seals since 1907 to raise funds through private contributions to continue its research programs.

Christmas Seals have enabled the ALA to provide many millions of dollars for research programs on the prevention and control of lung diseases. Christmas Seals also have allowed the ALA to conduct vigorous public campaigns against air pollution and cigarette smoking. The use of Christmas Seals on holiday mail is a visible reminder that chronic lung diseases remain a serious public health problem, but one that can be in large part prevented through research and public education.

Nation today. Approximately 11 million Americans suffer from this disease. Although careful treatment can control many of the short-term metabolic effects of diabetes, the disease is also associated with serious long-term complications that affect the eyes, kidneys, nervous system, and blood vessels. Physical, emotional, and financial consequences of this disease impose an enormous burden on its sufferers, their families, and the Nation in general. Diabetes-related health care, disability, and premature mortality alone cost more than $14 billion annually. The non-monetary costs are also staggering. Moreover, the prevalence of diabetes is increasing in the United States.

In recent years, there has been an enormous amount of progress in understanding, diagnosing, and treating diabetes. The National Diabetes Advisory Board, established by the Congress, has recently reported that ``Not since the discovery of insulin over half a century ago has the outlook for clinical advances in the treatment and ultimate prevention and cure of diabetes been as promising as today.'' Researchers continue to discover clues to the causes of this disease and its complications. New and better forms of treatment are being developed and tested.

However, basic biomedical research and its translation into clinical practice still remain the bedrock of hope for discovering the ultimate answers to this complex disease and its myriad complications. The Federal government, in cooperation with the private sector, is deeply committed to supporting basic research on diabetes so that we can conquer this major public health problem for all present and future Americans.

To increase public awareness of diabetes and emphasize the need for continued research efforts, the Congress, by Senate Joint Resolution 299, has designated the month of November 1984 as ``National Diabetes Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that month.

Hospice care is a humanitarian way for terminally ill patients to approach the end of their lives in relative comfort and dignity. Increasing numbers of patients have chosen to enter hospice programs in recent years because of the competent and compassionate care they provide outside of the hospital environment.

Hospices care for both patients and their families by attending to their physical, emotional, and spiritual needs. A team of physicians, nurses, social workers, pharmacists, counselors, and community volunteers work together to meet the needs of the terminally ill.

The importance of hospices as an integral part of our Nation's health care system is increasingly recognized. The growth of hospices was encouraged in November 1983 when the Federal government added hospice care to the benefits available to people under Medicare.

The Ukrainian famine of 1932 - 1933 was a tragic chapter in the history of the Ukraine, all the more so because it was not the result of disasters of nature, but was artificially induced as a deliberate policy.

The leaders of the Soviet Union, although fully aware of the famine in the Ukraine and having complete control of food supplies within its borders, nevertheless failed to take relief measures to check the famine or to alleviate the catastrophic conditions resulting from it. In complete disregard of international opinion, they ignored the appeals of international organizations and other nations.

More than seven million Ukrainians, and millions of others, died as the consequence of this callous act, which was part of a deliberate policy aimed at crushing the political, cultural, and human rights of the Ukrainian and other peoples by whatever means possible. The devastation of these years continues to leave its mark on the Ukrainian people and has retarded their economic, social, and political development to an enormous extent.

